Contents

Chapter 1

Chapter 2

Chapter 3

Introduction to the Astral Plane

Chapter 4

Chapter 5

Chapter 6

Chapter 7

Chapter 8

Chapter 9

Chapter 10

Chapter 11

Chapter 12

Chapter 13

Chapter 14

Chapter 15

Chapter 16

Chapter 17

Chapter 18

Chapter 19

Chapter 20

The Five Elements

Chapter 21

Chapter 22

Chapter 23

Chapter 24

Wizardry

Chapter 25

Chapter 26

Chapter 27

Chapter 28

Chapter 29

Chapter 30

Chapter 31

Classification of Demons

Chapter 32

Chapter 33

Chapter 34

Chapter 35

Chapter 36

Chapter 37

Chapter 38

A Treatise on The Hierarchy of The Abyss.

Chapter 39

Chapter 40

Chapter 41

Chapter 42

Higher Realms

Chapter 43

Chapter 44

Chapter 45

Chapter 46

Chapter 47

Chapter 48

Chapter 49

Astlanian Calendar

Chapter 50

A Treatise on the Nature of the Multiverse

Chapter 51

Astrology and the Elements

Chapter 52

Chapter 53

Animages

Anilords

Chapter 54

Animus and Mana

Chapter 55

Chapter 56

Chapter 57

Chapter 58

Chapter 59

Chapter 60

Chapter 61

The Council States

Chapter 62

Chapter 63

Chapter 64

Animages and Animagic

Chapter 65

Chapter 66

Chapter 67

Chapter 68

Chapter 69

Chapter 70

Chapter 71

Chapter 72

Chapter 73

Chapter 74

Chapter 75

Chapter 76

Chapter 77

Chapter 78

Chapter 79





Demons of Astlan Vol. 1:

Into the Abyss

By

J. L. Langland

Copyright 2014 J. L. Langland





Special Thanks and Dedication to:

Michael Begal, Jay Haesly, Sean Jones



For Maps, Details, History and more visit: www.Astlan.Net





Chapter 1


He wasn't really positive, but Tom was pretty sure that this wasn't what pot was supposed to feel like. He'd never smoked any before, but people had told him what it felt like and this wasn't it. The room was swaying around him and funny colored lights were dancing about the room. Which he thought, rather muddily, is what acid was supposed to do, not grass. His stomach was beginning to dance in his middle. He sat down on the couch behind him, rapidly. The room seeming to telescope around him, sounds and faces appeared as if through a very long tunnel.

"Whoa," was all he said as he sat down. This might not have been a good idea, thought Tom. He really shouldn't have let Paul talk him into it. In fact, as the colored lights began to obscure the entire room at the other end of the tunnel, he began to wish he'd never let Jack and Paul talk him into coming to this party. At the time though, it had seemed the best way to meet people. He'd only moved to Harding two weeks ago and he had been awful lonely until he'd met Jack and Paul at school last week. They'd convinced him to come to the party, and then convinced him to try one of the new joints Reggie had just bought in New York yesterday.

"Hey Tom, what's the matter? Can't handle a little good feeling?" asked one of the guys on Tom's left.

"I'm fine, just...thought I'd sit down and enjoy the...rush," lied Tom, trying to save face. The world began to spin. Voices filled the air around him. The partiers laughing and joking, the music rushing in waves upon his head. His whole body seemed to be undulating in time to the rather retro—almost trance or psychedelic like—rhythm that was gushing out the fourteen inch speakers in the corners. As he turned his head towards the speakers it was like the tunnel was a reverse megaphone or something channeling the sound; it made him even dizzier.

As the rush grew, the room and its occupants seemed to sort of fade from view, the tunnel dimming, turning gray. Within a few minutes he was unable to see anyone in the room, or the room itself, for that matter. He could feel it and the music, but colored lights swirled and danced around him as his soul seemed to expand and shrink around his body with the music. Voices seemed to come to him from far away, his `friends' making jokes because he'd apparently passed out. As the music and voices began to fade from his ears he slowly realized he could see again. It was weird though; through his eyes, or what he thought of as his eyes, colored lights still danced around him, but with what was almost like a second set of eyes he could see the party going on around him. The scary part, however, was that he wasn't looking at the party from the couch. He was watching from the ceiling above, and he could see his own passed out body on the couch below him. His face pale, the joint slipping from his fingers, his chest rising and falling with the beat of the music.

Paul bent over him, laughing, and shook him, trying to wake him up. Tom didn't feel a thing though. He could no longer hear any of the people at the party, but he could still feel the music, even though he couldn't hear it. The room began slowly receding, as if he were backing away from it like one of those expanding long shots in a movie where they zoom from street level to outer space.

Is this one of those near death experiences? Thought Tom. No, he could still see his body breathing, and he certainly didn't feel at peace. He felt sick and disoriented. This stuff was bad.

As he gazed at the ever more distant room, he realized that he could hear voices again. These, however, didn't sound like the voices at the party. They were chanting something in time to the music in what sounded like a strange foreign language, something similar to, but definitely not, Latin. One voice older than the rest seemed to be leading the chanting, drawing him on. In his mind he tried rotating his point of reference in the direction of the chanting. It seemed almost as if they were saying come to us, come to us. Hey, he thought confusedly, maybe these are the voices of the doctors trying to bring me back, I better go to them, I really don't want to die quite yet. He tried, sluggishly, at first, to move forward, towards them, through the soup of colored lights. The chanting grew louder and louder. Suddenly a face appeared right in front of him. It seemed twisted in a grim smile of triumph and determination.

It shouted in his mind, "NAME."

Tom was so startled by its appearance and by being able to understand the voice, he answered, almost unwilling, "Thomas Edward Perkinje."

The face twisted in, if possible, a more hideous grin of triumph. Tom suddenly decided, if that's what I'm going back for, I think I'll stay here. Tom recognized somewhere at the core of his being that the voice and face wanted nothing good for him. He rotated what he thought of as his body and began to flee from the face with all his strength. He ran on mental legs as fast as he could. Farther and farther away, he fled. As he fled, the voices became more and more insistent, demanding that he return to them.

He fled from them harder than he had ever run from the bullies in his old school, the ones that used to harass him because he wouldn't give them money. Tom was stubborn, his mother always said he was too bull-headed for his own good. Well, Tom was absolutely positive that he wanted nothing to do with that leering face. He ran on and on, refusing to give into the voices that called on him to submit, to return.

He felt what seemed to be cold hands reach from behind to try and grab at the center of his being. The old voice screamed at him, "Thomasedwardperkinje, by thy true name I command thee, submit. Your will is mine. I am thy master. Submit demon, submit!" For reasons beyond his grasp hearing his name and that command he slowed his flight. He didn't want to, but he couldn't help it. He was running as if through molasses, his legs slowing, the cold hands firming their grip upon his being. I can't run, thought Tom, so I fight. Without warning, and with all his will Tom slammed to a halt, spun his `body' around and threw something resembling a reverse spinning side kick, right into that hideous leering face. At the same time, he released a loud mental Kiya! at the face, he had no lungs to verbally yell, as his Tae Kwon Do instructor had taught him to do when kicking. His foot met resistance as it impacted with the face, but not solid contact. It was like kicking pudding.. His foot went into the face as his leg reached full extension, but to Tom's eyes it appeared as if his foot went through a hologram.

The face reared back in apparent surprise and possibly a bit of pain. Clearly, it had not expected the kick. Using the time to his best advantage, Tom did two rapid punches to the face, kiyaing twice. The face again backed off. The face was no longer grinning in triumph, now if anything it almost looked worse. It had grown solemn, serious and downright nasty. Tom decided that it was time to run again since the Tae Kwon Do only seemed to pause the man. He ran again; this time the molasses was not quite so thick.

"Urbido Dominae, triustrum" shouted the voices together behind Tom. "These are the rites of high binding let none hinder our task." Smoke was burning somewhere, noxious and heavy. It stunk of sulfur and rubber. His vision of the lights was becoming clouded. "Et servitus nostrus Dominae. Ekfeltos tral kiev. By the sigils of binding, we conjure thee Thomasedwardperkinje. The sigil and thy name bind thee to us. As Varn in the first millennia, we control thee Demon. Thomasedwardperkinje thou canst not escape." A glowing rune appeared in the smoking lights around Tom. Faces surrounded him.

The old face was behind the rune; to its left was a fat sweaty one. To the right, a middle-aged woman, lines of concentration etched on her brow. Beside Tom and behind him were arrayed the faces of young people. Most only a few years older than himself, some had fear in them, others showed nervous excitement. Tom spun around, seeking an opening in the circle of faces. There was none.

Up, he thought, I'm in a three dimensional space. Tom imagined himself fleeing upwards above the circle. This is, after all, a drug induced psychotic state; I can do what I please, thought Tom. His mental body flew upwards away from the circle. Behind him, he heard a grunt of annoyance.

"Necros filium spiratu. Thomasedwardperkinje thou art ours. Thou art bound!" Suddenly from the glowing sigil webs of yellow light shot out surrounding him, blocking his escape upwards. He was webbed in in all directions.

"Shit," said Tom in his mind. “Well, this is a dream, right? I may be whacked out of my head now, but I must still be at the party, these aren't doctors. They say if you wake up before you hit ground, you won't die from a dream fall, thus if I wake up they can't hurt me. Therefore I'll wake up.”

With all the strength he could muster, Tom tried willing his eyes open. He tried to feel the couch under his body, to hear his friends at the party. To fade from the net and return to his own body. He heard a young voice say, "What's it doing? It's fading!"

The old voice said, "Tricky bastard, it's got a body stashed somewhere on another plane and it's trying to return to it. Quickly Jehenna, put Orl wood on the brazier and do Kristel's Fourth Order Binding. I'll sever its cord."

Tom could almost imagine the feel of the couch below him and Paul's voice begging him to wake up. "Thomasedwardperkinje, altos novos ejnikrepdrawdesamohTsovon sotla Thomasedwardperkinje. By thy true name desist, halt and stop. I Lenamare the Great command thee." The old voice shouted. Green smoke began to twist around him, as it touched him he could hear a woman's voice entwined within it, which kept repeating his name and several unintelligible phrases. The green smoke bound him so that he could not move. His muscles, imaginary though they might be, were frozen.

The old voice rose in power. Words rolled through the multi-colored realm. Words that somehow managed to install loathing and a deeper fear in Tom than he thought possible. He had been convinced that he was already as scared as he could get. There was something in these words that installed a deep abiding dread in the very core of his being. He knew that these words were more terrible than anything yet spoken to him. After a few minutes of sounding more like distant thunder rumblings, distinct, if indecipherable words became clear.

"Umatrium seperatum crystum, sceptum Dictum Thomasedwardperkinje, Thomasedwardperkinje, Thomasedwardperkinje. Morium seperatum ce ist. Severance eternal, no more together. Depart thy vessel, leave it in peace. Ek filos, nor xastre, exodus corpum Thomasedwardperkinje, se Dictum ek flux. Supremum, deritivum nos treum, kris falthos reyen kryolbus. Se feat lux Thomasedwardperkinje." As his name was pronounced the last time, Tom felt a great ripping within himself. His heart, his brain, his mental/physical self-screamed. He felt raped, shorn, and destroyed.

Although his entire self-screamed in agony, nothing passed between the green ropes binding him. He did not move, he couldn't. He felt himself dissolving in upon himself. He felt weak and worn, he didn't even have the strength to hold himself together, he let himself melt and ooze. Yet he could go nowhere for he was tightly bound within the green smoke.

In unison all the voices began to chant loudly and triumphantly, for they knew they had won. "Thomasedwardperkinje, appear we conjure thee. Take thy true form, demon. In the name of Estrogal and Varn, Tamros and Uneseros, we command. Show us thy hideous true form, creature of evil. We command thee by thy true name; appear in this room, in this tower. Enter now this our domain. Your spirit is ours, come to us."

The old voice then rose above the rest. "Come demon. I Lenamare command thee. Reveal thyself before me, thy master."

In his mind Thomas saw before him an image from his nightmares, something from the fantasy novels he read and from the games he played. Yet the image before him was real, it was no drawing from a book, nor was it a fantasy creature. He saw it and feared it, yet was drawn inexplicably closer to the immense muscular red figure. All of the sudden his mind blanked and there was no longer the demonic image before him. His imaginary form screamed in agony. His soul twisted and contorted in ways not meant for mortal men. He flipped between here and there, now and then. His form stretched and contracted. It was one of the most terrible and painful experiences in his sixteen years.

Suddenly, he could feel stone beneath his hands. His eyes were closed; he was on his hands and knees. For the first time in what seemed like an eternity, he could touch and feel the world around him. At last, he was freed from the color world in which he had been. His head ached; his body, his true physical body, ached. It ached as if every muscle in his body had been pulled like taffy. He also felt weird tingling sensations all over; he just didn't feel right. He was also tired, bone weary. Tom sat there on his hands and knees, with his eyes closed, and rested, too tired to do anything, too tired to even think about where he was or what had just happened.

He heard a gasp from behind him, and a small voice from behind say, "We conjured that?" He was too tired to even think at what the voice was saying.

"Silence," Tom heard, physically, not in his mind, the old voice say. "Thomasedwardperkinje. I have summoned you here, and you are mine, you will obey my every command or you will suffer. Now I have no further use for you at the moment, so be gone until I summon thee."

Thomas opened his eyes to look at the hated voice. Before, however, he could raise his eyes to the person speaking; he noticed a pair of huge red hands with claw like fingernails on the floor before him. They were attached to the biggest forearms he had ever seen. His eyes followed the arms up to biceps, and then at this point he had to move his head down to trace the arms to the appropriately sized red gleaming body to which they were attached. With an incredible exhaustion and annihilating shock he realized that the gleaming red body was his. The horrible demonic image he had seen in his mind was himself.

With that thought registering on his mind, he felt rather than saw Lenamare twist his hands in an arcane gesture, and then the room disappeared.





Chapter 2


The demon disappeared from the center of the pentagram. Lenamare breathed a small sigh. "Well, students. I think that's enough work for one day. You may return to your studies now."

Lenamare stood calm and poised as ever as pudgy Trisfelt ushered his charges from the tower workroom. He avoided the glare coming from Jehenna standing near a brazier. Finally, all ten students had left and Trisfelt shut the door behind him as he left. Lenamare slowly stepped to his left and sat down in the wooden armchair that rested there. Now that the students were gone, he allowed his exhaustion to show.

Jehenna proceeded to douse each of the braziers in the five sympathetic pentagrams. She too was tired, unlike Lenamare who had done most of the work.

"That--was a bit much," said Lenamare.

"We were lucky, no more preparation than we had, and with a room full of students," commented Jehenna. To an outside observer her statement probably sounded like a neutral observation; Lenamare, however, knew her too well and thus felt the full brunt of her censure.

"Yes, well I certainly wasn't expecting to find an unbound demon today, let alone one of that power."

"So much for demonstrating the summoning of bound demons."

"Well, the students shouldn't have anything to complain about today. Quite strange to find an unbound demon so carelessly wandering around." Lenamare defended himself. He noted the twist in her mouth; she knew she had him on the defensive.

"As I recall, it's only the fourth one captured this decade," said Jehenna.

"Yes and probably the most powerful in at least 100 years. What I don't understand, besides the fact that it initially let itself go around unguarded, is why, when we first spotted it, did it appear as nothing more than a first order demon."

"I don't know, by its lights it only appeared a minor demon, yet when cornered we needed fourth order bindings to hold the creature. I am thinking that perhaps we shouldn't have gone after it."

"Do you think I would have knowingly gone after a fourth order demon, with a group of students and with no more preparation than we had. No, I was just so surprised to find any unbound demon out there, and then when I thought it was first order…well, how could I refuse the students a chance to bind a demon. As you said it is only the fourth one this decade."

"Well, they did get a lesson, we almost got toasted," replied Jehenna a bit more emphatically, but still reservedly.

"I was sure that it was first order up until it began to flee, then with its speed, I figured maybe second. Especially when it so readily gave its name."

"Then it turned and blasted you with an energy bolt, and then twice more."

"I must admit that somewhat took me off guard."

"’Off guard’ my ass. It damn near laid you flat. Don't lie to me; I was in the link next to you. I felt that blast." Jehenna’s concern for his well-being was showing through. Lenamare knew it wasn’t the student’s safety she worried about, but rather his.

"OK, so it did put a strain on me; but, I did manage to maintain my pose and concentration, and not reveal my weakness to the demon."

"Granted. I admit that if that blow had hit me directly, I might have faltered a little more than you did."

"Needless to say, that's when I first realized we had a higher order demon on our hands. However, by that point, as you well know, if we'd stopped, it could have come rampaging back on us and thrashed us severely. Our pentacles could never have stood against it, no stronger than the wards we had set were." He gestured to the six pentagrams on the workroom floor. As any observer could have noted, the wards were set to guard against bound demons and unbound minor demons, but not a major unbound demon. The room itself contained only the six pentagrams, five braziers within the five pentagrams sympathetic to the primary pentagram, the chair in which Lenamare sat beside a small table with chalk and a few vials of conjuration supplies. The walls were, as a matter of course, curtained solidly, so that the demon could not find a way out, or tell where it was in the world of men. "It was sheer providence that we had some Orl wood in the room and the few other supplies necessary for the fourth order binding."

"Actually, as to that, I am surprised we got it even then," commented Jehenna, "Its dodging upward, and then attempting to dematerialize from the astral plane, actually suggests fairly high intelligence. Why it didn't try a few other fourth order tricks, I'm not sure."

"That plays to my first question, why was it wandering around unguarded, posing as a small demon anyway?"

"To lure silly wizards into trying to capture it, so it could possess them?" suggested Jehenna.

"Well, if that was its game, it might have succeeded if any of the students had broken. Again, I'm mad at myself for not taking better precautions today."

"Well, luckily they didn't break, and there is no way for you to have anticipated finding an unbound greater demon." By this time, Jehenna had finished putting out the braziers and her internal fire seemed to be subsiding; she walked over and put her hand on Lenamare's shoulder; staring down at him the cold mage light hovering above their heads.

"The whole thing still bothers me; why did it act so confused about the whole thing?" Lenamare sighed, shaking his head.

"That, I have no answer for, so we won't worry about it for now. OK?" Jehenna asked, trying to put the matter to rest.

"If you insist."

"I do," and with that she kissed him on the forehead and left the room.





Chapter 3


At the party, Paul was freaking out. He had been leaning over Tom, trying to get him to come to. At first, he had thought Tom was joking, but when he noticed how pale his friend was he became worried. He shook and yelled at Tom to wake up.

Finally after several minutes Tom looked like he was about to come to, then the lights had flickered and the iPod spontaneously rebooted and the powered speakers turned off; Tom screamed and stopped breathing. Everyone had all gone wild then, as fast as they could Paul and Jack had tried CPR, but they had only seen it done, never actually been trained in it. Mike called an ambulance, and the entire party had stopped to watch them try to help Tom. It didn't do any good.

Now the ambulance was here and the police were on the way. The medics worked over Tom for a few moments and then decided there wasn't much they could do. He was dead. Paul and Jack cornered Reggie in the back room.

"What the fuck was in that joint you gave him, Reggie?" Paul demanded.

"Nothin’, the guy I bought it from said it was just a new special high grade shit grown in Puerto Rico. I swear! I don't know what happened." A terrified Reggie pleaded, he was scared to death someone would tell the cops he gave Tom the joint. “He was even smoking it out of this big ass old fashioned tobacco pipe when I met up with him. Or that’s what he said he was smoking.”

"Are you sure, cause if you're lyin’, I'm gonna bust your balls and turn you into the police for murder. Tom is dead because of your fuckin’ shit," raged Jack.

"I swear to god, man. I didn't know. I had part of one this evening, it had an incredible high but otherwise seemed perfectly normal to me, I didn’t pass out or anything. Please, I swear to you, I didn't put anything in the joint. You've gotta believe me."

"What are we gonna do?" Paul asked Jack.

"Shit, I don't know. You got any more of those damn joints?"

"Yeah, sure, four. Here." He handed four joints to Jack.

"Anyone else smoke this shit?" asked Paul.

"No, I swear."

"What do we do?" asked Paul.

"Let's just flush 'em and ride it out, it's all we can do. Pretend he had a heart attack," Jack answered.

"I hope it works," said Paul.

"So do I. So do I."





Introduction to the Astral Plane

By Ase Onan Archimage of Turelane 1334-1362 Ani Chronia

WARNING: The following treatise is intended only for those skilled in the Wizardly Arts. All others shall most assuredly be stricken with befuddlement and confusion.

The Astral Plane is a plane of spirit and energy. It is completely unlike the planes of men. The wizard (or other spell user) journeys there in spirit form (raw animus). Only the caster's spirit goes, all of his or her material possessions remain on the planes of men with his or her body.

On the Astral Plane the caster's spirit is attached to his material body by what appears to be an umbilical cord of a silvery colour (thus called the Silver Cord). This cord is not in fact unique to the Astral Plane, the silver cord is an extension of the network that attaches or anchors animus to the body. If a wizard were to use the spell Anima Travel, to travel in spirit form in the planes of men, the silver cord would still connect the caster's animus to his or her body. This silver cord is the life link. If it is cut, or severed, the owner of the silver cord has some severe problems. Certain spirit and demonic creatures may damage or sever the silver cord as may some magic artifacts and certain spells. If the silver cord is damaged, the caster should return to his or her body for 24 hours to let the silver cord 'repair/restore itself.'

The Astral Plane itself is rather disconcerting to the novice visitor. There is no 'ground' on the Astral Plane, nor is there an up or down. It is just a vast space, apparently without gravity (but since everything is spirit there, how can one tell?). The Astral Plane appears to be filled with a glowing multicoloured vapor or mist. There are large brightly coloured regions of mist of all imaginable colours; there are even a few colour empty regions, simply white. Because of this 'mist' visibility is not far and orientation in the Astral Plane is hard. Generally, one needs some form of spell or device to provide directions.

What purpose does the Astral Plane serve? It is not completely clear to most scholars, but apparently, the Astral Plane is a nether ground, or highway, between the planes of existence. Only spirits may traverse it, and most religions believe that the spirits of the dead must cross it to reach the home planes of their various deities.

What is known is that various creatures, many of which are of malevolent natures, roam the Astral Plane. It is well known to wizards that demons frequent this plane. It is in fact on the Astral Plane where wizards find new demons that have never been bound before. What these demons are doing there is not clear, but they often wander freely on the plane. Spirits of the dead and all sorts of other spirits traveling between the planes of men and the planes of gods also travel there.

In principle, deities may also wander this plane, but none has ever been recognized, or at least categorically recognized by any wizards. Clerics and priests will make all sorts of claims, but their views are typically biased by their religious fervor.

On the Astral Plane, spells that require material components will not work, unless the spell is specifically designed to use material components on the planes of men and effect the Astral Plane. Further spells that rely on physical effects to produce damage have no effect on the Astral Plane, since there is nothing physical to effect. Energy based spells, such as lightning and fire based spells, do work, but they do significantly less damage than on the Planes of Man. Only pure energy spells or spells oriented towards spirits will do actual damage. Spells of an indirect nature, that do not rely on physical effects, nor do direct physical damage, work normally.

If one knows where one is on the Astral Plane, relative to the Planes of Man, then in principle it is possible to effect the Planes of Man with some spells from the Astral Plane. The difficulty lies in having a clue as to the correspondences, and getting any information about what is happening on the planes of men.

The only wizard spell to really provide such information is my own mentor’s: Aerelion's Astral Seeker. The Seeker will seek out an individual on the Planes of Man, from the Astral Plane. This spell will allow the caster to attack the target's animus on the planes of men from the Astral Plane.

If the silver cord is severed while on the Astral Plane, the spirit is basically stuck there. Unless the caster has some means, spell or otherwise to form a new body on the Planes of Man, or receives help from another, he or she is stuck for eternity. On the Astral Plane, animus will not dissipate, unlike on the Planes of Man, however this only means the individual is stuck there until the end of time. His or her body on the Planes of Man will die within a few days, depending on the strength of the individual’s own Animus.

Of course, at such a point one is basically dead; in theory, if one’s religious contracts are in order, it should be possible to somehow get to one’s reserved afterlife in the Plane of one’s particular deity or pantheon. However, exactly how that works, or how one locates said plane is beyond not only the scope of this text, but also the purview of Wizardry. Please check with one’s preferred priest or cleric for more information.

In any event, this severing on the Astral Plan may or may not be preferable to having one's silver cord severed while traveling from one's body on the Planes of Man. When this occurs, the spirit is in real trouble and will immediately need to find some means of protecting itself or it will be dissipated back into nature. The body will die in the same time period. A spirit whose Animus dissipates into nature, cannot be reincarnated or raised, or resurrected by normal means. Only extremely powerful cleric invocations can bring the individual back.

An individual, whose spirit is trapped on the Astral Plane, can usually be contacted, by the appropriate, speak/commune with dead/spirit type spells. Which brings up an unpleasant point for most self-respecting wizards. If one is in one of these situations, often times the person best suited to help the individual is a highly experienced necromancer. Of course, such help may be worse than no help; but necromancers specialize in securing spirits on the Planes of Man. Naturally, there would be a steep price, in many ways, for dealing with such an individual. Slavery to the necromancer as an undead creature, being only one possibility.





Chapter 4


The world blinked. Slowly. Sort of like a Broadway play where the lights fade out on one scene and then fade back in on another, say on a different part of the stage. Except, Tom was at the center of the lighting and it was the world that faded out and back in again. He was still on his hands and knees on stone: rough, raw, natural stone, not stone flagging like in the room with the psychos.

He was dizzy. He needed to catch his breath; except that, he just realized, he wasn’t breathing! Tom quickly inhaled. Hot, dry, very dry air filled his lungs and he breathed out again. He wrinkled his nose the smell of rotten eggs in the air; was that sulfur? Shit, he wasn’t breathing again! He forced himself to breathe again; if he didn’t think about it, he didn’t breathe! Well that would make life difficult! How was he going to sleep?

The next thing Tom noticed was a huge cliff to his left and a stone cliff wall to his right. A curved stone cliff for that matter. The ledge was curving around a stone cliff. He looked up…and up…OK that went up dizzyingly high; and it was cylindrical. He glanced over the edge to his left. He pulled his head back quickly. The drop was every bit as bad downwards as upwards. He thought he saw ground below, but there were clouds, dark grey clouds, below him, and flames. Fire? The ground below seemed to have molten lava on it and jets of flame that were shooting up hundreds if not thousands of feet in the air.

Whoosh! Went a loud noise off to his left; he turned his head to see a ball of fire expanding into the thin air and then contracting and disappearing. As he looked around, he saw other fireballs expanding and contracting randomly out of nothing. What the hell?

Hell? Fire, lava, flames, sulfur? Was he dead and gone to hell? Tom felt light headed. He must have forgotten to breathe again. He resumed breathing; he tried to breathe through his mouth to avoid the nasty stench in the air.

Tom shook his head and stood up. Or rather, he tried to stand up; he had to catch his balance on the stone column beside him. He was a bit unsteady. He looked down at his legs. Oh shit! They were the same legs he’d had in the room with the psychos! Hooves, he fucking had hooves! Like a goat! Concentrating on his feet, it felt like he was standing on his toes, but his toes were cloven hooves! He had like two toes on each foot and they were all nail! Or, mostly all nail, he closed his eyes to try to feel them; tapping his toes on the stone.

No, he had toes; it was just that what felt like his toenails surrounded each of his toes. He wasn’t standing on his toes, he was standing on his toe nails! That was weird. He looked down again, so what looked like his ankles were really the balls of his feet. His feet felt weird, he flexed and twisted them. It seemed as if there were a lot fewer bones and tendons in his foot. That would make sense with only two toes. His hooves were probably eight inches in diameter, huge! His foot was nearly as big around, but it was at least two feet long and since he was standing on his toes, his feet were arched upward and backwards towards his ankle which was probably 12 inches off the ground between his long feet and rather tall hooves.

His shins were bent back, as one would expect for standing on one’s toes, perhaps 2 and half feet long they came forward to his knees, leading into massive calves. As his heels were probably 18 inches behind him, his knees were nearly two feet in front of him and his thighs rose like mighty trunks coming into his hips more from the front than straight down. It was as if he were crouching. His thighs were easily three feet long and certainly over 18 inches in diameter at their thickest point.

Holy Shit! Nestled between his thighs was a third leg! At least that’s what Tom thought at first. His manhood was huge! If someone were to say he was hung like a horse, he’d have to consider that an insult! He was not aroused, yet the appendage was at least eight inches in diameter and eighteen inches long. His penis hung down half way down his thighs; or would have, except it went straight down. He was also uncircumcised. That struck him as odd and disconcerting suddenly. Why would that be odd compared to the rest of this? His testicles, for example, were larger than softballs and hung almost as low as the head of his penis! That thing was a weapon!

His pubic hair was a thick wiry mess of black hair. Actually, that was the first hair he’d seen. The skin on his legs was thickly scaled. He rubbed his thighs. The scales were very hard almost like armor plating, with small hairs around the edges of the scales. Tom shook his head in shock. This was unreal.

Of course not as unreal as having a twelve pack of abs! Jesus Christ! His abs were insane, there weren’t that many abs on a human body, were there? His serratus muscles on his rib cage looked like speed bumps. His pectoral muscles where huge red slabs with large thick nipples. He flicked one and nearly curled over in pain/pleasure. Clearly very sensitive.

He lifted his left arm, noting that his upper arm was now larger than most men’s thighs. In fact, probably larger than every human man’s thighs! He flexed; his bicep expanded into a giant mound. The scaling on his fore arms seemed a bit heavier than on the rest of his upper body. His lats were god awful huge though, making it so that his arms, when lowered, were some ways from his torso.

Tom paused. While peering under his arm he noticed movement behind him, sort of like a flag in the wind. There wasn’t much wind up here, so what was the flag moving to? Well, now that he thought about it, there was a slight breeze behind him. He turned his head to peer over his shoulder.

Christ! There was an absolutely huge pair of bat like wings rising from a mound of muscle between his shoulder blades! No wonder his deltoids were so far apart! He had wings! Giant, huge, freaking bony, like bat wings with a thick webbing between the ‘fingers’ of his wings. He concentrated. It took some mental locating, but he fairly quickly found that he could stop the wings from fanning him and expand and contract them.

He had no idea how long he spent playing with them. It was so weird to have new appendages! It just felt completely bonkers! Like having a second set of arms or something. Hot damn! Something slapped against the back of his thigh. He twisted down and around to look at what had hit him.

Holy fuck! A tail! Another freaking appendage! He had a tail! He reached behind to grab it and yelped in pain as his finger nails; or finger claws, he guessed, pinched his tail. With his right hand holding his tail he took a closer look at his left hand. Shit! His hands were unbelievably huge and gnarly and rather than normal finger nails, the ends of his fingers were shiny carbon black curved spikes that felt attached to his finger bones. The nails were probably nine inch long on average, quite thick and very sharp.

They’d be great for picking his teeth Tom thought. He ran his tongue over his teeth! Shit, that was weird! Wait! Stop, one weirdness at a time, Tom thought. Tail first! He returned to looking at what he could see of his tail.

It was attached, naturally, to his tail bone and felt about 8 inches in diameter as it existed at the top of his butt crack. It tapered down over about a five foot length to maybe two inches in diameter, before what appeared to be a spade like, boney, or rather, nail like, end point. The spade shaped nail was probably eight inches across and about the same length. If it were as sharp as his nails, it would hurt. He whipped his tail against his heel. Ack! Yes, that hurt.

Hell. This was too much! He ran his tongue over his teeth again. His teeth were really long and really, really sharp, it was like a mouth full of fangs. There were a few molars that he could feel in back, but that was it. He reached up and grabbed a tooth in his mouth. Hell! That was a very sharp spike of a fang. The front two thirds of his mouth seemed to be full of nothing but spikey fangs! His tongue whipped against his finger. His eyes widened as he suddenly realized why his tongue had felt so weird at first; it was forked! He had a forked tongue.

Tom shook his head and brought both hands up to feel his face. His mouth and nose protruded a bit from his cheek bones; that’s how he could have so many spiky fangs. His nose was right above his mouth, sort of like a dog’s snout, but not so pronounced. Feeling the rest of his head, he confirmed that the image he’d seen in the misty place was accurate. He was bald, had long pointy ears and a set of horns that could gore a bull. They felt like immobile parts of his skull and bracing his very thick neck; he couldn’t budge the horns or his head when he resisted.

He tried to recall the image he’d seen. Assuming that was accurate, he had large cat like eyes and the horns were the same shiny black as his nails and the spade on the end of his tail. How tall was he? Based on what he could guesstimate and how big he’d felt in the room, he had to be well over ten feet tall. He stretched his wings; he had a wingspan of maybe twice his height? What twenty feet?

Tom shook his head and realized he’d stopped breathing again. He really needed to stop forgetting to breathe. He shook his head. This was just insane. It was too much to process; he was in sensory overload. He closed his eyes to try and calm himself. He needed a moment to get his thoughts together, to make sense of this insanity.

He didn’t get it.

“What did I tell you? I felt the plop!” A high pitched voice squealed excitedly behind him.

“Yes, yes, you did. You do have a good sense for these things. I’ve never denied that, dear fellow!” Another voice replied with a distinctly British accent.

Tom whirled to confront the voices and nearly lost his balance. He grabbed at the stone wall beside him and heard the nastiest screeching noise, like fingernails on a chalkboard as his hand dug into the stone of the wall. Literally, he’d clawed his fingers into solid stone.

There were two…two…somethings behind him. The one that was more human looking was wincing in apparent discomfort from the sound of his claws in the stone.

The wincing, fellow, demon, creature? Was quite ugly. And little. Or rather, about half Tom’s height, so probably human sized. On better inspection, he actually seemed quite humanoid. He was, like Tom, naked; and he had very long prehensile feet, very long fingers, a tail not unlike Tom’s, bat wings, horns and red skin. Other than that he looked mostly human, ugly human, with sharp teeth, very sharp teeth. Oh, and he was wearing a monocle. That seemed odd.

“Greetings, fellow comrade in eternal servitude!” The fellow shouted. “It appears you gave somebody a good fight, or maybe fright!” The little demon flew up to the ledge; Tom stepped back for him to land; only at the last minute did he realize it might not be a good idea to let a demon land on the ledge with him.

The little demon landed and effortlessly stuck out a hand with a slight bow. “How do you do? Bogsworth’s the name; however the local chaps call me Boggy!” Tom shook the little demon’s hand being careful not to crush it.

“Uh...Tom.” Tom responded.

“So Uh Tom, you just get here?” Boggy asked. A loud buzzing sound came from above them.

“You know he did! I told you the moment he popped up.” The shrill voice said angrily, or at least Tom thought it was angry. “You can smell the Mana just dripping off him! It’s like butta!”

Tom did a double take; the shrill voice had suddenly changed in midstream to sound exactly like a yenta from Queens. He glanced up to see a very bizarre demon. This demon was sort of splotchy greenish and flying with his stomach to the ground; he had four arms and four legs, all mostly human looking; just a lot of them. He also had two sets of pectoral muscles, two sets of lats, and two sets of male genitals. Tom looked away quickly; he really didn’t want to explore this demon’s undercarriage. The demon also had a double set of wings, or at least Tom thought he did, they were moving very fast, like a hummingbird or something.

Boggy just chuckled. “Yes, Tizzy, you did indeed; you are correct; as always.” He shook his head and waved at the little demon with a smile. “Tom, it is my pleasure to introduce my partner, Tisdale! Or Tizzy for short!”

“Are you calling me short?” Tizzy asked waving what appeared to be a curved long stemmed old man’s pipe in his lower left hand. Boggy just rolled his eyes.

“Partner? Are you married?” Tom asked.

Boggy blinked a couple times trying to parse Tom’s question. Tisdale just burst out laughing and suddenly crashed into the side of the spire they were standing on and slid down to the ledge laughing.

Boggy was looking quote perplexed. “Uhm, partner as in business partner, associate, best friend, bosom buddies, what all?”

Tom winced, “Sorry, it’s just where I come from well…never mind…” He’d put his foot in it damn fast. It probably wasn’t a good idea to call a demon gay.

Boggy twisted his head to stare at Tisdale. “What exactly are you cackling about?”

“You. Tom apparently comes from a plane where people of the same sex can be married! He thought I was your wife!”

“Dear lord!” Boggy exclaimed.

“Sorry…I didn’t meant to…” Tom started to apologize; Tisdale started laughing some more.

Boggy shook his head and smiled. “Never mind, dear boy. No offense here; I’m just a bit of a fuddy duddy. Where I came from, such a thing was unthinkable and made absolutely no sense. But, of course, being here, when it comes to sex, pretty much anything goes. I suppose if a demon wanted to get married they could, but it’s just not something we do.”

Tizzy had climbed back to one set of feet and then launched himself back into the air with a buzz. His shape was a bit awkward to rest easily on the ledge. “So, Tom,” Tizzy asked as he rotated in mid-air to face Tom. “Do you like our little home away from not home?” He spread his hands to indicate their surroundings.

“Uhm, nice, I guess.” He didn’t want to risk insulting anyone again.

“Think so?” Tisdale asked. “I think it shits.”

“Never mind him, he thinks everything ‘shits.’” Boggy told Tom. “Actually, I think it grows on one. You get used to the flames and the adventure…”

“And it beats the HELL out of the alternatives…” Tizzy cackled. He stuck his pipe in his mouth and wiggled his eyebrows in a weird leering sort of way.

Boggy rolled his eyes again. Tim spoke up. “So where exactly is here?”

Boggy paused and tilted his head “Well now, that’s a bit hard to say….

“Basically it’s about two planes below Astlan,” Tizzy interjected.

Boggy sighed. “Which does not tell you much if you don’t know where Astlan is, now does it.” He gave the hovering demon a glare.

“But it does if you do.” Tizzy retorted.

“Yes, but I bet Tom doesn’t know, does he?” Boggy looked inquiringly at Tom. Tom shook his head no. “See, I told you.” Boggy told Tisdale.

Tizzy pouted. “Ok, got me there.”

"Now, Tom, just exactly which plane are you from?" asked Boggy.

"I don't know." Tom had no idea. He was, of course, familiar with the concepts of multiple planes of existence. He had read too many fantasy and science fiction novels not to be; nonetheless, the knowledge that there actually were such planes, at least in his drug-induced hallucination, was still a bit hard to handle, although it should have been obvious, since he wasn't on his own world. Obvious? About the only thing obvious was that he was on one serious ass trip!

"Now that makes it difficult. What did you call your world?" Asked Boggy.

"Earth."

"Earth! It figures. Six out of ten worlds call their planet Earth," complained Tizzy. “Might as well call it Dirt!” The hovering demon twisted his head and frowned as if thinking hard, “Hmm, why don’t they call it Dirt? Why do we call the ground beneath our feet earth rather than dirt? I mean of course, some people do call it dirt, but when being prosaic they always say earth and not dirt? Earthenware for clay pots and such, not dirtware.” He removed his pipe and closed his eyes, tapping his skull with the stem of the pipe. “Hmm, and there are Earth Elementals but not Dirt Elementals, yet on the other hand there are Dirt Devils, but those aren’t actually devils, nor demons, nor actually living creatures per se as far as I know at least. Not that I think I’ve ever saw one but…’’

“Ahem.” Boggy coughed, interrupting Tizzy’s stream of conscious external dialogue. Tizzy shut up and just smiled brightly at Boggy.

"Never mind then, where did you live on this Earth, what was the major world power?"

"I…lived in Harding, New Jersey; the United States was one of the major powers, along with China and I guess Russia or the former Soviet Union. But…”

"But what?"

"What does it matter to you? I mean, why would a demon be interested in that...I mean, I'm sorry but I doubt you've been there?"

You haven't looked in a mirror lately have you?" asked Tizzy, laughing. "You ain't no Apollo yourself, you know."

"Don't mind him, Tom. Of course, you wouldn't know. You see none of us are exactly demons, in the sense you mean."

"There's only one sense, and we're demons, yep, that's what we're called and that's what we are," contradicted Tizzy. He stuck his pipe back in his mouth. The way he waved that thing around, there couldn’t be anything in it or it would have spilled out by this point.

"Be quiet, Tizzy. He is, of course, sort of right. You see we are all demons, now, but we weren't always. Everyone here once looked different, most were human, but not all."

"Not all, definitely not all, and some definitely not now," interrupted Tizzy.

"Anyway, we've all been snatched one way or the other from our home worlds, and forced to serve in Astlan and live here. I'm sure this is your case, right?"

"I guess; I really don't know what's going on," answered Tom.

"Well, try and see if you can tell me what happened."

Tom wasn’t sure he should trust this rather weird demon, but he certainly seemed a lot better than that Lenamare fellow. Plus he needed to talk to someone about this, to help make some sense of it.

"Well, one moment I had been at a party that I really didn't want to be at, then I was smoking a joint my friend had given me. The next thing I know I am floating off in a bunch of colors sicker than ever. Then suddenly, I’m being assaulted by a bunch of goons trying to grab my soul or something, They keep chanting at me to submit to them. I tried to run, and when that didn't work, I tried to fight; when that didn't get me very far, I tried running again, but they caught me. I went through an awful lot of pain and then found myself on the floor of a stone room. Then these people threaten me, and dismiss me, and here I am on this rock looking like this, and here you come."

"Yep, that sounds about right. You see, like I said, we've all got similar stories, and we all got snatched up into slavery." Boggy told Tom.

"But why? Why do these people do this, and why do we have to look like this, and how do they do it?" Tom's head was full of a million questions.

"Why, well…it's kind of like they don't know what they're doing.” Boggy explained. “They can, by means of their spells, reach out into the Astral Plane. Unfortunately, this kind of screws up their vision, so they don't seem capable of distinguishing anyone other than people from their own plane, or planes very similar to theirs as being people.

“Everyone else they just see as a bunch of lights. From their history they interpret these lights as being demons, especially when considering the process by which they do this, it reinforces their beliefs. When they reach out and grab you and bring you to their world, it takes several people and a lot of willpower and a ton of Mana, magic energy. In the process, they mold the form you take in their world by their expectations of what they think you look like. In other words, they expect demons to have horns and tails and be hideous, so when we come onto their plane, that's the incarnation we are forced to take."

"You mean, they thought I looked like this, so I do?"

"Essentially. However, the party entering the plane also influences the form, so that for example, a complete alien, non-humanoid would manifest differently. They name us demons, so the form you get is their image of a demon, mixed with the image that the demonized person has of a demon. Thus alien demons, look like really weird demons, i.e. non-anthropomorphic demons."

"Yeah," was all Tom could say.

"I realize it's probably a bit much to take all at one time; but don't worry, you'll figure it out," Boggy consoled.

"So, what exactly is the story…now that they've...well, caught me?"

"Basically it's eternal slavery." Tizzy spoke up.

"Eternal?"

"Well, you see, we're not actual physical or corporeal beings anymore, basically just energy patterns, thus we can't really die." Boggy added.

"Cept if were disrupted, destroyed or obliterated," interjected Tizzy.

"OK, we can be killed by certain devices, spells and etcetera, but we won't die of old age," amended Boggy.

"If I'm non-corporeal--without a body...where's my body at?" Tom asked, very suddenly afraid of the answer.

"Well, in order to bind your spirit they had to sever the silver cord that connected you to your body. So your body is still on your home plane."

"So, I can maybe get back to it?"

"I'm afraid not, Tom. You see, when the soul is separated from the body, and the silver cord cut, the body dies," Boggy said sorrowfully, looking at Tom's confusion and fright with pity.

"So I'm dead?"

"No, not exactly, when you die your soul goes off somewhere, to regenerate, or to some sort of heaven or ceases or something; I don't know. In our case, our minds and spirits, our consciousness if you will, are still alive, our physical bodies just aren't."

"And what's considering the state of our lives and our slavery, you might say were in a living hell," giggled Tizzy at his joke, as he mischievously let his eyes dance around looking at the flames.

"Ignore him, Tom. Sure, this isn't the greatest way to live, but it doesn't have to be the worst. If you're lucky."

"Lucky?"

"Yes, if you get a master who's not too demanding or too happy inflicting pain. Pain, now that’s the rub! We are very hard to kill, but with their spells, the wizards don't have too much trouble inflicting pain on any demon under their command. That's how they maintain their mastery, by threatening us with excruciating pain and torture."

Still stuck on Tizzy's analogy, and struck by Boggy's comment on torture, Tom said, "So there is some basis to the legends. I mean we're not physically alive, and we aren't where most lucky souls go, we get tortured, we look like devils and demons, and we do live in a place of fire."

"Well, a lot of cultures do have similar mythos, especially the Astlanians, and the way they control us and perceive us does lend credence to those legends. However, it is really a self-perpetuating circle. We look like this and are treated like this because of Astlanian legends and religious beliefs, and our existing like this, of course, strengthens their belief in demons and hell and all that sort of thing. Where the beliefs come from in the first place, I have no idea."

"If the shoe fits, wear it," interjected Tizzy. Pointing at him with the stem of his pipe.

"Like he says, most give up questioning it and just go with the flow, do what's expected, and be a demon."

"But the other stuff, damned souls and all. I mean, I realize this is a damnable situation, so to speak," he stated before Tizzy could interrupt with a similar type comment, "but what about the reason we're here, is it because of sinful or evil acts?"

"Well that's a matter of personal opinion and belief, some would say yes; but me, no, I don't think so."

That relieved Tom a little; he didn't like to think this had happened because of some evil act on his part, he really couldn't remember any. "Well, what about the other legends, demons being evil and enjoying evil acts, and just waiting for a wizard to goof up, so the demon can rend him horribly."

“We call that a party!” Tizzy exclaimed. Tom’s eyes widened.

"Well now, evil is a matter of perspective, generally speaking. However, just like the humans most of us once were, there are nice demons and not so nice demons. As far as rending wizards limb from limb, more than just the generally wicked demons would love to rip a wizard or two apart. After all, you try having your life interrupted, subjected to centuries of abject slavery, degradation, torture and pain, and tell me if you don't get just a bit pissed off and want revenge on those doing this to you."

"Crap, it looks like I'm going to get the chance to find out," Tom said despondently.

"Oh, yeah, sorry. That's just kind of a sore spot a lot of us have. We, of course, always want to defend what we feel are, ah, justified actions."

"I guess I understand, or soon will, at least."

"Yeah, you will, heh, heh," chuckled Tizzy, sticking the pipe stem back in his mouth.

"Well, actually, you understand there are of course other more logical reasons for trying to axe your master, beyond simple exquisite painful revenge. Because, if you kill off everyone who knows your true name, no one can call on you for your services. Therefore, you are essentially free, until someone realizes that there's a bound demon running around out there with no master, and tries to find out your name, or tries to force it out of you. Which, if you're discreet, won't happen very often."

Gazing down at his form, Tom came up with a brilliant idea, "Hey, you said we're not in a physical body, right?"

"Yes," Boggy answered, as if he knew what was coming next.

"Well then, why can't we alter our forms, at least back to the original?"

“Bright lad.” Tizzy hummed.

"Good question. Actually, some can do it, the most powerful demons, generally speaking, the Lords of the Abyss and such can do so anywhere they please; however, in practice, it is extremely difficult, takes an awful lot of willpower, and is not comfortable, and most importantly, would only last until you're called back to Astlan. There, the person calling you has the same idea of what you should look like, so back you go to demon form, and that means the same painful quick reformation and materialization in Astlan that you went through before."

"So, I have to go through all that pain every time?"

"Only if you've changed your pattern to something different from what they're expecting, and when you change on your own, it's slower, so less painful, and also it's by your own will, so it's more natural; assuming, of course, that you can do it. Besides all of which, your present body is much better adapted to living in this environment than your old human body.” Boggy told him.

"You may not have noticed, but the ambient temperature here is very nearly the boiling point of water. The air in many of the lower, hotter regions is rather acidic and can burn humans, and because of the terrain, it really pays to have wings.” Tizzy chipped in.

"So, to sum up my point: many demons are capable of doing it, but don't go to all the trouble of changing forms," Boggy concluded.

"Uh, huh." Well, that answers that, thought Tom. He looked about, and concentrated, yes, he guessed it was probably relatively hot here, but it was hard to tell, since the temperature felt comfortable.

"Kinda squashes that idea, don't it?" Tizzy asked leeringly. Tizzy, Tom decided, was not quite right in the head. Enough however, why worry about an octopodal demon, when he had enough problems of his own.

"Don't worry, you'll get used to it, we all do," Boggy said sympathetically. "Look on the bright side; at least you're big and impressive enough so that not many trouble makers will bother you."

That sparked another question in Tom's weary mind, "Why, am I so much bigger than you? I mean, what was it that made the people decide I looked like this?"

"What makes any man think the way he does?" Boggy asked philosophically. "However, in your case it's fairly obvious. As I said when I flew up here, you must have given your capturer a good fight, or fright. Basically you resisted him or her quite strongly, or impressed him enough, so that he thought of you as a fairly powerful demon. Now that in itself isn't enough of course, otherwise any half assed new demon could scare the shit out of a wimpy conjuror.

“No, you must have done something to absolutely convince several people that you were quite powerful. The Astlanians do, by the way, have a scale for rating demons, I won't bother with it now, but there is at least a scale to judge demon power. It's that scale, in the mind of trained wizards that they weigh all new demons on, and that kind of fixes their mental images of how big and powerful you are. You resisted them pretty well, so they figured you had to be some big powerful demon, so that's what appeared before them, a big powerful demon. Add to that, the fact your own will power and thoughts had something to do with it too, they can't just make you something you aren't, just reshape you."

“And, most importantly, the bigger they think you are, the more powerful spells they bind you with; it’s these bindings that infuse the Mana into your form, giving you the power you have. The bindings infuse you with a shit load of magical energy.” Tizzy suddenly interjected. “It’s oozing out of you, like butta!” He did the yenta voice again.

"Wow," Tom said., He felt he wasn't saying much that was intelligent or worthwhile most of the time; but the whole thing was just too much, too overwhelming to handle at once. It was exceedingly difficult to think of worthwhile responses at this stage. Besides, his bone deep weariness was rapidly returning.

Boggy said "I know it's quite a bit much to handle at first, but you'll get over it. Why don't you rest now, we'll come back and see you after you've had some sleep. Actually, you normally don't need sleep, but after heavy expenditures of energy, like you've just been through, sleeping is the easiest and fastest way to regenerate your energy field."

"And it keeps you from going insane!" inserted Tizzy.

"He's got a point, it does allow one to relax and get rid of tensions and frustrations," agreed Boggy.

"Yeah...well, I guess I'll just lie down here and rest," Tom stated.

"If you like, or off over that way," Boggy pointed behind him and over the pillar, "there are some mountains with caves. You’re welcome to find an unoccupied one and move in."

"Um," Tom stared over the edge of the ledge and looked pointedly down at the nearly bottomless depths below, "how do I get over there?"

"Why, use your wings of course, that's what they're there for!" exclaimed Tizzy.

"But, I don't know how, I've never flown before."

"Easy enough, just relax, think of which direction you want to go and go. It's almost like walking; don't think about what you're doing and let it happen naturally. It's natural, comes built in. But, just like when first walking, don't think about what you're doing, otherwise you'll screw up and fall," said Boggy.

"Just, step off the cliff?"

"Yep, easy as that, those wings know what they're doing, even if you don't."

"I don't know..." Tom said nervously, eyeing the long way down.

"Just try it. Here watch me." With that Boggy stepped off the edge and flew a few feet out before turning around to face Tom and hover.

"Well, got to try sometime." Tom tried relaxing, attempting to clear his mind of all the wild things that had happened to him. He looked toward Boggy and took a step forward. Trying to brace himself, yet remain calm, he walked three steps forward and off.

He lurched a little, but he kept concentrating on heading toward Boggy. It worked! He was moving towards Boggy, and his feet weren't moving. This was totally wild! It took very little effort, even in his weakened and tired state. Considering the nature of his new legs and feet, it was even easier than walking. Thinking of his feet he looked down at them, to make sure they weren't actually what was carrying him along.

Mistake! The ground was incredibly far below him, he was suspended in complete nothingness. His fright caused his wings to falter. He lost altitude. Quickly he tried flapping his wings to bring himself back up to Boggy. This didn't work, in fact he began to fall even more. Unless he could get the proper rhythm, his wings wouldn't support his massive bulk. He fell. Frantically he tried harder and harder, the more he worked at it, the less good it seemed to do. He was panicking, he didn't know what to do. "Help, someone please help!"

Up above, Boggy shook his head in dismay, an ironic grin of futility. “They always have to learn the hard way,” he muttered to himself. He took off after the plummeting Tom.

Tom's frantic attempts at catching his fall only half worked; occasionally he managed to slow down a little bit, but not enough. He fell. His back quickly began to ache as the new muscles were taxed harder than they were intended to. The ground was rushing up. A miracle I'm still thinking, thought Tom. The long fall had certainly given him a chance to try everything he could. His muscles ached; he could hardly move his wings anymore.

Eventually, exhausted, he gave up. This is it, thought Tom.

Shortly thereafter, he smashed into the ground at terminal velocity.





Chapter 5


"Well what are we going to do?" Jehenna asked, as she looked up from the missive she had just read. Her gaze was directed at Lenamare, who was reclining in a thickly upholstered red chair behind his massive oak desk. His hands were steepled in front of him, his eyes lightly surveying the stacks of paper and books on his desk.

He looked up, but not at her; he looked over her shoulder, out the tower window. It was open, the velvet curtains drawn aside to let the spring sunshine into the richly appointed room. This was Lenamare's private study. Towering bookcases lined the walls, ancient tomes, carefully tended and dustless, crammed the shelves. Here and there, between books, were assorted implements of magic: skulls, vials of colorful, yet potent, chemicals, thuribles, beakers, cymbals, chalk and bone.

The floor was carpeted with a deep red pile rug. Four elegantly carved chairs were placed strategically around the room. The two small tables in the room, near the chairs were, like the desk, overflowing with manuscripts and scrolls. Lenamare was the headmaster of the school, he could live as sumptuously as befitted his glorious position and he did. The accouterments, however, were only that; his truly prized possessions were not the elegant and expensive furniture and rugs that he owned, no, Lenamare's pride and what he considered wealth, rested in the books and papers scattered across the room. For in these books was knowledge, and knowledge led to power.

He looked thoughtfully out the window. "What can we do? You know I can never submit to that pompous moron, Exador, even if the Archimage of Turelane backs him. I will not turn my school over to the bastards in that guild. If they want my knowledge and my school, and the other thing, let them beg for it. Let them pay the price."

"Exador says he's willing to use force to get what he wants. If he wants the school, he'll probably succeed."

"You know, as well as I, it's not the school he wants. No, that is only a cover. All that legal mumbo jumbo in there is just a pretext, completely made up. They don't dare let the rest of the world know what they want, and what we have." His gaze switched over to the bookcase on his right, behind which was a special, secret, magically protected safe.

"Well, whatever, I bet he's not above acquiring his own new school, in the process of getting the book. And more to the point, whatever else he wants, he'll be here in a few weeks." Jehenna pointed out.

"We'll be ready; this arrogant note has given us warning. We will not give him what he wants. Prepare the school for siege…and, just in case, prepare our escape route.

"I promise you. Exador will not get that book! It is mine and I swear to Hierelan, I'll fight to keep it, even if I have to destroy everything else I own to save it." Lenamare leaned forward and hit the desk with his fist to emphasize his point.

"Is it really worth losing everything?" Jehenna asked, knowing even so, that it was more than worth it.

"Exador thinks so, as does the Archimage. However, hopefully it won't come to that; Exador can't be expecting us to call a fourth order demon to our defense. He's got a little surprise coming."





Chapter 6


Jennifer paid little attention to the thin soup poured into her bowl by Grubeck the cook. She was still too keyed up by today's events to give the cook a hard time over the dinner offering as she normally did. She picked up her wooden spoon and turned to look around the small dining chamber that the older students shared. Rex and Alvea were seated at a small table near the only window in the room. She hurried over to their table so she could join them.

She sat her bowl down on the rough round wooden table where the other two students were sitting, and pulled out a third stool from under the table. The room was partially full. Howard and Levi were sitting at the table across the room and Willis, Bromagni and Cleo were at the third table in the room. Yrgeddin and Warren had yet to show up for dinner. On the far wall, from which she came, stood Grubeck, with his soup tureen, slouching boredly over the table from which he worked.

Rex looked up at Jenn and smiled, Alvea also smiled to her, but it was obvious to Jenn that the girl was more interested in making sure Rex didn't look too closely at Jenn. Alvea was actually pretty nice, but she was jealous of what she considered hers, and she considered Rex to be hers. "Nothing like a droll experiment to draw out one's appetite, is there?" Rex asked Jenn as she sat down.

"I still can't believe Master Lenamare actually brought in something that huge and ferocious this afternoon."

"Well, he is an extraordinarily gifted wizard of the highest caliber." Alvea said in her best imitation of Jehenna's sultry voice.

"Truly…" sniffed Rex imitating Master Lenamare.

"Even so, I think even he was a bit surprised when the demon blasted him."

"Blasted him? Damn near knocked the shit out of him, you mean," Rex said pointedly.

"Well, giving him the benefit of the doubt, he did manage to hang on, and bring it in."

"Gods, can you believe it? A fourth order demon. There hasn't been a new one that powerful in practically ages. And, we helped bind it." Alvea voiced the general feeling of awe the students felt at their accomplishment. "The creature must surely be centuries old. It was immensely powerful."

"I have to admit, I really never believed old Lenamare and Jehenna could rake in anything so powerful, let alone without more preparation." Rex conceded.

"I know. I'm still so excited. I never expected to see one like that until I was old and gray," Jenn said.

"It almost makes one believe Lenamare's incredible ego might be justified," Rex said, wistfully.

"Hierelan forbid. Nothing could be that big," laughed Jennifer.

"So, what's he going to do with it?" asked Alvea. "Now that he's got it."

"Who knows, I mean, you don't just use a fourth order demon to bring in well water," Jenn said, still grinning.

"Lenamare might," giggled Alvea. They all laughed at that.

"Actually, if what my friends in town say is true; we may need it." Rex looked at the two girls seriously.

"What do they say?" asked Jenn

"Exador's coming."

"Ooh. Well, that wouldn't be good. How sure are you?"

"Just rumors, but Exador and Lenamare have never gotten along, and I could see Exador deciding that he wanted Lenamare's school." Rex looked knowingly over at Alvea. Alvea had a serious expression on her face now. She knew of Exador, her home town was only a few miles from Exador's tower, and like all of the people near it, she knew of his passionate desires and expansionist machinations.

This was the first Jenn and Alvea had heard of this. It was slightly disturbing that Rex hadn't told them sooner of these rumors. He knew they’d want to know. Alvea had told them all stories of Exador and his men. Jenn certainly didn't relish the thought of falling into the hands of Exador or his men. Not, of course, that she or Alvea meant anything to him. He had no idea they even existed, it was simply the reputed brutality of Exador's legions that scared her.

Jenn looked over at Alvea, she’d need to talk with her later. Being from the south, she didn't know much more about Exador than she'd heard from rumors and stories since she'd arrived here six years ago. In addition to Alvea’s stories, she’d heard other stories from Grubeck and other older students, who had known of Exador's and Lenamare's conflicts of interest.

The talk around the table died as the three quickly began eating, hoping to take their minds off the rumor. If true, it could mean a serious interruption to their studies, which would be a good break. However, if true, then they were also in for a lot of trouble, which was definitely not good.

~

Master Enchanter and Sorcerer Elrose arrived in his preferred spot outside of The Raunchy Orc in a flash of light and a scattering of long dead leaves blown away by the air displaced by his teleportation spell. Master Trisfelt loved this tavern for some reason, it was nearly 500 leagues from the school in the middle of a dense woodland. Admittedly, remote enough to avoid any spying or eavesdropping by anyone that might know Lenamare or Jehenna.

Elrose adjusted his djaellaba and checked that his nimcha was secure on his belt and headed out of the woods into the cleared area around the tavern. Torches along the front of the tavern created a feeling of security around the building. There were only two horses in the adjacent stables as Elrose approached the door.

Entering the tavern he was immediately assaulted by extremely loud drunken laughter to his right. He glanced over to observe two satyrs holed up at the corner table under the stairs; their backs to the wall, legs spread to display their wares to anyone in the room. Elrose shook his head at their crudity.

Further into the room, halfway to the kitchen was Trisfelt at his favorite table, already piled high with books, scrolls and of course wine. Elrose smiled and moved to the table and sat down.

“I see you’ve started without me, my friend.” Elrose observed as Trisfelt chuckled and gave him a twinkly eyed smile through his round glasses.

“Half the reason I started coming out to these woods was for the reasonably priced local beer and wine. The satyrs make exceedingly good beverages of almost shocking value.”

“You spent time with them didn’t you?” Elrose asked, gesturing to Hilda, the barmaid for a pint of elderberry juice.

“Indeed I did, I spent a couple different seasons with the locals in the area, trying to ferret out the secrets of both their wine and beer recipes.” Trisfelt smiled fondly, remembering.

“So then, here’s a question you can answer, why do satyrs go around naked, and always seem to inadvertently expose themselves to everyone in sight.” Elrose shook his head disapprovingly.

“What, are there some things a sorcerer doesn’t want to See?” Trisfelt asked with a wry grin.

“Yes.” Elrose said drily.

Trisfelt chuckled, “There are many reasons, but mostly I think they consider it to only be polite.”

“Polite?” Elrose asked.

“Sort of like a greeting card, an advertisement if you will, an invitation to any that might want to spend some intimate time with them. They feel you should see what you’re getting.”

“Ugh, enough.” Elrose shook his head, still smiling. “Let’s talk about the other naked being with hooves that showed up today.”

“The demon?” Trisfelt asked.

“Of course the demon.” Elrose shook his head. “You flashed me the vision of it when we met in the great hall after the summoning. That is why we are meeting tonight.”

Trisfelt laughed and nodded, “It did seem to disturb you a great deal. I realize that it was a rather spectacular event, and achievement, but it ended well, so what is the matter?”

“I’ve Seen that demon before.” Elrose stated quietly.

Trisfelt shook his head, “I was there, it was a fresh catch, an unbound demon. There is no way you could have seen it before.”

“No, I mean I Saw it, in the scryings I’ve been doing to try to uncover what exactly Lenamare is up to.”

“You mean you saw it coming?” Trisfelt nodded in thought.

“Well, I saw it among multiple possible paths. It’s appearance today helps narrow down which road we are about to go down.” Elrose said.

“Well, that seems helpful.” Trisfelt shrugged.

“Helpful, perhaps, but as such it’s a bad portent.” Elrose stated, going silent as Hilda dropped off his juice and her assistant put down plates of chicken, bread and fruits and cheeses. The table was near to overflowing. Trisfelt did enjoy his dinners.

As Hilda and her assistant left Trisfelt turned back to Elrose. “A bad portent? So whatever it is that Lenamare and Jehenna are up to is, as we feared, going to be trouble?”

“I fear so, but the threads of the future, particular this future are hard to interpret.”

“What do you mean this particular future? I’d think untangling said threads would be what you do all the time?” Trisfelt asked.

“This is different, there are lots of people involved, armies of people.”

“Armies?” Trisfelt asked, puzzled. “As in more than one army?”

Elrose shrugged. “I believe so, and worse, demons, lots of demons and lots of wizards. All the mana and animus is clouding the picture, I only see disturbing glimpses.”

Trisfelt sighed, “Well how do we sort it out?”

“Later tonight, I shall attempt to contact an old colleague of mine who is a member of the Society.”

“The Society?” Trisfelt seemed surprised at this statement, “Are they even still in existence?”

Elrose smiled and nodded. “Yes, particularly among Seers. This friend is in Seren in Eton. I’m hoping either or he or someone he trusts can join us and help me sort this out.”

“You really feel it’s getting that bad?” Trisfelt asked, now truly worried.

Elrose shook his head, “Neither of us are Conjurors, but we both know that you don’t accidentally summon an unbound Greater Demon. It strains credulity, even for Lenamare. I fear something is up, and from what I can See it appears to center around our school and whatever insanity Lenamare and Jehenna are up to.”

“Argh, I think I’m going to stock up on bottles while I’m here tonight.” Trisfelt sighed.





Chapter 7


Hurt.

Pain.

Agony.

Suffering.

Severe pain.

Intense agony.

God awful hurt.

Extreme suffering.

Painfully agonizing suffering and hurt.

This is not good, thought Tom in one of his semi-lucid moments between thoughts of assorted types of pain, agony, et cetera. So far, in the last few hours since he smoked that joint, he had really done nothing but experience new and varied forms of pain, Tom decided. Fortunately, this pain was not so all encompassing or soul wrenching as the pain of formation or whatever it was called in Astlan; however, that did not make it any less intense. It was in fact a type of pain he was a little more used to, or at least able to cope with. This was the type of pain one felt after landing stiff legged from a long fall, only a lot worse, because this was a fall of several thousand feet. It was also the pain of having one's breath knocked out, and one's lungs temporarily collapsed, and that of a severe shock throughout the entire skeletal system. All in all, a bitch.

Eventually, Tom managed to draw in a shuddering breath and slowly open his eyes. He looked down at the ground expecting to see his broken legs, shattered all over the place. Instead what he saw was ground that resembled the pictures taken of the Martian deserts and which came half-way up his thighs. His legs it seemed were imbedded in the ground. They had actually punched two holes in the ground, and he was stuck in the ground. Not good, but at least they weren't shattered. In fact, as he reanalyzed the pain, he realized that his legs must still be intact, so that the pain could feel like it was sending lightning bolts up his leg bones, which it did.

Boggy came flying down from above at this point. "I told you to relax and not think about it. Now look what you've done. You've gotten stuck."

"Yeah," Tom panted. "Got...my...breath...knocked...out...too."

"Shouldn't do that."

"I…really--didn't mean to fall."

"Oh, not that. Although you shouldn't have done that either. I meant breathe."

"What?"

"Personally, I never breathe except to talk. Too much of a hassle for too little muscle exercise. All that ever happens is that it gets knocked out of you, or you accidentally breathe a noxious smelling vapor."

"Don't you need to breathe to live?"

"Nope, we're energy fields remember. We're not alive in the normal sense."

"Then if I'm just an energy field, why do I hurt."

"Well, that's a little more complex. Actually you are physical, sort of. We're mainly condensed energy...actually that's all matter really is too; but we are just less condensed. Anyway, your demon body does have senses, or something close enough that our mind perceives them as traditional senses. One of these sets of nerve like pathways, or senses, simulates our old pain receptors. This is, of course, for similar reasons, survival etc.; however, in our current forms, it's not quite so necessary. However, we do still want something to simulate a sense of touch, to gauge pressure. So think of this pain as an overload of those senses. The pain from formation however, that's something different. That's more of a spiritual pain, in other words, it hurts because it's doing something unnatural to your essence or self, and our minds interpret it as pain.

"Interprets my ass," interjected Tizzy as he came in for a landing, "if it hurts, it's pain. Plain and simple."

"Well," Boggy said, glaring at Tizzy, "whatever you chose to think. You can experience unpleasant sensations, even though you’re not totally material."

"Yeah," Tom seemed to be saying that an awful lot, he thought. The pain was finally starting to subside, a little. "So, how do I get out?"

"Raise your arms, and we'll try and pull you out," Boggy suggested.

Tom complied, and Boggy grabbed his right arm and Tizzy his left. The two demons launched themselves into the air with all their might and pulled as hard as they could. Slowly and with a lot of effort, Tom began to rise from the dirt. His legs pulled slowly out of the holes, until suddenly, a point was reached, and the earth gave way. The three demons went flying up into the air as the ground reluctantly gave Tom up.

Slowly they settled back down. Tom's legs, he noticed, appeared to be intact, but they did ache a lot more than they had up on the pillar. In fact, when they set him down, he could not stand. His legs hurt way too much, so he had to kneel on his hands and knees. He found it was too hard to sit directly on the ground with his animal like legs and his long tail.

"I don't know if I can make it to those mountains, let alone find a cave right now. I'm way too sore and too tired to even really try," Tom told Tizzy and Boggy.

"No serious problem. I doubt anyone will bother you right here for awhile, if you want to sleep here," Boggy reassured him. "However, you really need to fly again as soon as possible. Otherwise you may end up too scared to fly, and a demon who can and doesn't fly has a lot of trouble."

"Sure, but let me rest first. I really can't do much more." Tom was quite serious; he felt almost as if he might pass out from exhaustion. The weariness and pain from formation, which had been temporarily forgotten, was now back in full force; coupled with the pain from the fall and the exhaustion of his wing muscles, it was almost more than he could bear. "You're starting to sound like my mother."

Boggy smiled knowingly, “You’re doing good, lad. Most new arrivals would be running around berserk at this point, insisting they were in some sort of dream or hallucinogenic state.”

“Some just go catatonic.” Tizzy interjected.

"Tell you what, Tom my...by the way, Tom, just how old were you, before you got captured, I mean, how old are you now?" Boggy asked as the thought just hit him.

"Sixteen. Why?"

“Sixteen! By the Notorious Dame’s skirts you could almost be British what with your stiff upper lip and all. Right ho! Taking it like a man!”

“Or de-man!” Tizzy exclaimed. Boggy shook his head.

"No reason..." Boggy continued. "As I was about to say, if it will make you feel any better, Tizzy and I will stay here while you sleep, to insure nobody bothers you."

Tom took Boggy's reason for asking at face value, he was too tired to do else. He nodded his head thankfully at Boggy's offer. He then slowly slid his arms and legs out till he was flat on his stomach, and promptly went out like the flames in the air above.





Chapter 8


The school was bustling with servants and staff running about madly, trying to prepare for the expected siege. The morning sun beat down upon the courtyard of the tower, giving a vibrant feeling to the air. Lenamare surveyed his people confidently. His gaze swept the large courtyard, examining the people piling firewood in the corners; carpenters constructing large wooden tanks to hold water in case fires should be ignited in the timber roofs of the stable and forge buildings. Lesser skilled servants and local peasants bringing food and game in from the countryside for supplies; the guardsmen drilling for the defense of the walls. Captain Markoff grilled orders in his typically surly manner, making guard recruits cringe. Here and there a stray dog would yelp as someone carrying supplies or tools would step on its tail or paws when it wasn't paying attention and got in the way.

His school may not be the biggest, thought Lenamare with pride, but it is certainly one of the strongest. Not only militarily, since Lenamare also ruled a good portion of the land around the school, but more importantly, magically. There were two full masters, Jehenna and himself, three assistant masters, and twenty-five students. Counting the best of the older students, Lenamare had about seven to ten wizards to draw on and of course his own incredible talent, which made the effective number about nine. He had fifty fulltime men-at-arms, forty-five new recruits, and about a hundred peasant men able to fight. Of course, Exador would probably bring about three to four hundred men, but Lenamare's fortification and his more potent permanent pentacles for summoning demons and conducting other spell craft, evened things out.

Which reminded him; he really should go up and check with Jehenna to see how construction of a talisman for controlling the greater demon was going. He turned around, and entered the narrow door to the tower. He crossed the large great hall in which women were setting up pallets for the wounded and any fleeing peasant folk to sleep. As he neared the center stairwell, he saw Assistant Master Hortwell leading the older students down to the dungeon level to inspect the magical wards that guarded the outer walls of the keep. Lenamare smiled to remember his brilliance in thinking to install permanent wardings for the walls. Now, anytime they were needed, simple spells could bring up powerful defenses to guard the keep.

He nodded to Hortwell, who gave a slight bow back, and continued down the stairs. Lenamare took the stairs up. The stairway was a large gray stone spiral staircase, which climbed from the dungeon levels up to almost the topmost floor. He went up three full revolutions and stopped at the main workroom, where he knew Jehenna to be. He opened the door to his left, the stairwell wound down counterclockwise, like all good defensive spirals, so that men retreating up the stairs, would in the open area in the great hall, have their sword arms free, and the attackers' would have to put up with the center pole of the spiral. Lenamare again congratulated himself on his inspiring military genius in recognizing the necessary defensive elements, when he designed his tower.

As he opened the door, Jehenna looked up from the table at which she was working. The room was of medium size, designed primarily for the construction of implements of magic. The room was equipped with a small forge, with ventilation, anvils, engraving tools, jewelry tools and many other more esoteric tools. The table at which she was working was filled with engraving tools, and small vials containing powdered jewels.

"I'm almost finished. I've decided to make the talisman a ring. Mainly, of course, for the benefit of the strength inherent in the Neverending Loop of Confinement, which the ring so easily represents."

"Good choice," approved Lenamare. "I take it you've inscribed the standard bindings for combat manipulation of a fourth order demon?"

"Of course, I used Pertwinge's Annulment of the Devious Destructive Demon, as well as Ekelios' Ectonic Shielding. Not to mention attuning it to the Kristel's Fourth Order Binding that I did yesterday."

"Good, you've inscribed the ring?"

"Yes, as you can see for yourself," she handed him the ring. "I admit, I did a rush job on the talisman, but it is perfect. It will allow any of us to command the demon with a minimum of effort during the battle."

He read the inside of the ring where the demon's name was inscribed, "Tomasedwardperkinje, fine. Odd name for a demon, but then they all are."

"Who did you want to help us in sealing the demon? Trisfelt?”

"No, I felt he was a bit weak, when we first bound the demon, let's use Master Hortwell. Elrose is busy planning the positioning of the other demons, and ensuring that they're ready.

"Hortwell is in the dungeon with some of the students, I believe they will need a few hours to manage the inspection of the wards. I'll send a messenger to Hortwell asking him to meet us in the same conjuring room we used last time, right after the evening meal?"

"Fine, I'll be done."

"Good enough," and Lenamare left the room.





Chapter 9


Tom slowly came to. What a nightmare he thought, I'll never smoke grass again. He kept his eyes tightly closed, he could feel the rocky ground around him in Reggie's back yard, where he must have fallen while stoned. "Helloooo," a voice shouted at him, "I can see you’re awake now, your wings moved."

Oh shit, it's not a dream, or it's still going. Tom recognized Tizzy's voice behind and above him. Slowly he opened his eyes. In front of him he could see his red, snout-like, nose and beyond that, the rocky Martian like surface of the demon plain, or was that plane? Tom thought weakly. He moaned as he tried to sit up, his muscles protested. They were still sore, but they didn't ache like they had. "Aah," he said as he accidentally sat on his tail, bending it the wrong way. He stood up, since as he now recalled, sitting was rather difficult.

"Slept like a bat you did," Tizzy said. “’Cept, of course, you wasn’t hanging from your feet.” Tizzy’s voice was still distinct but a bit less shrill now, more grizzled. Did the demon have some sort of multiple-personality disorder? One could easily be excused for going crazy in this place.

Tom looked around; the desert seemed to stretch forever. Behind him was the pillar from which he fell, towering ungodly high and incredibly thin. Surely those pillars violate some law of physics? Tom thought to himself. In the distance to his right and before him was a range of mountains, apparently where he was supposed to be going. He searched for Boggy, but couldn't see the little demon anywhere.

Seeing him looking around, Tizzy said, "Boggy got called away, he'll be back as soon as possible."

"Called away?" Tom inquired.

"Yeah, you know, summoned, conjured, etcetera, went to see his favorite accursed master." He waved his pipe; smoke was coming out of the bowl, apparently, he’d been smoking while Tom was sleeping.

"Right, I should have guessed." Tom reluctantly began to remember all the things Boggy had told him. Eternal slavery, pain-dominated servitude, lifelong misery. What a thought to wake up to and to look forward to, thought Tom.

"Well, ready to fly again?"

"No. I think I'll walk."

"Take too long, and besides you'll never be able to cross the Styx."

"The Styx? As in river to the underworld, with the boat keeper?"

"You've heard of it? Yep. Favorite transportation of mortals, or at least dead mortals, through the Abyss. Travels the entire plane. And a major bitch to cross if you don't fly."

"I don't know. Last time was not fun." Tom looked down at the two holes in the ground nearby, where his legs had implanted themselves. "Besides, I really should eat something first."

"Are you hungry?"

"No…" Tom said, realizing it was true. He hadn't eaten anything in ages, and he'd been through a lot, but he was not hungry in the slightest.

"Then why eat?"

"I don't know. Habit I guess."

"Wasteful habit. Demons don't need to eat. We get enough energy from the heat in the air around us. Course, we can if we want to. Munching a little wizard or two for breakfast is always a fun thing to do." He took a deep pull on his pipe and grinned at Tom.

"No thanks. I suppose I should try and fly again," Tom said doubtfully.

"Just try short, low level flights at first. It's a lot easier."

"I guess," Tom said, not really wanting to, but knowing that he'd better learn, if he was going to be in this psychotic state for long. Or was it neurotic? He was definitely aware he wasn't perceiving things quite right anymore, did that make it neurotic? or did the fact that he was having hallucinations automatically mean he was psychotic. His stepfather had been a clinical psychologist, andTom had often visited his office and talked to him about different types of crazy people. It was quite different being one of the crazies now.

However, Tom just thought, I fell asleep and I still seem to be here. Everything seems to make sense and is rationally connected, assuming one can accept the premise of a demon plane and a bunch of wizards kidnapping stoned kids from parties. Now, am I actually out of my mind or really here? Tom had read enough fantasy novels to know that the major characters, who were transported to fantasy realms, often spent a great deal of time disbelieving in the world around them, and therefore managed to get into a lot of trouble.

So, thought Tom, would it be better to disbelieve in this place and say this is all a dream and possibly get into a lot of trouble, if it's real; or do I accept that everything is real, and risk falling even deeper into my personal insanity? Reeling from the weight of thoughts he had never expected to have to face in real life, Tom giddily began to wonder if there was actually any way that he could determine if his whole past life had been a dream and that he was now awake.

No, he thought, pulling himself together suddenly, Boggy assured me that I had lived somewhere else as a normal person, thus this is either a new place, or a dream, and my past definitely real regardless of the situation.

"Hey, are you going to fly or not?" Tizzy interrupted his thoughts suddenly. He quickly realized he had just been standing there going around in mental circles while Tizzy waited on him to start trying to fly.

"Well how do I start?" Tom asked. Since, Tom rationalized, anything based on a false assumption was true, then if he was crazy and this world a dream, then anything he did was correct, so it couldn't hurt to believe; whereas, if this world was true, it could be very dangerous to disbelieve. He decided, therefore to accept his situation as real, until more convincing proof became evident later.

"Simply relax and start walking. As you walk think about walking upward at the same time, think of gaining altitude. Once you start rising, you can stop your legs, but just continue to pretend you're walking. For you it should be easy. Me, well I had to get used to my extra legs as well."

Refusing to simply say, `right,' or `yeah,' or `OK,' again, Tom simply did as he was instructed. He began walking towards the mountains. As he walked he pretended he was also climbing stairs. Shortly, he could no longer feel his legs touching ground, so he looked down. He was walking about ten feet above the ground. Tom was so pleased by the easiness of flight, that again his wings started to falter. This time however, he quickly looked forward, and tried putting all thoughts but those of walking forward out of his head. It worked, he started going forward again, he wasn't gaining altitude, but he wasn't losing it either. Once again he began to think of rising, and once again, he did. He simply couldn't stop being amazed at how easy this flying was, if one didn't think about it.

"Good job, good job," Tizzy said as he flew up beside him. "We've only got fifty kilometers to the mountains.”

"What!" Tom said as he stopped and turned to face Tizzy in midair, then promptly fell.

Actually, it wasn't quite as bad as it had sounded at first. As Tizzy showed him, once he managed to get airborne again, demons could fly considerably faster than a normal man could walk. In fact, the mighty wing muscles of a demon, combined with their not quite material state, allowed them to fly, as Tizzy explained, much faster than a horse could run. As they picked up speed, Tom conservatively estimated their velocity to reach about thirty-five miles an hour, or about fifty-six kilometers per hour. Which, since Tom had no way of judging time, meant that it took them only about an hour to reach the base of the mountain range.

Tizzy was an interesting companion on the flight, since he would fly ahead, then fall behind, dash right and dash left and occasionally come alongside with an obscure comment on some of the local geography. All in all he found Tizzy to be good at keeping his mind off their altitude, and his as yet unresolved questions about his own sanity. In fact, he was somewhat relieved to note that if he was crazy, then Tizzy was crazier.

The river Styx, when they passed over it, was quite impressive. It seemed to wind from horizon to horizon across their path, and was located about halfway between the mountains and where he had landed. The river was black, darker than any river he had ever seen on Earth, and much wider. The river had to be several miles wide, he imagined that the Mississippi was probably about the same width, but he had never seen it, except from thirty-thousand feet in an airplane. It was also quite violent, which puzzled Tom, he had always expected really wide rivers to be fairly calm, but this one certainly didn't seem to be. It seemed to be as turbulent and violent as a white water river, like the ones that raft trips were taken on. However, there didn't seem to be any actual `white' water in the Styx, even the foam was a black color. Perhaps there were some silvery streaks on the crests of the waves, but he couldn't be sure from one hundred feet above. The river also seemed to be slightly out of focus for some reason, and this didn't help matters any. He was unable to see any boatmen on the river, and he couldn't see how any boat could traverse that river.

Tom had, after the first fifteen to twenty minutes of flight, gained enough confidence to fly higher above the land. As Tizzy pointed out, a fall certainly couldn't kill him, it could only hurt him; however, Tom greatly desired to keep his requisite pain to a minimum, so he kept his altitude at about one hundred feet. He had to admit there was some beauty in this `hellish' land. Not normal beauty, but a grim, impressive beauty, in the huge desert and towering pillars. The streams of lava, highlighted everything and the arcing flames and immense fireballs, seemed to punctuate the majesty of the view below him.

His most treacherous moment in the flight occurred when one of the great fireballs all of the sudden ignited right in front of him. He had simply been flying along, when all of the sudden he saw a small light in front of him, and then there was this roaring fireball. As if he was walking, he sprang back, out of the way of the fireball, and stood there an arm’s length away from its edge.

He could feel the heat on his face and chest and he realized that it had to be incredibly hot, but he felt only mild discomfort from the intense blaze. In all, the fireball must only have lasted a few seconds; however, it seemed to go on for several minutes. Only after the ball had shrunk back to a small flame and then out of sight, did Tom realize that he was hovering in midair. He hadn't fallen; maybe, just maybe, he'd finally be able to get the hang of this flying business.

Eventually they did reach the base of the mountains. "Here we are!" Tizzy exclaimed. "We actually made it, and you still have all your parts."

Tom looked speculatively over at Tizzy, wondering for a moment about the demon's comment, and wondering how much of the confidence he had seemed to show in Tom had simply been faked. "So where do I go from here?" Tom asked.

"Why anywhere you want to live."

"Just go pick out a cave, anywhere?"

"Well, any uninhabited cave.'

"How do I tell which ones have demons in them?"

"Easy, every demon makes his personal mark above the entrance to his cave, just don't go in any marked ones."

"How many caves have demons in them?"

"Oh, I don't know, not all, certainly not even most of them."

"Well, I guess I'd better start looking," Tom said, not knowing really where to look, since he couldn't see any caves at the moment.

"The best ones are over there." Tizzy pointed beyond the first layer of mountains, deeper into the range.

"Very well, I guess I'll start looking."

"Yes, I always say..." Tizzy's voice drifted off a little as he seemed to look off into space for a moment, puffing on his pipe. "Sorry, gotta go." With that, the small octopodal demon vanished into thin air.

"Hmm, guess I'm on my own." Tom said. He supposed Tizzy had just been called off to see his `accursed master.' Tom flew up higher in the air so that he could pass over the mountains. The mountain range seemed, like the river, to be larger and more imposing than any he had seen on Earth. The mountains were all jagged, torn and extremely rocky. None of the close ones had snow, which was to be expected if the temperature was two hundred degrees Fahrenheit. It did appear, however, that some of the more distant mountains did have white on them. Thinking back on what little geography and geology he'd had, Tom guessed that those mountains would have to be incredibly high for the temperature to drop from two hundred degrees to the point where snow could exist.

He was now flying over the first mountains. He was higher than he'd been, since any time after he fell off the pillar. He guessed he was still not as high up as the pillar had been, but this mountain had to be at least nine thousand feet high. He guessed this by the time it took him to fly to the top, based on what he estimated his speed to be, about twenty miles per hour. If this mountain was nine thousand feet, then some of those further in had to be twenty thousand feet high, and those snowcapped ones would have to be higher than Mount Everest.

He tore his eyes off the distant mountains, and began scanning the valley below him, now that he had passed the tops of the first mountains. Occasionally, he spotted what appeared to be dark spots on the sides of mountains. The first one he saw, he swooped towards, and saw that it indeed was a cave, this one had some sort of strange circled `Y' engraved above its entrance. Apparently, it was occupied. He continued on, when he saw a cave that was situated in what looked like a convenient location he would swoop down on it, to see if it was marked.

To his dismay most of the caves that he examined in the first few valleys were marked, or else they were extremely shallow. So he flew on, he had searched for what felt like several hours, when he spotted a large cave near the top of an extremely high peak. He flew up on it in a sweeping arc, the more he flew, the more impressive looking tricks he learned.

This cave was definitely large. At the mouth of the cave was a fairly large overhang of rough stone. The mouth itself was about twenty feet in diameter, and as far as he could see, extended a long way into the mountain and down. The cave seemed to be inaccessible, except by flight, since below the overhang, the gray rock of the mountain dropped drastically downward for well over a thousand feet. The best thing about this cave, however, was the fact that Tom was unable to detect any markings around the cave mouth indicating that the cave was occupied.

What a stroke of luck, Tom thought. He landed on the ledge and turned to look out over the valley. Looking back the way he came, he was amazed to note that he could no longer see the plains. Apparently, he'd flown a lot further than he had thought. True, his wing muscles were a bit fatigued, but nowhere near being exhausted. "I guess one just has to go to the ends of the world to find a good home these days," Tom said to himself.

As he looked over the valley he noted that there didn't appear to be any other caves in this valley, which suited him. For some reason, he felt totally satisfied being alone, and he really had no desire at the moment to see any other demons. Well, Tom thought, if I am alone here, then this shall be my kingdom. In a mock imperial manner, the King of the Valley viewed his new land. Truly, looking out over the majestic, rocky valley and the rugged range of mountains, he did feel like a king.

As he was surveying the valley, Tom heard voices calling his name in the distance. Commanding him to attend. Slowly the world began to fade around him, as the King of the Valley was forced to return to slavery.





Chapter 10


The image of the valley was slowly replaced in his mind by that of the tower room into which he had first appeared after traversing the color world. As the valley dimmed and the room came into focus, he was able to note that he was standing in the middle of a five pointed star inscribed within a circle. Tangent to the circle at each point of the star were smaller circles with stars inscribed in them also. In each of the smaller stars was a three legged metal stand with a small bowl on top. Each bowl contained glowing embers which gave off strange noxious odors. He also noted that each brazier was made of a different metal: gold, silver, platinum, a white faintly glowing material, and a dull gray metal unlike any other that he'd ever seen.

Arranged outside of the circles were three individuals, an old balding skinny man, the woman who's face he'd seen in the circle that had summoned him, and the face that he dreaded, the one called Lenamare. The old balding man was about six foot, but not yet bent with age, and weighed in the neighborhood of about one hundred and thirty five pounds, although it was hard to tell since he was wearing a large purple robe. His face was basically skin and bones, his nose long and pointed. He head was shaved except for a mustache and goatee. His gaze fell upon Tom, hesitant, yet determined.

The woman appeared to be in her mid-thirties. Not a great beauty, her features were too sharp for that, yet she had an aura of command about her, that he imagined would pass for strong charisma, if he were more inclined to be sympathetic with her. She was quite tall, about six-two and around one hundred and fifty pounds. Her reddish brown hair was done in a spiraling braid above her head. She wore a black gown trimmed in red, and cut and highlighted so as to reveal a good deal of her ample breasts. She stared at him in a manner of contempt, mixed with a trace of caution. By her stance she felt herself in control, but also she clearly yielded to the third person in the room.

The room's other occupant was Lenamare. A man who Tom would not forget, a face he was sure would haunt his dreams for weeks. Lenamare was the shortest of the three at around five-ten, yet he stood tall and arrogant. Under his robe he seemed trim and slightly muscular. His gray eyes were the same color as the unknown dull gray metal brazier. His hair was a dark brown interspersed with thin hairs of white, like white crests on a dark brown ocean. Lenamare looked to be in his late forties or early fifties, yet his stance bespoke that of youthful strength and arrogance. His glance was cold, totally in control, with no room for doubt as to his mastery. It contained no possibility of ever even understanding the concept of fear, or submission.

All the pain he had felt in the color world seemed, to Tom, to be the sole responsibility of the man before him. He could easily understand how Boggy would want to obliterate his master. Tom still didn't exactly feel like ripping Lenamare to shreds, but he certainly wouldn't have minded returning a little of the pain that Lenamare and his associates had inflicted on him. Tom took a step closer to Lenamare, intending to try and stare the man down. Tom felt confident, that with his superior height and new found strength that he should have little trouble in intimidating this man who was five to six feet shorter than himself. However, as he stepped forward, his hoof encountered resistance. He looked down and saw that his hoof was blocked by some invisible barrier at the edge of the circle. As he looked up quickly, he caught a slight smile on Lenamare's face which seemed to mock his attempt to get closer to the wizard. The smile seemed to be so mocking, that for an instant Tom simply wanted to smash it off the man's face.

"Know, Demon, that thou canst not cross these barriers that we have set for thee. Thou art our servant, thou hast succumbed to my will, Thou wilst obey my orders and those of my lawful assistants," Lenamare said commandingly to Tom.

Tom tried harder to push his foot through. When this didn't work he stepped back and pushed with his hands against the invisible barrier. As hard as he tried, he couldn't make the barrier even seem to flex.

"Try as you will demon, thou art trapped and thou art mine." Lenamare smiled, and then quickly twisted his fist in a counterclockwise gesture. Pain exploded in Tom's chest. It felt just like what he'd imagined an incredibly severe heart attack must feel like. It was almost crippling, he began to buckle, to go down on his knees, but out of the corner of one of his eyes, as he bent over, he noticed a cruel grin on Lenamare's face. No! Tom thought, I will not give him the pleasure. Stiffly, Tom gritted his teeth and slitted his eyes. Using all of his strength, he forced his legs to straighten to their normal position, and he raised his head to stare directly into Lenamare's eyes.

Lenamare's grin faded, and his eyes became more serious. Eventually, after what must have been only a few more seconds, but which seemed like eternity to Tom, Lenamare nodded, and released his fist. The pain suddenly vanished from Tom's chest. Slowly, he relaxed.

"So, Tomasedwardperkinje, be defiant. But know that was but the mildest of the tortures and pain I shall inflict on thee, if thou dost not obey my commands. Jehenna, the binding."

The woman called Jehenna raised her right hand before her; in it she held a ring. Softly she began chanting something that Thomas couldn't make out. Before his eyes, he almost seemed to perceive the green smoke rings that he had seen the other day. "...by the ancient rites we command thee, be unto us our slave. Let they who hold this ring control thy fate as surely as Lenamare the Magnificent. Ek rios et veltos dok run se falos." At this point Lenamare and the old man joined in. "Rieman et sveltos, kriolbus nek vistrum, Dominae set servitus. Creistes, sen feltos. Rhiallan mak velddrum. Nor fiels sans bartos, kryptos nos vermumn. Thou art ours, thou art ours."

Now Lenamare spoke alone, "by the power of my will, by which I command thee, Tomasedwardperkinje, I hereby relegate my authority to the wielder of this ring. Let the wielder's command of thee be second only to my own. Let all know that today, as forever, thou art bound. Bound by my will, and bound by this ring. May thy soul be trapped in the Neverending Loop of Confinement, ad verti sig fallum. Dros Faustus tan Varn, sid Ekelios, fel Mephistum."

Together they all chanted, "Embodiae sig fallum, Dominae sed nostrum, deskripten sig fallum, verti et sebuam. Bound unto forever Tomasedwardperkinje, hielphistos sorbum amenetorum." With the final pronouncement, the ring flashed a bright white light. Tom felt his pupils automatically contract to block the light, but other than that he felt absolutely nothing.

The three wizards stared at Tom intently, as if trying to determine something. Jehenna put the ring on the middle finger of her right hand and pointed it at Tom. He winced, fearing that more pain was coming, although none did. His reaction apparently satisfied her, for she nodded. "Demon," she said, "kneel before me."

Not really knowing what was going on, but not really wanting to feel the pain that Lenamare had already inflicted, specifically, not wanting to test whether or not he could face it down again, he complied. Again, seeming satisfied, she nodded.

"Any other tests?" Lenamare asked.

"No, I think we've demonstrated that it works," Jehenna said. The old man simply nodded his head in agreement with Jehenna.

"Very well then, Jehenna, if you would care to do the honors?"

"Certainly," Jehenna waved her arms toward Tom and said, "be gone now, Demon; get thee hence, return to thy own plane until we should have need of thee. Depart in peace, and take none that is ours with you." At this apparent dismissal, Tom relaxed, knowing he would soon be out of this tower and away from these people. As he relaxed and imagined his ledge, the tower room began to disappear around him. Shortly, he was once again standing outside his new cave.





Chapter 11


"God, those people really piss me off," Tom said to himself as he looked out from his cave, "with their mixed up thee's and thou's and their pseudo-Latin mumbo jumbo.” Slowly he turned around and descended into the cave to explore it. "Would I like to show them a thing or two." As he descended, he thought about this last encounter; and the more he thought about it the angrier he got. Just as in any confrontation situation, where one feels one is the loser, Tom replayed all different scenarios, envisioning how things might have gone. If only he could have broken the barrier, if only he had thought of this, of that, of several different things.

He wandered down the cave, thinking of all the things he might do next time, to teach Lenamare and his toadies a lesson. He let out a lot of mental steam and frustration, knowing he'd probably never get a chance to exercise his dreams of vengeance. It was, he thought, just like the bullies; he had dreamed and dreamed of someday getting even, but he never did, and now never would. The closest he'd ever come to doing anything about the bullies in Junior High had been to take Tae Kwon Do lessons for over a year, before giving them up out of laziness. Occasionally he berated himself for not going further, only a few more months and he'd have had a black belt, but he'd gotten mad at people in the club and decided he didn't want to put up with the lessons and a few of the other students.

The tunnel was, Tom guessed, pretty dark inside; he could no longer see light from the outside; however, he had no trouble seeing. His demon eyes, he realized, could see very well in complete darkness, better even than a cat. Everything was in black and white, but it seemed almost as light as a very overcast day, and different objects stood out in sharp contrast to one another. Here and there the passage would narrow or widen and twist or turn. "Good grief this tunnel is long, I guess I've found a pretty good cave." Suddenly the cave opened up into a larger cavern. Nice, Tom thought looking around the cave, he was still too wound up to really appreciate the cave.

Lancing pain!

"Shit!" Tom yelled as what felt like huge knives ripped into his right arm and wing area. The blow sent him off balance and forward. He glanced behind him and saw something. What it was he couldn't be sure, but it was big, bigger by far than himself, and it had a huge claw with which it had tried to slice him.

A five foot long snout was suddenly in his face, as the creature repositioned itself, blocking the only visible exit to the cavern. The snout was very reptilian, and had huge teeth and mesmerizing eyes. Behind the head was a long curving neck which eventually merged with a large scaly body with wings the size of theRoc models Tom had seen in museums, and claws that looked like giant swords. Shit, thought Tom, it looks like a dragon. Quickly, Tom looked around the room, but he could see no other tunnels leading out. Since he was still wound up over his encounter with Lenamare, and because the pain had given him a massive adrenaline rush, and since the fight or flight syndrome was definitely going full bore, and he couldn't do the flight part, he decided to fight. Trying to think as little as possible about what he was doing, Tom put all his body strength into a back kick right to the nose of the dragon.

Crunch, was the sound from the dragon's nose scales. The dragon reared back and bellowed a horrendous roar of pain. Tom had forgotten how his bull-like legs were very well suited for back kicks, and how much stronger he now was. Put both of those facts together with the Tae Kwon Do he had learned, and he supposed he must have a pretty powerful kick.

Acrid smelling, steaming blood spurted out of the dragon's nose. Infuriated, it opened its mouth and let loose a gusher of liquid. The liquid fell on Tom's hide, and burned. Did it ever burn, it felt like he was on fire. Every nerve screamed in pain. Without pausing to think, Tom leaped forward swinging his right hand in an open karate chop at the dragon's neck, just as his instructor had taught him, what seemed like so long ago. He spread his fingers slightly, to get better advantage of his long nails. Tom knew that if he stopped to think rationally that he would probably run, even though there was nowhere to go, but he was too keyed up from his imaginary scenarios with Lenamare, and was too pissed off at this damn dragon, to do so. As easily as they had dug finger holds, his claws raked through the scales of the dragon, causing it to scream again.

This time the dragon's blood squirted on Tom, and if he had thought that the breath acid had stung, well this was somehow worse yet. The dragon reached down and tried to bite Tom on the head. Viciously, incisors bit into Tom's shoulder, one canine type fang punctured Tom's chest. He gasped in new pain, as lancing bolts of agony shot up from the puncture wound. Because of the puncture, he couldn't really use his left hand, not only did the tooth in his chest interfere with his pectoral muscles, but his left arm was partially in the mouth. Everything went dark around him as the jaws clamped shut. The small incisors hurt, but he hardly noticed them compared the fang in his left chest muscle, and the complementary top fang scraping along his left side. The dragon's tongue kept poking Tom on the head as it tried to bring him into its mouth to chew him up.

In a desperate attempt to avoid being eaten, Tom wildly swung his right fist towards where his own face would be. He felt his fingers tearing into the softer underside of the dragon's jaw, ripping muscles and scales. The dragon shuddered and screamed with its mouth shut. With his head inside the mouth, Tom's ears rang horribly, painfully even. He pulled down with his right hand, desperately using all his strength. His hand hit jaw bone; he pulled, and pulled, at the same time trying to gouge his nails into the bone.

Suddenly he heard a cracking sound nearby, and felt less resistance against his right hand. Then the fang was out of his chest, the head rearing back in pain, as part of its jaw hung broken from its mouth. As the head reared back, Tom noticed what appeared to be a more vulnerable spot, down where the dragon's neck met it's body. It was about fifty feet away now that the dragon's neck had arched back and up.

Tom ran as fast as he could towards the front of the dragon, he used his wings to add to his speed. This had never worked in practice, he'd always fallen flat on his face, but then he'd never had wings before to help him, he prayed silently that this would work, otherwise he'd be a dragon snack. When he got to what he felt was the right distance away, he jumped, spinning in midair. He again tried to use his injured wings as best as possible to aid his flight. Almost before he could think again, his feet impacted on the spot, doing a double reverse spinning back kick. His sharp hooves plunged into the dragon's body, just as they had into the ground after his fall from the pillar. Up to his thighs Tom plowed. The dragon screamed, if possible, even louder than before. Quickly before he could be plucked out, Tom began to kick his legs, back and forth inside the dragon, praying that he would disrupt something vital. Thrashing madly the dragon tried to remove Tom from its body. It screamed and shrieked, spun and thrashed. Tom grabbed onto scales to hold on, wincing as his left hand closed, and his arm flexed. Slower and slower the dragon spun, Tom kicked and kicked, all the time his legs screamed in agony as dragon blood ate away at his skin and muscle.

Finally, after a small eternity, the dragon's throws subsided; it ceased its screaming. The thrashes turned to mild rolls, then to rocking and finally it stopped. When convinced it was done, Tom crawled out of the dragon. His legs were shriveled and the muscles were partially dissolved almost down to the bone in places. All over his body scales were missing, dissolved away by the acid breath, and the even more acidic blood. On the left side of his chest was the gaping hole where the dragon tooth had speared him, green pus oozed from the wound. Apparently it was what passed for demon blood. He was still functional, so apparently no important organs were located in that part of his chest. Tom was exhausted; but, to be safe, he crawled over to the thinnest part of the dragon's neck. Clumsily, he plunged his fingers in, and began to hack and rip the dragon's head off. He wanted to make sure, before he slept, that this was one nightmare that was over.





Chapter 12


Jenn was in charge of leading some of the younger students in search of herbs and other plants needed for healing and magic spells. Alpert and Rodgier pulled two small wagons behind them and followed Jenn closely through the woods. Daphne and Siegfrid ran along beside Jenn, darting back and forth between trees looking for the plants she had described to them. Rupert walked calmly to her left, his eyes carefully scanning the ground around him.

Rupert, Jenn thought, was always so serious. It was perhaps a shame that he couldn't be as happy and playful as Daphne and Siegfrid, who were his own age. Children should be happy while they could, hard work and serious study came later. Jenn smiled fondly and remembered back when she was their age, if only she'd known to enjoy things more while she had the chance. Now it was work and study all the time. Goddess, she felt old for her seventeen years. Perhaps it was just tension from the expected siege.

Rex's rumors had been right. The very next morning after breakfast, Master Lenamare had called all the students and staff together to announce the fact that Exador had stated that he intended to take the school. Runners had been sent out to gather the peasants and recruit more men for defenses. The past few days had been the most hectic Jenn had yet seen at the school. Thiswas the first time in recent history that Jenn could think of a wizard's school being laid to siege by another group of wizards.

There had, of course, been, the Armelian invasion, over a hundred years ago, and the battle for Lord Folios' Keep, where thirty students, five masters, and three hundred men at arms had kept off the besieging army for thirteen weeks until help had arrived. That, however, had been during war time, and then the people laying the siege had been an invading army, not the neighboring wizards' guild. Why the Archimage of Turelane would permit such a thing, Jenn had no idea, but apparently, Exador had no fear of being opposed. To blatantly lay siege to a school such as Lenamare's took a lot of guts, or a lot of backing.

It was this fear of lots of backing that had really set people's nerves on edge around the school. After all, if it was just Exador, one could expect intervention from the Archimage and the Council, but apparently, Lenamare felt no intervention would be forthcoming, because he had talked of fighting to the last man, `to defend our freedom and our homes.' Needless to say, that had made a lot of people nervous. The only thing keeping people together was fear, and their belief in Lenamare and some new secret weapon of his.

Jenn, like all of the older students who had been present, knew that the secret weapon was the fourth order demon; however, all those present had been warned not to speak for fear Exador might learn, and attempt to gain more demonic support of his own. Actually, Jenn wasn't all too sure that what one fourth order demon could do to improve the efforts of seven or eight lessor demons against a huge army was worth the risk involved in controlling such a beast. She imagined, however, that the psychological effect of confronting a wizard powerful enough to control it, and the fear the demon itself would instill in the enemy soldiers would probably be worth it in and of themselves. Minor demons tended to scare normal people, more powerful ones even made trained wizards nervous.

Of course it wasn't shear power that made the higher order demons fearsome, it was also their trickiness. In addition to being more powerful, they also tended to be smarter and so could use their power to greater effect. It was these demons that wizards had to be especially careful of; the miswording of any order could be the undoing of the wizard’s entire cause. All too often one heard horror stories of some hapless wizard who overlooked a loophole in his or her command, only to find themselves spread out all over their tower in tiny pieces. Of course, Jenn had never known any of these wizards or even knew of anyone that actually had known one of these wizards, who was ripped to shreds. Still, it was a well-known fact that nobody cared to test. Enough proof could be garnered in the form of observation of the sometimes twistedly literal ways demons carried out their orders, and their general threatening manners.

To Jenn, as to all wizards, it was quite obvious that each and every one of these malevolent and foul beings would do anything they could to destroy mankind. As such, they were very much a two edged blade when used in combat. Jenn personally preferred to rely on human strength and other forms of magic, rather than face demons. Especially that new one. True, it was the first demon greater than second order that she had seen, but that had been more than enough. Its huge and hideous form gave her goose bumps just thinking about it. How Lenamare could plan on using something so monstrously powerful and unthinkably old and inhuman, she really couldn't understand. If Exador had the powerful backing everyone feared he had, then using a fourth order demon would probably escalate things and bring in more high order demons. If the Archimage of Turelane got involved, he too could send in a fourth order demon, perhaps even a fifth, if he really got desperate.

Jenn brought herself to a halt in the forest and began to scold herself for being so foolish in her speculation. A fifth order demon. As if Lenamare's school could ever be so valuable. No, perhaps the fourth order demon could save them. The goddess knew Jenn prayed that it would never come to even using that.

Off to her right Daphne screamed. Quickly, Jenn spun to her right. She motioned the other three children with her to huddle together as she ran to where Daphne sounded to be. She dodged through a few trees and came upon the frightened child. Siegfrid was cowering with her, both were trying to back away from what menaced them.

What menaced them Jenn quickly saw, was a man. Not just any man either, he was scroungy and dirty looking and wore the trappings of a forester. His cloak however had a bright badge of purple and gold. Exador's colors. This man, who was advancing on the children with a dagger, with the obvious intention of silencing them before they could give warning, was one of Exador's scouts.

Fearing for the children, Jenn reached in her pocket and pulled out a small vine. "Esticten tomros sed nesten. Verdet et suprestum entreppum sid faltos. Xiat et lux." As she said this she concentrated on the forest growth around the man's feet, she twisted the vine in her hands into a loop.

Mimicking her gestures, the roots of nearby trees and bushes, rose to twine around the man's feet. Cursing the man stumbled and fell to the ground. Looking up, he grimaced angrily as he saw Jenn. Hurrying, before he could get free, Jenn shoved the children back towards the wagon, and then grabbed more vines from her pocket. Carefully she repeated the spell, this time wrapping the struggling man's right arm and then his left. After this she roped him around the waist.

Reaching into another pocket she pulled out a rock and began the spell that would make her other spells last long enough to get people back here to capture this man. "Eternum solidum, vectos sed altos entreppum se kreolum. Sig fielos soy dernum. Kiapum der bindus." Using all her strength she broke the rock she held with her hands, releasing its centuries old hardness and solidness into her previous spell, so that it might have some of the lasting power that this rock had had. Since the rock was only limestone, because that was all she could break with her own hands, the spell wouldn't last that incredibly long, but it should last without her for several hours, long enough for her purposes.

She then left the man, still struggling and cursing and led the children back to the wagon. As a final precaution, she took out a small crystal and stared into it. Concentrating, she tried to detect any other humans in the area. As far as she could tell though, the scout had been alone, or certainly was now. It wasn't fool proof, and she wasn't the best at this sort of scrying, but it was still better than nothing

Feeling relatively safe now, she headed the children back to the tower. At least the children would have something to talk about. As would she, Jenn realized. What was more, Jenn suddenly thought, she, herself, had made an important contribution to their defense by stopping a spy, and by capturing someone who would have information on Exador. Shaking from the past few moments of stress, but proud of herself, Jenn returned home with her charges in tow.





Chapter 13


For the second time since smoking the grass, Tom awoke in the demon plane. Oh well, Tom thought, still here. Tom had hoped he might have woken up at home, proving that the whole thing had been a dream. It was still real though. What was happening at home? Tom wondered. Was he in a coma some place, or was he, as Boggy said, dead. He hoped he wasn't dead. He hated to think of all the pain it would cause his mother if he were dead. Hisdad had died in an explosion 10 years ago, and just recently his mom had divorced his stepfather, so Tom was pretty much the only person she had in her life.

What would his friends say? He imagined that if he died at Reggie's party, they'd all be shitting bricks. Even if he was only in a coma, they'd still be majorly freaked out. Serves them right, Tom thought vindictively, for giving him that bad grass. They could go home that night, even if they didn't sleep well. Tom was stuck here, either forever, or until he woke up, if it was a dream. In the meantime he'd have to be constantly living in fear of more intense agonies. Thinking of pain, Tom noticed that he was sore all over. Noticing that brought him back to where he was.

Quickly, he looked around. The large cave was deserted, only he and the dragon body were in the cavern. Actually, sans dragon, the cavern was pretty nice and roomy. However, Tom tried inhaling, which caused a great deal of pain where he'd been bitten, and he caught a powerful smell of rotting. The dragon corpse was stinking really bad. Apparently he'd been out for some time.

He looked down at his legs to see if he'd ever walk again, and was surprised to see that they were almost back to normal. Touching them, he noticed that they were quite tender, but all the muscle had pretty much returned. Looking down at his chest, and feeling it with his hand, he noted that the puncture was closed, and only a large indenture and some scarring was left. It seemed that demons bodies repaired themselves. Carefully he tried to stand.

He wobbled a bit, both from weakness and from still not being totally familiar with his new legs. After he got to his feet, he tried flexing his wings. They definitely had a twinge to them, but, as far as he could tell, were fully functional.

Well if he had to be stuck in a video game it was good to have regeneration as a power. It might have been nice to have designed his own character so he knew what it could do. Character? Tom shook his head. There was no character, it was him. He was the demon warrior fighting dragons! He had to close his eyes and take a deep breath to avoid freaking out. He needed to get to doing something, stop thinking about this.

The first order of business, Tom decided, was to remove this unwanted corpse from his new living room. Tom walked over to the dragon’s head, and carefully picked it up. Actually, Tom thought, it might be nice to have a souvenir. He reached into the mouth with his right hand, and steadied the head with his left. Deftly gripping one of the fangs, he pulled. Crack, snap, the tooth came loose from the mouth. It was covered by decomposing flesh and was pretty sick, but Tom figured, it was worth it. He then repeated the exercise with the other three fangs until he had a nice set of four dragon fangs.

Tom then picked up the head in both heads and proceeded to carry it to his entrance. When he reached the cave mouth, he looked over the edge. Now, where to put it? He could toss it over, but that was likely to draw scavengers that he really didn't want to deal with, so perhaps it was best to take it away someplace. He glanced up, and around the valley. Nowhere here, Tom decided. As he'd been taught, Tom began walking towards the center of the valley. When he reached the edge of ledge he kept on going. He then reoriented himself, and flew up and over his mountain. He'd decided that his best bet would probably be to dump it a few valleys over. He flew down the backside of his mountain and then up the next mountain and into the next valley. When he got to a likely spot, he simply let go of the head and watched it fall. He then returned to his cave.

As he landed on the ledge, he realized that he hadn't marked the cave yet. Thinking that marking would be the best way to keep unwanted visitors away, Tom imagined himself walking up a ladder to the top of the cave mouth. His wings complied, and there he was. Now, what would he use as a mark? Tom really didn't feel too creative today, so he finally decided on a cursive `T' with a flourish of a circle around it. True, it was imitative of the other demon who had used a circled `Y,' but who was to know. Using the nail of his index finger, Tom carved his symbol in a relatively smooth space above the mouth.

He descended and started back down the cave. As he was walking back to the cavern, Tom suddenly realized that the dragon, when it was alive would have had to twist and constrict itself to get through the passageways. It was dead now, and Tom would have to carry it out somehow. Fun, Tom thought, this is going to be messy.

Tom was just pulling the last of the dragon's legs out of the cave when a voice hailed him from above. "Ho, Tom, what you got there? A giant drumstick?"

Tom turned around and saw Boggy descending from the sky.

"No, just doing a little house cleaning." Tom was actually glad to see the little demon. It was nice to have someone to talk to, after dragging random dragon parts out of the cave and dumping them, for the last hour.

"Nasty looking termites you've got," Boggy commented as he landed on the ledge.

"Actually, not only nasty looking, but just plain nasty."

"I can see. Must have been a great fight." Boggy was eyeing Tom's wound's with an appraising eye. "How long ago did you kill it?"

"I don't know, I slept for a long time after. The fight was probably about eight hours after I woke up beneath the ledge."

Boggy raised both his eyebrows, which of course were hairless. "Then definitely a nasty fight. That would have been two Astlanian days ago. If that's all the more healed you are, then you were in bad shape."

"Yeah, he sunk a fang clear through me." Tom pointed to his chest wound, and to the smaller scar he'd discovered, where the fang had come out. "And his acid breath squirted me all over."

"Well how did you finally kill it then? Those things are mean S.O.B.'s."

"I spotted a weak spot, under its neck, and jumped with both feet for it. When they got in, well, I just kicked its guts until it died." Tom felt a small glow of pride in telling his tale.

"Lucky you spotted that weak area. I don't know what plane those fellows originally came from, but their anatomy sure makes them hard to locate a vital area."

"Plane they came from?. This isn't another demon is it?" Tom got nervous, he'd thought he'd just killed some stupid monster. Not another human being in demon form.

"Yep it is, but don't worry," Boggy hastened to add, seeing Tom's stricken look. "They were never humans, like you or I. They belong to some sort of warm blooded technological reptile race out on the edge of some distant galaxy, in god knows what universe. They hate humans and human demons. They always do their best to kill us, so we either try to kill them too, or avoid them if they're stronger than us."

"Oh," Tom said, somewhat relieved. He still didn't like killing another intelligent being. He wondered why though, it hadn't bothered him until Boggy had mentioned the possibility of it being another demon. Of course, it wasn't like he'd had much choice, the thing was trying to kill him. But, his conscience nagged him, Tom had invaded its cave.

"I guess Tizzy didn't mention the fact that just because a cave isn't marked, doesn't mean it's empty."

"No, he didn't," Tom replied hesitantly.

"Well, all human demons mark their caves, but some of the alien ones don't. That dragon living there was also probably the reason you don't see many other demons out this way."

Curious, Tom asked, "Boggy how did you find me?"

"Wasn't too hard. When I finally got back, I found Tizzy and he showed me where he'd left you. I simply went towards the mountains looking. It took me quite a while, but eventually I spotted this cave and saw the `T' on it."

"You saw that mark from way up high?"

"Sure, demon sight is a lot better than any mere eagle sight. Just concentrate on something at a distance. If they can, your eyes will focus on it. Try it sometime."

"What other things, besides the eyesight, the regeneration, and the aliens not marking their caves haven't I been told?" Tom asked suspiciously.

Boggy smiled at him, "Now lad, you can't expect me to tell you everything, that would take all the fun out of it. Besides itis sometimes best if you find out for yourself what you can and cannot do. That way I don't limit you by telling you what you should and should not be able to accomplish. Who knows, different demons can do different things, maybe you can do things that I consider impossible."

"Yes, but..."

"Now, except for the oversight on the markings, we've told you everything really necessary for survival, don't worry. Besides, there isn't much that can permanently hurt you here."

"Speaking of permanently hurt," Tom realized, "why did this dragon decompose and I regenerate. How did I actually manage to kill it."

"That is a bit complex. But basically speaking it has to do with the basic differences in the energy patterns between us and the dragons. The dragons, regenerate faster, but not if you kill them. You and I regenerate fairly slowly, but still incredibly fast compared to a man. Dragons regenerate about three times faster than we do. The only way to slow them down is to cut off their heads and destroy their hearts. Which, it appears that you inadvertently did. Now, once you do that to a dragon, it can't regenerate its old body, so it just abandons it. It then has to form a new one from scratch, and that could take a couple hundred years before it gathers enough energy to form one. We, on the other hand, don't stop regenerating after a certain point. The largest part of our bodies left after a fight, somehow gathers up what's left of our field and begins rebuilding. So, we generally stay with essentially the same body. Which, I might add, is many times faster than starting from scratch."

"That's handy to know. Here, fly with me, while I dump this." Tom launched in the air and took off to the dump site, Boggy following.

"So," Boggy asked, "have you seen your accursed master again?"

"Yes," Tom answered as they flew. "It was kind of strange. This time there were only two people with him, and they had some sort of ring and did some sort of mumbo jumbo about binding me to the ring and some Neverending Loop."

"Hmm," Boggy said knowingly.

"What were they doing?"

"Well, it sounds to me as if they are preparing to control several demons at one time. What they did was bind you to a talisman. Which basically means that any wizard who has the ring, can command you without first doing a bunch of rituals to bind you. Essentially, anyone wearing the ring is as protected from you as if you were in a pentagram, and they can command you in the name of the master who did the binding."

Tom reached the place where he was depositing the dragon bits, and let the leg go. As he turned to head back he asked, "Now just exactly, who can normally command my service."

"Well, basically any wizard who knows your true name and does the required bindings for a demon of your power, or any wizard with the ring who knows how to use it. Now, the first wizard to bind you has precedence over any later wizards binding you; unless, the later wizard is a lot more powerful than the first. Actually, I really wouldn't worry too much about it. You'll know whose orders to follow, by being able to carry out those orders when they conflict. For now, just realize that anyone who's guts you can rip out, can't command you."

"Great." Tom didn't relish the idea of going around ripping people’s guts out to determine if he should follow their orders; that really wasn't the best way to make friends. Tom also couldn't feel the bloodthirsty attitude towards the Astlanians that Boggy did. He didn't like them, but that didn't mean he wanted to kill them. Sure, for a while he'd wanted to strangle Lenamare, but that was only one Astlanian, and that only for a short while after being bullied by him.

Tom and Boggy went back inside the cave to get the tail and the lower torso of the dragon. Boggy dragged the tail out and Tom what was left of the torso. It was a tight fit, but eventually he got it to the cave mouth. Tom leaped into the air and Boggy followed, puffing as he hauled the tail along. Tom's section was bigger and heavier, but Boggy was the weaker demon. Eventually they both made it to the dumping site and unloaded the last of the dragon.

"I noticed as I was chopping up the dragon, there was very little blood on the ground. Some of the ground had been dissolved, but there really seemed like more blood in the dragon when I fought it," Tom commented as they returned to Tom's cave.

"Dragon blood evaporates quickly, and when in gaseous form is extremely volatile. Their acid breath is a toned down version of their blood. When they get extremely excited, more blood is pumped in and the acid gets stronger. If they exert themselves physically and raise their body temperature, the acid becomes a gas and the dragon can strike sparks on its teeth to ignite it as it breaths."

"Fire breathing dragon."

"Exactly."

"So is my cave likely to explode, if I spark something?"

"I doubt it, but it’s possible, however it would probably only cause you mild pain, we're fairly fire resistant."

"But not acid."

"You've got to give the poor suckers a fighting chance after all," replied Boggy with a grin.





Chapter 14


"Have you learned anything from the man yet?" Jehenna asked as she relaxed in the chair across from Lenamare's desk.

"No," he said looking at her from behind his desk, "not yet. We will though. If the normal interrogators don't succeed by tomorrow afternoon, I'll threaten him with the salt trick.”

Jehenna shuddered; the salt trick was bad. In fact it was forbidden by every guild in Astlan. Fortunately only a very few wizards were capable of doing it. Lenamare, of course, was one. The salt trick was not done often, not because it was illegal, but because it was tedious and extremely taxing to the wizards involved.

It involved spells to keep the victim alive as his skin was carefully peeled off in one piece. Salt and other substances such as ammonia were then gently applied to the inside of the skin. The skin was placed back on the victim. The wounds quickly sealed and healed magically, then the person given a thorough rub down. It was extremely unpleasant. It required two wizards and three experienced torturers to get it right. That, however, was not the worst part. The worst part was that Exador knew the trick also and he liked to do it for fun.

As a rule, the preparations and perhaps a little cutting were all that were necessary to get the victim to talk. Although few had seen it done, almost everyone knew what it was. Lenamare, in his characteristically benevolent and generous nature, had only had to threaten it and had never actually had to do it. Exador’s ancestors on the other hand, had been known to do it, and most presumed he would as well.

"Sounds like a fun night," Jehenna said drolly.

"Oh yes. We must know Exador's strength though, and we must know how soon he will arrive. This is survival of the fittest. May the best wizard win."

"To you," Jehenna said as she nodded and picked up the wine goblet beside her and raised it in a toast.

"To me."

~

Jenn tucked the last of the children in. They had had a busy day, as had she. She smiled wearily as she went down the corridor to her own cubicle. Those children were perhaps the only light in this damn school. She really didn't like it here. No one did. Master Trisfelt was nice, and Hortwell tolerable. Elrose was aloof but fair; Lenamare gave her the creeps; and she disliked his better than the gods attitude. Jehenna, however, was a bitch.

When she had hurried home with the children and reported the scout in the woods, all Jehenna could say was "Why didn't you bring him in for questioning? now I have to send guards out." As if Jenn could have managed five children, two small wagons and a struggling captive on the mile long hike back to the castle. It seemed that no matter what she did, no matter how good she was, she could never satisfy Jehenna. Lenamare didn't bother to notice her, and Jehenna kept demanding more.

This was price one had to pay to be a wizard. Unfortunately, Lenamare's school was the only one around with an opening when her parents discovered her talents. Thus, they'd packed her off, and paid a stiff matriculation fee, as well as tuition each year. Jenn often wondered what happened to those people with talent and no money to pay for education.

She walked into her cubicle and sat down on her cot. She looked around the room, there really wasn't much here. There was the cot, a small table and stool, a small trunk with her few changes of clothes and her extra robe, the two text books she called her own, paper and pens, nothing of real value, but it was all she owned in the entire world. Except for the little brown leather book, with the gold embossing, her diary. It was what recorded her world. Every night she faithfully recorded her day. The diary was one small piece of private stability, her best friend. Tonight she'd recorded her busy day before putting the little ones to bed.

All in all the room wasn't much, but it was home. She hadn't seen her parents since they'd sent her away, six years ago. She'd been eleven when she came here, already two to three years older than most of the initiates, like Daphne and Rupert and their friends. She had learned quickly though, now she was nearly caught up with the rest of the students her age. She still had trouble getting enough force into the destructive spells, her best talents lay in healing and nature spells.

Enough thought for one evening, Jenn decided. She blew out the candle and stripped off her gown. Quickly she slid between her covers, savoring the small relaxations in her life. For some really obscure reason, the flame of the candle had made her think of demons. Did they sleep at night?, Did they even do much of anything when they weren't serving, other than kill each other and perform other hideous and unspeakable acts? She knew then she must be tired, why else would she be thinking such silly thoughts.





Chapter 15


Tom dug the last bit of stone out with his index finger. Since Boggy and he had finished cleaning up the dragon, Tom hadn't really had much to do. Boggy stayed around for a few more hours, talking about his experiences as a slave, and sharing a few of his personal thoughts on the situation. He had then decided he'd better go and find Tizzy.

Tom stood around for a while; when it began to look like he might have to dwell on his predicament some more, he quickly decided that what his cave needed most was furniture. How to get furniture? That was the problem. He had walked out of his cave and looked around a bit and finally came up with an idea. He would carve it out of stone himself. His claws/nails could easily dig through stone, so why couldn't he carve with them?

Tom flew around until he found the best sized boulder that suited his purposes and that he could carry while flying. He then took it up to his ledge and into his cave. After a little bit of design work in his head, he began to carve. It took him several hours, but since he didn't get tired, he was able to keep it up for a long time. Eventually it was finished, and he stood back to admire it.

It really wasn't much, but it would have to do. The seat was about four and a half feet above the ground, it had armrests that raised another foot, and a back of about the same height. He couldn't make the back too high or his wings would get in the way. After trial and error, he managed to get it at a comfortable height. He also had to punch a hole in the back of the seat, and a small groove, so his tail could fit through with plenty of room to spare. It was going to be tricky for a while to get sat down correctly, but he figured it would get easier with time. He also had to carve the seat in a few other places for his legs and hooves, but these were relatively minor, and mainly just for maximum comfort. Actually, the chair was not incredibly comfortable, but it seemed better than standing all the time. It would have been nice to have a cushion, but he had no way of obtaining one.

Tom also carved shelves into the walls of the cave, he didn't really have anything to put there, except for the dragon teeth, which were a bit large for a shelf anyway. He hoped that someday it might be possible to acquire a few things, but for now it was something to do. He also considered a table, but for now it would be difficult to gouge one smooth enough, and he really didn't need one.

Tom also didn't like the idea of sleeping on the cave floor all the time, but again, he had no way of getting a mattress, or even any straw. As far as he'd been able to tell, there was no plant life here in the Abyss, as Tizzy called it. He also had no idea how he could get any from Astlan. If, as Boggy had indicated, only spirits could travel between planes, how could he bring anything material here?

While he was pondering this, he once again heard voices calling his name. Actually, this time, Tom really didn't mind. He had been beginning to run out of things to do, and that meant he would have had to start thinking about his parents and friends again, which he really preferred not to do.

The world changed slowly this time, like the last time. This time, however, he was prepared and so could calmly watch the whole thing. The image of the familiar tower room slowly superimposed itself over his cave. He saw the pentagrams glowing at his feet, a shadowy Lenamare appeared to take form in his cave. The light level increased with the new image; eventually it seemed that his cave was the hollow image and the tower room the only real place. Shortly, his cave was gone, and he was completely in the tower room with Lenamare and Jehenna. The whole process had lasted about thirty seconds.

Tom stared at Lenamare, who naturally stared back unflinchingly. Tom said nothing; he would let Lenamare do the talking. He would not trifle with any of the, `How may I serve thee master...' bit, which Boggy had described most masters as preferring. Lenamare might be able to control his pain, and his coming and going, and therefore force him to obey some commands, but he wasn't going to get any more from Tom than was absolutely necessary.

"Demon, I Lenamare have graciously decided to allow you to perform a task for me." As if he should be grateful, Tom thought. Lenamare paused, as if expecting a response. Tom simply continued to stare. "Know that I have a message for a fellow wizard, and at this time I can only spare one so lowly as yourself to deliver it." If what Boggy had said about the relationships between demons and master was true, this guy was either immensely powerful, or incredibly stupid.

According to Boggy, most wizards were fairly wary of all demons, especially the more powerful ones, consequently they were usually only used for the most difficult tasks, or when for some reason it was impractical for a human to do the same thing. Delivering a message, sounded like a task better left to a human. Unless, of course, it had to be done with all speed, in which case, Tom guessed a demon would be better.

Lenamare held up a sealed tube. "This is the message you shall take. It goes to the wizard Zilquar in Beltan. Do you understand the concept of a map, demon?"

Tom couldn't decide if he should give Lenamare the satisfaction of answering. As he thought about it for a moment, though, Tom decided that it would probably save himself some work if he admitted that he could read a map. He decided however, that if he had to play a demon, then he would give these two assholes the full treatment, at least until he could do something more constructive.

Inhaling, instead of exhaling, and lowering his voice as low as possible, Tom attempted his best imitation of what he imagined a powerful creature of evil sounded like. "Of course...foolish mortal." Actually, Tom was quite pleased with the effect. He had misjudged the power of his lungs slightly, and the echo that would be produced in the small room; his voice came out deep and booming, with a hint of crackling in it. Darth Vader would have been proud, Tom thought.

Out of the corner of his eye, he was pleased to note that Jehenna stepped back slightly, surprised by his voice. Lenamare, of course, didn't so much as bat an eye. Speaking carefully now, Lenamare pulled open a scroll with a map on it. He pointed to a small star on it. "This star, demon, represents my keep, the red line represents a human road that goes towards Beltan. You must go south. Do you know which direction is south?" Tom tried to simply smirk. "I will point in the proper direction, before you leave." Lenamare said sounding slightly frustrated at not receiving an answer. "This X on the map represents Zilquar's tower." He pointed to a spot near a bunch of squiggly lines, which Tom assumed were mountains. "It is in the mountains."

"You will go directly to the tower and demand to speak to Zilquar. You will harm no one nor anything at this point. When Zilquar identifies himself, you must give this canister to him, sealed, unopened, and undisturbed in any manner, and state that you were sent by me, Lenamare. You will then depart his tower, leaving Zilquar and all that is his or his subjects' intact and unharmed. This includes all people who work for or are slaves to Zilquar. You will immediately return to me for further instructions. You will not deviate from your course to or from the tower in any way. You will do nothing that I have not commanded you. You are to say nothing to Zilquar that might harm me or mine in any possible manner, indirectly or directly; however you are free to speak as otherwise necessary to carry out this mission."

Tom stared down pointedly at the pentagram on the floor. "I shall now release the pentagram, you will harm neither I nor any of my people, nor anything that is mine." Lenamare and Jehenna put out two adjacent braziers, and made arcane gestures with their hands while chanting, "Disolum, tripedus, prodentes ved sultos. Akien et veltos, summa lux." They both stepped back as Lenamare motioned for Tom to leave the circle.

He stepped forward over the line. He could feel a slight resistance, but he had no real difficulty. As he stepped out, he looked around the room seeking an exit. The curtains were all shut tightly; he couldn't tell where any exits might be. Lenamare handed him the tube and the map, saying, "You should be back in no later than three days, if you fly all the time. If you do not return then, you shall experience the compulsion spell I’ve placed on you and I guarantee you won't enjoy it."

Tom just glowered at Lenamare. He wasn't particularly mad, he just figured it would make a good effect. These people were almost comic in their seriousness. Tom supposed however, thinking of the fantasy novels he had read involving demons, and more than a few first person shooters, that if he was in their place, he might act similarly.

"So, mortal," Tom said in his booming indrawn voice, "do you mind if I just smash through your pitiful walls. Or do you plan to provide me with an exit?"

Lenamare looked slightly peeved at the moment, and Jehenna looked slightly taken aback. There could be a few enjoyable moments in this job, Tom thought, hiding a smile. This demon business wasn't always boring; however, he imagined that it would probably get pretty old, quickly.

"Here, use this window." Lenamare drew back a curtain revealing a shuttered window. Tom looked at the window, it was big enough for Lenamare or Boggy to get through, barely, but he doubted that he would fit. The shutters swung open, it would definitely be too tight.

"If you insist…mortal. However, know that I'll have to take some of the window with me." Tom warned Lenamare, actually he'd have preferred to just crash through it, without warning Lenamare; however, he felt he might just be taking too much of a risk of pain. At this, Lenamare looked definitely annoyed; apparently, he had not counted on Tom's size.

"Hmm, very well. Follow me." Lenamare went to another portion of the curtain and pulled it aside, revealing an iron bound wooden door. Lenamare opened the door and went through. Tom, as instructed, followed, he had to bend down, but he did make it through. Jehenna brought up the rear, looking extremely nervous about marching a demon through the building.

They went down a short corridor to a spiral staircase. "Remember, demon, if you so much as harm, however so slightly, or cause to be harmed, any person or thing that is mine, you will be severely punished," Lenamare warned as he turned at the top of the stairs.

These folks are paranoid, Tom thought. Lenamare began the descent down the spiral, Tom following behind, being careful not to bump his wings on the stairwell. After about two revolutions, Tom heard an indrawn breath and quick scurrying. As they passed a small landing with a door, Tom observed a girl in a brown robe, drawn up inside the doorway. Not bad, Tom observed, too bad she was a wizard, he recognized her as one of the members of the circle. He turned his head back toward Lenamare, ignoring the frightened expression on the girl's face.

Eventually they reached an open floor, where Lenamare left the spiral, even though it continued further down. Tom also got off the spiral and moved next to Lenamare, who was waiting for him. As he stepped off, Tom heard a couple glasses break, and what sounded like four or five people diving for cover. He looked up to see several women scurrying behind pillars and makeshift cots. He was in a large hall area, which was filled with cots and straw sleeping pallets. The only people in the room were the few women, who had apparently been doing odd jobs, and gossiping, but who were now hiding in terror.

Their fear, and the wizard girl's, served to bring home just how different Tom was now. His mild enjoyment of the demon role was rapidly wearing off. This really wasn't going to be fun, having everyone run from him. It brought a lump to Tom's throat; he wished desperately that he could be back home in Harding. He was definitely feeling homesick, and he guessed, body sick. He just wanted to be like he had been.

As he stood, sadly eyeing the frightened women, Lenamare said, "Come along demon, we are almost out.” Lenamare turned and marched across the room, ignoring the women, to a large door set in the far wall. Tom followed silently. Lenamare opened the door, letting sunlight in.

For some reason, seeing that light made Tom feel slightly better. Perhaps it gave him a little hope, a little piece of home. Tom stepped through the door into the sunlight. Outside, men were building things and running errands; guards were practicing. As Tom stepped out, all motion slowly came to a halt as eyes turned towards him. A few children and men ran, but most just stood and stared. Tom looked at them, fear shone plainly in all their faces and eyes. He could almost read their thoughts, he imagined most feared to run because they didn't want to look cowardly, or they were afraid of attracting his attention. As his eyes scanned them, they flinched from his gaze, as if he could kill them with a glance.

So much for the ray of sunshine, Tom thought, Enough. He pulled his eyes back to Lenamare; if they wanted to fear him, there was nothing he could do. Lenamare pointed over one wall of the keep and said simply, "south."

Without saying a word, Tom climbed into the air and flew over the castle walls to the south. This was really going to be hard to get used to, thought Tom as he flew from the keep.

~

Back in the courtyard, the tension eased from the men as the demon flew out of sight behind the wall. Slowly men began to speak again, but not too loudly, since Lenamare and Jehenna were still there. As the work began again, Jehenna turned to Lenamare.

"Are you truly sure it was wise to send that demon to Zilquar? Wouldn't a smaller one have worked, or a man, or a Telemirror?"

"No, we must bargain for aid from a position of strength. Having a fourth order demon deliver my request will reassure Zilquar that we have a chance of winning. If I had sent anything less, he might have felt that we were a lost cause, and not bothered to help, no matter how good a deal I might make. This will show him my strength."

"Was it wise to parade it through all these people, what if Exador hears?"

"Did I have much choice? What sort of reaction would we have gotten if the demon burst through the tower wall? That would have been great for morale; it would have appeared that we couldn't even handle our own demons. That surely would have gotten to Exador. No, this way they see the demon, and know fear, as well as hope. If we are lucky, everyone will be too scared to talk for a while. We don't need much time. Exador may even be here before our messenger returns."

"Impossible, armies only move so fast," Jehenna assured him.





Chapter 16


Jenn stood, silently shaking in the doorway. Goddess, that had scared her. Who would expect to find a demon, let alone that demon, following Lenamare around the school? When she had been coming up the stairs and saw Lenamare coming down, she had started to respectfully bow, but then she had seen it. Her heart had nearly jumped up her throat. This was the first time she'd seen a demon that wasn't in a pentagram. She'd dashed to first doorway she could find.

As it passed, it had looked straight at her. Jenn had feared then that she might break down crying in fear, but luckily, she'd managed to hold her own. The thing had been so huge, so horrible, and it had passed within one of its own claw lengths from her. If it had wanted to, it could have reached out and ripped her heart right out of her chest. She hadn't realized when they'd conjured it, that it was so big. Then it had only been there for a short while, and on its knees. She'd known it was powerful by the way it had fought them, but that had been in a remote, abstract sort of way. This, this was real, and present in the stairway. Those huge claws, the horns and fangs, the creature were surely out of her worst nightmare.

The whole thing was incredibly huge and powerful, she just couldn't get it out of her mind. She desperately prayed that those stories about women raped by demons and being forced to bear demonic children were false, and even more so, she hoped she'd never have a chance to find out. How Lenamare could let it roam the keep, even with himself and Jehenna, Jenn just simply couldn't understand. If it escaped their control…Jenn would rather face Exador and his entire army.

She tried consciously to slow her breathing. Looking down at her feet, trying to get her terror under control, she noticed her hands clenched on her breast. Forcefully she put her hands to her sides and unclenched them. She ordered her body to relax. She was after all, a student of the magical arts. Someday soon, she would be a full wizard in her own right, how could she ever expect to conjure and control demons, if she feared them so. That was easy, another part of her mind answered, she didn't. Jenn wanted nothing to do with the magic of conjuring demons. They were better left alone, anyone foolish enough to mess with them deserved whatever they got. There were plenty of other types of magic around; she could work with natural magics, healing and plants, the elements, things like that.

Jenn gathered her wits together, soon it would be the talk of the school and she would have to able to describe it to others. She mustn't let anyone else know of her fear. Sudden dread grabbed at her. What if Jehenna had seen her fear…if she knew of Jenn's fear, she would exploit it. Use it to goad her, use it as a weapon to demand even more from her. She would use it until either Jenn broke or her fear did. At the moment, Jenn wasn't at all sure which would go first.

~

The news of the demon spread rapidly throughout the school. Finally, everyone knew of Lenamare's secret weapon. Most had realized that demons would be used, but few had ever actually seen one. None who had seen one previously had seen one this powerful. Excitement rang through those who hadn't seen it, tinged with only a little anxiety in most. Here was hope, a chance against Exador, surely he could not summon anything so powerful in the middle of battle.

Those who had seen it felt slightly differently. Of course, they recognized the hope it represented; but they had seen it, seen it in full form, and seen how big it was. Everyone knew demons were dangerous, especially the powerful ones. Normally people only saw the little imps and sprites, the first order demons, if they ever saw one. These, although they made people nervous, did not cause the fear of the second and third order demons. Those demons looked like more normal sized, if hideous and grotesque, people. This one was much more than that.

Although none of the wizards who knew would say, including Jenn. Old men who had seen demons whispered that this was higher than a third order demon. Naturally not knowing the power of the demon only made things worse in the minds of the people. The people who saw this one feared it escaping. They had seen the grim frown of its hideous face as it left the keep, they were sure it was more than willing to destroy them all and take their souls.

Thus it was that the possible salvation of the school was also the greatest fear for several in the school. For truly, as the people near a wizard school knew, demonology was the two edged sword of magic. Therefore, everyone in the keep waited anxiously for Exador; they dreaded his arrival, yet feared their salvation almost as much. Except, of course, for Lenamare, and one other.

The other was a small boy, a new student at the school. He knew the real reason the demon was here, and after years of hoping, he rejoiced.





Chapter 17


Tom flew south. He was still in a bad mood over the reaction of the people in the keep; however, seeing green grass and living plants did a lot toward cheering him up. He supposed he really couldn't blame the people in the keep for fearing him. He wasn't the most handsome looking guy in the world. In fact, remembering his first visions of his current form, he really couldn't fault anyone from being a bit nervous. Given the superstition that was bound to be running wild among peasant types in a medieval world, the only sane reaction would be fear.

Even so, it hurt to be the object of that fear, even if he could understand it. Now he knew why monsters in fantasy novels were always so surly and nasty. If everyone in the world feared and hated one, wouldn't it be easy to hate everyone in the world? No real consolation there, thought Tom, it really didn’t help to know that historically, others have faced similar problems. The only problem that really mattered was his.

By now he was flying over deep prairie, as far as he could see in any direction, there was nothing but grass. Occasionally he would spot a meandering stream. He flew fairly high to avoid scaring any innocent people that might be wandering by. The grass and small occasional trees seemed to beckon to him. The warm sun beating down, grass blowing gently in the wind, all contributed to a relaxed feeling Tom had not encountered in a long time.

Not that Tom ever used to lay around in the middle of prairies to relax. He had grown up in cities, and only rarely got out to the countryside. Nevertheless, books he had read had set the picture, and the gentle breeze seemed to propel him onward. It was only the fact that he really didn't know how far away this keep was that kept him stopping for a nap. For all he knew it could be so far away as to require continuous flying to reach it in the appointed time. The map had no distance markings and he had no idea how fast Lenamare expected him to travel. Thus he simply kept flying.

Eventually the sun began to set to his right, and heat of the day began to subside. Not, of course, that he even really noticed the heat; he could simply feel the sunlight warming his wings as he flew. Actually, this place was positively arctic compared to the Abyss, if what Boggy had said was true. The air though, thought Tom, really was not at all uncomfortably cool. Apparently, his body could adjust to a wide variety of climates.

As the sun went below the horizon and the stars began to shine in the sky, Tom once again noticed that now he saw everything in dark contrasts to one and other. All images were a lot sharper, but black and white. Actually that wasn't quite correct, occasionally he spotted small colored lights, which seemed to move through the grass of the field. For the longest time, Tom could not figure out what those lights were, eventually he swooped down on one to get a closer look. As he got closer, the light all the sudden shot faster through the grass. Originally, the light had been a dim orange, but as it started to move faster, it became brighter. Eventually Tom overtook it, and recognized a small fox.

The fox was apparently normal color, as far as he could see in the dark, but it was outlined in an orange aura, which seemed to fluctuate as the fox ran. This was really quite puzzling, why hadn't he noticed this in the day, surely there were small animals out in the day time. Besides why would animals glow in the dark? Certainly, there could be no evolutionary benefit that Tom could think of. He let the fox run off, and rose to a higher altitude.

He pondered for some time over the nature of glow in the dark animals, but came to no real conclusions. Occasionally he spotted other glowing lights, mostly orange, but once in a while, a few other colors showed up. Knowing what they were however, and not wanting to scare the poor animals any more than absolutely necessary, Tom didn't swoop down for a closer look at any of the animals; he simply flew on.

The night wore on. Tom just kept flying leisurely along, his wings didn't seem to tire a bit. Eventually the dawn came over the horizon bringing new life to the world. Tom had always enjoyed dawn, true, normally the only time he ever saw it was when he had to get up for school, and he hated it then, but on those rare occasions when he was somehow up and around at dawn and not tired, he really enjoyed it. There was a refreshing feeling to it, a sense of putting ones troubles behind, and forging on anew. This morning was no different; Tom put yesterday's frustrations behind and vowed today would be different.

Tom focused his eyes on the ground below him to see if he could detect any animals, and if they glowed during the day as well. As his eyes adjusted, Tom was surprised to note that he could see the ground as easily as if he were standing on it, instead of flying hundreds of feet above. It didn't take much looking until he found a ground squirrel. He slowed and circled, staring down at it, however he stayed well out of its sight range. Sure enough, if he concentrated on it, he could detect a dim orange light around the squirrel. Definitely puzzling, why didn't the humans glow like the animals? Or did they; he'd never really looked, next time he saw one he would take a closer look. Tom shifted his sight a little as he circled and noticed the small tree near the squirrel. Only because he was concentrating on seeing glows, did he notice that the tree looked a little blurry. Tom focused his eyes and concentration on it. It seemed as if he could almost detect a slight greenish glow to the tree, and in fact to most of the plants around. If he stretched it he could say that all the plants glowed faintly.

Plant glow seemed to be much weaker than animal glow, and normally he wouldn't have even noticed it if he hadn't concentrated. Last night he hadn't noticed it, but he hadn't noticed animal glow in the light before either. Perhaps the plant glows were so faint they couldn't be discerned against even the low level of night light without concentration, much as the stronger animal lights couldn't be seen without mild concentration in the daylight. Of course, the other thing was that he was a couple of hundred feet in the air, and there were probably limits to even his vision.

About noon, or so, as Tom judged by the position of the sun above him, Tom spotted a mountain range on the horizon. After a few more moments of scanning the horizon, he was able to make out a small dot at the base of the mountains. Judging by his eyesight's range he guessed the dot, which he soon resolved as a tower with walls around it, to be about sixty miles away. At this point he began to think about his upcoming encounter with humans. In all likelihood they would be scared shitless again. He decided he had better just steel himself to that fact.

After a few minutes of pondering however, he realized that scared humans were likely to do something foolish, like attack him. If, as they usually did in the novels, they had bows, crossbows, and ballistae, it could make his approach slightly difficult. After the dragon, he wasn't too scared of little arrows and bolts, but nonetheless, it would still probably be painful, and annoying. Glancing around, he came up with a solution to the problem; if he engineered his approach so that he came from the direction of the sun, they would be less likely to see him until the last moment, and if he came in fast, he could be there before they could act. Tom climbed higher in the sky, and over, so that he could hide in the sun.

It took him about another hour and a half, he guessed, to get within what he felt was a safe distance from the tower. From there he could see everything quite clearly. The fortress was a large tower, about seven stories, surrounded by large stone walls. Inside the courtyard area were many smaller buildings and people wandering around with errands. For the most part it was similar to Lenamare's, except smaller, and judging from the people in the courtyard, probably not a school.

Well, here goes nothing, Tom thought. Using the full strength of his wings, Tom dove straight for the castle walls. His wings and gravity boosted his speed to close to sixty miles an hour, Tom guessed. He got closer and closer to the walls, at about twenty feet from the top of one wall someone spotted him. People began screaming, and running frantically. Tom swooped in over the top of the wall. To insure his safety by keeping guards off balance, he let out a huge roar, hoping to unnerve anyone who might be taking aim.

"Aaaarrrrrgggggghhhhhhh!" he screamed in his deep, thundering voice. Quickly he began back beating his wings to slow himself down. He beat as heavily and strongly as he could, and righted himself so that he would land on his hooves in the courtyard. Unfortunately, he still wasn't completely used to his own limitations, and so overestimated his stopping power. He hit ground on his hooves, cracking, and caving in, the paving stone of the courtyard. Apparently, the stones were somehow mortared together, so in addition to sinking a foot into the ground, and smashing the stone in the immediate vicinity, he also sent cracks radiating outward along the mortar lines. Essentially, he managed to damage a twenty foot diameter circle of the stone courtyard around him.

Being used to sinking in the ground by now, Tom quickly flew up out of his small hole, and landed on the courtyard itself. He looked around; as expected, several people, mainly women, although one or two men as well, had fainted to the ground, and the rest were cowering behind whatever cover they could find. As he glanced at the wall, he did see a few men with crossbows vaguely pointing in his direction, but none seemed to have the courage to actually point one at him.

Playing it to the hilt, and thus attempting to ignore the feelings of hurt inside him, Tom thundered, "Humans…I bear a message for the wizard Zilquar. Bring him forth."

Nobody moved everyone simply stared at him. "Where is the wizard Zilquar?" thundered Tom. This was going to be fun; if they were so scared they couldn't even move, he wouldn't accomplish much. "I have a message for him, and I do not wish to spend all day here!" Tom looked around menacingly; he spotted a boy about his age hiding near a wagon. "You," Tom pointed at him, "bring the wizard to me." The boy's eyes got wider, and he clumsily pointed to himself. "Yes, you. Now!" The boy shook his head, affirmatively, and ran off. Peasants, Tom thought sadly, this was definitely not fun. The problem was, he had tried this posture to distance himself and avoid the pain, but in reality, this only confirmed their fears. What could he do though?

It took only a few moments for the boy to return, followed by an old man in robes. By his looks, he had probably been on his way anyway, since he was out of breath, and the boy hadn't been gone long enough to bring the man from far enough away for the man to have run here and ran out of breath.

"I am Zilquar, Demon," the old man said, speculatively eyeing Tom, while obviously hiding a bit of fear and a lot of trepidation.

"This is for you." Tom handed Zilquar the scroll. "It is from Lenamare."

"You delivered a message from Lenamare?" The wizard asked, doubt and suspicion showing on his face. Obviously, this man knew the logic behind not having demons run messages.

"That is what I said. Now if you are through with foolish questions…I shall leave."

"Uh, yes, by all means," Zilquar agreed hastily.

With that, Tom stepped up into the air, and left the tower behind. Well, thought Tom, all and all, that was pretty much a waste. All that flying, and for what? To play mailman?

Since he had three days to do his mission, and the trip was only about twenty-four hours, Tom decided to take a slightly different route back to Lenamare's. This time he flew further west, since there seemed to be a forest over in that direction, and Tom thought that perhaps a stroll through the woods might be relaxing and calm his nerves. He was feeling pretty wound up. This whole demon business sucked. He didn't like being a demon, he hated having everyone hate him, and he hated himself for playing to their fears. But what could he do, if he simply tried to be friendly, people like Lenamare would walk all over him, and try to use him for their own purposes. Not that Lenamare wasn't doing that all ready, it was just that if Lenamare feared Tom, then perhaps he wouldn't try to use him too much.

Of course, all of that was secondary. What if what Boggy said was true, that they'd killed his real body. Then assuming this was real, he couldn't go back; he didn't know the way, and without a body to focus on and a party to concentrate on, he doubted he could find his way back. Also if he were dead back home, then his mom would be in bad shape.

Actually, the more he thought of it, the more he realized that there was no way his death would bring his mom and stepdad together. His stepdad would simply blame his mom for not controlling him better. Tom knew that there was nothing his mom could have done, but his stepfather wouldn't see that, and his mother would probably believe his stepdad and blame herself too. The more he thought of this the more depressed he got.

Finally, over the forest, Tom landed among the trees. It was quiet here, a few birds, small animals running in bushes. The wind through the trees. Feeling depressed and slightly weary, Tom sat down beneath a tree, just to rest. Perhaps to sleep a little, he was not really tired enough to sleep, but if he could, it would help him forget. He closed his eyes and listened to the sounds of the forest. They were far away at first, having been quieted by his disturbance of the forest, but they slowly returned. Slowly he drifted off.





Chapter 18


"If he marches all night, then he'll be here before dawn. Otherwise we should expect him around sunset tomorrow, sir," the young scout reported to Lenamare in his private study. It was about two candles after sunset, and the scout had just arrived on a worn out horse. He had just ridden straight from the enemy camp. He hadn't spared his horse; he knew that every moment of advance warning would be needed.

It was a good thing he had, the wizard thought. Lenamare really hadn't expected Exador for a minimum of four to five days. There was no way Zilquar could get his troops here by tomorrow. The best he could hope would be for Zilquar to help lift a siege. Well, that should be no problem, Lenamare knew his defenses were strong enough, and supplies large enough to survive a siege for a few days. The problem of course, was how Exador managed to get so close so fast. "Tomorrow evening then," Lenamare said, no sane general would march all night and then go into battle at dawn. He waved the scout an absent-minded dismissal.

As the scout left his office, Lenamare turned to Jehenna. "How the hell did he move so fast?" He demanded as soon as the door closed.

"I have no idea. He would have had to either use magic or our previous scouts were badly mistaken."

"I think mistaken is an understatement, they would have to have been blind, to misjudge an army's march by three days."

"Perhaps blinded by magic?"

Lenamare frowned at that. Exador could have done that, but to so carelessly waste one's energies on cloaking and illusion spells, when one was about to go into battle, just didn't make sense. "Possible, I just have a hard time seeing Exador cloak and hide his army for several weeks. That's too insane."

"Well then, what if he didn't. What if he is now?" Jehenna asked speculatively.

"You mean put an illusionary army three days ahead of himself? Then arrive later? No, that's almost worse. We'd eventually see through the illusion if it just sat out there. True, one could speculate that we would arm up, and then when we'd relax because no attack came from the nearby army, he could hit us with the real thing. However, I trust Exador to know that it wouldn't take me too long to investigate the army and discover the illusion and deduce his plans.

"No, we must assume he'll attack tomorrow. Exador is no fool. He has something planned. If only we knew what."

"Well, whatever it is, we'll just have to be ready. We won't get much sleep tonight." Jehenna said.

"No, let lesser individuals do things tonight. Tonight all people truly essential to the defense should get a good night's sleep. We probably won't get many in the next several weeks."

Jehenna nodded. "Very well, I'll instruct the students and masters to finish all the wards, except for the final primings, tonight. Then tomorrow afternoon, we'll perform the final rites to prime them, and when Exador's army shows up, we set them."

"Good, will you be interested in...meditating...with me this evening, before battle," Lenamare asked, giving her a knowing little smile as she stood.

"Of course. We will need to generate all the…psychophysical energy we can...for the battle." She smiled back as she opened the door to leave.

As the door closed, Lenamare spun in his chair to look out the window at the horizon, where his enemy slept. Exador thought to take me unaware...no, old adversary...Lenamare is never unaware. Lenamare knew his defenses could and would hold. Thanks to his ingenious planning and strategy, his defenses would be completely ready for the army. True, it was regrettable that they hadn't been able to gather in as much food and storage as they'd hoped; but, in war, peasants died, and dead peasants didn't need food anyway.





Chapter 19


The sound of voices woke him. Tom looked to the sky, it was shortly after dawn. Startled, he sat up; somehow he'd slept the rest of the afternoon and all night. He hadn't been that tired, at least not physically. Maybe the peace of the forest had lulled him.

That peace was broken now. Voices, a ways off, were arguing. Tom focused his attention on the voices. "Please, lord, I have no more...my wife and I have given you all we've got," whined a scratchy old voice.

"But, peasant, it's not enough, Baron Orscezy demands four coppers for every man, woman and child in his domain. That's twelve coppers for your family. Yet you only give me nine. Can you not see the justice in paying your fair share of taxes? After all, the Baron graciously protects you and your family from harm," a smooth and arrogant voice replied. "Surely, now that I have shown you reason, you will give me the other three coppers."

"But lord, I have no more. I cannot give that which I do not have!" The voice was becoming defiant.

"Liar! All you peasant scum are the same. Greedily you grab at each little piece of money. Little do you think of the comfort and purse of your betters. What right have you to hoard coppers? This is not your land...it is the Baron's. All that comes from it is rightfully his, and so should you pay him what you indisputably owe him. Pay, now. Else I will take payment in your hide."

"Please, we have no more, he's telling the truth," a woman's voice begged.

"Keep out of this, woman, your man knows what he owes."

Was this for real? Tom wondered. He thought this sort of thing only happened in corny medieval melodramas and fantasies. He decided he had probably better investigate though. Slowly he got up. As quietly as possible, which was slightly difficult in this form, he walked towards the voices.

"Please, no," begged the woman.

Crack. Snapped something that sounded like what Tom imagined a whip on a man's back would sound like. A grunt of pain came through the undergrowth.

Crack. This time it was followed by a moan. "Please, we don't have any money!" cried the woman.

Crack. The arrogant voice laughed. "I might just believe you old woman. But if you don't, then your man must pay ten lashes for every coin he doesn't have."

By this time, Tom was close enough to peer through the trees and bushes. In a small clearing stood a small stone cottage with a thatched roof. Outside the open door to the cottage, near a small well, stood a stout, but older woman. Between her legs was a child about four. Nearby in some hay, lay a man, he was probably in his late fifties, but looked to be in his late sixties, as did the woman. Over the man stood another man. This man wore a red and black uniform. Actually, it was a red hauberk, trimmed in black, which covered a set of leather armor. In his hand was a massive bull whip, with which he was striking the downed man. At his side was belted a fine sword, behind him, near the edge of the clearing was his horse.

Crack. "Aaahhhh!" cried the old man and arched his back in pain. His eyes shut as he blacked out.

"Granpy ..." screamed the young child, who suddenly dashed from the woman's skirts towards the old man. She tried to catch him but failed. The soldier, whose attention had been fixed on the old man, and was raising the whip again, was startled. Turning quickly, he brought the whip down on the child.

The child screamed in pain. The whip lanced across his face and down his chest, through his thin shirt. The child's frail skin could not withstand the might of the whip. It split wherever the whip hit. A large gash appeared, down the child's face, and down his entire torso. The child fell to the ground.

Horrified and angered, Tom stepped from the forest, onto the path opening into the clearing. "Little bastard got what he deserved, trying to interfere," the soldier said as he turned back to whip the man some more.

The old woman was on her knees by the child, frantically trying to stop the bleeding. Tom stepped into the clearing, breathing quite heavily in his frustration and anger, forgetting that he didn't need to breathe. The sound must have alerted the soldier. He turned, and his mouth fell open. Fear lighting his face.

Tom said nothing; he simply advanced into the clearing. The woman looked up, scared, but too concerned with her grandchild. The whip was still in the soldier's lax hand. He simply stared in terror at the nightmare that approached him.

Suddenly he seemed to realize what might happen to him if this creature got its hands on him. Fear for his immortal soul provided the impetus. He brought up his whip. Quickly, and without thought, he brought it down. Down upon Tom's chest.

Tom didn't even notice, he was too wound up on hurting the man in front of him. The soldier however did. His whip didn't even touch the demon, it simply seemed to pass right through him. Hastily, he dropped the whip and drew his sword. He waved it a few times in front of himself and then brought it around in an arc to slice through the demon.

The sword did register on Tom's mind, mainly since the soldier had waved it right in front of his face. As the sword came around, Tom stuck out his hand to block the slice. The broadsword struck his palm, and clanged loudly as it broke. The sword simply stopped on his hand and broke in two. The soldier winced in pain, as his arm and shoulder were severely jarred.

Wasting no more time, Tom struck out as he had been taught, palm upward, fingers extended, in a strike intended for the diaphragm. As usual Tom forgot his strength, and his five inch long finger nails. His hand slid right into the man's stomach, his finger nails came out the other side. Blood went everywhere. Gushers streamed from the man, squirting Tom and the ground around him. The man would have screamed, but his chest cavity was punctured and all he could do was make a wheezing noise as he expired like a popped balloon.

Surprised and not knowing what to do with the corpse, Tom simply lifted his hand with the man on it, and flung the soldier over his shoulder, into the forest. Shocked by his own action, Tom stared at his bloody hand, his right hand; the left one which had blocked the sword wasn't even scratched. The soldier's blood ran down his forearm and dripped off his elbow. He simply stared.

Slowly he looked up, he saw the old woman looking on in horror and fright. Simply staring at him, wondering what the demon would destroy next. Scared and frightened by his own action and ashamed of the reaction he had caused, Tom launched himself into the air, and flew away as fast as he could.





Chapter 20


The bird sang sweetly in the meadow; clouds passed through the spring sky, seeming to dance with the wind. Trees swayed gently with the breeze. Everywhere she looked there was peace.

Until the bird went off key. She glanced over at the bird in the tree beside her. It had suddenly opened its beak wide and was pouring out an ungodly wailing noise. It was extremely unpleasant, and the more she listened the more she hated it. Violently she shook her head, trying to clear it of the horrendous screeching.

As she shook her head she seemed to rise through layers and layers of reality. The forest disappeared around her; slowly in its place was her darkened room. Suddenly she realized she was shaking her head back and forth and she stopped. The screeching didn't.

What the hell? Jenn thought. She jumped from bed with a start as she realized what it was. Attack. Those were the warning horns of an attack. They meant an enemy was attacking. Exador! but he wasn't supposed to arrive till evening. She swung open the shutters on her window and looked out. Torches were appearing in the courtyard below as servants quickly lighted the way, and soldiers hurried to the walls. She couldn't see beyond the walls because her room wasn't high enough, but she thought she could detect extra light beyond the walls, like the fires an army might light as they prepared for siege. She couldn't tell if there was more noise than the people in the courtyard could make, which one would expect if there were an army outside ones gates, because of the blaring horns.

She glanced at the sky; from the position of the stars she judged it to be shortly before dawn. She had no time to waste; if there was an attack, then she had her job to do. She must gather all of the youngest students and get them down to the hospital area, where they could help the doctors and healers tending the wounded by running small errands for water and bandages. Quickly she slipped into her robe and sandals. She didn't have time to check her hair.

She opened her door and hurried down the hall to the stairs that would take her to the youngest students. As she passed their rooms, she saw the other senior students getting around and hurrying off on their assigned missions. Quickly she came to the top of the stairway and ran down it.

She exited on the younger students’ level and hurried to their study room. Unlike the older student levels, the youngest students' level was arranged around a common study/play room. All the rooms adjoined the common room. Already, even as she arrived, the children were coming out of their rooms. The girl who served as nanny to the children was busily trying to get them dressed. All of them appeared bewildered and frightened. None of them had ever been involved in anything like this before, and as any child facing the unknown, they were afraid. All of them that was, except one, Jenn noticed that Rupert had a curiously determined look on his face. As if something he had been waiting a long time for, was about to occur. Unfortunately, she didn't have time to wonder about it now; she, and they, had work to do.

~

Jehenna heard the word "Shit," in her left ear, and then she noticed the horns blaring in both. She sat up quickly, even as she did, Lenamare was already up and throwing a robe over his naked body. He walked to a nearby window and threw open the shutters. It revealed the courtyard beginning to rouse to the horns' incessant wailing. She was about to say something, but then noticed the look of concentration on Lenamare's face.

"Damn, the son of a bitch must have marched his troops all night."

"He's here?" Jehenna asked, she could hear the horns, just not believe them.

"Bastard. I want you to get those wards up now. We haven't got time to spare." Lenamare looked over the edge of the window, the courtyard was eight floors down, and then he'd have to cross it and climb to the top of the gate house. There wasn't time; Exador might launch an immediate attack. Turning to Jehenna, he said, "Set those wards and join me as soon as you can."

With that, he spread his arms outward, and chanted a short phrase. As he completed the phrase, he raised his arms above him, keeping his arms rigid, and touched his hands together above his head. As his hands touched he shouted some word Jehenna couldn't catch, but which she knew by heart. Purplish light spread out from his center, engulfing his entire being. Reddish beams lanced outward from the center of where his chest would have been, and then the light dimmed. Even before all of the light could fade, she could see he was gone, even as she knew where he would be. In her mind's eye, she could see him appearing in the same manner on top of the gatehouse, impressing his soldiers; and notifying the enemy of his position.

She stood up, and dressed herself. There wasn't much time. How Exador had gotten here so fast was a mystery, it wasn't like him to march his soldiers to death, just so they could go exhausted into battle. Besides, what was the hurry; it wasn't as if Lenamare and her were going anywhere. As she finished dressing, she left the room and walked down the stairs to see to the pentacles. She felt hurried, but she knew that one of her position could never let her inferiors see her flustered or in a hurry.

Jehenna entered the pentacle catacombs as calmly as she could manage, given the circumstances. She noted approvingly that Masters Elrose and Hortwell were already there and ensuring that the senior students took their positions as they arrived. Master Trisfelt along with Rex and three other senior students arrived right behind her.

The catacombs were a series of linked chambers below the keep. The center of the catacombs was the dome room; the heart of Lenamare’s famous wards. The floor of the dome was inscribed with pentacles that upon first glance appeared similar to those used for demon summoning. However, they were quite different. Rather than being pentacles of containment, these were pentacles of warding.

In particular, they were far more complex and permanently engraved in stone and the engravings lined with rare elements. These pentacles when activated would surround the keep in a sphere of power. From the outside, it would appear to be a dome; but the wards actually surrounded the entire keep in every direction.

A key feature of these pentacles which was different from every similar prior work was that they could block both magical and physical attacks and were adjustable, allowing the controlling wizards to alter the amount of energy dedicated to either physical or magical energies as required. Of course, this caused problems for the people inside firing out, as well as for those outside firing in.

The big trick was that one could quickly cycle between magical and physical energy block in a manner that was hard to detect from outside; except by either trial and error or a very good wizard. The advantage being that the defenders could prepare an all magical or all physical attack; adjust the pentacles quickly to let the defenders strike those outside and then have the equilibrium resealed before the outsiders realized that the balance of power had tilted one way or the other.

In complete magic mode, only the most extremely powerful spells had any chance of penetrating, which were unlikely to be used by Exador, but almost any physical attack against those inside would succeed. In complete physical mode, nothing physical could penetrate the barrier, but only the most trivial of magics would be stopped. Normally the wizards would keep the levels equal, so that only moderate to fairly powerful magical, or large scale physical attacks could succeed.

The center pentacles in the dome room connected to sympathetic pentacles in outer rings via five evenly spaced tunnels extending from each of the five points of the principle pentagram to the rest of the catacombs via radial tunnels that led to a ring tunnel just outside the walls of the keep

Together with the pentacles in the catacombs they formed the most formidable, versatile, long lasting and stable wards in the world. The only other place to come close was Freehold. Those were arguably larger, covering an entire city and very similar, but they required a much larger circle of wizards to maintain and control.

Lenamare had designed and implemented those as well based on his original design. After constructing those formidable yet power hungry wards, Lenamare came back and redesigned his own, incorporating numerous improvements. Therefore his improved wards provided a far better ratio of protection to power input than those in Freehold. Meaning he needed fewer high-powered wizards to maintain them.

Of course, there was one slight problem. For maximum performance and stability, the wards had to go through a couple levels of priming. Exador had beaten them to the punch and arrived too soon, before they had completed the final priming of the wards. They would just have to do their best.

Jehenna glanced around the dome room and down each corridor making sure everyone was in place. She gestured to let everyone know she was about to begin. She met the eyes of each member the team in the dome and had them confirm their readiness.

There were five braziers in the dome room, one for each point of the pentacle. Master Trisfelt and the students: Rex, Bromagni, Howard and Levi stood at each of the inner braziers, ready to add their ingredients at the right time. The outer pentacles along with their braziers in the outer ring were manned by senior students: Cleo, Ygreddin, Willis, Warren and Alvea.

Master Hortwell, tall and thin, joined her and the dignified Elrose at a large central brazier, the heart of the pentacles. She reached out with her mind to confirm the students in the outer ring were also ready.

Jehenna reached over the unlit central brazier to touch hands with Hortwell and Elrose and form the initial rapport for the wizard link. She brought up the link and the three wizards began to chant in unison: “Yri ep lestion, angels of light guard our work this day. Evil assails this our domicile and we seek to call upon the forces of nature to aid us. Alpheros son leptos, quant erat sed vitum, akselos per unem. Lords of Power come to our aid. Nec sid falcos, ton maltos sig fallum, netristem som exaltus. Provenderaum sid Merinos. Aid and guard us, Keeper of the North Wind. Grant us mercy oh Lord of Death, Master of Earth. Bringer of Light deliver us the power we seek, King of Fire bring thy purging flame, Guardian of the Tides wash the evil from our beings and our sight.

"Within this room we conjure thee, we the Lords of Men seek to join you the Lords of the Spirit in the Five that are one. Earth, Air, Fire, Water and Man, five who are separate yet one. Let the strength of each aid the strength of all. Sec zistum sed nostrus sed falom." As they chanted, the lines and runes of the pentacles began to glow with a soft yellow light. In each of the small rooms under the outer walls, the relay pentacles glowed in resonance.

"Strength of one is strength of all. Might of all is might of one. Eternal winds of fate bind and mold us. In recognition of the debts we owe, this offering we make to aid our strength and cause." The wizards chanted in unison as each of the outer wizards joined the link.

The ten, now lit, braziers, burned higher as precious materials were added to their fires. Different braziers received materials precious to their respective realms. Each of the five inner elemental braziers was matched to the opposite elemental brazier at the end of the tunnel. The pentagram of Man was naturally in opposition to itself. Thus the circle of outer braziers went Man, Air, Fire, Earth, Water and the inner pentagrams were Man, Earth, Water, Air, Fire.

With one voice the wizards intoned: "Varkos sed nophial, the offering is given, we are taken together. Let space and time unite us as one. Sis Velkos, nor pleatrium nos becrum." The lines and runes of the pentacles were all glowing brightly now. The central three wizards now concentrated on the material in their brazier, a spherical ball composed of dirt from all over the world and from different geological eras, sulfur, water, and blood surrounding a hollow cavity filled with oxygen. Slowly the ball began to smolder, small flames beginning to appear on it.

All but the three core wizards fell silent, "Now all is complete, we the Trinity of Power, Jehenna, Elrose and Trisfelt, have brought the Five Realms together as one, Man, Earth, Fire, Air and Water. We have bound them together with Space and Time so that the Seven Essentials of Spirit and World are joined." Now, the inner circle joined in, "All is contained by the Eleven Pentagrams of Power, now and forevermore." The voices and minds of the other wizards joined their brethren, "We are the Thirteen Who Control. Our hands are the guiding force, our wills the pillars of power.

"Thus it is Thirteen controlling Eleven, holding Seven, made of Five, based on Three. Three, Five, Seven, Eleven, Thirteen, the prime conditions now met, all power unite! Dominae provebem se fiat lux." With these final words, all met as one. Bright white light of the entire spectrum radiated from the central brazier.

Rays of magical energy sprang from the center, striking each of the three. A circle of light was formed. Where the circle of light intersected the primary pentagrams inner pentagon, light walls formed, creating a wall of light along the inner pentagon, and then speeding out along the arms of the inscribed star. The energy was controlled by their united minds, it was shaped and molded by the power they had summoned. Mentally they chanted the ancient words that would guide the force, the combined will of the thirteen wizards which dictated the growth of power. The power was constrained by the pentacles, but the direction it grew in was controlled by their will.

Within instants, lines of light traced the primary pentagram. Then the secondary pentagrams flamed brilliantly as they were lit. The primary set of pentagrams flashed briefly, achieving balance and then beams of energy shot down the specially warded and inscribed tunnels to each of the relays. As the light hit the relay stations, those pentacles flared to blinding full power, and the outer circle between relay stations flashed to life. To an individual who was not one with the power, the entire array would be almost impossible to look at, however those inside did not notice it.

The power was theirs; it was to be commanded. Now came the forming of the sphere of force that would protect the school. "Sanctum dominae, fortuum nostros," spoke the single voice of the thirteen. "Guard and protect us walls of power, Sid velum se crostat. Scerbum si voltan. Nek sid faltos epiterum. Sig nos leum trig falthos. Shield of Might, Hand of Fate, protect and guard us, this we ask, this we command."

As the chant continued, the walls of light that lined the outer circle began to expand both upward through the ground and downward below their feet. The words were once again lost in the roar of power being channeled through the pentagrams. Sound however did not matter. As all wizards knew: it was the formation of the words within the mind of a wizard that focused the power.

The earth did not stop it nor impede the flow of energy in any way, since the earth was a part of the energy. Upwards through the depths it moved, until it reached the surface, it climbed up the walls of the castle. To those outside, the walls of the castle seemed to shimmer and suddenly glow white with the burgeoning power. The force walls continued upward beyond the castle walls, slowly they began to bend inward and grow together, until they eventually came together at an apex. Thus a perfect dome over the tower and courtyard was formed, perfectly mimicking the domed room directly below the apex of the force dome. Below their feet the dome was inverted forming a perfect sphere.

Those people inside and out could still see through the force walls, in daylight, but in the predawn darkness, it appeared as if a white nearly opaque dome had been placed over the school. As the walls closed, one man among the besieging army frowned in annoyance, he had hoped to catch them before Lenamare could get those damn wards up that he was so fond of bragging about. Oh well, one way or the other, he would win, pentacles or no pentacles.





The Five Elements

Earth, Air, Fire, Water and Spirit

Curriculum Vitae: College of Wizardry

University of the Council States



These are the five elements of creation. It is their interaction that creates Mana, the energy of magic. Perhaps the best known treatise on the interaction of the 5 elements to produce mana is that by Heward.

Each of the five elements exists in their raw form in their own dimension, or plane of existence. It is the intersection of the five elemental planes that forms the Planes of Man. The entire physical world is nothing but a collection of objects constructed from these five elements.

The first four are generally familiar to most individuals as they encounter reflections of these elements within their everyday life: the dirt beneath ones feet, the air one breathes, the fire one cooks dinner with and the water one must drink to live. The fifth however is less well known, and while it is omnipresent it is also elusive and ephemeral.

The fifth element, spirit sometimes referred to as Animae or the Element of Man is the raw essence of the life force. That which we call life is matter from the combination of the first four elements, infused with spirit or Animus. Animus is the reflection of Animae on the Planes of Man.

All of nature is dictated by the interaction of the elements, Astrology is the science that tells us how.

The Pentagram

The pentagram, so crucial a tool in the conjuration of creatures is the perfect ward containing all five elements. A pentagram has five "corners" if you will, each of which represents one of the five elements.

The exact nature, positioning and the five elements within the pentagram varies upon usage and need. Below is a traditional arrangement of the five elements within the pentagram. Further, the usage of a pentagram is also influenced by astrological factors as well as the current environment. Within various religions and pantheons there are always avatars and/or angels assigned to correspond to each element and for certain invocations these beings may stand guard or lend their presence on behalf of their element.



The Pentacle

A Pentacle is a combinations of a pentagram and other runes, symbols and logic. The runes of and symbols of a pentacle provide modifiers, or enhancements and instructions to pentagrams basic function. In essence, a pentacle is an inscribed spell based upon a pentagram. Multiple pentagrams are often combined together in a single pentacle each serving as building blocks, along with runes and other shapes and symbols of an inscribed spell.

Further pentacles often include braziers located either in the center of a pentagram or at the node points of a pentagram depending on the nature of the spell being constructed. Braziers typically contain materials that provide fuel for the spell. Often fire is used as the mechanism for immolation; however. acids and solid catalysts can also be used to consume the material depending on the nature of the material and the requisite elements to be invoked.





Chapter 21


What have I done? Tom cried in his mind. He had killed a man. He had done it for no real reason at all. Yes the man had hurt the kid, maybe killed it, and so Tom had killed him. Actually, he didn't even know the kid had died, in fact it probably had only been severely wounded, so he had killed that man for even less of a reason. There was no justice in that; he had no right to do that. The man was wrong, he was probably even evil, but did he deserve the sort of death Tom had inflicted on him. First Tom had practically scared him to death, and then he popped him. In his mind the dying man's exhalations echoed again and again. The hissing and gurgling noise he made as he had bled down Tom's arm, would not go away.

Tom tried to cry in shame and anger at himself, but found that he couldn't, apparently demons had no tear ducts. He was nothing but a cold blooded killer, if he'd had anything to throw up, he would have; but he'd never eaten anything in this form. He had ruthlessly, and thoughtlessly, killed a man in a very gory and disgusting manner. What had become of him, to get so easily provoked into such a horrible thing? What he had done was sickening, inhuman, demonic.

Demonic, that was the word, Tom almost laughed at the sick irony of it all. It was like Tizzy said, "...demons...that's what we're called and that's what we are." He had killed the man just like a demon out of countless video games and books he'd read. He wasn't human, he was less than human, he was a creature of evil. Tom wanted to cry, but he couldn't, even that was denied him.

He flew in random directions, continually berating himself, hearing the death gasps of the man he had killed, watching the man's life seep down and drip off his elbow. How long he kept this up he didn't know. It seemed like a small eternity that he flew around hating and loathing himself. Eventually however, he ran out of steam and hate.

He settled into something like despair. He'd done it; he couldn't change it; he would have to live with it, with himself. He hated himself and what he'd done, but he just didn't have the energy to go on raging at himself. He also realized that it was getting late and that he needed to get back to Lenamare. Lenamare had given him three days, that time was nearly up, and he still had a long way to fly.

He looked around to the setting sun and headed north, back to the tower. Night came and he flew on. A nervous feeling was growing inside him; he didn't think he was going to get back in time, and for some reason that gave him a sick feeling in his stomach. He didn't know why, and after all the raging at himself he'd just been through, he didn't care, it just did.

As morning came, the uneasiness grew as he realized he was further away from the tower then he could fly by noon. The gnawing grew as the morning marched on and he knew he would not make it in time. Faster and faster he flew. To Tom it began to seem imperative that he reach Lenamare on time.

A cold, rational part of his mind told him he was being silly and to let Lenamare wait; but even so he flew faster and faster, until he could fly no faster. His speed would just have to do, even though the unease was turning to almost a physical pain, a need.

As the sun neared overhead, he began to ache all over. He knew it was irrational, and surely all in his head, but the fact that he wouldn't reach Lenamare in time hurt. It must have been something in the compulsion, the binding, that forced him to obey Lenamare's command and it was probably the possibility of failing or disobeying that command that was causing the pain.

By the time he saw a shimmer on the horizon, which he took to be the tower, he desperately needed to get to Lenamare. He didn't know how he knew it was the tower, he did, he didn't care that it shouldn't shimmer, it did. His whole mind was focused on completing his assignment. He concentrated on it so strongly that he didn't even notice the army camped around the castle, he didn't even notice the wards. Until he hit them.

He was flying very fast, twice as fast as normal, about seventy miles an hour. He hit the wards like hitting a brick wall. Unlike a car or person however, all Tom did was bounce. The shock of the blow brought him slightly back to reality. It didn't hurt badly, but it did stun him slightly. He realized that there was an obstacle in his way to getting to Lenamare. He knew that he had to get around it, or through it, there was no other choice.

Single-mindedly Tom flew to a point on the dome and began pounding on it with his fists. When the dome didn't give or break, Tom realized, almost insanely that he needed more force. Whatever the cost, he had to get through that dome. Grasping for ideas, he began to pound rhythmically back and forth on it with karate punches from each fist. He did it just like he was instructed, kiyaing with each blow, but with a fanatical devotion he had never used before. Because of the compulsion, he put all his will power in it. With each blow and yell Tom also struck with his will.

~

Out on the field, Exador noticed the large demon strike the wall and rebound, and then begin to pound. His eyes narrowed in calculation. He knew it wasn't his demon, so it must be Lenamare's, trying to fulfill a return compulsion. Knowing Lenamare, and guessing the strength of the pentacles, Exador did some quick calculations in his head. Quickly he began giving orders to his generals and subordinate wizards.

~

Inside the dome, every wizard felt the blow to the pentacles as Tom rebounded. "What the hell ... what is Exador doing?" shouted Lenamare as he glanced up from his surveillance of the surrounding army, atop the gatehouse.

"Not Exador, I think. One of ours." Jehenna remarked beside him as she pointed up in the air to where Tom was pounding on the dome.

"Damn. I forgot about him coming back."

"Not good."

Up in the air Tom was so single mindedly determined to get in that he paid no attention to anything. Thus, he didn't even notice the red glow surrounding himself, and the bolts of magical energy that struck the wall in time to his fists.

On the ground near the cots, Jenn looked up in fear at the demon trying to get in. She had known that summoning that thing would be the end of them all. Now it was helping the enemy invade the castle. Like all the older students and masters, she knew that even though the pentacles could keep out Exador or a fourth order demon; given how hastily they'd been set up the wards without a full priming, they couldn't withstand both for long.

The children were becoming frightened by the energies they could feel reverberating through the dome. To calm them, Rex, who was standing nearby, gathered them together and led them to get some wood for the fires that heated the hospital's water.

On the gatehouse roof, Lenamare turned to Jehenna. "Well, you set them up; you know the strength of your support in building them. Will they hold without the priming?"

"You know as well as I, if Exador's got the kind of force we think he does, and decides to use it in concert with that demon, the shield can't hold for more than a few hours. If we could have gotten them set up properly..."

"I know. No problem, I designed them myself. Damn Exador and his sped up time scale. We're gonna have to shift the shield to let the demon in."

Jehenna thought for a moment then said, "But how? Demons are both magical and material. Thus, he's blocked no matter how we balance the shield. That's why pentagrams work so well on demons...remember."

"Yes, I realize that," Lenamare said testily. "We can however, play a few tricks with the oscillation frequency of the balance and sneak him in." Lenamare motioned to one of his students standing nearby acting as a page. "Tell Hortwell and Elrose to meet Jehenna and myself in the primary ward chamber in five minutes." The child ran off immediately to follow his orders. "Follow me," Lenamare told Jehenna, and they set off to the catacombs.

~

The children were gathered around the woodpile getting their third loads of wood. They couldn't take much at one time, actually Rex was doing most of the carrying. Rex didn't mind however, the primary point of having the children carry the wood was to keep their minds off the situation. Besides the hard physical work also kept his mind off the situation.

As he bent to pick up another chopped log of wood, he felt a change in the air. Reaching out with his mind he could feel that the pentacles were oscillating. He could only guess that Lenamare must be trying something to let the demon in. The shields couldn't be shut down temporarily without having to start from scratch to put them back up, but they had to do something to get the demon in, before it seriously weakened the force field. Rex's quick mind saw what Lenamare was trying to do.

The best bet would be to set the field on magic mode and set it to oscillate at a resonance frequency with the demon's spirit's energy frequency. The demon's physical body would pose no problem, since the field would be keeping out only magical energy. They'd have to risk only a short time of physical attack; unless Exador got clever and sent energy into the field at the same frequency as the resonance. That would be a forcing of the system, and if he sent enough energy in, it could overbalance the system and lead to a stochastic field, meaning the field would disintegrate into a bunch of isolated stability points and collapse.

Of course, Rex rationalized the possibility of Exador timing things that well was almost insignificant. However, it was just what Lenamare would figure Exador to be able to do. Sometimes that man's reasoning was positively twisted. So Lenamare would probably set the field to physical mode and try to achieve a multilevel resonance with the demons very simple material resonance frequencies. This would be about five times harder and a lot more impressive of a feat; which, of course, meant Lenamare would definitely do it. The only good part of this was the fact that Exador wouldn't think Lenamare crazy enough to try it, it was simply too difficult of a feat in the middle of battle.

Rex shook his head, and smiled at Lenamare's twisted genius. As he bent to get a piece of wood, his ears detected a roaring sound, like a large blaze in a fire pit. He turned in the direction of the walls, where the sound was coming from, in time to see several great globes of fire hurling over the walls. Almost without thinking he traced its trajectory and saw that one would land among the children gathering wood with him.

Reflexively he stood and began a neutralizing chant. "Urbido proveteum, sig falthos nors verboten. Sig Dispateum, vog El Mer serioul." He spread his arms wide, mind reaching out to the rapidly approaching fireball.

The onrushing ball of flames seemed oblivious to the chanting figure, except perhaps to focus on him even more specifically than before. Quickly it came down, directly at Rex's torso. Roaring filled his ears, and his eyes were blinded by the light, Rex ignored it all, keeping his mind on his spell.

The ball struck Rex directly in the heart. It quickly began to expand and engulf him. Normally, the ball would have expanded to about a forty foot diameter, devouring all nearby, this ball however, only expanded to his arms-length. His entire body was hidden in the roaring conflagration. Momentarily his body was outlined within the flames in bright orange light, and then it was over. The fire died, dissipated within his body.

However, the casting of such a last minute spell had its price. The charred and cindered body of the young wizard fell lifeless to the ground. A voice screamed in agony, "Rex!" and Alvea came running. The counter spell and its effect had only taken seconds, there had only been a few moments before the fireball reached him; Alvea never saw what had happened, she just knew Rex was dead. She ran mildly across the courtyard from the doorway in which she had stood.

The yard around her was in flames; four other fireballs had gotten in and were not countered. They had ignited flames in several of the temporary wooden structures, and killed several soldiers. Another score were severely burned. Alvea had eyes for none of this; her eyes were fixed on the body of her love. Weeping she threw herself upon his body. She knew nothing of the outside world, only her loss mattered.

Jenn saw the whole thing and was almost in shock. She would have run to Rex also, but men were screaming around her in pain. Quickly she shook her head, and put the agony of her friend’s loss to the back of her mind. She turned and began to help soldiers make their way to prepared cots so that she and the doctors could tend them. A score of soldiers and another six or seven women had been severely burned. About fifteen had died in the fireballs.

The shield had only been in oscillation for about twenty seconds while the demon plunged in, but that had been enough for Exador. The stable was blazing, and grooms were running around trying to get the horses out. A water bin had had its support legs burned out. The water from the bin had doused some of the nearby fire, but a lot of steam had formed, and this added to the burns. Two makeshift barracks were burning as well as a nearby latrine. One of the animal pens had also been hit. Dead and dying animals lay where they'd been roasted alive.

The demon came dashing in, searching madly for Lenamare. Jenn however, was almost beyond caring. She was too busy with the wounded, and still numb from Rex's death. She didn't have the time nor patience to be scared of anything right now. She didn't even pay attention as Lenamare came out of the tower with Jehenna on his arm to confront the gigantic demon who stood glaring all around at the castle.

The demon stood before him, in the middle of the courtyard for all to see, "Your task is complete...master." The demon glared at him with pent up anger and frustration. Normally Lenamare would have had to force himself to remain calm, staring at this horrible visage gazing so malevolently at him; however, the carnage wreaked on his castle outraged him so much that he didn't have time to be nervous.

"Obviously...you moronic imbecile of a demon. Look at what you've done to my castle! Get out of here! Return to your damnable hell, till I summon you again." He waved his hands at the demon and it vanished. Quickly he turned to Jehenna. "How did that nephew of a second rate dung splayer outguess me like that? Every damn thing I do, he outmaneuvers me!"

Jehenna herself was none too pleased by the results, and she had no more idea than Lenamare. "He's got to have some sort of advantage or ally that we don't know about. The sheer luck of him even realizing what you were doing, let alone figuring out the physical oscillation trick and timing his wizards to get the fireballs off fast enough, it’s impossible."

"Impossible maybe, but the horse shit eating pile of vomit has done it." Lenamare began to walk hurriedly to the gatehouse. On his way he almost tripped over Alvea with Rex's body. "Get that corpse out of here, and tell her to dry it up. We haven't got time for that kind of nonsense; she's got work to do." Jehenna waved impatiently to a nearby serving woman to get Alvea and Rex out of the way. Alvea didn't even seem to notice the raving Lenamare walking nearby. She simply rocked back and forth with Rex's blackened head in her lap.

"If he keeps this second guessing up, we might have some trouble," Jehenna said while climbing the stairs to the gatehouse behind Lenamare.

Lenamare, too caught up in righteous anger, didn't even seem to hear her. He climbed the stairs oblivious to all but his thoughts. As he reached the top, he turned and shouted as if to the sky, "how dare that bastard fifth son of a boot licking slavemonger attack me so. I, Lenamare, attack me, in my own hold. I swear that riverbank sludge-brained upstart shall know my wrath."





Chapter 22


Tom rematerialized in his cave. He turned slowly and walked over to his chair. As he sat down all he wanted to do was cry. He was frustrated, angry, upset and tired. Guilt still nagged him, yet now compounded to it was a feeling of helplessness. Here he was trapped in this demonic body, doing demonic things and under the control of a wizard at war. The way he'd acted, when confronted by the force field had been shameful, the emotions that had racked him then, were almost incomprehensible now. At the time it had felt like getting through the force field had been the most important thing in the world; that it had to be done at all costs. Yet now he realized there was no good reason, he’d literally been out of control.

He was ashamed of his totally uncontrolled behavior when trying to finish his mission. Rationally, he knew he couldn't control the pain or things he did there at the end, but that didn't help. Especially considering that when he'd killed the man, he should have been in full control.

If he'd been able to do so, Tom would have cried, but apparently demons still didn't have any tearducts, so all he could do was something like sobbing. The killing of the man and his behavior at the end, two acts of uncontrolled passion, simple thoughtless reactions. Things he'd always thought he was above, when he looked at the ignorant, emotional, juvenile bullies in his school. What was he coming to? Why him, why were things so unfair? Sobbing he drifted off into a weary, drained sleep.

~

Jenn put away the last of the dirty bandages. A serving girl had come to relieve her of tending the patients while they slept, so she could rest herself. Wearily she stood, and walked back into the tower. The children had been put to bed a few hours ago. The guards were posted on the walls. Although several more attacks had been made by Exador, none had penetrated the wards. She climbed tiredly up the stairs, her right hand dragging on the center pole of the staircase. She didn't know if she'd have the energy to write in her diary tonight; but she supposed she must, Rex's death couldn't go unrecorded.

~

"So what are we going to do?" Jehenna asked. She and Lenamare stood on the roof top of the central tower, looking out at the invading army beyond the softly glowing wards. The army was big, six to seven times larger than they had expected. Where did Exador get the men? Jehenna wondered.

"What can we do. That idiot student got himself killed, and his girlfriend is out of commission with her stupid grief. Both of them were central to the foundation of the wards."

"Well, we could hardly have expected them to be put out of commission like that."

"I suppose, but nonetheless, with two of the legs supporting the wards gone, it’s now only a matter of time before they begin to decay. If only we could have got them primed first, instead of doing it ad hoc. Then they would have lasted for a year after all the casters were dead. As is, with no priming and two out of thirteen legs useless, we've got maybe four weeks, forty days, before any decay starts. Once that happens, they will only last another forty days. In all, a total of two lousy Uropian months before they decay to nothing."

"Which of course they'll never get a chance to do," said Jehenna.

"Precisely, as soon as Exadung out there realizes the thing's decaying, he'll do everything in his power to help it. So in reality, we only have a little over six weeks."

"Unless Exador manages to outguess us again."

"No," Lenamare said, turning to face her. "Twice, maybe. But no one does that sort of thing to me three times. I've learned my lesson. I will not even give him the chance to outguess me. There is positively absolutely no way the man can know that he toasted one of my warders. Thus he can't know that this field can't be maintained indefinitely.

"This time around, I've got a few surprises for him." Lenemare turned to glare out at the army surrounding his home.

~

Jenn looked out over the edge of a merlon on the parapet of the schools defensive wall. Everywhere she looked there were men lined up behind the wards. The number of besiegers seemed to have grown over the past few days, she wasn't sure because she hadn't had a chance to observe the enemy closely before this point. She'd only gotten quick glances during her errands.

This was the first free moment she'd had since the siege had begun. Finally after three days, the wounded were finally getting to the point where they no longer needed her constant attention. Unfortunately, she mused, for some patients, it was because they had passed away. Luckily, however, thanks to the skills of the doctors and her spells, most would survive. True, many would bear burn marks and scars for the rest of their lives; but at least they had their lives. Rex wouldn't even have that.

Goddess, she couldn't believe he was dead. It was, she almost smiled sadly, just like Rex to get himself killed in such a manner. Heroic, brave, saving others. Just like a ballad. Rex always liked ballads, she'd always thought that somewhere down deep, Rex was really a bard, not a wizard. She could understand what he'd done, and intellectually she knew it was probably be for the best. Actually, looking at the faces of the children who had been with Rex, she couldn’t exchange their lives for his; she just wished there had been another option. It just hurt so much. It seemed so unfair that the stupid fireballs had to come over the wall at them.

Why were the innocent punished? Why couldn't the stupid fireball have bounced and hit Exador. Even hitting Lenamare would have been better, true it would have meant the end of the siege, and Exador's essential victory, but wasn't Lenamare more deserving...

No, she had to stop that line of reasoning. Every human had a right to life, even those she personally didn't care for. Both Exador and Lenamare should be allowed to live out their lives. Actually the whole thing was that damn demon's fault. If he hadn't been so insistent on getting in, Rex would still be alive. It was probably just being spiteful and vindictive in a typical demonic manner. If anything had to die, it surely should have been that thing. Of course, it wasn't exactly alive, so she wasn't sure if it could die. Nonetheless, if anything had to get hurt it should be a creature of evil, not a human being.

She turned and looked up at the late afternoon sun, its shimmering light refracted by the force dome. Actually it didn't matter if Lenamare or if anyone else had gotten it. With Rex dead and Alvea in shock, Jenn knew the dome couldn't be sustained long. Most of the common people didn't realize it, and in fact no one had admitted it to her either; but she wasn't a fool.

She hadn't participated in the setting of the wards because they had only needed thirteen people, and her specialization was the farthest from that area, but that didn't mean she didn't understand how it was set up. She had known the schedule for setting up the magical defenses, and knew they hadn't been primed. She knew exactly what it meant when a major pillar of the impromptu wards was destroyed.

Jenn didn't know how long the dome would last, but at least Exador didn't know for sure that it wouldn't last. What they were going to do when the wards came down, she didn't know. It wasn't going to be fun. Of course, thinking back on it, what real chance had they ever had. Even under the best conditions, they would eventually have been starved out. Completely cut off, physically and magically, from the outside world with no real chance of relief, they would eventually have succumbed. Oh, true, after a year or so, Exador might have gone home, but if he really wanted the school so much that he'd gotten the Archimage's support, then what was a year's time?

Actually, Jenn thought, as she began to walk along the top of the walls, this all assumed Exador didn't have any more tricks up his sleeve. He might have some way to break Lenamare's wards. Lenamare had never made a secret of them; to the contrary, he had often boasted about them to others. He’d previously built the wards for Freehold and the Council. It wasn't inconceivable that Exador had a plan to get around them. Not that he needed one now, but it might be morbidly interesting to see what he came up with.

Depressing; what could they do? They were doomed to lose. She shook her head slightly in frustration. She really didn't have the energy to do much more. She nodded absently to the soldiers stationed on the wall as she walked by. What would become of all of them? Exador had no love for Lenamare, and would have no mercy for his people. One of the children had asked if they wouldn't be safe since Exador wanted the school, and the school was made up of students; wouldn't he spare the students.

Jenn had reassured the little girl, but she didn't feel any such assurance. Schools also had political clout. The wizard controlling the school controlled the nearby land, and no new master who'd won the school by force could trust the people in the old master's clique. Perhaps the youngest might be spared, but the masters and senior students would be in jeopardy.

Of course, all this effort on Exador's part for the school seemed to be a bit much. Could any school be worth this much effort? True Lenamare and Exador had been enemies for decades, but an army this size? Jenn stopped again and looked over the edge of the wall at the besieging army again.

As she looked down, she noticed a slight disturbance. Something was happening. At certain points individuals were moving towards the iridescent wall. What they were doing she couldn't tell. There certainly weren't many, she could only see about four people at regular spacing around the part of the wall within her line of sight. It would be logical to assume from their semi-symmetric arrangements that others that she couldn't see were also lining up along the wall. Maybe eight in all were lined up around the school.

It didn't take long for her to figure out what was happening. Although not attuned directly to the wards, she could still feel the attacks on them. The individuals down there were either wizards or demons attacking the wall. From her perspective it was too hard to tell. If she were attuned to the wall she could probably tell by the feel of the assault but she wasn't. All she could feel was the throbbing of the pentacles below. Normally with the sort of energies that had to be flying about, she would have expected to feel a certain charge in the air, as well as a definite mental sensation indicating the type of magic being done and who was doing it. The wards, however, as designed, blocked most of the magic coming in, and so all she felt inside was the response of the wards themselves.

As she watched however, she noticed that the insides of the wards, directly in front of where each of the individuals were positioned had begun to glow. This caused her more than just a little concern. It meant that the attacks were beginning to penetrate. Lenamare had better do something quick to balance the wards to keep more magic out. She looked around quickly for him, but couldn't see him, surely he knew?



~

Lenamare knew. He too could only feel the throbbing of the pentacles. He was hurrying down the spiral staircase with Jehenna at his side. As they went, six of the remaining senior students joined them. The others, were on guard in the primary ward chamber itself, just in case such an event as this occurred. "Can you determine who or what is attacking the wards?" he asked Jehenna.

"I'm not positive, but I think he's hitting with about two thirds demons, and the rest wizards. It's definitely a mixed group."

"Damn, how much are we going to have to shift the balance?" Lenamare asked.

"Quite a ways, I can feel it weakening in spots."

"Which means that when we shift to defend the magical, the demons concentrate on physical attacks, instead of their energy bolts. Can you tell what type of demons is he using?"

"I don't know for sure, at least one three, possibly two. The rest are twos, what difference does it make?"

"We can fight demons with demons," Lenamare answered. They reached the warding room. Everyone was now there except Hortwell. Jehenna glanced around in annoyance, wondering where he could be.

"How? For us to send demons against his, we have to send them outside, that means doing some sort of oscillation trick again. We can't risk that now, it didn't work when we weren't under direct attack." Jehenna observed.

"Ah, but like I said, Exador is in for some surprises. When we set the wards to pure physical, I had Hortwell teleport outside, a safe distance away, with amulets. Now all I need to do is give the proper signal and he'll summon demons."

"Teleport out, during physical mode...of course, why didn't I think of it. Teleportation's a magical translocation, not physical. That makes what we did all the more dangerous..." she stood still and looked directly in to Lenamare's eyes. "What if Exador had thought to send his people in?"

"Ah..." Lenamare smiled coldly, "he did."

"He did? Where? What? Why didn't I know?"

"You were too tired afterward, and I haven't completely decided how to kill them yet."

"But how did you find them all? You did get them all?" Jehenna asked nervously.

"Of course, you recall that teleportation trap I worked on a few years ago? Well, I never did get all the bugs worked out of it; however, I was able to get it at least operational, with a few slight glitches. We however, don't have time to go over that now. I shall take Hortwell's place and we shall balance the wards as soon as the demons are distracted."

"How do you signal Hortwell, and can we wait that long?"

"To signal, I just change the color of the dome in the correct pattern. As far as waiting, no we can't. We shall have to do some shoring and minor rebalancing until the demons are called off."

Jehenna nodded, giving Lenamare the `we are going to talk later' look. She then motioned the others into position. She took the secondary position since Lenamare seemed to know what he wanted done. Then they set to work.





Chapter 23


"Master, master, your signal!" the little demon yelled excitedly.

Master Hortwell roused himself from where he'd been reading a recently received scroll on new work done on fourth order perturbation theory of material substances, and their effect on the spiritual realm. He'd summoned the little first order demon to keep watch on the school, in case Lenamare should signal him.

It was one of the few occasions Hortwell summoned a demon for a trivial task. There was no way he could keep the continual surveillance on the castle that a demon could, so it seemed like a valid exception to his own rules. He stood and walked over to where the small demon was.

This demon was no bigger than a small child, and as ugly as only a demon could be. Despite its lack of power, and his familiarity with it, Hortwell had left it within the minor warding pentacle he'd summoned it in. He didn't trust demons further than he could throw them; which, since demons could fly, wasn't anywhere.

True, this one had never even tried to betray him, but one could never be too sure. As he stood behind the gremlin-like creature, he looked to where it pointed excitedly. Beyond the small grove of trees in which he stood and across the plain, about a mile away, he could discern the castle and its magical dome. It had changed color. Before it had been essentially clear, with only a little cloudiness, now it was purple.

As he watched the dome turned from purple to red and then to green. It then oscillated between red and black for a few moments before returning to purple and starting over. The dome continued to repeat its message for about three minutes, and then it returned to its normal form. It didn't take Hortwell anytime at all to decode the message, it was as he'd feared.

He reached to his side and took out a small black box. The box was about four inches on each side. Two opposite ends of the box had holes in their center. Placing his right eye to one hole, and pointing the opposite end toward the castle, he scanned the situation.

With the aid of the Sortielli's Cube of Observing Places Everywhere, he was easily able to see the forces lining up against the wards. Apparently Exador was attacking the castle directly using demons and wizards. Lenamare hadn't said so, but it was what Hortwell had been expecting, and what his cube showed him.

Lenamare's code had simply said, "aid, demon 4 and more." It was in a code Lenamare had designed long ago, and had given to all the masters of the school. His message clear, " Summon the fourth order demon and as many others as possible for backup.”

Hortwell didn't like the idea of summoning that big thing. Actually, he didn't like summoning any demons unless there was good cause. Of course, saving the school was definitely such a cause. He had, however, been prepared for this. He walked over to a nearby area that he'd cleared, and in which he'd inscribed a double pentacle for summoning demons. Surrounding it were the necessary braziers, already ignited, needing only to have the correct ingredients added to summon a demon. Naturally, there were also a subsidiary set of protection pentacles for himself.

True, the extra pentacles may not be necessary for a known demon whose name he knew, especially since he also had several amulets, including a fourth order one, and he would use them; but Hortwell felt that when dealing with demons, it was always best to be doubly safe. One could never take enough precautions. He could easily summon and control the demon with less paraphernalia, but he preferred to leave nothing to chance.

In point of fact, he would truly have liked to have the ring, but for some reason Lenamare had insisted it stay with Jehenna. Hortwell, had to admit there was logic in her having it. As the school’s Master Demonologist, she had studied demonology more than anyone at the school except perhaps Lenamare, and at times he was pretty sure Lenamare didn't know as much as he thought he did. Hortwell was a strong advocate of the traditional methods of demon binding, something he and Lenamare disagreed on, Lenamare felt that a good wizard should be able to command demons with essentially the strength of his own will and magic alone, Hortwell believed that a sane wizard used everything at his disposal to help himself in conjuring demons. Thus it was that his method was slower, but, he felt, much safer.

Moving as quickly as possible, Hortwell went around to each of the braziers, adding sulfur along with the necessary rare woods that helped in controlling high order demons to the flames. Standing back and focusing on the large ring on his left ring finger, he began to conjure the demon.

~

Tom felt his cave dissolve around him. He sighed, expecting to see the stone conjuring room appear around him. Instead, he was surprised to see that he was in the middle of a small clearing among some trees. What's more, Lenamare wasn't the one conjuring him. It was the old man he'd seen earlier. He wasn't sure what this meant, but at least it was interesting, something to take his mind off the brooding he'd been doing the last few days.

"Demon...knowst that I am Hortwell, and that I have summoned thee by the power of will and warding, and by the power of thy name which binds thy soul. Knowst that thy spirit and body are mine to command. Dost thou acknowledge my right to command thee?"

This guy was like all the rest, however, rather than fight it, Tom figured he'd just go along with it. He didn't know for sure how far this man's power to command him went; but he didn't want to test it by ripping the guy's guts out as had been suggested to him as a test. "Very well, mortal what do you want?" This time he didn't use his Darth Vader voice, instead he answered simply impatiently. To his surprise, his voice still came out extremely deep and sinister, not quite so booming, but impressive nonetheless.

"The school of Lenamare is under attack by the wizard Exador and his minions. Currently, Exador has sent demons and wizards to try and break the wall of force around the castle. You are to go and destroy all the demons attacking the school. You will in no manner aid Exador, or cause him to be aided. You will in no manner harm the force wall or those inside it. Is this clear?"

"You want me to destroy the attacking demons?" Tom was excited about dealing with other demons; but he wasn't thrilled with killing them. They certainly didn't deserve to die, and he had no reason to want them dead. Besides, remembering the dragon, he didn't know that he could kill the demons. He knew what he was capable of, and how fast he recovered, and Hortwell had implied that there were more than one. "That might be a bit difficult."

This caused Hortwell to pause and think for a moment. "They are all weaker than you, and I will be summoning up lesser backup demons for you. But you are right in suggesting that their actual destruction will be tricky. Very well, simply see to it that they are damaged enough that they have to return to the Abyss, and can no longer harm the school, or myself."

"Very well, " Tom said. This still wasn't going to be fun; but Tom remembered the other day when he'd been lax in following orders. He had better do as much as he could rationally to get rid of the other demons before the compulsion made him act irrational. If he managed to stay rational he might be able to come up with a way of following these orders without anyone really getting hurt.

"Now, I am going to release you from the pentacle. You shall not harm me in any manner, nor cause harm to come to me or mine. You shall go directly to carry out your assignment, and when finished return here. Is this understood?"

"Yes." This fellow was getting annoying. Tom had already said he would do as asked. What more did the guy want?

Hortwell stepped back and waved his hands in a few peculiar gestures down at the pentacle. As he did this, he whispered some words that Tom did not catch. Just as when Lenamare had done it in the tower room, Tom felt the invisible restraining walls part before him as he stepped from the pentacle.

"Now go." Hortwell pointed to the castle. Tom looked in that direction, and then took to the air, heading to battle.

This definitely was not a good idea, thought Tom as he neared the battle. Before him he could see Lenamare's castle. It was enshrouded in a hemispherical white mist that was difficult to see through. This, Tom realized, must be the barrier he'd ran into when he'd been trying desperately to complete his last mission. He remembered the dome and he vaguely recalled seeing the army encamped outside of it. At the time though, he had paid no attention to it, he'd been too out of his mind.

Now however, he was in full control and could observe the situation calmly. The castle was protected by the dome of force. Camped about the castle, surrounding it, was what Tom supposed was a typical medieval army. It consisted of about two thousand men, mainly infantry with perhaps a few hundred cavalry. There were also seven wooden towers and five catapults. Essentially it was just what one would expect from a besieging army, which this apparently was. The only difference from the history books was the force wall, and from his own experience he would have to say it was a major difference. Actually it seemed to Tom that it would be extremely difficult to break, but apparently Lenamare feared that that was exactly what might happen.

The major question, of course, was, why were these people laying siege to the castle? The only thing Tom could think of was Lenamare's great personality. It was certainly enough to make Tom want to do violence to it. The other major thought was where had it come from? When he had left here only a week ago, there had been no army, but this camp seemed very well settled. It had also been there when he'd gotten back. It had basically come out of nowhere in about two days.

Thinking back on it, Tom remembered all the building and work going on about the school when he'd left. He'd simply assumed that it was the routine. Obviously they had been preparing for the siege. This siege also explained why Lenamare might risk a demon as a messenger, he was probably asking for some sort of help. Hopefully, Tom thought, he wouldn't get it. Especially since Tom would rather be down helping the besiegers than the besieged.

All of which brought him back to his dilemma. How to get rid of the demons? He could see them now; they were placed at strategic locations around the dome, along with some humans. All together there were about four demons and three wizards. Both humans and demons seemed to be concentrating on the dome. The wizards were periodically sending fire and lightning at the dome while the demons seemed to be alternating between pounding with their fists and sending out little beams of energy themselves.

These little energy blasts being shot by the demons were interesting. Tom hadn't realized that demons could do that. He vaguely recalled a lot of red light that seemed to surround him when he was pounding on the wall, but no real energy beams. He assumed that he could do the same as these demons, though he wasn't sure how. He might have done it unconsciously when angered, maybe or maybe not, he didn't know; but regardless, it would be much more difficult to consciously do it. All of which, again brought him back to his problem, how to get rid of these demons.

Of course The easiest thing would be to walk up and ask them to leave; unfortunately, he doubted that even if they were so inclined (which was also doubtful) that they could. They were probably being ordered to attack the dome by their accursed master. So if they didn't leave, what would he do then? He guessed he'd just have to see what happened, he'd probably be forced to mayhem. He didn't like that idea, especially considering the previous results he'd attained.

The only consolation this time however, was the fact that it was unlikely that he could actually kill them. Of course There was one other problem, Tom wasn't at all sure he could hurt them enough to make them leave. He didn't know how much damage any one of them might need, let alone trying to get them all. Things might get especially tight if they all ganged up on him. Although the old man had promised reinforcements, he didn't see any behind him. Tom sighed and shook his head, the time for speculation was gone, as he was rapidly approaching the demons.

~

In the woods, Hortwell turned from watching the demon dwindle in the sky. As he turned around, he was brought up short. Standing not two horse lengths from him was a soldier, and he wasn't one of Lenamare's. The soldier grinned mercilessly at him, pointing a broadsword at his middle. Hortwell, stopped cold; all thought of conjuring more demons died in his head. He gazed coolly down his nose at the soldier and waited for the man to speak. He needed time to think.

"So, old man, going to rain demons upon my buddies, is you? I think not." The soldier said as he stepped forward bringing his sword closer to Hortwell's chest. "I think I is going to have to put a stop to your black magic, gramps."

This was not good, reflected Hortwell, most any protection spell would require movement of his hands, which would surely cause the soldier to stab him. "I think it’s time that there be one less magic bagger in the world, don't you?" As the man spoke, Hortwell noticed a movement out of the side of his eye, behind the soldier.

The soldier lunged. Without thinking, Hortwell dove to his own right and yelled "Zargoffelstan, kill him!" The shout slightly distracted the soldier, so combined with Hortwell's dive to the soldier's left, the blade in the man's right hand and lunging forward, only stabbed Hortwell in the shoulder. Hortwell fell, gasping in pain, his shoulder a bloody mess of cut muscle and tendons.

~

The soldier spun, but not in time. Zargoffelstan was a minor demon, nothing like the powerful lord that had just left. But he had been Hortwell's slave for sixty years, and from his experience, there wasn't a better master in the world.

He saw Hortwell go down, even as the order came. He moved on the soldier with the speed only a demon could muster. True he was weak by the standards of the great demons, but he was still stronger than any man, and he had razor sharp claws. If Tom had been watching, it would have appeared that the man had just been inserted into a food processor. Blood flew everywhere. Arms, legs, entrails, all were spread evenly about the clearing. The man didn't even have a chance to scream before his guts lined the trees like shiny red ornaments. It took only moments before the little demon was done.

As soon as he finished, Zargoffelstan rushed to his master's side. As he kneeled down, Hortwell opened his eyes on him. "Zargoffelstan, aid, protect now," was all he could manage before darkness began to drag him down. He felt so weak, tired, he didn't even really care how the little demon had managed to get out of the warding it had been trapped in.

~

As he neared the edge of the dome, Tom scanned the dome's attackers with his acute vision, looking for the biggest demon. He figured he’d better take out the biggest one while he was at his strongest. He soon spotted the biggest demon. As he settled in behind it, it didn't even turn or seem to notice his existence. The nearby soldiers did; they were clearing a large area. They hadn't seen Exador conjure this one, and it was definitely a big nasty looking demon.

Tom walked up quietly to within two arms lengths of the demon who was madly pounding on the force wall. It was shorter than him, only about man height, maybe slightly taller. Its entire body was red, like most demons, it had shaggy goat legs with thick purplish red fur. Small bat-like wings, a thatch of dark hair on its head, and of course, pointy ears and horns.

"Excuse me," Tom said.

The demon ignored him. Perhaps it didn't hear me, Tom thought, maybe I'd better speak up. "Excuse me," Tom said, about as loudly as a man could yell. Still the demon continued. This is annoying, he was trying to be polite... "STOP THAT, DAMN IT!" Tom yelled at the top of his voice.

"What the ferg do you want?" the demon snarled nastily as it spun around, obviously bent on trying to intimidate what it thought was an annoying lesser demon. When it turned to face Tom however, its attitude lost a little of its nastiness. This was partly because its eyes were directed at its own height, and all it saw was solid stomach muscle. Slowly it raised its head to look Tom in his face. As his head came up, his eyes narrowed in calculation. "Uhm, what did you want?"

"I said," Tom replied dryly, "please stop pounding on that dome."

"Oh, and why should I?" asked the smaller demon, snidely, but not too snidely.

"Because...I have been instructed to stop you. The easiest way for me to do that is for you to just quit and leave."

"And if I don't?"

"I hope, it won't come to that."

The demon stared up into Tom's staring eyes. "You do realize of course," the demon said, as if sizing Tom up, "that I am under orders, and can't just stop."

"I was afraid of that." Even as he said this, Tom came up with what sounded like a logical ploy. "However, think of this. If you disobey your master's order, he may punish you with a few hours of torment, but if you force me to stop you, I'll ensure that you have a few months of agony. You see, I'll have to forcibly disassemble you to make you go home, and that won't be fun."

The demon seemed slightly taken aback by this. "Is that a threat?" he said angrily, his pride asserting itself.

"No," Tom said, realizing he may have said the wrong thing, "simply a fact." He decided that for better or worse, if any of this was going to work, he'd better stick to his guns.

"I...don't think so," and with that he slugged Tom in the stomach with all his strength.

Tom's breath, which he'd been talking with, left his body in a rush, as he doubled over in pain and fell backwards. His falling was more in reaction to the surprise than the strength of the blow. Still, it was as painful as any blow he'd received from the bullies at home. Annoyed, but still wary, Tom leapt to his feet. He would have assumed a defensive position from his katas, but his legs just weren't built for it. So he stood there, hands raised into blocking position. "That wasn't a good idea."

The little demon said nothing, but suddenly its eyes narrowed and its hand shot out. Tom raised his arm to block the fist, but instead was surprised again. The fist never came close, instead flame engulfed him. It burned.

Without thinking he dove upwards, much like he'd done when trapped on the color plane. Up he went, sixty, a hundred and more feet. He then paused, and stared down at the demon. It was looking for him, unsure of where he'd gone. The flames had so covered him and obscured the other's sight that for the moment and he wasn't sure where Tom was. Before the other demon could get a bearing, Tom came down. He came down hooves first, just like when he'd fallen in the Abyss. This time, however, instead of using his wings to slow himself, he used them to speed up and direct his path. He came down, hooves first, directly onto the smaller demon.

As Tom came in for his kamikaze collision, the smaller demon saw him. His eyes widened in surprise, just as Tom's hooves connected with his face at a forty five degree angle. The little demon's head went crack, backwards in a severe case of whiplash. His body was plowed backward by the force of the collision. Tom stumbled a little as he landed, but regained his balance. He looked toward the little demon.

He'd expected a knockout, but unfortunately, he didn't get it. The little demon was about ten feet away. It was standing up, shaking it head, slightly dazed. Connecting him and Tom was a foot deep gouge in the ground where the little demon had tilled the ground with its body. Deciding to take advantage of every possible opening, Tom leapt over to where the demon was, and delivered a double punch to the stomach, using both hands and all his strength.

As always, he was suitably impressed by his strength. His fists didn't go through the demon, but they did send it flying. It was hurled backwards and upwards twenty feet, bowling into a crowd of onlooking soldiers. The soldiers were knocked down forcefully; none would have been hurt more than some bruises and cracked bones, except that the little demon was now annoyed. Angrily it clawed its way out of the pile of soldiers, shredding uniforms and human flesh in equal proportion. Tom was rather nauseated by the sight, but he didn't have time to fully realize the situation before the demon was on him.

It flew at him. Literally. It came at him with both fists extended before it, in a Superman pose. As it came at him, Tom who was in the air, flew slightly to the side, but the demon veered. Both of its fists connected in Tom's middle. The momentum of the demon carried them both backwards. Tom's backside rammed painfully into the force wall. As they slid down the few feet to the ground, Tom grabbed each of the demon's wrists, which were still pressed against his stomach. He drew them apart and twisted them with all his strength. He twisted them inward and downward, so that the backs of the demon's hands would be inside. He twisted and pulled. A human's arms would have been broken and his shoulders thrown out of joint; the demon, however, only howled in pain. Thinking quick, Tom brought up his right hoof and slammed it between the demon's legs. Because of his leg's structure, the kick wasn't as effective as a human kick, but his excessive strength more than made up for it. The little demon truly howled in pain now.

Its howls were so loud that Tom almost thought his ears would break. Having no choice but to carry on, Tom brought his knee up, and pulled the demon’s two wrists down. This action promptly connected the demon's head to his knee with a satisfactory clunk. It didn't knock the demon out, of course, but it did change the pitch of the demon's scream slightly.

Out of the corner of his eye, Tom noticed some movement coming towards him. Looking up, he saw the other three demons converging on the fight rapidly. Quickly he scanned the sky looking for his support, he didn't see any. Fun, thought Tom. Stepping over his now kneeling opponent's back, Tom turned, bringing the demon's arms with him. The demon's arms were now behind its back, and crossed over each other. Using the oldest restraint trick in the book, Tom shoved the demon's wrist up over the back of his head. Human arms would have been in bad shape at this point, instead the demon simply uttered a completely new timbre of howling.

Knowing that he had to get rid of this guy for the moment, he bent his knees and lifted. Ungracefully, yet with the rudimentary form he'd learned in class, he flipped the little demon over his back with all his muscle power. As it was, even if he'd been the greatest black belt of all time, instead of not quite a brown belt, he probably couldn't have pulled it off if it hadn't been for the shear strength in his new body. The demon went sailing over Tom's head, forty feet, into the middle of the on looking soldiers. These soldiers, Tom decided, must be really stupid, despite the fact that they kept getting a demon thrown into their midst, they still held their ground and watched the fight.

One problem temporarily on hold, Tom turned to face the next three. This wasn't going to be fun, Tom thought. He had absolutely no idea how to deal with these three. As he stood, staring at the demons descending on him, he felt a pinprick between his shoulder blades. Arching his wings slightly, he turned to see what had caused the small pain. He couldn't see anything that could have pricked him. Quickly scanning the crowd of soldiers who had been behind him, he detected some slight movement, as if someone moving away. He really didn't have time to deal with whatever was going on there. He began to turn back, when he spotted a dagger lying on the ground. Apparently, someone had tried to throw a dagger in his back. Tom stood still, staring at the dagger for a few seconds. He didn't know why it surprised him that daggers were bouncing off his skin, given everything else he had discovered about his demonic form.

Suddenly, as he stood there, someone slammed into him from behind. Sinewy arms closed about his neck, trying to strangle him. He had temporarily forgotten about the demons charging from behind. Startled violently, reflexively, without conscious thought on Tom's part, his long prehensile tail came stabbing straight up. Tom felt it shoot up, and before he could stop himself, it rammed hard into the demon behind him.

Once or twice, when he'd been in elementary school, Joe Montague, who had always been the class trouble maker, had snuck up behind Tom and quickly placed one of his hands flat on the top of Tom's head, and pounded on it with his other hand. This was what Joe liked to call "Ten Thousand Volts," which was because it felt like a bolt of electricity was traveling down one's spine. That was the feeling he now encountered. It felt as if an electric shock were traveling down his spine, from his neck, down the small of his back, down his tail and up to the sharp pointed part, which was stuck in the attacking demon.

The offending fiend screeched piteously. The sinewy arms fell slack, and then slid off Tom's shoulders. Tom turned around to see a badly charred demon, which looked as if it had been split in two from the crotch up to the sternum. Even as his eyes widened upon the grisly scene, the demon's body began to fade. This Tom realized was what it must look like to others as he disappeared back to the Abyss. At least that was where Tom figured the demon was going. He really couldn't think completely straight at the moment, but everything Boggy and Tizzy had said, as well as his own experiences with the dragon, indicated that the demon should be returning to the Abyss to regenerate. At least he hoped so. He would hate to think that he'd killed the smaller demon, just because it was following its orders.

Tom looked up from the offending corpse. The other two smaller demons were simply standing a little ways off, looking at the spot where their compatriot had vanished from. Slowly they glanced up with sickly smiles. There was, Tom thought, definitely a hint of wariness, and perhaps even fear, in their eyes.

"Hi?" one said hesitantly. It made a feeble gesture with one hand, as if waving hello.

Trying to think quickly, but without knowing what to say, Tom just stood there. He realized later that the look of concentration on his face could probably only be construed as a fierce scowl to outsiders. Whatever the case, the two demons looked at each other, and then suddenly without warning, charged Tom.

Tom scrambled back a little, trying to take a defensive stance. However, just before the demons reached him, they let out high pitched howling noises, clouds of smoke sprang from nowhere, and the demons disappeared. "What the hell?" Tom said in surprise.

What were these two up to? Tom quickly looked around, suspecting a trick. The two demons however, were gone. He couldn't see them anywhere, as far as he could tell, they'd gone back to the Abyss. The question was, why? It really didn't make any sense.

"Cute," said a voice from the crowd of soldiers to Tom's left. Tom glanced over and saw the first demon slowly emerging from the crowd. "Perhaps you can scare pip squeaks into pretending that you destroyed them, so that they don't have to fight; but it won't work with me.”

"No, you're going to have to get rid of me the hard way, asshole. That lightning trick ain't gonna work on me either. So you'd just better be prepared for a long fight." As he spoke the demon marched closer. As he finished speaking, Tom judged that he was just at the right distance.

"I don't think so," as fast as he could, Tom spun and landed a spinning back kick to the demon's stomach. The demon moaned in surprise and bent over. As he bent, Tom quickly repositioned himself. Breathing as he'd been taught, Tom began a series of quick punches to the other's face. Using the full force of his body, but keeping his shoulder's fixed, he jabbed as quick and hard as he could at the demons face six times, kiyaing each time. Shifting his balance, he then executed a right crescent kick. Unfortunately, because of his leg construction, he didn't coordinate it properly to get it as high as it should go. He'd intended to hit the guy's chin, instead, Tom's hoof impacted on the demon's shoulder, spinning it around and to the ground.

Tom backed up as far as he could. As he did so the other demon slowly got to its feet. Tom charged through the air. He was attempting to do the double flying back kick that he'd used so successfully on the dragon. Unfortunately, he realized as he flew by, this demon wasn't as large as the dragon, and it was a lot more mobile. The demon had simply seen him coming and leapt out of the way at the last second.

To his surprise, Tom kept going. He tried to slow himself down with his wings, but before he could decelerate appreciably, he found himself plowing through soldiers. Only vaguely did Tom hear the screams. All he could really note in those few seconds, was the thumping of bodies against his hooves and body. Hardly recognizing what he was seeing through the blood that was spurting everywhere, he came to a stop, about a two hundred feet from where he started.

Standing up dazedly, he unthinkingly looked at the mangled corpses around him. Uncomprehendingly, he noted calmly that at least one man's head had been popped off. Some soldiers were missing limbs and many just had their guts hanging out. How could he have done this? Slowly he realized that at least some of the damage had come from the fact that they'd been tightly packed and had weapons drawn.

So in reality, the only ones he'd really mangled, were those in his hooves' path. The other's had just been jammed aside as he plowed through, and they'd accidentally sliced and diced themselves and their fellows. Wanting nothing more than to get away from the death he'd caused, Tom took the only open path out, back the way he'd come. As he emerged from the bewildered and wounded soldiers, he saw the other demon laughing at him. This was almost too much. "What the hell is your problem? It was your soldiers that got creamed!"

"I am laughing at you. You're nothing but a fool."

Tom was getting annoyed, this jerk was laughing, and now he'd noticed some fool wizard chanting something at the periphery of the clearing made by the soldiers. Tom couldn't tell what the guy was chanting, but a black cloud seemed to be forming in front of the wizard. Tom didn't know what the man was doing, but he imagined it wasn't for Tom's benefit. Angry, and lashing out, Tom once more charged the laughing demon. Again, the demon was ready, except that this time Tom didn't do quite what was expected.

Instead of trying to physically throw the other demon, or punch it, Tom simply attempted to grab one arm and spin the demon around. He was simply trying to throw it off balance and make it stumble. His ploy worked. The demon stepped aside as Tom charged up and in the process added to the momentum that Tom needed to grab its arm and jerk it off balance and away. Stumbling on its goat-like legs the demon accidentally backed into the mumbling wizard and his black cloud, just as Tom had hoped.

However, the results were more than Tom had bargained for. The demon ran into the wizard, thus throwing off his concentration.

~

Now, distracting a wizard in the middle of casting a spell is never a good idea. If a wizard loses control of a powerful spell, bad things can happen. This is especially true when the wizard is casting a Cloud of Disintegration, as this one was doing. Unbeknownst to Tom, C.o.D's are one of the few spells that can permanently discorporate demons. It also happens to dissolve anything that gets in its way. Including casters that lose control of it.

Thus it was that Tom heard only a very short yell, as the cloud expanded and completely engulfed the demon and the wizard. C.o.D's are very efficient, the victims feel only a momentary instant of infinite pain as their cells are ripped into their component molecules, which are in turn disassociated into their constituent atoms. At this point the victims feel absolutely nothing as the atoms are stripped of their electrons, and then the protons and neutrons are ripped apart. Suffice to say, one need not even mention any thought of pain as the nucleons are split into quarks and so on it goes down to the primordial energies and particles which may make up quarks. Naturally, a theoretical magic student may wonder at what happens to the incredible amounts of binding energy that are released in this occurrence. Unfortunately, the best theories simply state that this energy goes into feeding the cloud, allowing it to grow. After all, it takes an awful lot of energy to rip things apart on this scale in the first place.

It is also fairly easy to see that it would be nice to have a wizard controlling said cloud, otherwise it would disintegrate things, grow and eventually eat everything. Unfortunately, in this case, the controlling wizard was eaten by the cloud. Now, actually, Lenamare, who was observing from the castle wall, wasn't too concerned. He wasn't positive, but he was pretty sure that the cloud couldn't get through his wards. After all, the wards were pure energy to begin with. Thus at least he and his school would be safe.

Exador, on the other hand, had no such protection. Therefore, he quickly decided that instead of messing with more demons to fight Lenamare’s demon, he would do his best to try to get the cloud under control, before it ate his army. By the time he got close enough to begin work on trying to control it, it had quadrupled its size and had eaten four horses and five soldiers who hadn't realized the problem in time to get away. Naturally it was also dissolving the earth below it as well.

~

Tom though, didn't really care about the cloud. He was simply exhausted and sick. He was just glad that he apparently had no more enemies to fight. Without waiting around for further orders, Tom took to the air to head back toward the clearing with the wizard in it. As he flew off, his last glimpse of the army was of some new big shot wizard waving his hands, and of soldiers finally having the sense to run away from something obviously dangerous.

It took very little time for Tom to return to the clearing. By the time he was coming down for a landing he was already preparing something nasty to say to the wizard about the timely backup he'd received. The words died in his mouth as he quickly noticed the state of the clearing.

The clearing kind of looked like one of those paintings he'd done at a carnival, where he'd squirted paint onto a rotating piece of cardboard. The main difference was that the clearing was painted mainly in red, with a little purple here and there. In the center of the clearing lay the wizard, unconscious, obviously suffering from some relatively minor sword wound. Over the wizard stood the little demon he'd noticed upon arrival. It seemed to be standing guard over the wizard, and glaring defiantly up at Tom.

"Stay back!" shouted the little demon as Tom landed a few feet away.

"Why?" asked Tom.

"’Cause I'm not going to let you hurt him," said the little demon, with such seriousness and conviction that Tom had to restrain a bit of smile, despite his sour mood. Apparently, the little demon considered Tom a serious threat to his master and was quite intent on defending the man. A rather strange thought, actually, Tom decided, why would a demon want to protect its accursed master?

"Why don't you want me to hurt him?" Tom asked in curiosity. "If I offed him, you'd be free." Not that Tom had any desire to kill the wizard, the guy had been a little paranoid and pretentious, but he didn't deserve death.

"Cause I said so, " retorted the little demon. "Besides, he's the best master I've had in a long, long time, and I don't want to give him up and get stuck with someone a lot worse. So you just back off, or I'll make you sorry." The little demon puffed.

"Oh, " said Tom with what he thought was an amused grin. The little demon blanched, so Tom figured the grin must not have worked like he'd intended. "Very well then, I'll just go back to my cave." The little demon said nothing, it just glared.

Without wasting any more time, Tom visualized his cave and began to will himself back to it. As the image of the cave began to superimpose itself upon the clearing, he noticed that the little demon wasn't glaring so hard, but was still extremely vigilant. As he was almost completely back in his cave, he gave the demon a friendly wave and a nod.





Chapter 24


Lenamare shut the door to his study and motioned to Jehenna to take a seat. She sat down in her traditional chair across from Lenamare's desk. Lenamare moved briskly around his desk and took his seat. "So, you wanted to speak?" He asked with a slight smile.

"Yes, this teleportation trap of yours, what's the story."

"Not much actually, simply that anyone trying to teleport within the vicinity of this castle, without the proper password, will end up in a specific location of my choosing, and not theirs."

"Uh huh. And the bugs you mentioned?"

"Well...simply that the standard version of the spell puts them in a stasis field. Unfortunately, because they rematerialize in stasis, they're kind of permanently stuck in it. I haven't figured out how to get them out of it. That's all."

"They’re stuck in stasis? Meaning we can't question them?"

"Or do anything to them. They're in a complete Vergian Time Stasis, so we can't affect them. Apparently, materialization into frozen time fixes their reality in a different time frame."

"Why would this be? I mean, people have been doing Vergian Time Stasis' for centuries, and they always get out."

"I'm not sure, my guess is that it has to do with the entry into Skew Timespace. Remember, teleportation reorients the individual's energies to perfectly align with new space-time coordinates. If the teleportation aligns them more perfectly with Skew Timespace than the normal stasis spell, then it could be a hell of a lot more difficult to realign them to normal space-time.

"Essentially, the normal spell method of entry allows a small communication channel between our reality and Skew Timespace. If this entry isn't made, then the communication channel doesn't exist..."

"And so we can't communicate with them in anyway, especially by magic. The reversal spell can't find them since no path exists between us and them."

"Precisely. Now if one could undo their teleportation spell, from outside, one might just be able to pull them out of it, the same way they got there."

"But no one knows how to do that, or even if it can be done." Jehenna concluded. Lenamare nodded.

"However, " Jehenna said as she realized something, "if there is no communication channel, then light can't pass between here and there. You couldn't see if anyone was there or not."

"True, but I know where I sent them, and when I go there I can detect the normal warping of space-time that you experience when examining someone trapped in a Vergian Time Stasis. It also happens to be fairly good size, so I am fairly sure that there are more than one would be infiltrators there."

"So what do you intend to do about them?"

"I haven't decided yet, there is not much I can do. For one thing, we don't have a whole lot of time. These wards aren't going to last indefinitely now that we've lost that student. Damn him for dying on me." Lenamare stood up and began to pace around the room, his elegant slippers making a slight whisper as he glided through the deep carpeting.

"Well, what do you plan to do, take them down and start from scratch?"

"No, that would take way to long and Exador would be in and crush us. I'm thinking of leaving."

"True, with that teleportation trap, we could safely teleport out of here."

"Exactly, as I'd thought. Except for one problem."

"Problem?"

"Yes, the students and retainers, peasants etc.. I can't take all of them with me in a teleport, and most of them can't teleport themselves. We don't have enough people to carry everyone else out."

"Since when did you care about them, let them and the men at arms fend for themselves." She was gazing at him with a slightly speculative demeanor.

"Normally, yes. But in order to exact my revenge on Exador, I'm going to have to have Council help, and they frown on School Masters who lose students they're sworn to protect. So I think, if possible, we should get them out too. It would make for a much better bargaining position later on, if I still had them."

"Good point. So how do we get everyone out without Exador knowing about it, and following us?"

"We'll probably have to use the escape tunnels and split up and make our ways separately in small groups to Freehold."

"Right. And while we're doing this, with the physical shielding nullified so we can get out, Exador comes trashing through, and brings the castle and tunnel down on top of our heads." Jehenna shook her head.

"Slight problem."

"Isn't it, though?" She said drily.

"Well, the two of us will just have to think of something, " said Lenamare as he finally came to rest, leaning on the right hand corner of his desk.

~

Jenn sighed and put her diary down. What a day, at least it was over, for the moment. She'd just finished writing up the day's events in her diary after returning from Alvea's quarters. The poor girl was still practically catatonic over the loss of Rex, even now. Jenn herself was just numb. So far the shields continued to hold out, but for how much longer? Old Ugly had destroyed the offensive attack on the wards, all by himself. Actually rather impressive; killing three type two demons, a type three, a fairly powerful wizard and somewhere around twenty to thirty soldiers in less than fifteen minutes, overall not to be scorned. In fact, it just made Jenn all the more nervous about the thing. Monsters that powerful shouldn't be allowed to wander around freely as much as Lenamare seemed inclined to let them.

Speaking of demon conjuring, she hoped Master Hortwell was all right. Everyone knew by now that he had been the one to go out and conjure the demon, but he'd never returned. No one knew what happened to him, and Lenamare wouldn't risk any wizards capable of teleporting out to try and find him. They had shifted the wards at the prearranged times for him to reenter, but he never had. She knew the masters were quite worried about it.

Oh well, no use thinking too much on it, it really wasn't worth it; she was powerless to do anything. All she could hope, as she slowly changed into her nightgown, was that if worst came to worst, she might be able to smuggle of few of the children out, before Exador had his way with them all.

~

"Come on son, time for your bed now," the soldier patted the boy on the head. While starting his nightly round about the top of the wall, Herchlion, one of Lenamare’s men at arms ran across the small boy, leaning between two merlons, arms folded on the stone, with his head resting on his arms and gazing intently down at the battlefield where the C.o.D had made the giant hole in the earth.

"Up with you now," Herchlion said again as the boy was slow to move. The child slowly pulled back and gazed up at him with a slightly disappointed frown, as if the boy knew Herchlion was all too right, but yet hating to have to leave. "Come lad, it's too late for you to see anything tonight. If there's no fighting, mayhaps you can come back another time." Herchlion smiled knowingly down on the boy. He knew what it was to gaze out on a battle field, dreaming of the glory. As a lad, he himself had been much the same way. Staring in awe at any soldiers he saw, wishing that he too could fight beside them.

~

The boy got up slowly and made his way hesitantly to the top of the stairs. He hated to go back to the "Nursery" as he called it. However, the guard was correct, he certainly couldn't see anything anymore. The glowing of the wards lit up the courtyard and the small perimeter outside the wall; however, since it was dark outside of the dome, the glow of the dome prevented him from seeing out. He could no longer see where the demon had fought its battle. If only he'd been allowed to see it. But no, kids weren't allowed on the battlements during action. So he'd had to rely on second hand reports of the mighty exploits of the demon. He'd hurried up there as soon as the soldiers would let him, hoping to catch a glimpse of where the demon had cast the Cloud of Disintegration on the enemy; he'd seen it, but barely. The fading sunlight and the distortion of the wards had made it unclear, but there was no mistaking a heavy battleground and the troughs dug by the demons. Maybe next time, he thought, maybe then I'll get to see him in action.





Wizardry

Curriculum Vitae: College of Wizardry

University of the Council States

Wizardry is the science of mana manipulation.

Wizards are scientists and engineers who have codified the complex relationship between Animus and Mana into a set of rules for consistent and uniform behavior. The Laws of Wizardry are in essence, the language of "Magic." At least magic as it is viewed by the layman. Language in all forms, including written in the form of Runes, spoken Invocations and action in the form of Gestures are powerful tools to focus and concentrate the mind and thus manipulate the forces of nature. Further, certain material objects and constructs have natural or man-made affinities to natural forces that helps in channeling these forces. Taken all together, Runes, Invocations, Gestures and Catalysts are tools that allow Wizards to control the very world in which the live.

Wizards "cast" spells, which are actually complex formulas for the manipulation of the elemental forces of nature through the application of both Animus and Mana. As discussed in the section on Mana, there is significant interplay between Mana and the elemental forces. Properly trained, a mage can utilize his own Animus to accumulate, contain and manipulate Mana in order to control elemental forces.

Schools of Wizardry

There are 7 "Schools of Wizardry", each of which is affiliated with some type or element of magic. Despite the name, the Schools of Wizardry are a classification system and are not particularly related to “Wizard School” although most Wizard Schools specialize in only a few “Schools of Wizardry.” Every wizard has a specific specialization, which allows him/her to cast spells of the same element/type with greater ease. The Schools of Wizardry and their elemental affiliation is as follows:

Sorcerer: Element of Water. Sorcery is the magic of information and scrying from a distance. Sorcery also deals with any spells using water and liquids.

Enchanter: Element of Air. Enchantment is the magic of illusions and charms, of beguiling the mind. Enchanters also specialize in any spells involving air and gases.

Thaumaturgist: Element of Earth. Thaumaturgist deal with spells of a physical and earthly nature, healing, mending and spells dealing with the ground and earth itself.

Pyromancer: Element of Fire. Pyromancy is the magic of fire, light and energy. Usually spells of a destructive nature, pyromancers channel fire and light.

Conjuror: Element of Spirit. Spirit is animus, the element of life. Conjurers deal with spells that summon beings both magical and mundane. They also use spells that directly affect the spirit or soul of a living creature. While conjurors conjure animals and spirits, they are most known/feared for conjuring demons.

Runic Wizardry: Runic wizards are not associated with any particular element, but rather they work through runes and symbols inscribed upon things to channel the forces of the elements, thus they are neutral in their ability with respect to all elemental spells, but by channeling these spells through runes they may gain great benefits.

Necromancy: Necromancy is the only exception to the rule allowing a wizard to specialize in only one element. Necromancy is a hybridization (some say abomination) of Conjury and Thaumaturgy. It combines Earth Magic and Spirit Magic to do vile and unspeakable things, such as animate the dead, control and converse with undead creatures and even occasionally do what only priests can do, bring the dead back to life (this is only done rarely, since it usually is contradictory to the nature of the Necromancer, unless he/she intends to try and enslave the one brought back).





Chapter 25


"I wish it didn't have to be you," Jehenna said to Lenamare as they finished supervising the loading of her wagon.

"So do I, but as we've already discussed, no one here is competent enough to do what needs to be done. Only I possess the skill and the willpower necessary to cast and maintain the powerful illusions needed to fool Exador into thinking that we're all still here. Not to mention, only I have the speed to activate the self-destruct spells and still teleport away to an unknown location. You are wearing the finder ring," Lenamare stated archly, rather than asking.

"Of course, right here on my left hand, " she said holding up the indicated hand.

"Good, with that I'll be able to home in on you exactly, wherever you are, and can so join you when my task is done." Jehenna simply smiled and nodded in acquiescence. "You also have the type four's ring?" She held up her right hand. "Good. Now, most importantly the book?"

With that Jehenna turned slightly and picked up a small leather bound gold embossed book from the small wooden table beside her. "Here, of course," she said smiling deviously. "I shall place it directly under my seat in the wagon, where absolutely nothing can happen to it."

"Good. If we lose that, we might as well hand over our necks to Exador and his minions. Is everything else about ready?"

Jehenna looked around the huge underground cavern where the escape wagons were being loaded and the mounted men were lining up in formation. She then looked down the primary escape tunnel where the lead wagons and horses were already lined up and ready to go, waiting at the edge of the wards. "Give us about another twenty minutes for the last of the wagons to get loaded, before you adjust the wards, then I'll give the order to begin the pull out, and you can send the last of the soldier down the tunnel as you get your illusions in place." She looked at Lenamare for agreement.

"Very well, naturally all my things are prepared and in that wagon,” he pointed to the wagon right behind Jehenna's. “It of course goes without saying that my illusions are ready any time that you are. So if there is nothing else, I shall go up to the courtyard and await your signal?"

"Excellent, my lord, and then we meet tomorrow night..." Jehenna trailed off with an invitational smile.

"Oh yes, " replied Lenamare with an answering smile. With that he turned and slowly made his way back up the sloping passageway that led to the main stables. As he left, Jehenna returned to inspecting the work of the packers. Satisfied that everything was correct on her wagon, she took the book, quickly weaving a Spell of Unnoticing around her wagon. She then placed the book beneath the driver seat, no one the wiser.

Dispelling the glamour a few feet away from her wagon, Jehenna noticed the senior student Jenn passing by. "Jenn, " she called. The girl halted and turned to face her. She nodded respectfully, but Jehenna did detect a slight bit of trepidation in her eyes and movement; good, she thought. "You, my dear, have been selected to ride in my wagon with me."

A look of surprise quickly crossed the girls face, but then she quickly replied, "Thank you ma'am, I'm grateful for your consideration."

"Think nothing of it, in times like these, we women must stick together." Jehenna replied confidently and with a slight air of condescension.

~

Right, thought Jenn with a small amount of despair. The bitch didn't care anything for female camaraderie, she just wants someone who is in her party, aside from her that knows healing spells in case of trouble. Lucky me. As Jehenna turned back to her business, Jenn took her few possessions, which she was carrying and placed them into Jehenna's already crowded wagon. The woman seemed to literally be taking everything she owned, furniture and all. She found a place for her clothes satchel under a small night stand, and her bag of herbs she placed in a basket near the seat. Her diary however, presented a problem, there didn't seem to be any more secure places to put it. Carefully she rearranged a few things, and finally found an opening that revealed some extra storage space under the front bench. Bending the little leather book slightly she squeezed it into place underneath the seat, and then replaced the few things she'd moved.

Next she went looking for the kids; Sidney, Rupert, Gloria and Chass had been assigned to Jehenna's team. Jenn had been going to sit with them and keep them company, but now it seemed they'd just have to be content with Master Trisfelt. Actually, they should be safe with him, the pudgy master always looked out for the students. In fact, it was odd that their group should have two masters, one of the other groups had Master Elrose, and the rest only had senior students. Master Hortwell had not yet returned, and for some unknown reason Lenamare and Jehenna had insisted on having another master in this group. Which was somewhat surprising, since while not quite as egotistical as Lenamare, Jehenna was not exactly modest when it came to extolling her own powers.

She found the children in the third wagon back from hers, Master Trisfelt had just loaded them and was scurrying off on some last minute detail. Gloria and Chass seemed to be a bit frightened. Sidney was professionally rearranging things in the wagon for his own convenience and Rupert was staring around with his intent little stare. As she approached, Rupert's eyes fixed on her.

"Does Mistress Jehenna have the binding ring for the big demon?" he asked her.

What a strange question, thought Jenn with surprise as she came up to the edge of the wagon. "I don't know, I'd assume either she or Lenamare, and Lenamare wouldn't bother to use it, so probably. But why do you ask? If you’re afraid she might call on it and let it get out of hand, don't worry," said Jenn, trying to calm her own fears on that matter as well as the boy's. "Jehenna is a first class wizard, she could control it without the ring, and with it, there can be no problems. Plus both Master Trisfelt and I will be here to help her."

"Afraid? of it?" Rupert actually looked a bit puzzled, "no, I was just hoping I might get to see it up close sometime, that's all." Rupert actually seemed to cheer up at her news.

Good Goddess, thought Jenn, what a twisted little kid, probably wants to specialize in demonology. She smiled though, twisted or not, at least the child was holding up well under the pressure of the situation.

Seeing her hesitant smile, Rupert quickly added, "Besides, if we're pursued, we want to have all the help we can get."

Holding up extremely well, thought Jenn. "Well, you're certainly right about that. How are the rest of you doing?" Jenn asked as she turned her attention to the other three kids.

"This is going to be a miserable trip, this wagon is extremely uncomfortable. I don't like it," stated Sidney. Gloria simply sniffled.

"Well, sitting in an uncomfortable wagon is better than sitting on one of Exador's swords," quipped Rupert, more sprightly than his usual want. Jenn gave him a disapproving stare as Chass gasped and clasped himself even tighter. "Now don't worry, its only for a week and then we'll reach Freehold. You can put up with it for a little while, can't you?"

"I suppose," Sydney said, looking sourly at Rupert, who was almost acting joyful for once. At this point Master Trisfelt returned from his mission carrying a large sack over his shoulder.

"And what have we here?" inquired Jenn of Master Trisfelt playfully, knowing very well what he had.

"Ah my dear, lesson number three hundred and seventy six--never enter the wilderness without proper provisioning. There were a few sweets left over from dinner last night, and I thought the children might enjoy them." He smiled graciously down at the children, all of whose ears had perked up at the mention of sweets.

"And perhaps a bit of refreshment for their protector also?" she asked mock archly of him.

"Well, my dear girl, one can hardly expect a man of my accomplishments to ride in this wagon with young students, without fair compensation," Trisfelt said jovially as he patted a large wineskin hanging by a rope over his shoulder.

"I suppose, we must make some allowances," conceded Jenn with assumed despair. "Very well then, I'm afraid I must make my way back to my wagon. I'm riding with the Lady herself."

Trisfelt's smile abruptly turned to a mock frown of concern, "Oh my, then I'm afraid you may need this skin more than I, if you are to survive this trip." Jenn laughed at this, and waving turned and made her way back to Jehenna's wagon, feeling better than she had in days.

As she reached her wagon, she found Jehenna seated and ready to go. "I trust you are finally ready?"

"Yes, ma'am, just checking on the children." Suddenly Jenn felt the change in the air around her, the wards had been shifted to allow them to leave the castle.

"Very well then, get up here." Jehenna pointed to the seat beside her, the driver's seat. Naturally someone of Jehenna's position could not be seen driving a wagon. "I shall give the signal." Quickly, she sketched a symbol in the air, murmured a few words, and blew gently through her lips. Trumpets seemed to blare throughout the cavern. Reverberating to the beginning of the line and up the tunnel to the courtyard where Lenamare stood ready to cast illusions of a replacement garrison, changing posts with the current guards.

Slowly at first, the lead wagons began to move up the escape tunnel. The long train of wagons and horses moved slowly at first gathering some speed as the line was allowed to spread out a little. As the main escape tunnel went on, branchings occurred every so often. These were different routes out of the castle. As the column moved along, different groups would split off and go up individual tunnels according to a well-orchestrated plan devised by Lenamare many years ago. Lenamare prided himself on providing for every possible contingency. His escape tunnels, dug secretly by his own demons who had been sworn never to reveal their existence to anyone, went for miles underground, each going to a well-placed strategic escape location. As a further precaution he had wisely planted explosive spells to seal the tunnels and destroy the castle from this end, to prevent pursuit through the tunnels. Their very lives and their escape was all to be due to Lenamare's incredible genius, as he had informed everyone at a meeting the other night to outline the evacuation.

It had been only two days since the major attempt on the shields. The wards were beginning to weaken fast without the proper support, so in that short time Lenamare directed the preparation for the escape of his people. Unselfishly, he Lenamare, would stay behind to hold Exador at bay and seal the tunnel behind the escapees. If necessary, as was very likely, he informed them, he would give up his own life for his people.

Actually anyone that really knew Lenamare, such as the masters and the senior students, as well as the Captain of the Guard, knew he was not completely forthcoming. They knew full well he wouldn't be doing this if he didn't feel he could get out looking like a hero, with very little risk to himself. However, out of respect for, and perhaps, fear of, their Head Master, no one said anything

The long tunnel wound its way through granite, and occasionally man, or rather, demon-made brick walled areas. Eventually the tunnel that Jehenna's group would take came. So without further ado, her wagon set off down their tunnel. Two guards on horses going ahead; behind her wagon trailed Lenamare's wagon, then a wagon loaded with food for her group, then Master Trisfelt and the four children, followed by two wagon loads of peasants and another food wagon. Riding along beside and interspersed with the wagons were mounted guards. In total they had ten soldiers, including the two leading the way. Jehenna really hadn't wanted to take the peasants in her group, but there had been no graceful way to back out of taking them, and still preserve Lenamare's selfless image.

To Jenn it seemed as if they'd traveled an entire day underground with only the torches held by the guards and her and Master Trisfelt's Mage Light lighting the way. Eventually however, Jenn thought she could perceive some light that they weren't making themselves ahead.. Sure enough, within a few moments they reached a large granite doorway where a torch had been lit by an advance scout who had gone ahead to ensure the route was clear. The doorway was about twelve feet high and fifteen feet wide. There were double doors apparently made out of stone and placed at a sloping angle, so that the top was closer to Jenn than the bottom.

The scout turned from the spy hole in the giant doors and nodded to Jehenna that all was ready. Slowly Jehenna traced a pattern in the air in front of the doors and chanted "Omiestes, Crim faltos, sig viernon et sofos...Open Sesame!"

"Open Sesame?" Jenn asked as Jehenna finished to spell.

"Don't ask me. Some silly code word Lenamare uses on these doors. I guess he got it from some demon one time. I really have no idea, nor do I care."

With that there was nothing much more Jenn could say, and by this time the giant doors were raising upwards and outwards. Daylight came flooding into the tunnel, temporarily blinding everyone. Cautiously the mounted guards moved outside to inspect the vicinity of the doorway. After looking around for a few moments they motioned for the wagons to come forward.

As the wagons rolled out into the sunlight, Jenn glanced at the position of the sun. It was three quarters of the way across the sky. That meant they'd been in the tunnel for only about four hours. Goddess, how it had seemed longer. Nevertheless, here they were. They were in a thin area of the same forest she'd found the soldier in, only about a two and a half hours ride from the that spot. According to the map she'd seen yesterday it was now only a six hour journey to the mountain pass that would take them eventually to Freehold. As it was, they had a journey of about ten days through the mountains ahead of them. A lot of riding, but as Rupert had said, better than Exador.

~

Back in the keep, Lenamare began to relax a little. He'd shifted the wards back to their normal balance, and Exador hadn't noticed anything. As was to be expected, his incredibly believable illusions of soldiers manning the wall completely fooled the army outside. It had been a long two days, he needed a little relaxation. He sat back in the padded chair in his office and poured himself a glass of wine. The illusions needed only the barest fraction of his mighty intellect to maintain, and the wards were completely on automatic.

The wards had been the hardest part of the last two days. Trying to design and build the mechanism that would allow Lenamare to adjust and maintain the wards all by himself. With the masters and students who constructed it gone, only Lenamare's ingenious device in the warding chamber kept it going. True it would only be able to support the wards for about thirty six hours without the people who constructed it; however, that should be more than sufficient time to give his people a head start. True when he discovered the deception, Exador probably would track the people. He'd probably even manage to find a good number of them.

That, however, was unimportant, what was important was that it would appear to the Council that Lenamare had tried his best to save his entrusted vassals. The only other thing that mattered was that Jehenna get away with the book, so they could rendezvous later. Actually, only that last was truly crucial to his plans. In any event, a day of peace and quiet would be nice for a change, no inferiors to bother him, and Exador firmly entrenched outside with no way in. Ah, the joy, he thought as he slowly spun around in his chair.





Chapter 26


Tom opened his eyes at the sound of the commotion coming from the tunnel leading into his cave. He hadn't been asleep, he didn't seem to need it unless he expended a large amount of energy. After the battle with the demons, he'd felt rather tired, but not enough to really need sleep. So he'd just rested for a few hours in his stone chair, waiting for another call. Surprisingly, it hadn't come.

He'd gone a few days at least, by his reckoning since the demon battle, it was hard to tell when there were no nights, and one didn't sleep; but still no calls. With this free time he had amused himself by carving himself a table out of stone that could sit in front of his throne, like a desk, if he so desired. Naturally, the table literally weighed a ton, but with his strength it was no problem to move it around as if it were a folding table.

At the moment, he'd just been relaxing with his feet up on the table, leaning back in his chair--it had, incidentally, taken quite a bit of work to get his new body in a position like this which was actually comfortable. As he began to pay more attention to the noise, it sounded like a small party coming down the corridor. Sure enough, Boggy and Tizzy were coming out of the tunnel even as he thought this. They were laughing and carrying on, and each had what appeared to be a wine glass in their hands. Tizzy also was carrying a bottle of wine in his lower left hand. As they walked in, they saw Tom staring at them. "Hey Tom, old boy...congratulate friend Boggy here!" Tizzy shouted joyfully.

Tom smiled, as best he could with his snout, at their jubilation and asked "What's the occasion?"

"HE screwed up, so I got mine, that's what!" Boggy shouted, a trifle drunkenly.

"He killed his accursed master! That's what!" shouted Tizzy.

"You what?" asked Tom, shocked into sitting up straight in his chair.

"Actually, I redistributed his body parts," answered Boggy.

"True, oh, true," laughed Tizzy.

"Yes, you see, he was always so uppity and all, but concerned about his family and their future well being...he even had this will and all in a lock box at a bank, in order to take care of his bratty grown kids."

"Who are obnoxious merchant types now," interjected Tizzy.

"Yes, well anyway, to make sure that the future generations were well provided for, I took the liberty of ensuring that the family jewels were placed in the lock box also."

"The family jewels..." Tom said, at first not understanding, but then grimacing in sympathetic pain, when he realized what Boggy meant.

"’Course, I do have to admit, he was a bit upset when I took them. Screamed most horrendously at me. It was then, of course, that I realized how much his wife would miss that screaming of his after I killed him, so I took his tongue and gave it to her. Unfortunately, she was busy at the time so I just had to leave it...in the stew. Naturally, by this time, he was a little bit mad at me and just hung there by his toenails glaring at me. This, of course, kind of discomforted me to see him leering so. Thus I plucked out his right eye and ate it, while his left eye watched. The worst part was that I hadn't thought, and had ripped his tongue out too soon, so all he could do was gurgle at me."

"Enough, please!" Tom was getting sick to his stomach.

Boggy didn't seem to hear, obviously relishing his recounting of his triumph. "I have to admit, by the time I'd plucked all the hair from his body and pulled his fingers and toes off, I was getting a bit bored. So, apparently, was he, he started to nod off from time to time. He probably thought that I'd think he was passing out from pain; but I knew, he was just bored and falling asleep. So naturally I clubbed him over the head a couple times with his right arm. I would have used a leg, since it makes a much better club, but by this point the legs were broken in so many places that they were just too limp to use effectively as clubs. After all the beating I had to do to get him awake again, I realized he really didn't have the heart for this sort of thing...so I ripped his out.

"Well by now I was about to leave, when who should enter, but the old man's fat pig son, who was a truly avaricious banker. Strangely, he seemed to be a bit shocked by the state his father was in. It was then when I remembered the conscientious and stingy nature of the master, in always wanting to keep everything in the family. So thinking quick, I grabbed the son and sat him down. I then, of course, proceeded to make amends by serving him dinner. The main course being the remains of his father. Admittedly, he was a bit hesitant at eating this delectable meal...but when I pointed out that if he didn't eat everything on his plate...he might grow up to be just like his father...in about two minutes...he readily cleaned his plate."

At this point Tom was in the corner puking his lunch out . . which, since he hadn't eaten anything in the last week or so, shouldn't have been much; however, from who knows where he was able to vomit some truly obnoxious green and orange bile. Finally, Tom's puking seemed to come to Boggy's notice and he shut up and went over to where Tom was heaving. "What's the matter, my boy?" asked Boggy, concerned.

"How could you do such a thing?" Tom asked in disbelief.

"Well, I may not be as strong as you...but I'm still pretty damn strong, It really is no problem to rip a human apart, they are really quite fragile," answered Boggy in his apparently inebriated state.

"No, no you fool. The boy means, why would you do such a thing," corrected Tizzy.

"Oh," Boggy responded, understanding now. "Why, for the best reason of all ...REVENGE! I had served that S.O.B for eighty years and his master before him for ninety two. Not to mention his master's father for seventy six years. Not once in all that time did I ever get a single thank you! All I ever got was abuse. Never could I seem to please any of those jackasses, all I could do was screw up...and then they'd punish me. During that period of two hundred and forty eight years, four months, two weeks, five days, thirteen hours, twenty seven minutes and four point oh-one-three-four-nine seconds, I received two hundred and seven Dalton's Demon Darts, three hundred and fifty two Wargol's Wracking Wrenches, one hundred and thirty six Sargum's Soul Slicer's, four hundred and seventy Spirit Wracks, three hundred and thirteen Davalon's Degradations, as well as six hundred and forty nine miscellaneous tortures. Each of which hurt me as much as anything I did to him today.

"Now, you tell me if he didn't deserve everything he got and more!" Boggy exclaimed passionately.

"I don't know...maybe...it's just so horrible all the things you did to him," Tom complained.

"Oh, and the tortures he put me through, were any better...let me tell you, some of those things were visual and physical as well as spiritual. Believe me, anything he got...HE DESERVED!

"However," Boggy finally said, calming down to normal level. "I understand how you feel. You are new, I suppose I would have felt just like you, when I was new. It's just after so many centuries of pain and suffering, you just have to say...enough is enough. Thus when you get the chance to stop it for a while...you take it. And although from a human point of view, maybe this vengeance is petty and morally wrong, regardless of what they did to me. But nonetheless, it felt good. And I really don't care what anyone else says, they haven't been in my position, so they can't know that they wouldn't act the exact same way in the same situation."

"I guess, I'm sorry...it just...I don't know..."

"I do though...you just feel rather squeamish about the whole thing."

"Yeah, well I mean I used to get a thrill out of watching that sort of thing in horror and slasher-type movies, but now, your describing that sort of thing seems worse."

"That's because it's real. Even though you didn't have to see it happen, this time you know it was real and not just theatrics. Look, it’s not like I enjoy going around and doing this sort of thing, I don't. Except in certain well deserving cases, like this one. Actually it's the first time I've ever done this. The first time I killed my master, I just beat him over the head with an ax and left him."

"I guess I'm really not much better; after all, I killed that soldier in the woods, the dragon, the third order demon on the field and lightning bolted another demon. It's just that then it was a fight, I don't think I could kill someone in cold blood."

"Well, my lad, that may be, and that's probably for the best. Remember this however; if you ever want your freedom, nine times out of ten you'll have to kill all those Astlanians who know your name. Very seldom do they die on their own, at least not without passing on your slavery to some other master."

"Is that the way it always is?"

"Pretty much...oh, according to legend there might be other ways, but I've never actually heard of any."

"OOPS!" interrupted Tizzy. "My doorbells ringing! Gotta go!" and with that the octopodal demon faded out.

"Scum!" shouted Boggy. "You took the wine!"

~

The small shelter was finally complete, it had taken him some time to get it built, he wasn't used to doing such things. Although building the little shelter had been easier than trying to bandage his master. Demon claws just weren't made for working gently with human flesh. He'd gone slow, trying to be careful, every now and then stopping to inspect his patient everywhere to make sure he hadn't accidentally caused more harm.

It had been centuries since he'd done first aid, but he still remembered most of it. His main concern now was why Hortwell hadn't come to. It had been a couple of days, long enough for Zargoffelstan to build a small hut of stone, and log ceiling, sealed with tar brought from a swamp, not too far away as a demon flies, the old man should have come to. The cut was bad, but he didn't think it that bad. Hopefully there wasn't any internal damage he'd missed. All he could do for now was just wait by his master's side.





Chapter 27


The sun was setting over the mountains, Jenn shifted her position a little to bring relief to her sore posterior; they'd been riding all afternoon now. Thank the Goddess that they hadn't encountered anyone on the way. The going had been slow through the forest, trying to wind between trees with the cart. Luckily that part of the forest was fairly thin, otherwise they never would have gotten carts through. Jenn suspected, of course, that Lenamare would at least take credit for their easy trip though, if he were here he'd probably be telling everyone about his wise forethought in periodically thinning the forest for just such an emergency. It really wouldn't have mattered if he actually had or not, since either way, he would probably take credit for it.

About an hour ago they had reached the edge of the forest and after a brief reconnaissance by the soldiers they were on their way across the plain, rising towards the mountain pass. Jehenna was periodically ordering soldiers to speed everyone up, she wanted to reach the base of the pass before nightfall. Other than that she didn't do much except look annoyed and preoccupied. She'd refused to allow any cloaking spells on the grounds that Exador might have wizards or demons out looking for traces of magic. Thus it was that everyone was continually on the lookout for patrol parties, albeit unlikely any should be so far from the siege.

Jenn simply drove on, her hands were getting chapped from the reins of the two horses pulling Jehenna's overloaded wagon, and her rear end was feeling worn thin. Whenever Jehenna had ordered a turn to go around something or other, Jenn had tried to get a look back to see how the children were doing two wagons back. However, she was never able to get a really good glimpse, they were apparently just laying low. When they'd stopped about three hours ago at a stream to water the horses and to let everyone take care of personal functions, she'd gone back to check on them.

Chass and Gloria seemed to have lost some of their fear, and were willing to get up and move around when the wagon stopped, Sydney had just complained about the rough ride and how he was getting splinters everywhere. Rupert, as usual, was looking intently about him, apparently searching for any sign of pursuit, and not very happy with the stop. She hadn't questioned him, just smiled and patted him on the head, to which he gave the expected shrug of annoyance for a boy his age. She imagined that nothing much had changed since then except that Sydney's temper had probably gotten worse. Master Trisfelt had been jovial as usual. When she'd complained to him about her sore seat he'd just laughed and explained that it was precisely for such occasions as this that he maintained such a well-padded one.

As the wagons climbed higher toward the pass, the terrain gradually became more and more rugged, larger boulders began appearing and the grass was getting thinner and longer. Trees were becoming scarcer, and when found, were mainly scrub trees. The brown soil here was fairly dry and dusty, this side of the mountain was shielded by the mountains, and not many storms made it this far up towards the mountains from the giant valley in which Hartwell and Lenamare's Tower were located.

It was decidedly getting dark by now, they wouldn't be able to go too much further, not without using light spells, and considering Jehenna's objection to glamours and hiding spells, Jenn doubted she'd want to use any light spells that would make them detectable to magic sensing beings, not to mention anyone or thing with eyes. A soldier pulled his horse alongside Jehenna's side of the wagon.

"Ma'am, are you about ready to set up camp for the night? Pretty soon it will be too dark to see to collect fire wood or set things up properly."

"Sergeant," Jehenna replied, "I realize that, but this party is under my command. We will stop when and where I give the word and not until then. Is that understood?"

Appearing slightly annoyed, but not at all surprised, the man acquiesced, "Very well, ma'am." He then fell back to join his men, who appeared as annoyed as he. Jenn couldn't blame them at all. They really needed to stop soon to set up camp, and she desperately wanted to stretch her legs and end this riding. It was, however, completely expected of Jehenna to act this way. Give the bitch a finger's length of power and she'd stretch it to a day's journey. Well, at least, thought Jenn, they'd eventually have to stop when the horses, who wouldn’t be seeing that well in the dark, pulled a wagon off a cliff. That would serve her right.

Finally, after about another quarter of an hour, when the western sky was only a lighter shade of black than the rest of the sky, Jehenna called a halt to the procession. As she called the halt, there was almost a collective sigh of relief and suddenly people began speaking, where they had been silent for about the last hour or so of the journey. The thought of stopping and resting was a relief for everyone.

As she halted the horses, Jenn gratefully stretched out her legs while still sitting on the seat. She swore she'd begun to think the madwoman would never halt the party. As she slowly climbed down from her wagon seat, she heard Sydney and Chass groaning to Master Trisfelt about his pronouncement that they should search around for kindling and fire wood to build a campfire or two with. She simply smiled to herself, wishing she could get away so easily. Slowly, working out her stiff joints, she began to unharness the horses and rub them down.

~

Jehenna stepped off the wagon and began looking around for a good spot for her tent. She had no intention of sleeping outdoors under the stars when she could at least have the comfort of her plush tent. Thinking quickly, she confiscated two of the soldiers, before they could think of something else to do instead of setting up her tent, and relegated them to the task.

~

"Rupert," Master Trisfelt called to the boy, before he got too far away gathering fire wood, "let the others search for wood, you shall help me take care of our horses."

It was hard to tell in the dark, but Trisfelt could have sworn a look of fear crossed the boy’s face at this. Nonsense of course, all young boys were fascinated by horses, and any lad Rupert's age would be delighted to be assigned such an important adult task, rather than having to gather wood.

"Uhm, sir...if you ah, don't mind, I'll just help Sydney and Chass, I'm really not very good with horses. I...I've never done that before."

"Exactly!" proclaimed Master Trisfelt, "That's why I want you to help; you were so helpful on the day's journey, I thought you deserved a better task then just gathering kindling. It will be an excellent opportunity to learn. Everyone should know how, and this is your best opportunity to learn. Come along boy, over here now."

Rupert seemed to have the look of a trapped rabbit on his face, it was fairly obvious he didn't want to do it, but Master Trisfelt couldn't see why that should be. "Please sir, Master Trisfelt...I, uhm," mumbled Rupert as he slowly inched forward toward Trisfelt and the horses.

"Now enough of this, boy." Trisfelt proclaimed, beginning to get a little annoyed at the boy's reticence. "Get over here."

Rupert reluctantly came forward, staring at the horses. "Now lad, there is nothing at all to be afraid of," said Trisfelt as the boy came next to him. "Here's a good lad, just give ole Chestnut a pat here on the neck, for a start. Let him get to know you." Rupert grudgingly raised his hand toward the horses neck, all the while gazing fearfully at the horse's face. Chestnut, sensing the activity at his side, turned his head around to face Trisfelt and Rupert, just as Rupert's hand began to touch the horse's neck.

Without any warning, as the horse's head swung around, and the boy gently touched its neck, the horse reared up neighing and screaming . The beast's eyes rolled in its head in fright as it reared on its hind legs and tried to dance away from Trisfelt and Rupert. Unfortunately it was still harnessed to the wagon and the other horse.

Rupert, scared, fell back on the ground; Trisfelt stepped back in surprise. The rearing horse, tangled itself in the harness and rammed into its partner. The other horse, suitably annoyed began trying to bite at Chestnut. Chestnut didn't seem to mind though, all it seemed to want was to get away; it just kept shoving into the other horse. The wagon bounced around, knocking some of the items carried within out onto the ground. Rupert, scurried away, with his back to the ground and all four hands and feet scrambling to make him move and avoid Chestnut's flying hooves.

Eventually, the wagon which had been bouncing up and down, was overturned as the second horse gave ground, allowing Chestnut to move over. Thus the wagon was pulled sideways, and levered over on its left wheels. The wagon hit the ground with a loud bang, its momentum, and the twisting of the harness and guide poles, caused the second horse to stumble to the ground, where the fleeing Chestnut tried to get over it. By this point the screaming of the two horses and the commotion was beginning to get to the other horses as well, making them nervous.

Quickly Jenn came running from her wagon. "Astriol sed makos, Centaurio sid falcom, destrius nericum. Lo riestum sedion falcomon," she chanted as she stroked a lock of horse hair that she carried in her hands, "Creatoris nos feltom, sin sarconum." The two horses rapidly began to calm, Chestnut moved enough that Bitterwhite, the second horse, was able to get up. Jenn came slowly and quietly up between the two nervous horses and tucking the horse hair she carried into her belt, she quickly began to stroke and calm the horses, muttering more words of peace into their ears. The horses stood still, simply shaking in their fright, sweating and rocking slightly, but calming down nonetheless.

Shortly, the two horses were calm enough for Jenn to leave them to Master Trisfelt. "And what did you do that for, you stupid girl?" Jehenna almost shouted behind her as she finished.

"Do what?" Jenn asked in annoyance as she turned to face Jehenna.

"Use magic, now everyone in the multiverse probably knows where we are! What an idiot! Didn't I tell everyone not to use magic, lest we be detected?" Jehenna ranted.

Calm, from her own magic, but coldly, Jenn replied, "You said not to use glamours or hiding spells, or any major detectable magic. What I did was nothing but a minor enchantment, simply a relaxation and calming spell. Hardly detectable for its output of power, it won't call anyone's attention. Not that screaming horses don't cause all sorts of more mundane individuals to take notice.

“I simply felt that between the damage that the horses were doing, the danger to the people nearby and the risk of having the horses cry out our position to everyone in a one mile radius, that it would be most expedient to do the spell."

"Well you felt wrong...I gave an order and I expect my orders to be obeyed. Regardless of what you feel. I know what is best for this group, and I will decide what is expedient and what isn't." Jehenna retorted, but this time a little less vehemently, since she really couldn't argue Jenn's reasoning, except that it violated her own order. "If you do anything like this again, girl, there will be severe consequences for you." With that, Jehenna stormed off to where her tent was being set up. Jenn simply stared after her.

"Well, if it makes you feel any better, I agree with your decision," said Master Trisfelt behind her. "Actually, if I'd been thinking," he went on, as he laid a hand on her shoulder, "I would have done the same. Unfortunately, I was so taken aback by the horses reaction, that..."

"I know..." Jenn said as she turned to face Master Trisfelt. "What caused it?"

"Abyssal Appoxia if I know, I was simply trying to show the lad," he pointed over toward Rupert, who was huddled on the ground about twenty feet away, "how to care for a horse. When the horse suddenly spooked. Never seen a thing like it. The lad just went to touch it, and it went wild."

"Well, maybe tomorrow we'd better put Chestnut on another wagon, so he won't be so close to Rupert and spook again."

"Good idea," agreed Master Trisfelt. As Jenn went back to her own horses, Master Trisfelt looked over to where to boy huddled, and shook his head slightly. Well at least the kid had a good reason to fear horses, the question was why? Whatever the reason, Trisfelt wouldn't pressure the boy into helping with the horses again, for a while, at least.

~

On the ground, Rupert just sat and shook as he watched Master Trisfelt take care of the now horses. His tear stained eyes just looked on in humiliation and shame. He had known what was going to happen as soon as Master Trisfelt had ordered him to help, it had happened before, several times. Why hadn't Master Trisfelt listened? Now everyone in the caravan had seen what happened; not even horses liked him, soon they'd all know or suspect. Why? Why me, goddess? Why always me? thought Rupert, It's just not fair.





Chapter 28


The golden rays of the morning sun had not yet struck the scrub land on which they camped, when Jehenna stepped from her tent. She looked around her in grim satisfaction to see her people almost loaded. All that remained was for the soldiers to pack her tent and for everyone to get the cooking gear cleaned up and stowed. She saw one of the two soldiers who had set up her magnificent red satin and gold trimmed tent, and motioned him to come and begin taking it down. He came reluctantly, motioning for another of his friends to come help him.

As they passed her on the way toward her tent, Jehenna looked towards the school. She could still sense the powerful wards, even at this distance; after all, she had been their center focus. They were still going, which meant that Lenamare still had Exador's men fooled. Good, with luck, by the end of the week, she and Lenamare would be in Freehold with the book, and ready to pursue vengeance against Exador.

~

Jenn finished hooking Chestnut and Drecilla to her and Jehenna's wagon. As she'd suggested last night, she and Trisfelt had switched horses, she'd given him Timber Leaf and taken Chestnut. Actually, she knew Chestnut, had even ridden him a couple of times when she'd first arrived at the school. She'd always loved horses, and riding had been one of her few pleasures at an otherwise unpleasant school, at least until she'd come to know Rex and Alvea. She'd eventually gotten so busy with her studies and doing things with Rex and Alvea that she'd only rode sporadically, but still she enjoyed it.

All of which made it seem even more strange, Chestnut was one of the gentlest horses she'd ever met, and he was certainly no fiery young stallion anymore, which was why he was reduced to pulling this wagon on the trip. Not that he wasn't still a fine horse, but only the fastest horses were ridden, all the others were drafted for pulling the wagons. In fact, the whole incident had so shook her that she'd even forgot to take her diary out to record the day's events, not that there had been any light to write by, but she did have a small candle she could have used. Jehenna would have had a heart attack if she'd used Mage Light. Anyway, whatever the reason for the horse’s behavior, further inquiry would best wait until they got to Freehold.

~

Rupert finished scouring the kettle with the cleaning sand, and stood up. He walked to the back of the wagon and morosely hung it on its peg. The other kids were already in, so he just put his foot on wooden end rail and climbed in. None of the others said anything to him, they had heard from the adults’ conversations what had happened, and they apparently couldn't think of anything to say. Which was fine with Rupert, he really didn't feel like talking about it to anyone, he didn't want to have to answer any questions. Thankfully, the only things anyone had said to him since the event were all work related. No one said anything, but he knew they were puzzled.

At this point Master Trisfelt climbed aboard the driver's seat. Grabbing the reins, he looked back and said, "Are we all in?" Sydney and Chass simply nodded, Gloria murmured "yes sir," and Rupert just stared ahead, unwilling to meet Master Trisfelt's gaze. His eyes were still red, he couldn't help it, he'd cried some more last night before falling asleep; he really just didn't want anyone to notice. Taking the quiet responses affirmatively, the hefty wizard turned around on his seat and made a clicking noise and gave the horses the signal to begin following the wagon ahead.

The wagon train rolled out in the same order as the day before. They had camped just below the entrance to the first pass, so it only took about fifteen minutes before they hit the trail that would take them through the mountains. As they went on, the trail climbed higher and higher along the side of the first mountain. The trail was on the south side of a mountain, and to the left the ground quickly dropped away to a narrow valley between mountains.

Rupert and the other children sat very still in the wagon. They had looked over the edge of the wagon once, and seen how narrow of a trail they were following. They quickly decided not to move lest they throw the wagon off balance; even though Master Trisfelt had assured them that the trail was perfectly safe, and that there was no danger as long as they didn't start a wrestling match going. The trail continued onward occasionally crossing small streams, or descending long grades to the bottom of a valley, only to climb again, up and around the next mountain.

At lunch time, they stopped along a slightly wider area to eat. The trail was still narrow enough that the wagons had to remain single file, but wide enough that people could walk alongside the wagons. Master Trisfelt climbed in the back of the wagon and began rummaging to find some meat and cheese for their lunch.

"Mind if I join you," came a voice from the rear of the wagon. Rupert looked up to see Jenn's smiling face peering at them from around the corner.

"Oh, I don't know if we'll have enough..." said Master Trisfelt, who had just produced a giant haunch of roasted beef from a sack along with a five pound wheel of cheese. "After all, we do have these growing boys to think of!"

"Don't you mean your growing belly, to think of?" inquired Jenn with a sweet smile.

"Ahem," Master Trisfelt said with mock dignity, "surely you jest, ma'am, certainly you can see that we have children here, who are on the brink of starvation."

"Uh huh, oh yeah, I can see that clearly." Jenn climbed up into the back of the wagon, "however, I do bring fair recompense for your hospitality."

"Oh truly?" inquired Master Trisfelt, his curiosity peaked.

"Yes, this." Jenn produce a bottle of wine from behind her back and handed it to the wizard.

"Hmmm, Scorzio wine, and a remarkable year at that. How did you get it?"

"Why, I'm sure it is simply payment from my lady for driving her wagon."

"You stole it? My dear," he said with a broad smile, "you're finely coming around."

"Hardly--actually, I brought it myself, the night before we left, I tried practicing with Fermi's Fermentation Spell. I fear, it simply happens that the bottle was an empty one I found while helping pack my lady's belongings."

"Hmmm," replied Master Trisfelt, crestfallen. "Fermentation spell eh? Well, maybe...have you tried it? I mean those things more often make vinegar than wine. Especially, when not performed by a Master such as myself..." he said while waving his nose haughtily in the air. All the children laughed at his imitation of Lenamare, even Rupert smiled.

"I leave that honor to you, as my glorious instructor...it is your duty to test my work."

"As most assuredly I shall," and with that Trisfelt pulled off the cork, snapped his fingers to conjure a wine goblet, actually it had been up his sleeve, and poured. Sniffing the wine, as a true connoisseur, he rolled his eyes slightly, and with a slight grin took a sip. Rolling it around in his mouth he appeared to think for a moment, "Aaah," was all he said as he swallowed. He took another, larger drink, smiled and looked towards the sky. Once again he sighed after swallowing, and then pretended to notice Jenn sitting there watching him.

Quickly, he shook his head, and gave her a formal look, "Ahem, I suppose it is passable...you'll have to do better next time though. Naturally, of course, I shall judge that one also." The children giggled.

"Oh really. I think you liked it." Jenn accused the wizard.

"Actually, Jenn, damn good. It tastes like the real thing." Admitted Master Trisfelt with a pleased look, "you really are remarkable when it comes to these spells...I must admit, this wine is as good or possibly--and I remind you only, possibly--better than I could have done myself."

Jenn smiled, "thank you, you're too sweet."

"Aaah, I know. However, now on to lunch, shall we?"

Lunch was finished in short order, and all parties managed to take care of personal business, so they were soon on their way again. The sky overhead was a brilliant purplish blue, not a cloud in the sky. Truly a lovely day, rejoiced Jenn as they rode along.

About an hour after lunch they road down to the bottom of a slightly wider valley than they had yet seen in the mountains. This one actually had moderately gentle sloping sides and even grass at the bottom. The hill sides were strewn with large boulders, everywhere. The basin, however, was easily wide enough for three wagons abreast. As the wagon train spread slightly out into the valley, Jenn suddenly felt a fluctuation in the air that signaled strong magic.

As she whipped her head up in the air, automatically thinking up counter spells in her mind, Jehenna stood up and raised her arms. From her lips spilled hasty words of warding, the air around their wagon shimmered, and just in time. For not six seconds after she felt the first twinges, their wagon was engulfed in a roaring ball of fire. Jenn could see nothing but flames all around her. Fortunately, nothing in their wagon was damaged because Jehenna had got the fire shield up fast enough. It didn't take long; the flames were quickly gone. Without taking time to think, Jenn did what she'd been instructed early on to do in a battle of wizardry. She reached out her mind, seeking the source of the magic.

To her dismay, she found that it came from all around them, there were at least four wizards out there. Even as she searched, two more fireballs came roaring down the mountainside to engulf the wagon behind them and one of the peasant wagons at the rear. She only had time to note that the soldiers were already down, the largest group of them had already been roasted alive along with their horses. Most of the grass in the bottom of the valley was on fire. Lightning rained from the cloudless sky. Sick at heart, she reached out to the nearest wizard. She called to the grass at his feet to rise to her command. Shouting words she herself couldn't even hear in the roar of the fireballs and the flames from the burning grass and other wagons, she caused the grass around her target to rise to three times its normal height and begin to entwine her enemy.

The grass began to strangle him, it tangled his hands and arms so he couldn't cast any spells, it would take a while to kill him, but she didn't know what else to do. Now that she had quit the conjuration part of her spell, she no longer needed to shout, all she needed to do was concentrate. She just about lost her concentration, however, when she heard what Jehenna was saying beside her.

"Tomasedwardperkinje, by thy name and this ring I thee summon. Come! I command thee obey. For I, Jehenna, art thy Master, thou art my servant, thou art bound by the power of this ring, by the Covenant of the Ring. Thou must appear. Aid me now, in this time of need. I command thee." Jehenna shouted at the top of her lungs.

Jenn was having all she could do to hang onto her concentration. It wasn't enough that they were under ambush, the madwoman was summoning a fourth order demon with a ring alone! No protections, sigils or triangles! The damn bitch was insane! What would they do? Only Jehenna's will and the ring would keep it from destroying them. True, Jehenna would probably be safe with the ring, but everyone else?

In front of the wagon, the flames rose even higher, towering up and up, easily shooting twenty feet into the air. A roar louder than any so far grew with the flames. Out from the flames stepped the demon. A true creature of nightmare. Towering as high as Jehenna who stood in the wagon, the thing's evil body gleamed purplish red in the flames. Flames danced behind it and within its eyes. Sparks seemed to jump from its horns. It bared its giant fangs in a grimace of hatred; it stood with its hooves planted four feet apart, its tail swinging angrily back and forth. Its huge phallus, there between its legs, a monstrous obscenity to the ways of nature. Its forearms stretched outward from its sides and flexed their razor sharp ebony claws. It seemed to be flexing its legs, as if to spring upon the wagon and rend them limb from limb. Small puffs of smoke rose from its nostrils, while its giant bat like wings fanned the fires around it, to quickly speed the destruction of the wagons.

"WHAT WOULDST THOU HAVE OF ME? THIS DAY I COME OF MY OWN WILL. SPEAKEST QUICKLY LEST I DESTROY THEE IN MY WRATH!" bellowed the foul creature; the voice shook Jenn to her very bones, and as it spoke, her concentration at last broke, and she could no longer maintain her spell, knowing full well that she was about to die. She offered a silent prayer that the thing would get careless, and forget, and kill her first, before it raped her. This was pretty much all she could think of as she slid to the foot rest of the wagon.

The wagon, on the other hand, was doing its best to come up and meet her. The horses were going absolutely insane at the presence of the demon. They were rearing and screaming, kicking and jumping. Every movement that the harness allowed them, they performed. In quick frustration, Jehenna, trying not to lose her concentration, pulled Tanthor's Wand of Paralyzation from her robe and quickly zapped the horses, with it. They fell to the ground with a large crash, breaking the guide poles on the wagon, but due to the nature of the wand, were unharmed themselves, simply unable to move.

~

Trying to regain her equilibrium, Jehenna continued, "know oh demon, Tomasedwardperkinje, that you are mine to command...you must do as I say." Jehenna's brow was sweating mighty heavily. Something wasn't right, it just didn't feel right, she thought. "We have been ambushed by our enemies, I command you go out and destroy those who attack us!" The demon leered at her, its evil grin, giving even her a slight pause. Slowly it looked at the horses on the ground, apparently hoping, in its lust for destruction that they were dead. It then looked at her; and then around at the rest of what was left of the wagon train, as if sizing up the situation. It didn't move to follow her orders.

~

As the wagons spread out into the valley, Trisfelt too felt the surge of magic. Although many laughed at the pudgy wizard, and considered him to be perhaps the least of Masters of Lenamare's school, mainly because of his paunch, he was no slackard when it came to magic. As quickly as Jehenna, he flung up a fire shield about his wagon., He only wished it could go farther, but the spell had its limits, especially when cast ad hoc. He could only grimace as most of the other wagons went up in flames in the initial assault. As soon as the flames died enough to release the shield, he tracked down his enemies and located them.

Calling upon his vast supplies of energy, one reason he ate so much was to get the physical energy that magic required of his body, he flung mighty bolts of lightning at the wizards. They fought back, trying to resist his bolts, but he rained them down incessantly, and they did crack. He managed to kill two of them, before he noticed the tower of flames from before Jehenna's wagon.

"What is she doing?" he asked rhetorically. He knew; he could feel the conjuration spell. As the demon stepped from the flames, the wagon rocked, and he turned to see Rupert diving from the wagon. He yelled to Rupert to get back in, but the boy ignored him He couldn't leave the wagon, that would risk the other children, damn that boy. As he frantically thought of what to do he suddenly heard what the demon was saying.

"Own free will?" puzzled Trisfelt, that wasn't good, demons didn't usually say that sort of thing unless it was true, and that tower of flame wasn't right either. At this point he noticed enemy soldiers on horseback charging down the hill, and they had bows. "Fuck," said Master Trisfelt.

He jumped into the back of the wagon with the rest of the kids. This wasn't good., Only one thing left, he thought as he gathered the kids to him. He raised his hands and shouted, "Exodilium transportatum, cyrilius seat flux, Universum Solum, globum teraturam Astlan sig faltum. Translatus por crealum, nos patrium siyenta." He focused his mind on his charges and their current surroundings while superimposing their destination in his mind. He created the juxtaposition of temporal coordinates necessary for nontranslational motion. As he brought his palms together above his head, bluish light flared from his chest, engulfing the four of them, and then they were gone.

~

The demon glared at Jehenna for a few moments more, it then slowly turned and began to move towards the oncoming soldiers. Temporarily relieved, Jehenna breathed a sigh of relief. Then she noticed the oncoming bowmen on horses, as they started to rain arrows upon her and the few remaining guards, who were charging them. "Shit, this is not my day." Jehenna swore as she quickly tore off the demon's ring, she dropped it on the floor of the wagon, there wasn't time to put it away, as she quickly put on her Porisiun’s Proven Personal Protection Ring, cursing the limitations of conflicting elemental affiliations in the rings.

She hated to give up the demon ring, in case it changed its mind before she was ready, but she couldn't ditch the Lenamare's Locator Ring, and even though it might be useful in the future., That will be then; this is now, she thought. Just as she slipped the new ring on, an arrow went by her throat, narrowly missing her. "Damn good thing I switched," she muttered as she tossed stuff off the wagon trying to get under the seat. Finally, the path was clear, and she reached under and grabbed her book. "Wouldn't want to lose this. Now bastards," she said as she turned, "Freehold here I come." She raised her arms above her head, and repeated words similar to Trisfelt's and left in a flash of blue light. Jenn, simply sat limply on the foot rail.

Originally, the storming troops had thought the demon an illusion summoned by their own wizards, thus they paid it no heed and simply finished butchering the last of Lenamare's soldiers, and tried unsuccessfully to nail the witch on the wagon. They ignored it, that was, until it began ripping them to shreds. It moved with lightning speed. Arms, legs, heads, it didn't matter, the demon ripped them all off the soldiers, indiscriminately.

~

Gastropé staggered up, finally freeing himself from the spot where he'd damn near been strangled to death by those weeds. Damn glad someone killed the turd of a wizard, he thought as he stepped out from behind his boulder. Now what was all the noise going on down there? He'd seen Carlisle and Gleston under attack by lightning on the other side of the valley, he didn't have much hope for them, the attack had seemed fairly devastating. The valley was quite red. There seemed to be blood everywhere.

"What the Abyss?" he asked as he gazed around at the destruction. The far side of the valley, was the worst, of the twelve soldiers charging from that side, and their horses, there was no sign. Just an awful lot of red, and an occasional small mound. Commotion brought his attention around to his right. Screams were coming from that direction, now.

As he looked over, he saw a human head go flying over the boulder that blocked his view of the battle This was not good. "Demon, well, I'll take care of that." Quickly he drew himself a protective pentagram, and warded it with the strongest spells he could manage in such a primitive situation. When he finished, he called out, "Demon, attend! I am the Wizard Gastropé, and I shall be thy master. Ceasest this destruction at once, I command thee." With that he sent out a mild enforcement spell that should make it heed his word.

Something came over a boulder and rolled to a stop at his feet. It was Martel's head. "Damn, that wasn't good”, he was probably the only wizard left, and the demon had axed Martel, that meant it was probably a third order demon. "Bitch." Gastrope cursed. He’d never even seen anything above a second order. A third would stretch his limits. He hoped he was up to the challenge.

"Comest now demon, I command thee!"

"OH DO YOU?" thundered a remarkably bass voice from behind the boulder.

"Yes, shithead, I do!" One had to be tough with these things or they'd walk all over you.

A hoof stepped out from behind the boulder, and then the rest of the demon followed. "Oooh shit." Gastropé's eyes grew wide as he took the creature in. Biggest damn thing he'd ever seen. "Did I say shithead?" was all he could say. The demon just grinned wickedly. Gastropé licked his lips.

"Gastropé is it?" asked the demon, in a much softer, but still very deep voice.

"Uh, yeah." Damn. He was only nineteen, just graduated from his journeymanship two months ago. Why did it have to end so damn soon. He knew he shouldn't have signed on with that asshole Exador. "Uh, you know, I'm really sorry. I really didn't mean to be so rude...you know...the exuberance of youth and all...heh, heh," he laughed sickly. Gastropé did not feel good.

The demon took a step forward. "By the way," Gastropé smiled, "I am warded, you can't get through." The demon took another step forward, its hooves were causing the grass it stepped on to smolder. "I don't think," he added as the demon stepped closer still.

"Hey, let's call it even. My...associates torched your...master's party, you shredded my associates! Fair is fair, right?" The Nightmare from Hell stepped another step closer. It was within its own arm's reach. Gastropé felt like throwing up, he was scared. He'd even wet his pants. Damn, he hadn't even done anything. His fireball had fizzled on a shield. He had all he could do to keep from crying. He really didn't want to die horribly.

"You know," Gastropé almost sobbed with desperation, "these wards would be a real pain to try to break. I won't bother you if you don't obliterate me." The demon reached out and grabbed Gastropé by the collar. His pitiful wards went pop. Not even a hesitation on the demon's part. Gastropé sobbed again.

The demon lifted the wizardling off his feet, and held him up, face to face. Gastropé stared into the demon's eyes. It was like staring into the very depths of the Abyss itself. He saw himself, agonizing for eternity, imprisoned, tortured every waking second. The demon opened its gaping maw, and ran its tongue along its sharp fangs. Gastropé relieved his bowels in his silk pants. The demon slowly began to bring Gastropé's head toward its fanged jaws of death. Gastropé broke down. He cried. Tears streaked down his dirty face. He was going to die, and he hadn't even gotten to live.

The demon brought Gastropé's nose right up to its horrible snout, but Gastropé could hardly see any more, the tears in his eyes practically blinded him. "Get the fuck outta here," said the demon in a very tired, human sounding voice. Suddenly Gastropé was flying through the air as the demon tossed him away like a doll. He hit the ground hard. The wind was knocked out of him. It didn't matter, though, that he couldn't breathe; he struggled to his feet and began to flee as fast as he could.

~

Jenn raised her eyes as she heard the sound of footsteps approaching from behind. Slowly she turned her head. She began to shake; it was the demon. It had finished off the enemy and had come back for her. What could she do? She couldn't handle a first order demon without wards, let alone a fourth order. Desperately, she looked around for something to defend herself with. Suddenly, her eyes lighted on the demon's ring, left by Jehenna. Salvation! Her only hope. Quickly she grabbed it and slipped it on.

As she heard the demon come up behind her, she spun, holding the ring on her right ring finger before her. "Halt...Halt, d.d.demon," she stuttered, as she shook. "I...I have thy ring and I command thee to obey me!" The demon stopped about a foot from the wagon. It towered over her. Its gleaming scaly red body glistened with the blood of soldiers. Its ebon claws dripped with the rich satin red blood of its victims.

Its malevolent eyes glared hatred down upon her. If not for her faith in the ring, surely she would not have the courage to do this she thought. "Thou art mine..." she desperately tried to remember its name, "Tomasedwardperkinje! Thou must obey my will. The power of the Covenant of the Ring binds thee to my will, demon!" The demon seemed to sigh, as if acknowledging her power. She began to hope.

It reached out and grabbed her wrist. She lost hope. It didn't immediately snap her hand off, though. Instead it almost gently pried her fist open like a small child's. All she could do was stare in horror. Almost casually its right claw came up and slid the ring off her finger. How! How could it do such a thing? Then it did something it never should have been able to do. It squished the ring between its fingers, like a clay ring. Jenn then did something she'd never done before. She fainted.





Chapter 29


Thomas Edward Perkinje sat on his throne of granite, bored. True, it was nice not to be serving his accursed master Lenamare, but there wasn't exactly a whole lot to do here in the Abyss during one’s days off. True, he could go exploring, but most of the place looked pretty much the same. It might be nice to go out and make some friends in the demon world, but then a lot of demons didn't exactly seem like his kind of people.

Thus it was that he was thinking over his options, when he heard a voice calling his name. He thought he recognized the voice of Lenamare's female friend, but he wasn't sure. She was commanding him to come, as if summoning him, yet strangely felt no compulsion whatsoever to go to her. She was shouting something about the ring, probably the one they'd made to bind him. If he concentrated hard enough he could see her in his mind.

She was standing up in the front of a wooden wagon, pulled by two horses. Beside her sat a young girl that looked familiar, although he couldn't place her; she seemed to be concentrating on something. It was peculiar, Lenamare’s cohort was certainly acting like she was summoning him, however, there were none of the pentagrams and braziers only her ring; and he felt no compulsion, it was simply the fact that she was speaking his name that caused him to even notice her.

Normally, Tom would have ignored her. If the damn Astlanians didn't force him, there was no way he'd want to help them; however, she did appear to be in a bit of a pinch; there were flames all around her, and what looked to be soldiers on a mountainside beside her. Exactly what was going on, he couldn't be sure, but considering his boredom, it was at least worth a look.

Trying to achieve the feeling of dissolving that had accompanied all his other trips to Astlan, Tom could feel himself siphoning through, as if through a small hole. To speed things up he pushed at the hole with his mind, and was rewarded with it growing to fit his size. The growth was also accompanied by a roaring noise. Quite strange really. He wasn’t fading so much as slipping through a hole.

As he felt himself emerging into Astlan, Tom decided it would save him a lot of grief if he played the demon role to the hilt; let them know exactly why he was here, on his own terms. Thus using his best demonic voice, he said, "What would you have of me? This day I come of my own will. Speakest quickly lest I destroy thee in my wrath!" Overall, Tom thought, suitable enough, it seemed to have the desired effect, especially when coupled with the flexing of his muscles and his heroic pose. The girl seemed to collapse in on herself, and even the wizard who called him was sweating.

The horses pulling the wagon were literally going wild at the sight of him. The woman pulled something from her robe and shot them. The fell straight to the ground and didn't move. Then she started talking, in a typically obnoxious wizardly manner about an ambush and destroying her enemies. Not really worth it, reflected Tom. He looked around at the scene around him, first at the horses., He wanted to reassure himself that the woman hadn't killed them; he could see them breathing, apparently she had just immobilized them somehow.

There were several large fires going. They seemed to be wagons that had been torched severely, with burnt horses in front of them. Tom had to swallow when he noticed a pile of charred soldiers and horses. Then his eyes swept across an unharmed wagon with a fat man and some little children. The children were looking petrified. Whether of him or the carnage, Tom couldn't tell. Then he noticed some of the back wagons, where it appeared to his heightened vision that entire families had been roasted alive in their wagons.

Tom was getting quickly sickened at the thought of anyone who would so ambush women and children like this. It was then that he noticed several bowmen on horses charging down the slope. While his eyes were distracted, he noticed a flash of blue light from the children's wagon. As he glanced back, they were gone. Probably destroyed by the same bastards that did the rest of the damage.

Enough is enough, thought Tom. I may not like the Astlanians, but I can't stand by and let helpless kids get murdered when I can stop it. He turned to face a large group of soldiers, they ignored him, seeming intent on attacking some defending soldiers. Moving quickly, so he wouldn't have to think about what he was doing, he ran up to the first of the ambushers and pulled him off his saddle. As the man, suddenly frantic, tried to stab Tom in the eye, the red anger, with which he'd been having so much trouble lately, took over. He moved almost within a trance, ripping the ambushers apart. He didn't even really pay attention; he couldn't, otherwise he would have puked. His body was on autopilot. As soon as he finished off this group of ambushers, he roared at their horses, and charged the terrified beasts.

Using only animal instincts, they fled. Screaming in terror the horses galloped off up a mountain trail, out of the valley. At this point, Tom noticed other soldiers on the other side of the valley. Quickly, he flew over and proceeded to execute them.

As he finished off the last one, an arcing pain shot between his wings. Something had struck him full in the back, and unlike a soldier's dagger, this hurt like hell. Spinning in anger, Tom saw a mustached man in his forties, dressed in green silk robes, calmly casting a spell at him. With a single fluid leap, Tom hurtled a broken corpse to land in front of the wizard, who was backed up against a boulder. Calmly Tom stuck his right claws into the man's chest and grabbed his back bone. His left arm came up and squeezed the man's neck until his head popped off. Tom's eyes widened in horror and surprise. All of this had been sheerest reflex, he hadn't controlled any of it. The shock sent a cold wave down his body.

As the wave passed Tom relaxed, leaving his trance-like state. He was quickly being overcome by the horror of what he'd done. It was then that he heard, "Demon, attend! I am the Wizard Gastropé, and I shall be thy master. Cease this destruction at once, I command thee." This is ridiculous, thought Tom, even as he felt a mild itching in his head. Annoyed, Tom tossed the head of his last victim over the boulder towards the voice. He heard it thunk and roll and then his sharp hearing heard the voice say, "damn." The voice was a little more subdued as it soon said, "bitch." At least these guys do have the appropriate human reactions.

"Come now demon, I command thee!"

What remarkably obnoxious people these wizards were, even when confronted by absolute horror. "Oh do you?" Tom thundered in his best demonic voice.

"Yes, shithead I do!" said the voice with what Tom could tell was false bravado, this guy really didn't sound that old or confident. Tom stepped around the giant boulder to see who this pipsqueak was.

What Tom saw was a rather dirty looking youth with spikey blonde hair stuffed under a turban wearing dirty yellow silk pantaloons and a vest. As the youth took in Tom's towering form, his eyes widened and his mouth formed a round "o" as he said simply, "Oooh shit."

Tom thought maybe the kid had finally shut up for good, when he managed to croak, "Did I say shithead?" Tom almost laughed at this, the expression on the young man's face was decidedly comic, and almost desperate. The guy licked his lips, apparently trying to think.

Deciding to play this for what it was worth, since he found that he enjoyed letting the wind out of these damned wizards, he said softly, in almost a 'Dirty Harry' style voice, "Gastropé is it?"

"Uh, yeah," at this point the kid was literally quaking in his boots, Tom noted with amusement that the front of his pants were wet. The wizard couldn't seem to think of anything to say. Finally he managed, "Uh, you know, I'm really sorry. I really didn't mean to be so rude...you know...the exuberance of youth and all...heh, heh," Tom was enjoying this but he could see that the thrill would be over soon and it would quickly just get pathetic. He started slowly towards the wizard.

"By the way," he gave Tom a sickly smile, "I am warded, you can't get through." Tom simply kept going forward "I don't think," he added, as Tom continued to advance.

"Hey, let's call it even. My...associates torched your...master's party, you shredded my associates! Fair is fair, right?" The young wizard was really looking green now, apparently on the verge of a nervous breakdown, or severe nausea or both.

"You know," the young man almost cried, "these wards would be a real pain to try to break. I won't bother you if you don't obliterate me." Tom didn't say anything, he simply stopped within arm's reach of the kid. Tom didn't, of course want to hurt him, simply make him leave. He reached out and picked the young man up so that they were at eye level. Tom opened his mouth to say something, but had to think, so he just ran his tongue over his teeth, trying to decide what would work best. At this point, the guy broke down and cried, tears started rolling out of his eyes and down his dirty cheeks. Tom's nose also detected a certain odor that he recognized immediately. He'd heard of people shitting their pants, but never actually seen it.

Suddenly he was tired of the whole thing. It had been cruel of him to frighten this guy so, even if he was an ambusher. Wanting to end it, he just brought the fellow close to his face, and dropping his demonic voice and letting his weariness show, he simply said "Get the fuck outta here." He then tossed the little wizard a ways off, but gently, so as not to break any bones.

Tom turned back towards the wagons, to see if anyone was left alive. He noted that Lenamare's friend had vanished, in fact the only person he saw moving was the girl who had been by the older woman. He walked down to the front wagon to see if she was O.K. As he got close, she turned and saw him, and started looking around wildly. Tom sighed, hoping he wouldn't have to put up with an hysterical woman. She reached down and grabbed something, and just as he got within about a foot of the wagon, she spun around. She stuck her fist practically in his face.

"Halt...Halt, d.d.demon," she stuttered; she seemed to be shaking. "I...I have thy ring and I command thee to obey me!" Tom was weary from fighting and really didn't really feel like dealing with this. "Thou art mine... Tomasedwardperkinje! Thou must obey my will. The power of the Covenant of the Ring binds thee to my will demon!"

Enough again, thought Tom. Apparently, she too thinks this ring has some compulsion on me. Time to disillusion her. He reached out and grabbed her hand. Trying not to hurt her with his strength and sharp claws, he gently pried her fist open and removed the ring from her finger. It was a little tricky, he really wasn't used to using his new fingers for such delicate work, but he got it off without too much pain. In order that she get the point, he held it before her face, on which there was an expression of shock. He then brought his finger and thumb together, and flattened the ring like it was made out of Styrofoam.

What he had not expected was for her to faint. Girls just didn't do that sort of thing anymore, not where he came from. Of course, he reminded himself, demons didn't pry rings off their fingers, either. Not knowing what else to do, he carefully lifted her off the wagon and laid her down on the ground. He then stepped back and looked down at her, trying to decide what to do next.

"You didn't kill her, did you?" asked a soft voice that seemed to becoming from under the wagon.

In order to see who spoke, Tom had to squat down and peer under the wagon. Laying on the ground was a small boy, with brown hair and eyes, homespun breeches and shirt, about nine years old, who was staring at him intensely.

"No," Tom said softly trying not to frighten the kid. "She seems to have fainted."

"Fainted?" the boy said curiously as he scrambled out from under the wagon, to gaze upon Jenn's face. "That's not something I'd expect her to do. Jenn's really not the fainting type. Alvea yes, Jenn no. Hmmm." Rupert looked down at Jenn's recumbent form, as puzzled as Tom about what to do. "I don't know what you're supposed to do, gently slap her face maybe."

"I guess, I don't know either." At this point Tom realized with a slight start that this boy didn't seem frightened of him at all. "Excuse me?"

"Yes," said Rupert looking calmly up at Tom's eyes.

"Why aren't you running away in fear of me?"

"Oh, sorry. Was I supposed to?"

"Well that seems to be the general reaction to me. I was simply puzzled why you're not."

"Oh, I don't know. Demon's just don't frighten me, especially you. I know you won't hurt me."

"Oh?" Tom said, surprised by this statement. True, he wouldn't, but how could this kid know that when every adult thought otherwise. He arched his eyebrows in a mock serious fashion. "You do, do you."

This at least got a reaction. The boy suddenly looked troubled and doubtful. He swallowed, stepped back a step, and licked his lips. "W...Well, I don't think, you'll hurt me." He amended.

Tom smiled at this; he liked this kid. At last, a rational Astlanian. Unfortunately his smile exposed his fangs and caused the child even more distress. Quickly, realizing his mistake, he said, "Very well, I suppose you're right, I won't." The boy looked suddenly relieved. "But, how do you know that?" Now the boy looked really uncomfortable, but not frightened.

"Uh, I'd really rather not say at the moment, sir."

"Hmm," strange little kid this was. Very well then, let him have his secrets. At least here was a possible friend. "What's your name kid?"

"Rupert, sir."

"Very well Rupert, you can call me Tom."

"Tom?" the boy seemed a bit puzzled by this, but seemed relieved that no further questions about his beliefs appeared to be forthcoming.

"So, Rupert, where is everyone else in this little expedition of yours?"

"Well, sir. Mistress Jehenna teleported away, as did Master Trisfelt with Chass, Gloria and Sydney. Everyone else, except for Jenn here, is dead. I think."

Disappointing, but apparently the kids got away. From his inflection, Tom judged that the names Rupert mentioned along that Master Trisfelt, to be the children he'd seen. That fact was worth something. It also seemed likely that the woman who called him, was this Mistress Jehenna. She seemed to behave like a whack job of a wizard: save her own ass first, and only then worry about everyone else.

At this point there was a groan from the girl on the ground. Tom stepped back to give Rupert room, and to be out of her eyesight when she opened her eyes. Rupert bent over Jenn's face, looking down at her intently.

~

Jenn's eyes fluttered open, the first thing she saw was Rupert's concerned face. "Rupert," was all she could say, the whole horrible event rushing up on her. "You're alive. I'm alive!" she struggled as if to rise but Rupert held her down. Fortunately, she didn't try too hard, so the boy was able to keep her down.

"Be still," he cautioned, "you just fainted, you don't want to get a head rush and do it again do you?"

"But how. That demon, he was about to rape and kill me." Tom grimaced as she said this, although she of course, couldn't see him. "How come I'm still here? How are you here? Where is everyone else? Where's the demon?!" At this she sat up, accidentally knocking Rupert aside. She came up, with her back to Tom, and didn't see him. She looked all over the place, searching for the demon in front of her. Then she noticed Rupert fidgeting beside her.

"Yes, where is it?"

"Uh, Tom's behind you," and he pointed.

"Tom?" she turned around. "Ehhh!" she gasped. Tom waved mildly at her. She wobbled where she sat, put her hand to her forehead, her eyes rolled back and collapsed back onto the ground.

"Why does she keep doing that?" Tom asked Rupert.

"I really don't know, apparently demons radiate a fear spell that affects humans, and women in particular."

"Oh," Tom said, and thought about it. It did after all make sense. True he was rather frightening to look at, but just standing around shouldn't provoke such continual fright in people. However, this made him think, "then why aren't you affected?"

Rupert again looked a bit uncomfortable, "Uh, well, like I said, women are more susceptible than men, usually. And I, well, I'm just not affected as much, some people aren't. Look at Lenamare, or any of the great Demonologists."

"I guess," Tom said. "So you're a great Demonologist?"

"Uh, no. I...I'd kind of like to be, sort of." Rupert hedged.

"Anyway, we have to decide what to do with her. Will she be all right?"

Rupert looked at Jenn, "I don't know. Jenn?" He shook her awake.

Jenn opened her eyes again. Rupert was once again looking down at her. The demon was still standing nearby. What was she going to do? The ring was destroyed, the demon was standing there, probably about to torture them. Why it hadn't already was a mystery. In fact, why she was still alive was a mystery. Apparently the demon had some sort of devious scheme in mind, and was simply holding off torturing them until it go what it wanted.

She had to get a hold of herself. This really was getting ridiculous. She didn't know why she'd fainted in the first place, and she really couldn't keep this up. Despite how much she dreaded doing so, she would have to get up, face the demon, and try to figure some way to get Rupert and herself away from it.

She sat up and tried to compose herself slightly. "All right demon. Just exactly what do you want?" There was no sense in beating around the bush, she couldn't hope to beat the demon in any scheme that it had. Demons were notoriously tricky and she simply did not have the experience to outwit a fourth order demon.

"Nothing," Tom answered, "your friend, who seems to have deserted you, simply asked for my assistance and I gave it."

"Uh huh, well thank you very much, we appreciate it, now what do you intend to do with us." The good thing was that the demon was no longer thundering at them, but its gravelly bass voice still sent shivers up her spine.

"Nothing, why?"

"Don't give me that, demon. I know you're up to something. What I want to know is why you're still here. It is my guess that if you could harm us, you would have." Jenn hoped she was right, otherwise... "but you haven't. So I want to know exactly why you're still here. Did Lenamare or Jehenna tell you to stay with us?"

"No, and what makes you think I couldn't harm you. I figured that demonstration with the ring would convince you that I'm not currently constrained by any summons."

Jenn got noticeably paler. The idea that he wasn't constrained and could still harm them was exactly what she was afraid of. "OK," she conceded, "I admit, that was rather convincing; however, if you are free to do as you please, then why haven't you killed us." She knew she was taking a risk, she really didn't want to encourage it, but she felt she had to know.

"Look. I'm not here to kill you. If I wanted to, you wouldn't be talking to me. The fact is, I just saved your ass from those people, and I'd just come down the hill to see if you were all right. OK? I'm sorry if my concern for your well-being has upset you." Tom was beginning to get annoyed at this girl.

"Don't give me that. No demon cares about any human's well-being. You want something from us, otherwise you'd have left." Jenn stated emphatically.

Tom was getting extremely annoyed, and so he spoke just a little bit louder now, "ALL I MIGHT LIKE--IS POSSIBLY--A LITTLE GRATITUDE. I JUST SAVED YOUR DAMN LIFE. DON'T YOU THINK YOU COULD AT LEAST BE POLITE TO ME. IF YOU WANT ME TO LEAVE, I WILL." Tom stepped back in preparation for fading out, when suddenly Rupert ran up and grabbed his knee.

"Rupert!" cried Jenn in shock.

"Please, please don't leave, Tom," Rupert asked hurriedly, holding on to Tom's upper knee. "Exador's people have just killed all of the people we were with. More soldiers may be around. If they find us, we'll be dead for sure. Can't you just ignore her and stay with us for a while...until we reach somewhere safe."

"Rupert! What the hell are you doing? You're asking a loose demon to save us from humans! Boy, have you lost all sense of reality?" shouted Jenn.

"I know what I'm saying, Jenn," Rupert looked over his shoulder at Jenn. "You know you couldn't protect us from a large group of soldiers. Tom could though. Who's going to attack a fourth order demon? No one! He'd be the perfect person to escort us to Freehold. Jehenna's abandoned us, we certainly won't make it alone."

Tom looked at the little boy, and then at Jenn. For once he had to agree with the girl. This Rupert must be a little weird. From all he knew of demons and their relationship with Astlanians, if he were an Astlanian, he wouldn't ask for a demon's help.

However, the kid did have a point. Nobody would bother them with him around. The more important question, though, was why should he bother? After all, what had these people ever done for him. Aside from killing him, enslaving him, and forcing him to kill others? Actually the more he thought of it, the more reasons there were that he should just leave them.

The only problem with that, however, was that looking down at Rupert, who seemed to be almost desperate to have Tom stay, he really felt guilty as hell at the thought of leaving them. The boy was right, there probably were more soldiers running around, somewhere, they probably wouldn't get very far. Actually, maybe Tom did owe the kid something, the kid was the only person he'd met so far, except for Tizzy and Boggy, who treated him as a human being. Not to mention the fact, that he had to admire the nerve of the kid.

"...Please Tom, just for a few days?" Rupert was pleading. While Tom had been thinking, Jenn and Rupert had continued their arguing. Rupert had just turned back to plead with Tom again. The other thing was, Tom thought, if I do leave, then I just sit in my cave until Lenamare calls. That was a deciding factor to be sure. He looked down at Rupert and over at Jenn, who was now standing. She really seemed to be going off the hinges yelling at Rupert, to get away, and to stop this nonsense. She looked as if she wanted to come up and drag the boy away, but was too shy of Tom to do so.

Tom cut her off abruptly. "SHUT UP--GIRL!" Jenn shut up. Rupert shook his head to clear it. Tom had been rather loud. "Very well, Rupert," he said in a more normal voice, "since, YOU asked, I'll stay." He rustled the boy's hair gently with his hand. He looked at Jenn, "I am going to stay to help Rupert, if you want, you may come along. But I won't force your company. I don't force other people to do things against their will." Tom said pointedly. He could tell this girl was going to be a problem.

“Damn.” Jenn cursed. She appeared to be thinking about something, apparently weighing their options.

"There is no way I'll leave poor Rupert to you and your schemes. I'm sure that's what you want, probably a nice young human soul to corrupt and consume. But you're not going to get it without going through me first. I'll go wherever Rupert goes, even with you, if necessary."

Like he'd thought, reflected Tom, she's going to be a pain. At least she does have a few more guts than she'd shown earlier. Rupert was sadly shaking his head at Jenn's speech.

"Good, I'm glad you’re being more agreeable, Jenn, even if it is for the wrong reasons," said Rupert. "Now, we'd better see if anyone else here is still alive, and what we can salvage." Rupert set off to search through the remains of the wagon train.

~

Jenn simply stared after him. There was something really strange about Rupert, he was not acting like a boy his age. He was so business like, when he should have been scared witless, and to treat a demon so. Surely he really had gone insane. At least he had the decency to avoid the blackened corpses, and even get sick looking at them. If he'd been able to do that, she'd known for sure he was lost.

She looked back at the demon, who was watching Rupert, if she didn't know better, she'd swear it almost appeared as puzzled as her about Rupert's actions. She suddenly had a horrid chill, what if, while she'd been out, the demon had possessed Rupert. She'd never seen such a thing, but, naturally, she’d heard of it. Could the boy already be a puppet of Evil. Good Goddess, was this some monstrous plot to get her?

Jenn shook her head, no that was foolish, she was just an unimportant student wizard. No fourth order demon would go to that much trouble over someone so menial. Still, she'd have to watch them both. The demon had some sort of strange hold on the boy. Goddess, if only it wasn't too late already to save him. Finally, she came to a decision.

"Well, if we're stuck with you, until we reach safety. Then I guess we had better head for Freehold." That was the closest 'safe' place. "So, I had better see what we can salvage." Jenn glared challengingly at the demon. She then set off to look for her things.

They found no one else left alive. They still had two horses left, Timber Leaf and Bitterwhite, Chestnut and her partner were still paralyzed on the ground, eventually they'd be all right, but it would take a day or so for the spell to wear off. So in the meantime, Jenn undid their harnesses, so that they'd be able to get up and move. Unfortunately, all of the wagons were inoperable, Jehenna's guide poles had been broken when the horses fell, Trisfelt's had a hole in it and the rest were torched. The hole in Trisfelt's wagon was most interesting. Apparently, he was in such a hurry to leave, that rather than take the extra time to individually select the people and things that would go with him in his teleport spell, Trisfelt had simply done an area teleport, and taken everything within a certain radius of himself. Aesthetically it was considered crude, but it was a considerably faster and easier way to teleport multiple objects, than the more traditional way; however, given the circumstances, few wizards would have faulted him for his inelegance.

Actually, it was all for the best, Jenn reflected. The demon could fly or whatever it wanted to do and riding horses would be considerably faster than pulling a wagon. Fortunately, Jenn had few, truly important belongings, her extra clothes, toiletries, a few notebooks and her diary. The problem would be carrying food.

That problem was solved however by the demon, surprisingly enough, it did at least provide the service of going through the pile of melted soldiers and locating some leather saddle bags and other equipment, that could be used. The leather was in bad shape from the fire, but enough was salvageable that they were able to get two complete sets of equipment. Thus in only a few hours they were ready to go.

The best they could do for the dead was a mass burial. The demon, reluctantly, piled all of the dead from the wagon train together. Jenn then cast a Moriella's Move Earth Spell, and parted the ground under them, so that the corpses would at least be buried. She then closed the earth on top of them. She wished she knew some words to say, but what with all that had happened, she couldn't think of what would be appropriate. She simply offered a small prayer to the Goddess. Besides, she reflected, what with an Agent of Evil standing by, anything she said could easily be perverted into a mockery.

The problem came when Jenn mounted her horse, and Rupert refused to. He'd seemed reticent about the whole saddle thing, but hadn't said anything until it was time to mount. "I just can't Jenn. I can't ride a horse."

"Oh Rupert," she said in despair. "It's not that difficult. Here, I'll get down and help you mount, then just hang onto the saddle horn. I'll lead and Timber Leaf will follow." She dismounted to do as she said.

"No," he said backing away. "It’s not that Jenn...it’s just that, well, remember Chestnut."

That did give her pause, true he had reason to fear horses, after that. "Rupert, that was Chestnut, Timber Leaf is a lot more gentle, she won't act that way, I promise. I don't know what got into Chestnut, but it was just a freak thing."

"No, no it wasn't Jenn," his eyes were starting to get watery, and his voice a little choked. "Horses don't like me, none of them."

"That's nonsense, Rupert. You can't make generalities about such things, simply based on one experience and your own expectations."

"I'm glad you agree," the demon interjected dryly.

She glared at him for interrupting, and ignored him. "Come on, I'll help you mount."

"No, please Jenn." Rupert was on the verge of tears. Jenn was frustrated, but at least she was reassured to see Rupert acting like a normal scared kid again.

"Rupert, come on. Horses do not hate you, come on. Just try petting Timber Leaf, you'll see." Rupert shook his head, but didn't actually say anything. "I'll hold your hand Rupert, that way if Timber Leaf does anything, I can protect you." That should get him to try it.

Rupert looked doubtful. "It won't work, Jenn, Timber Leaf doesn't like me."

"Come here, let's just try it." She knew if he did this, he'd see there was nothing to be afraid of. Slowly, Rupert came forward. Jenn took his hand. "Here, we'll come from the front, where Timber Leaf can see us, and there is no way she'll get spooked." As they approached the horse, it eyed them speculatively. When they got within about two feet, it backed up. Jenn sighed with annoyance, "Silly horse." They approached a little closer. The horse backed up again.

Getting frustrated, Jenn reached out with her other hand to grab the reins and hold the horse still. It was just like a horse to do exactly what you didn't want it to. As she held the horse in place, she moved Rupert's hand up to pet Timber Leaf. As the boy's hand came closer, Timber Leaf shook her head and tried to get away from the hand. Jenn frowned in puzzlement, Rupert looked nervous again. As she tried again, Timber Leaf reared in fright, just as Chestnut had the night before.

Jenn let go of Rupert's hand, and he backed quickly away. Jenn started murmuring and calming, trying to relax the horse. It took just a few minutes, and Timber Leaf was standing fairly calmly again. Jenn turned to the boy, a grimace of frustration on her face. "Well, Rupert, I guess you knew what you were talking about. So what do we do now?"

Rupert shrugged, happy to be relieved of having to ride. "I guess I'll walk, you ride. "We'll just have a spare horse."

"Great, we'll never get to Freehold." Jenn said, "I guess we'll just have to walk the horses. If you're going on foot then I guess I can too, for now." Rupert, just bowed his head looking guilty, but not unhappy.

"Well, let's go then." She still had Timber Leaf's reins, so she loosely tied them to a rope, which she then attached to her horse's saddle. Jenn then set off down the road leading her horse, followed by Timber Leaf, then Rupert, and the demon hovering behind.

They followed the trail onward and upward, once again following the mountainside. The day wore on slowly, their pace hampered by Rupert's slow walking pace. Actually Jenn was quite impressed, an hour later Rupert still hadn't complained, and for all that they were slowed by their going on foot, they were still moving at a considerable pace. For his part Rupert marched steadily onward, quite content with walking and the way things were. Jenn's own feet were beginning to hurt.

Eventually, however, the pace began to show on them. Jenn gave in and mounted her horse. Rupert was beginning to look a bit tired, despite a few stops, but he still refused to try and mount Timber Leaf. After another two hours he was beginning to slow down. Jenn really didn't want to stop yet, even though it was only about an hour and a half till sunset. For one thing, they were on a narrow mountain trail with no place to stop for the night. Further she wasn't sure what to do about camping. She really didn't feel safe with the demon watching her while she slept. She'd be extremely vulnerable to his attack. However, Rupert really couldn't go much further. "Rupert," she called back to him.

"Yes?"

"You want to try riding again?"

"No Jenn. Nothing's changed. If you want to continue, I can keep walking." Even though Rupert sounded sure of it, Jenn didn't believe it, he was slowing down, and looking exhausted. No wonder, he'd been through a big day and then a three hour march. She didn't know how he was managing it. She knew they'd have to stop as soon as a suitable spot was found, unfortunately that didn't look like it would be for a while. She just wanted to get to Freehold as fast as possible, and definitely didn't want to camp with the demon. Not that she'd be able to avoid it. What with at least eight more days journey.

~

While Jenn's attention was directed towards looking for a camping spot up ahead, Tom came down near Rupert and whispered in his ear.

"Rupert," he said softly, trying not to attract too much of Jenn's attention.

"What sir?"

"Would you like me to carry you?"

"I can manage," Rupert said, although he seemed relieved at the offer.

"I'm sure you can, it’s just that it wouldn't be any bother for me, and I think your friend wants to continue for some time. And when we do stop, I'm sure she'll want you to take turns watching me, so I don't kill you all. Therefore, I think it would be smart if you got some rest while you can."

Rupert smiled at Tom's little joke. At least someone wasn't frightened of everything he did. "Well, O.K. I guess." Rupert turned around to face Tom. Tom, hovering a foot off the ground, reached down and carefully picked the boy up.

"Put your arms around my neck, and rest your head on my shoulder. I think that will be most comfortable for you." The boy did as he was instructed. Even though Rupert was good size for his age, he still was no larger than a toddler compared to Tom's giant size.

Jenn turned when she noticed them stopping, and gasped as she saw what was happening. "What are you doing!" she screamed. "Goddess above, put that boy down you foul beast!" She stopped her horse and would have turned it around if she could.

"Relax! I'm not going to bite his head off. If I'd wanted to, I could have done it any time, and you wouldn't have been able to do anything about it," Tom said to her.

"I don't care! I don't trust you. If you so much as harm a hair on that boy..." Jenn threatened.

"You'll what?" Tom asked tiredly. "The boy is tired, there's no place to stop, we have to go on. I offered him a ride; he accepted. It's the best solution. Further, I am sorry but there isn't anything you can do about it. So live with it. You already have my word that I'll protect the boy."

"Jenn," Rupert said with his back to Jenn, resting his head on Tom's shoulder, "don't worry. I trust him."

Jenn glared at the demon, then at the boy's back. She turned around angrily on her seat, but said nothing. Tom put his left arm across the back of Rupert's thighs and his right hand rested on his back, to hold him like any small child.

~

Rupert did as he was told, resting his head outward on Tom's shoulder, as the demon took off again. Rupert hadn't wanted to tell anyone, but he was tired. He hadn't thought he'd be able to take too many more steps before collapsing. Now, however, he could relax. Feeling the heavily muscled, scaly shoulder under his cheek, the rhythmic beating of the bat like wings, and the gentle claws on his back, Rupert felt that he could finally relax. Not completely, not yet, but more so then he had in a long time. For the first time that he could remember, in an incredibly long time, he felt completely safe and protected.





Chapter 30


The sun had set about a half hour ago, only the blue horizon to the west indicating that it wasn't long down. They'd continued for about two hours after Tom had started carrying Rupert. Tom could make out Rupert's deep breathing indicating that the boy was sound asleep. He flew as smoothly as he could so as not to wake him. Tom wasn't sure why, but he really liked the little guy. He supposed it had something to do with the fact that he was the only human who didn't treat him like the demon he was.

Jenn and he hadn't spoken a word since he'd started carrying Rupert. He couldn't figure her out. One moment scared witless and fainting, the next, openly hostile. He couldn't decide if it was an Astlanian trait, a wizard's trait, or just a female one. Whatever it was, she was definitely not the best company in the world.

As he was musing this, he was startled by the sun rising behind him. The entire valley was suddenly lit like a giant flashbulb went off. Thunder rolled across the sky above him, and the horses on the road seemed to shake. A hot, harsh wind buffeted him from behind. Smaller rocks and boulders slid down the mountainside. Frightened, the horses started neighing and dancing, Jenn was forced to stop them in an effort to calm them. Both looked behind them to where the intense golden light was fading slowly, a huge cloud, like a cupcake with a really big top on it, rising higher than the mountaintops behind them. It seemed oddly familiar to Tom.

"What the hell was that?" Tom asked.

"Lenamare, I think."

"I knew he was pretty smart, but I never thought of him as being quite so bright," Tom commented wryly. He caught a brief grin on her face, before she remembered who made the comment.

"It wasn't him," she replied coldly. "It was the surprise he'd left behind for Exador."

"An explosion," Tom guessed.

"Yes, some sort of device of his. One of his greatest achievements, he claims. It uses some strange, extremely rare unstable material. He focuses a beam of concentrated energy on it until the innermost structure of the stuff splits up into more stable materials. In the process it apparently releases great quantities of energy. He explained it to all the masters and students who could understand it the night before we left.

"Which is one reason he stayed behind. In addition to giving us a head start, he wanted everyone out of the way before activating it. Apparently, in addition to explosive damage it also has a built in area affect sickness spell."

Tom thought for a moment, surprised, and then shocked. "Are you saying he used a nuclear weapon on his enemy?"

She looked at him puzzled. "If that's what you call it. It figures that a fiend from the depths would know of such destructive things."

Tom ignored that remark, this changed several things. He'd always thought of these people as backwards medievalists who also happened to have real witches. If these people could control nuclear devices, then in their own way they were as advanced as his own people. Somehow it seemed to make the whole thing seem much more real. "So let me see if I understand this," Tom said to Jenn, since she seemed somewhat willing to talk. "Lenamare decided to pull out of his keep, where he was securely protected from his enemies. He sent all of his people out ahead to escape and then did a suicide destruction of his enemy."

"Hah," Jenn laughed, "Lenamare, sacrifice himself for anyone! Hah! That's a joke. No you can be sure he set some sort of timer and then teleported away, after removing the wards, for fullest effect."

"O.K. but then where are the rest of the people, surely that wasn't everyone in the castle back there."

"No, we split into different groups, for maximum diversion and the greatest hope of some people getting away. Unfortunately it doesn't seem to be working too well."

Tom couldn't say anything to that, but he did ask, "Why? Why would he abandon such a secure position? That force field of his seemed pretty potent, and with the resources he had to call on."

"Not quite, the wards were failing. When you so obligingly forced us to open it, Exador sent fireballs in and killed a lot of our people, including one of the people maintaining the wards, who happened to be my close friend!" Jenn's anger at the demon coming back.

That shocked him a bit. He only vaguely remembered the whole thing, and then nothing about fireballs. He hated to think innocent people had been killed when he tried to get in. "I'm sorry; I didn't know." Jenn remained silent. "I really didn't know too much about what was going on. I really wasn't in control then. I couldn't help what I did. Lenamare didn't give me much choice. His orders were pretty specific to return to him.

"Believe me, if I had had a choice, I certainly wouldn't have returned." Tom was feeling a bit cold at the moment toward Lenamare, but he did regret her friend dying, maybe that explained her attitude, a bit. "I really am sorry your friend died," he repeated.

Jenn remained silent; she just nodded. She then quickly turned away but not before Tom could notice tears streaming down her cheeks. She shrugged her shoulders, shook her head as if to clear the notion that a demon could actually apologize for something it had done.

They were riding through a small valley now, with a few trees. "Why don't we stop now? The horses need to rest." She decided that she wouldn't sleep though. It was too dangerous. She dismounted near a tree, Tom landed nearby and began looking for a place to lay Rupert down.

As Tom laid the boy down, he woke groggily, and asked what was happening. "We're just setting camp., Go back to sleep; I'll take care of everything." As the boy leaned back against the tree Tom had set him next to, Tom began gathering evergreen bows and some mulching for the boy to have a soft bed. By the time he'd finished, Jenn had taken care of the horses and was getting some food.

She looked at Rupert and apparently decided to let him sleep, rather than make him eat. She sat down and began to eat, then looked at Tom. Grudgingly she offered him some cheese. He smiled at her being forced to be polite, fortunately she couldn't see it or she might have fainted. "No thanks, I don't eat," Tom said.

She withdrew her cheese. Now, thought Tom, how will she interpret that? Probably for the worst. He took Rupert up and set him down on the bed he prepared. As he stood to leave, Rupert sleepily grabbed his hoof.

"Don't leave me, Tom. Stay, please," mumbled the boy.

Tom arched his eyebrows in surprise, but squatted down next to the tree beside the boy and rested his hand upon the boys shoulder. He was a bit weary, not really tired, but weary after the day's events. He stared into the night sky. Aware of the girl glaring at his every move. It would be interesting to see if she managed to stay awake all night on guard.

Tom simply stared up into the sky, thinking. Thinking about the battle today. How could he have done all that. It was, he thought like a dream, he had seen the destruction caused by the ambushers and allowed himself to be carried away by his anger and rage. It just didn't make sense. He'd never had any great anger or fury before coming to Astlan.

He didn't know, it was almost as if, well, demons were supposed to be creatures of unstoppable fury, it was like his anger matched his form. Maybe it was a part of being a demon. He didn't know. It was scary though, to think that he could just go off into a red fury like that and destroy things. Were Rupert and the girl safe with him? What if he got mad at them. Maybe he was the evil creature she believed him to be. To be sure, before, he never would have killed anyone; now it was all he seemed to do. Kill, kill kill. What kind of monster was he? If demon's eyes could have cried, he might have.

Eventually, he came out of his reverie. He noticed, by her breathing that Jenn had fallen asleep. As he started to shift his weight, he also noticed that Rupert had entangled himself on Tom. The boy had somehow wormed his way up near Tom's side. He was hugging Tom with one arm, and had his other thumb in his mouth. Tom had to smile, what a strange kid.

~

Blue light filled the center of the room. Lenamare's body formed into existence. As the blue light died, he took in the candle light, soft tapestries, and the carpet below his feet. Where was he? Quickly he looked around. Apparently, he was in some well-appointed bedroom; paneled walls hung with tapestries, tastefully carved furniture. There was also a large feather bed with red satin sheets, complete with a naked and inviting Jehenna.

Lenamare smiled, "I must admit, my dear. You do know how to rough it."

"Yes," she said seductively. Then she put aside her sulky side, and said in a business-like manner, "we were ambushed today, shortly after lunch. Some of Exador's hired goons, with wizards. Unfortunately it was a rout, I had to teleport away."

"You got the book."

"Of course, you don't take me for a fool do you."

As a second thought, Lenamare asked, "What about the others?"

"Trisfelt slipped away, took some people I think. They managed to surprise us and torch pretty much everyone else with fireballs. I summoned the fourth order demon in hopes of salvaging things, but..."

"But?"

"Something wasn't right. I couldn't feel the proper control. He even claimed to have come of his own will. He eventually did as I commanded, but by that point more enemies were coming, and I decided it would be best to leave with the book."

"Wise decision," Lenamare approved.

"I had to leave the ring, I needed a protection ring, and didn't have time to balance the elements in the rings, so I just dropped the ring. If she's lucky, that girl Jenn may have grabbed it and kept herself from being raped when the demon returned.'

"Oh well, regrettable, but we can make another. For now, let's make something else." He smiled as his clothes vanished in a puff of smoke.

"Let's," she agreed as she raised the sheet, and extinguished the candles with a bare thought.

~

He was pissed. Damn Lenamare to the deepest part of the Abyss. The aerorian smith kisser had tricked him. It had cost him most of his army, that stung. He'd gotten suspicious as the wards dropped suddenly, and then he'd sensed it. He'd only had the barest time to raise a strong shield. It protected everyone behind him, fortunately; however, most of his troops were surrounding the keep.

He still wasn't sure what it was that Lenamare had done, but it had taken everything he had to maintain that shield. At the moment he could hardly move. He sat in his throne, and his officers brought him the news. Any people not protected by the shield were gone. Ashes or less. Of those protected by the shield, half had been watching the keep and were blind, those nearest the shield had burns and were quickly sickening. Fortunately, many of his sycophants were quick to point out, Exador had had his helmet on, and was well behind his own magical shield.

He'd lost this one. He'd never expected it. He'd never thought Lenamare capable of such a feat, let alone willing to destroy his own castle. Had he destroyed all his own people? Exador had stationed patrols in key locations in case people tried escaping from the school. So far he hadn't heard anything, but he'd have to check for himself first thing tomorrow. He didn't think Lenamare would kill all of his own people, not if he ever wanted to get anyone else's aid. If he could just get a hold of some of those people, he could find out for sure what Lenamare's plans were.

For now though, all they could do was clean up the mess and treat the wounded. He had a few master healers left and they were analyzing the sick victims, apparently, there was some sort of sickness spell associated with the explosive spell. Tomorrow he would search. Tonight he had to sleep. His powers were drained lower than they had been in centuries, if not a millenia. If he ever got that sludgeworm Lenamare in his grasp, he'd certainly have to wring the secret of that spell from him. Damn effective.





Chapter 31


Once they'd finished eating, Jenn began saddling her horse and preparing for the day's journey, Tom had flown up to see if anyone was following them, so Rupert had a few minutes to himself. He felt better today than he had in a long time. He was still a little nervous, but happier than he could remember being in the last several years.

After all the walking yesterday his feet ached a bit, so did his back for some reason. He reached up to scratch his head which had been itching him all morning, and felt a slight swelling above his temple. He was slightly surprised, apparently he'd relaxed more last night than he'd thought. He'd have to be careful. He still wasn't completely confident. True, Tom had given him a part of his name, but he hadn't said anything to him. He'd really been scared, when it had looked like Tom might leave. He didn't know what he'd have done then.

When you want something all your life, which in his case was only about a decade, and then to almost have it in your grasp and lose it. Scary, he still hadn't figured out exactly what Tom was doing, maybe testing him. Last night, though...maybe, Tom seemed to care about him. He gave a hasty prayer to whoever managed such things, then turned as Tom descended.

"No one in sight, I didn't look very far, but it seems clear for a while."

"Fine, shall we go then. Rupert, have you changed your mind about riding?" Jenn asked hopefully.

"No, I'll walk," Rupert said to both of them.

"Are you sure, we'll be going all day, not just for a few hours?"

"I'm sure," Rupert said as Tom simply looked on without saying anything. Jenn gave up in despair and pointed her horses toward the trail. Today she'd switched and was riding Timber Leaf. She'd still saddled Bitterwhite though, since she'd hoped Rupert would ride, and she didn't have anything else to do with the gear. At this rate it would take a long time to reach Freehold.

~

Gastropé searched through what was left of the wagon train. Unfortunately, not much useful was left. True some rather nice things in and around the front wagon, such as live horses, but nothing very useful. The horses were paralyzed, and after a half hour of fiddling, he was sure he couldn't remove the spell. He was mainly thankful that they had left a little food. Not a lot, but enough to last him a few days. He also managed to dig up some new clothes; he'd had to mix and match, so much had been burned. His old clothes, though, were simply ruined. The fine clothes he'd been wearing just couldn't stand the roughing they'd had, especially his soiling them. He also had no way of cleaning them, the only stream he'd found was too small, and he also needed drinking water.

When the demon tossed him, he had run as far as he could. He'd finally collapsed in exhaustion. When he woke up, he'd realized that he'd need a few things if he were to survive. He'd snuck back to the wagon train just before dark. He hadn't seen anyone or thing, but he waited till morning nonetheless, just to make sure the demon was gone. He didn't know where the survivors, if there were any, went; but since all the bodies were gone, he assumed there had been some. He actually didn't care, as long as that demon was gone.

He still couldn't believe his luck. To actually have been so close to an enemy demon of such power and live...through no fault of his own. He had no idea why the demon didn't kill him, normally its master would surely have ordered it to kill all of the enemy. Still, it was best not to question good fortune.

He'd gone around the valley and seen the handiwork of the demon. Goddess that thing was nasty. There really wasn't much left anywhere. Martel's was the only body recognizable, and that probably only because he'd interrupted the demon's rampage with his own foolish summons. It was one thing to see the little first order demons in lessons, and even conjure one. This thing though, had been unimaginable. The biggest thing he'd ever seen was a second order his master had summoned, it was nasty enough. Naturally, he'd heard about third order demons, and even the higher ones; but whoever expected to meet one?

The thing that made him perhaps the maddest was that Exador was sending out men to confront people who controlled fourth order demons. It was like sending a flea to kill a lion. There was no way Exador could not have known what he was doing. Exador was a damn good wizard; he didn't make that kind of mistakes. No, it must have been a setup. Which was why he was not going back to Exador.

It was that which presented him with his problem. Where could he go? If he went east, he'd surely run into Exador. Not only was that where his army was, but, since these people were fleeing the army, Exador would be pursuing them. If on the other hand, he went west, he'd run into the people with the demon. It wasn't a good choice. He couldn't go over the mountains, so he had to follow the trail, which mean east or west. Which way did he want to go?

If only he could do a teleport spell, but he wasn't anywhere near good enough. He might manage to cast it, but he'd just as likely end up in a solid object or twenty stories up, or somewhere random, as his destination. The other problem was what to do when he got some place. He'd used the last of his money to buy those fancy clothes to get hired by Exador, and Exador wasn't going to pay until the job was done, which didn't seem to be soon, if ever, especially considering that Gastropé had no intention of seeing Exador again.

~

Jenn was upset with herself; she'd fallen asleep almost immediately last night. She hadn't intended to sleep at all, and then she was out like a light. How could she be so incompetent? The demon could have worked any mischief it chose on them during the night. For some strange reason it hadn't, as far as she could discern, but that was probably just because it hadn't found the right time. It was surely just waiting for the perfect opportunity to cause the maximum possible damage. She had to find out what its game was.

"Demon," Jenn called. The demon flew over the yawning chasm on their right and up beside her slowly walking horse, trying not to get within its view. Unfortunately, he came within the view of the following horse, and it started having fits. "Would you mind?" Jenn asked, annoyed.

"What?"

"Casting a glamour to keep the horse from spooking."

"Me? Sorry. I don't know how."

"Sure. Be that way then, I'll do it." Quickly she cast a spell, hiding the demon from Bitterwhite's senses. In short order the horse calmed down, unable to see Tom.

"Neat trick," commented Tom, honestly.

"Yeah, you'll do anything to cause trouble."

"Look, you're the one who called me up here to talk," Tom pointed out.

"I suppose," Jenn grudgingly agreed. "Why are you wasting your time?"

"What do you mean?" Tom asked, puzzled by the tone in her voice.

"I mean, why are you doing this? Surely, you have better things to do than follow us around and guard us. After all, I'm sure someone of your power has important things to take care of in the Abyss." Jenn was trying a slightly different tack to get information out of the demon. She hoped that by being less confrontational, the demon might give a clue for its reasons.

"No, not really."

"What do you mean not really? I'm sure you'd like to be off destroying something somewhere, wouldn't you. Rather than baby-sitting?"

"No." Tom wasn't sure he understood exactly what she was getting at, other than trying to give him a hint to get lost. "What makes you think I like to destroy things?" Tom asked a question of his own.

"Why," Jenn was rather surprised by that question, "that's what demons do." Aside from lying, thought Jenn, but she decided it might not be tactful to say that.

"Well, I'm afraid I don't." Tom defended himself. "Well, actually I do;" he had to amend that thinking back on what he'd done yesterday, "but, I don't enjoy it. I generally don't have much choice in the matter."

"Sure," obviously the thing still insisted on playing games. "So, anyway, why are you here. Don't you find this boring?"

"Well," Tom admitted, "I can't claim it to be incredibly exciting; but then I'm sure you're not having the time of your life either."

"Yes, but we're fleeing. You don't have to. You can go back to your home and no one will bother you."

"Oh really," Tom said,. "I don't think so. You and your friends have seen to that. As long as Lenamare's around, I can be summoned at any time. And he's insured that no matter what, I'll never return home."

Jenn was puzzled, the demon actually sounded bitter. Human emotions coming from a demon? "Well, you could go back to where you go when you're not here, I'm sure you'd at least prefer that wouldn't you?"

~

Rupert was listening intently, he didn't like the sound of this conversation. He wished Jenn would shut up. Fortunately, Tom relieved him with his next words. "No, and besides which, I promised Rupert I would see him to safety. I don't go back on my word."

Rupert saw Jenn’s shoulders and back tighten in frustration. Tom had told her something she couldn’t deny. Demons didn’t go back on their word. They twisted the living hell out of them, but they didn’t renege. "Ugh, I guess my question is," Jenn’s frustration showed in her voice, "why should you want to? What is Rupert to you?"

Rupert's ears pricked up at this, this was something he definitely wanted to hear, he strained to catch every word, even though Tom was generally incapable of talking softly. "Because he is my friend. I like him and I want to." Tom's voice was starting to get louder as he said this, obviously becoming slightly annoyed too.

"Like! Hah!" Jenn laughed at what she apparently saw as a blatant lie. "What would a creature of evil know of things like friendship, kindness or fondness. Lust, hatred, vengeance, yes. Love and friendship no.'

"WHAT THE HELL IS IT WITH YOU PEOPLE!" Tom shouted. He then calmed down a bit, when Jenn jumped in her seat. "Every damn one of you, except for Rupert here," and he pointed, "keeps telling me what a rotten evil person I am. None of you even know me! I never did one damn thing to any of you. You people, on the other hand, captured me like some animal and then bound and enslaved me to be your fricking servant.

"If anyone around here is evil, it's you wizards! You grab people you don't even know and force them into slavery. You never even ask us if we want it! You expect us to bow and scrape and do your every whim and then you rant and rave over how evil and destructive we are; but don't you think we have a right to be upset? Besides, as far as I could see back there yesterday. You stupid Astlanians are as nasty to each other as we demons sometimes are to you!

"Do you think I like this situation. Do you think I like being forced to serve some egotistical moron, to be cut off from my family and friends? You bitch and moan about how I plan to destroy you and how you fear me and all this other garbage, but it’s your own damn fault I'm here. If you, and I mean you, because, I remember now where I've seen you before, you were there and helped Lenamare enslave me; don't like my presence, then blame yourself. I'm the way I am because of you. If you don't like it then just shove it." With that, Tom flew back to the end of the small procession, and crossed his arms on his chest and just fumed.

~

Jenn was shocked, speechless. She had never, ever, heard of, read of, or even considered possible, such a tirade from a demon. What it said didn't even make sense. It seemed to contradict every known fact about demons. Oh, to be sure they didn't like be forced to serve, but then demons didn't like anything. To imagine a demon having feelings like a human being--it was just too much.

~

Rupert too was shocked. Not at the words, he could understand them, had even experienced some of it for himself. It was just that--well, to have them expressed, it just brought home to him the whole situation. It also confirmed a lot of what he secretly hoped and felt. To actually have some of his own thoughts and feelings expressed by a demon of such tremendous power and might, was almost too much to be believed.

He looked over his shoulder at Tom in awe and happiness, maybe this was the sort of thing he'd been looking for. True, he hadn't directly come out and said what Rupert had wanted said, but things were getting closer, maybe soon he'd have his confirmation. Tom said he did like Rupert, that was definitely a start.

~

"You! Halt in the name of the Exador, General of Turelane. Halt or be vaporized!" Not wishing to be vaporized, Gastropé naturally stopped. This was not good. He'd chosen to go west after the survivors of the wagon train, hoping they'd returned their demon, and were now sufficiently far ahead. He had figured that that would be better than risking a run in with Exador after failing. Unfortunately, it didn't seem to have made a difference.

He stopped and turned around, trying to appear pleased to see whoever called him. Coming up the mountain trail after him were two people on a Ponto's Firebird Flying Carpet. He had to admit, it was a beautiful red carpet, and the flaming exhaust was a rather awe inspiring sight. He crossed his arms on his chest, and tried to look impassionate.

As they pulled to a stop near him he said, "About time we got some reinforcements!" Always best to bluff, he knew it wasn't worth lying about who he was. If he wasn't one of Exador's people, then he was probably one of Lenamare's refugees and would be executed, thus best to be himself. "That stupid demon wiped out the entire ambush party except for me! I've been trying to follow them to see where they were going, I'm glad you've come to help."

The two men didn't look surprised, or interested. "Name."

"I might ask the same." Seeing no response, he replied "Gastropé Al-Ghayrani, sid Mierkan, Tolan de Turelane con Exador." He gave his full formal name, including his current lord, Exador, just so there could be no mistaking. The men looked down a list they had, apparently looking for his name.

"Well," one said at last, "your name is here, but you certainly don't dress like one of our people."

"Naturally, as I just mentioned, our entire party was trashed by a fourth order demon. There wasn't much left of my old clothes, so I simply got together the best that I could from the remains of the wagon train, before pursuing the enemy survivors."

"Uh huh, and where are these enemy survivors?"

"A few hours ahead of me. I gave them a bit of a head start, in case they should send their demon back reconnoitering and discover me." These guys were not exactly the most sympathetic or trustworthy people in the world.

"Very well, your mission is temporarily suspended. You shall board this carpet and return to give your full report to Lord Exador."

"On who's authority?" This was not good. He really didn't want to face Exador again.

"Lord Exador's himself. He has ordered that anyone we found, whether our men or theirs, be returned to him at once for a full report on the event of interception of refugees. Which is apparently what happened."

"Yes, I see," damn, "however, my mission is quite important, I must follow these people to see where they're going."

"On this trail there is only one place they are going of major consequence, and if necessary we can transport people fast enough to resume your mission in plenty of time.

“Board." They landed the carpet, the nonspeaking one had a small wand pointed at Gastropé. Not good, he thought as he boarded the carpet.

~

It had been an hour since the demon's speech, and Jenn still wasn't sure what to say or think. She'd certainly been puzzling over a few things that it had said; but really, how much truth could there be in demonic propaganda? It was actually almost, well, she didn't know. She supposed it would just be better if she didn't think too much about what the demon said.

In order to get her mind off it, she reached back in her saddle bag and took out her diary. She hadn't written in it since they'd left the school. She hadn't even looked at it. Yesterday, she'd just grabbed it out from under the seat and stuck it in the saddle bag. She took it out, and went to open it.

“Now that is strange.” It was magically sealed. She hadn't sealed it, why would she have? Carefully she examined the book; true, it looked like her diary at a glance, but on closer inspection she could see that this book, although of the same size and style was considerably older than her diary. Now that she looked at it: it was obvious. This book was much more worn than hers, and considerably more scuffed up. It was also magically sealed by some spell she'd never seen before.

"What?" The demon asked, coming forward again. Apparently bored enough to be interested in anything.

"I just went to get in my diary," Jenn said not looking up, "and noticed that I'd grabbed the wrong book. This isn't my diary; it’s something else. It must belong to Jehenna since its magically sealed and in her wagon. So where is mine? This was the only book in the wagon."

"Magically sealed?" Tom said picking up on the word magical, "you mean like a spell book?"

"Yes, or any book that contained important or secret information." Jenn looked up and suddenly realized who she'd been giving this information to. She suddenly shut up, naturally the thing would be curious about it. Anything like this would be of interest to a demon wanting to make mischief. Perhaps this is why it was hanging around. "Is this why you're here demon?" She asked forcefully, "trying to get your claws on this, maybe!"

"What the hell are you talking about? Do you have a one track mind or something? I've already told you why I'm here. I don't give a damn about any book. You're the one who brought it to my attention. I was just making polite conversation. Something you apparently are incapable of." Tom flew off angrily, back to his place at the end of the line.

That got rid of him, thought Jenn. It sounded sincere and innocent in its anger, but one could never tell. Demons were the masters of deception. It could have been looking for this; although, if it had been, wouldn't it have just taken it from her? "Yuck." More questions, this demon seemed to cause a lot of them. It would probably be best just to not think about him for a while.

The important thing was the book. What could it be? She knew most of the standard book locking spells, even if she couldn't open most of them, since they required a special password, but this was different. It was a spell unlike any she'd seen before. Certainly the book was old, and apparently valuable. If so, however, why had Jehenna left it.

A thought simply came to her then, what if she hadn't? Jenn's diary hadn't been there. Had Jehenna taken Jenn's diary by mistake, thinking it was this book. She had to laugh at that. True, she didn't care to have Jehenna reading her diary; but Jehenna would be suitably upset, and if as was usually the case, Lenamare owned part of it, he would be madder than a Zierlien Hell Hound when he discovered it. Actually, it served them right for abandoning her to a fourth order demon.

~

"How could this have happened?" shouted Lenamare.

"I don't know. The stupid girl must have switched her diary with the book."

"So, she was in the pay of Exador all along!"

"Possibly, possibly not. I think it highly unlikely that she would just happen to have placed her diary in the exact same place I put the book. On the other hand, I don't think she would be dumb enough to leave something with her name on it for us to find if she were working for Exador.

"The switch could have been made by someone else. I simply don't know. Whatever the case, we must get that book back. If Exador gets his hands on it, we might as well give up."

"If I find that girl! I will personally see that she pays for this. I'm sure it’s her fault." Lenamare paced back and forth in the room. The noonday sun shone in upon the white bearskin rug under his feet. He was still dressed in his morning robe. They'd slept late, then when Lenamare had gotten up to look at his prize possession, he'd found only a girl's diary.

Jehenna simply ignored his tirade. "Well what do you want to do? The fact is, by now, the girl is probably in Exador's hands, if the demon didn't kill her, which is a good bet."

"Well, we'll just summon the demon. Have it tell us what happened to the girl, and then go find the book." Lenamare began looking around, as if in search of equipment to summon the demon.

"Are you going to summon it dressed like that, and in my bedroom?" Jehenna asked amused. Lenamare glared at her.

"Of course not." By the expression on his face when he first glanced back at her, she could tell he'd been ready to.

"Fine, then let's get dressed, break our fast, and then we'll check out a lab room to do the summoning in."

"Very well," Lenamare grumped. Jehenna could see he didn't like the delays, but she just smiled. She enjoyed seeing him riled; it made her feel good.

In all it took about three hours to get around and then prepare to summon the demon. Lenamare seemed to be counting every second, but Jehenna was determined to take her time and do things properly. It was hurrying in the first place that caused the loss of the book. She didn't want to see any more mistakes made.

Lenamare finished etching the last of the circles, and then Jehenna proceeded to light the appropriate braziers. When she'd finished, she blew out her wick, and took her place in her own pentacle and sealed it. She nodded her readiness to Lenamare.

Lenamare rose his hands to shoulder height. "Ziarostelan sid fiernon, by the Laws of Rienon I summon thee Tomasedwardperkinje. From the depths of the Abyss, I Lenamare, by the power of my will and the Laws of Binding conjure and abjure thee to appear before me. Knowest thee that I, Lenamare, am thy true and only master. Riastelon ted corbeth. Nos faltum y crenin. Come demon, come Tomasedwardperkinje, appearest now, humble vassel, before thy true and mightiest liege, lord and master, Lenamare." Lenamare felt the conjuring go out, spiraling outward from Astlan to the Abyss, searching for the demon so conjured. The special summoning runes inside the circles grew red hot from the power of the magic they contained. Unfortunately, nothing appeared inside the principle pentagram.

Lenamare's brow twitched in frustration. "By lord Hierelen, Lord of Fire, Lord of Demons I conjure thee Tomasedwardperkinje. Ekfeltos tral kiev, urbido Dominae. Sig norium sed layum. Demon Tomasedwardperkinje thou art commanded by the covenant of Man and Demon as set forth by Varn and Hierelan in the first millennium. Thy true name compels thy obedience, attend! These are my words of command to thee. Thou shalt appear in this room before me now. Kristem sid torium let fialtos sed miercoles. Trist absum sed fierkum. Nos kriegum sed vienton merienton torme."

Smoke began to fill the air, the sigils and runes etched upon the floor flashed pure white with intensity. The braziers burned faster and hotter than ever. Sweat trickled down both Lenamare's and Jehenna's brows. The build-up of magic in the room was beginning to be felt physically as something similar to a build-up of static electricity. Red mist began to form in the center of the pentagram, and vaguely large canyons with huge boulders could be seen. Periodically, jets of flame seemed to burst across their vision.

Realizing that it was of no use, Lenamare quickly began to perform the release spell that would safely discharge the magical energy that had been built up. The summons simply wasn't working, and Lenamare needed to dispel the summoning energies, lest they start interfering with the world around them. It took him about a minute to get the energies down to a minimal level and when he did he looked to Jehenna.

"Well," Lenamare's face was about as red as the demon's. Jehenna could tell he was on the verge of screaming.

"Apparently someone or thing is blocking our attempt to summon the demon." She stated, trying to draw his attention off along safer lines. She didn't want him raging about a demon that wouldn't obey him. He was likely to start causing random damage.

"Exador?"

"Possibly, although short of having taken control of the demon, I don't think he could do it."

"What then? You surely don't suggest a Demon Prince is shielding it, preventing me from summoning it?"

"No, none that I know of are aware of what we're doing. Of course, if they were, then they very well might." That gave Lenamare pause, and he actually leaned back on a table to think. "Actually, there are also two other explanations."

"Yes?" Lenamar asked.

"Actually, I'm sure you realize them, but I'll just point them out. First, the demon could be even more powerful then we believed. True even a fifth order would have at least been forced to show its presence in the pentagram, even if it didn't obey you completely. However a sixth order wouldn't have to have obeyed that particular summons."

"True. But that's impossible. We know the demon's fourth order, we bound it with a standard fourth order spell. Second?"

"A minute. What you've said is true; however, when I summoned it with the ring, as I said, I didn't feel in control. It is possible that it simply allowed itself to be bound by the fourth order spell." That made Lenamare's eye's light up in thought. “Remember, it appeared as a low order, only revealing itself later on. We didn’t understand what was going on. Perhaps it is playing a longer game?”

"However, my best guess is possibility two."

"Which is?" Lenamare asked.

"He's still in Astlan."

Lenamare looked at her more seriously this time. "That definitely would explain it. The summoning spell could only draw it from the Abyss. It would certainly be the easiest explanation. Except for one thing."

Jehenna nodded, knowing the one thing. "Why would it still be here?" she agreed.

"Exactly, there is no possible reason!" Lenamare exclaimed raising his right hand in frustration.

"True, it should have done the job assigned, possibly killed the girl and then left. There would have been no reason for it to stay, in fact it should have automatically returned."

"Unless, remind me? You said it did say that it came of its own free will?” Jehenna nodded. “In which case it's here until it decides to leave.”

Jehenna’s brow furrowed. “It is entirely possible, there was certainly enough fire for it to build its own gateway."

"Shit, if it's in Astlan, there isn't a hell of a lot that we can do to get it here, unless we find out where exactly it's at. If I knew that, I could force it to come to me..."

"But," she finished, "we don't know where it is."

"It could have gone anywhere in the world, after leaving the battle. Goddess rot in the Abyss!" Lenamare shouted in frustration.

"So, what do we do next?" Jehenna asked.

"We think; we think and plan. We also keep trying to summon the damn demon."

"We also have to present our case before the guild in three days."

"I know, I know. I'd just prefer to know exactly where we stand with that damn book before facing Exador in court."





Classification of Demons

Curriculum Obtestatus: College of Wizardry

University of the Council States



Demons are generally classified in six different categories. These categories are roughly based on the relative power and strength of the demons. The lower the classification level, the lower the power and consequently the more common the demon. One important thing to keep in mind is that all demons are unique and the following is only a rough guideline.

Class I: Imps, Sprites and Shadows.

These are certainly the most common of demons. Most are smaller than man size. Most are wingless without the power of flight, although some can teleport. Imps are generally the only class I demons to have any wings and usually look something like small gargoyles with wings. Sprites generally are the most human appearing of all demons and often appear nearly completely human except for their perfectly proportioned miniature stature, 1' to 3' high, and the fact that most are red skinned. Some Sprites even wear clothes occasionally. Shadows do not appear humanoid at all and in fact have the least physical form of all. Shadows appear simply as impenetrably dark regions in corners and dimly lit regions.

Class II: Fiends

Fiends are more powerful demons and range in size from dwarven up to man-size. Some Class II demons have extremely bizarre forms with multiple sets of arms and legs, occasionally with humming-bird type wings rather than the more traditional bat-like wings. Appearance of these demons, despite often being man sized, is often the least man like of all the demons. Fiends are relatively common in wizardly circles.

Class III: Major Demons

Major Demons range in size from just under man sized to slightly larger than man sized (5' to 7' tall). While often appearing somewhat more human than Class II they usually have bat-like wings, horns (like almost all demons), red, scaly skin, perhaps a tail, and usually cloven hooves. Succubi and Incubi are generally examples of Class III that look very human except for small exotic differences such as small horns and maybe red skin color or other similar small but noticeable difference. Class III demons are typically the most powerful demons summoned for any but the direst of uses. Often summoned to fight in wars or battles they are usually only seen in small number and usually not on lesser errands.



Class IV: Greater Demons

Greater Demons are truly horrific in the terror they inspire. They are rarely seen on the planes of men and are always sources of dread and fear. Only the bravest and strongest of Conjurers would summon Class IV demons. Class IV demons are the epitome of the demonic nightmare. Generally around 11' tall or larger, with goat legs and cloven hooves, two or three times the size of those of a large bull.

Those which have wings (and almost all the sighted ones have them) have wings spans on the order of 20'. In addition to their absolutely unbelievable fighting prowess, they are also powerful wielders of magical energy, and can be expected to toss lightning bolts and fireballs around with glee.

Class V: Arch-Demons

Arch-Demons have not been openly seen on the planes of men for nearly a thousand years. If any wizard knows the name of a class V demon, it surely must be one of the most closely guarded secrets in existence. Only the greatest wizards from ancient times were capable of summoning these dread beings, and even they did so with the greatest of trepidation. Since so few have been seen, little is known of what these beings look like, other than they surely must be horrors beyond description.

Class VI: Demon Princes

Demon Princes have never been known to have been seen on the planes of men. They have only been described to wizards as the absolute rulers of the Abyss. The other demons hold these unspeakable beings in such fear and dread that not even the gravest of tortures and punishments has ever induced any demon to divulge the name of a class VI demon.

A few unlucky beings in the last three millennia have reportedly managed, or been allowed to escape from unexpected visits to the Abyss where some have reported seeing the Unimaginably Hellish Palaces of these beings. The one or two who rumor states actually managed to see a Demon Prince were forever-after irrevocably insane. The power of such beings is incalculable but surely nearly rival to the lesser gods.

It is believed that the primary reason that no Demon Princes travel to the planes of men is that their manifestation requires so much mana that the resultant disruption would alert the gods and their avatars. Such an alert would likely trigger confrontations that would not be beneficial to any parties.





Chapter 32


It had been a tense ride. Gastropé wasn't looking forward to his upcoming interview. Exador wasn't known for patience with people who failed him. Gastropé’s only hope was to try and convince the wizard that he, Gastropé, had not failed in his part and had been in fact continuing to do his job. Not that he thought he had an incredible chance of success, but it was all he had.

The carpet finally came over the edge of the forest in sight of the school, or what should have been the school. Gastropé had to look twice. The force dome was gone, as was the school. In fact, as the carpet zoomed in closer and closer, it became apparent that there wasn't much of anything left. Where the school had been was a giant crater, or almost a crater. It would have been a big round crater with a diameter of about a twenty minute horse ride, except for the far side, where a peninsula of normal plain jutted into the crater.

Within the crater, there was nothing. It looked like a barren grayish desert from the carpet's altitude. The peninsula had Exador's army camped upon it. But not the same army Gastropé had last seen. The army camped on the peninsula was literally the part of the army that had been camped on that piece of ground. The edges of the peninsula looked as if they'd been subjected to a great destructive fire. The center of the peninsula looked unharmed, physically. It did, however, look like a giant hospital zone though. What could have caused this sort of destruction?

It must have been, Gastropé thought, that brilliant flash of light and windstorm he'd noticed at sunset. He hadn't paid it a whole lot of attention because he'd still been in shock from his encounter with the demon. At least, Gastropé thought, I'm not the only one who's failed to succeed. The problem was that it was Exador's failure. Gastropé had a bad feeling that any of Exador's own failures would simply cause him to look even more harshly at others'. Thus it was with great trepidation on Gastrope's part that the carpet landed with him and his two escorts.

They led him, one in front, the other in back, through the tents of wounded and apparently sick people to a man in a major's uniform. "We found this guy, one Gastropé, wizard in our lord's service, on the mountain pass to Freehold. Apparently the only one of our people to survive an ambush, laid by us, on a refugee wagon train."

The major looked Gastropé over hard and finally said, "Very well, hold him here. His Excellency will probably want to see him shortly." With that the man turned and went off to a large tent about four hundred feet away. Obviously the tent was Exador's current headquarters.

It took several minutes, but eventually the major returned. "Bring him in." He motioned for Gastropé's escort to follow. Gastropé quickly began rehearsing the story he'd prepared on the few hours journey from where he'd been picked up.

As the major reached the tent, a guard standing beside it opened a flap for the major to enter. The major ducked and went in. Gastropé's lead escort glanced back to make sure he was following and then went in himself. Gastrope' bowed his head and entered the tent of Exador, a slight prayer on his lips.

His eyes had to adjust to the dark interior of the tent. He stood for a few moments getting his bearings, and had to be pushed forward by the soldier following him. The tent was lit by four glowing yellow globes suspended from the roof in each corner of the tent. The floor was covered in thick rich red Argonil Furs. At the far end of the tent was a large throne, positioned atop a raised platform and between two large glowing braziers.

On the throne, leaning back in a slouched position was Exador. His right hand hanging over the edge of the throne and resting on the top of his famous war helm. The large helm was on the floor beside the throne. Exador's fingers were rhythmically tapping out a small beat of impatience. He was looking straight at Gastropé; his facial expression was that of studied nonchalance, but his eyes seemed to bore right into the depths of Gastrope's frightened soul.

"What is your excuse?" Exador stated, rather than questioned, coming straight to the point.

Gastropé gulped, audibly, and stammered, "Um, gracious lord, we...ah . . we did everything as you ordered, just like you instructed. We, uhm, we laid ambush along all the possible routes of exit and waited. We really didn't think it likely they'd come our way, but, but they did. So, we ambushed them, they had no warning. At first it went well, the fireballs took out several wagons. But..."

"But you failed me anyway," Exador inserted impatiently, "why?"

"Lord they apparently had loaded this caravan with all of their most powerful wizards, suddenly lighting began to fall amongst our men, and then one of their lead wizards caused the very plants around me to rise up and halt my spells. They tried to strangle me, naturally I used counter measures, but the enemy wizard was too strong, at first. Eventually I broke free, but by this time it was too late...I...stepped out into sight to get a better view, and lord..." Gastropé's face was pale with remembrance of the frightful scene.

"Spit it out already...what did you see!"

"Lord, all of our people...dead, horribly dead. Apparently Lenamare was with them, or something, they, somehow, in the heat of battle...well I don't know for sure...but..."

"But what?...you are really beginning to try my patience." Exador said testily.

Gastropé gathered himself together to make the unbelievable statement. "M'lord somehow they summoned an archdemon...at least fifth order or so, perhaps a demon prince...I don't know how...all I know, is that I had to once again use all of my power and knowledge to escape it relatively unharmed," Gastropé finished.

Gastropé fidgeted nervously as Exador just stared at him thoughtfully. The room was silent, Exador had stopped tapping on his helmet and simply stared through Gastropé. It really made the young wizard nervous, it was as if Exador had temporarily decided he didn't exist.

Eventually, Exador's eyes came back into focus, and he looked at Gastropé himself for a moment then looked around at his men. "Possible, unlikely but possible, they do have that type four running around, it could have been that." He looked at Gastropé, "Not a demon prince, or even an archdemon, you never would have escaped, I don't even see how you could have escaped from a type four. That, I find suspicious..."

Gastrope turned even whiter, "M'lord I swear," he fell to his knees, "all that I've told you is true, I escaped using my skills and magic, it was all I could do, but I did." He really didn't like the tone of Exador's voice.

Exador stared a moment longer, as if assessing Gastrope's sincerity, then said, "Be that as it may, you've still failed me. I reward those who succeed, those who fail..."

"Please lord, there was nothing we could do ...no normal mortal can stand up to a demon of that power, and I honestly admit that I'm not a good enough wizard to defeat one in combat...what could I have done to change things?" Tears were starting to come to Gastropé's eyes.

Exador just looked at him sourly, "Take him to the prisoner tent; it’s empty at the moment. I'll decide what he'll be...later."

The guards moved in and picked up Gastrope. He was too scared to protest; Exador's words...what he'll be...frightened him. He might be a corpse; he might be a mindless slave; he might be a frog; he might be a toadstool; he might be anything. Exador was notorious for his nasty shape change spells, and for killing people that failed him; there were just too many possibilities--all of them bad.

~

As Gastropé was carried out, Exador turned to one of his higher ranking aides, "Send out a sufficient number of three's to try to intercept the remainder of that party, and bring them back here. Then hold them for me till I get back."

"Back? M'lord?" the aid asked.

"Back. Apparently Lenamare has somehow made it to Freehold and is petitioning against me, for invading his lands. I've got to go keep an eye on him, if he spills too much, all of my plans could be in jeopardy." The aide nodded sagely in agreement. Without saying anything more Exador stood up from his throne, and surveyed his tent. Satisfied that his lieutenants could probably manage what little was left of his army while he was away; he raised his hand in a casual gesture, making a few arcane gestures for show, and vanished.





Chapter 33


Damien leaned back in his chair perusing the missives recently delivered to him by couriers. Except for a harvest report from his steward, the messages were all from his friends in the border areas. All of which concerned an apparent disagreement between the wizards Exador and Lenamare. Which was precisely why Damien was so interested in the reports. Exador and Lenamare were bringing mutual complaints against each other before the council in three days. Damien, being an ever interested and attentive council member, was thus most interested in what was occurring between the two.

Actually as a point of fact, while Damien was one of the more conscientious council members, he normally wouldn't have paid this much attention to the matter; or would not have if not for the rather unusual reports coming from the confrontation between the two wizards.

Apparently, Exador had lain siege to Lenamare's castle on the premise of taking Lenamare's school. A rather worthless thing to do, but given the egos of the two wizards involved, not outside the realm of possibility.

Lenamare had responded as everyone knew he would by tossing up his super wards around the castle. The wards were worthy of respect, even if Lenamare, in his insatiable demand for fawning compliments, did make their secret just a little bit too well known. When Exador tried to remove the wards, Lenamare apparently retaliated with a fourth order demon. Having a fourth order demon on hand was quite a feat, in and of itself, stupid and dangerous to use, but quite a feat.

Anyway, despite Lenamare's wards and big demon, Exador somehow managed to push Lenamare to the limit. For some reason, apparently thinking his castle was a lost cause, Lenamare blew it up and took the vast majority of Exador's army with it.

Another piece of incredible wizardry from Lenamare, thought Damien. Lenamare might almost be as good as he thinks he is, if he can pull stuff like that out of his hat, mused Damien. However, it still didn't make much sense. Why would Lenamare destroy the very thing he thought to save, apparently so casually. Further why would Exador go to so much trouble for a stupid little castle and some land. It just didn't add up.

Damien relaxed in his chair thinking. The music from Antefalken's harp slowly relaxing some of the tension from reading the messages. Damien was in his quarters at Freehold, relaxing in his stuffed chair listening to his bard, Antefalken, play a collection of melodies from the Vargosite Empire, 600 years ago. Damien sat gently stroking his light beard and mustache, now and then brushing a dark golden lock of hair from before his eyes.

The melodies temporarily diverting him, he once again noted the advantages of having a bard that could play music that no one else had heard in 400 years. Actually, his bard had other advantages. Maybe Antefalken could find something out about Lenamare's fourth order demon. No one had been aware that Lenamare had one. Perhaps Antefalken with his special connections could find something out.

Damien looked over to Antefalken. Antefalken was perched with his small harp, sitting on the back of a sturdy chair, with his legs on the seat. The lap harp balanced on his thighs as he played. At first glance, Antefalken appeared to be a boy. Certainly in size and proportion he was about the size of a thin boy of about seven years. However his beard and moustache rather despoiled that image. Well, upon further thought, Damien decided that maybe the cat-like eyes or the small bat-wings on Antefalken's back didn't help the image much either.

"Antefalken?" asked Damien, interrupting the flow of music.

"Yes, m'lord?" the bard replied, still strumming, but more softly now.

"You haven't by any chance, heard of any fourth order demons being enslaved recently have you?"

"Fourth order?" the bard said with a puzzled expression. "No, I don't recall any such events. Of course I'm normally here in Astlan most of the time, so I do miss the court gossip."

"Hmm. Next time you're back, if you could perhaps enquire. Lenamare has come up with a fourth order demon that he's been using in combat with Exador."

"Using a fourth order demon in combat? My, my, isn't your friend Lenamare getting a little bit senile these days. Or is the end of the world coming and he's pulling out all the stops?" asked Antefalken.

"Hardly the end of the world, or at least if it is, Exador and Lenamare haven't bothered to tell the rest of us. Not that they would mind you...but the thought would be nice. Anyway, for whatever reason, Lenamare's up to something so big that he's willing to use fourth order demons and waste his own castle in a rather incredible blast to try and take out Exador."

"Hmm, well, if you won't be needing me tonight, I could return to the Abyss, dig up what I can at the Courts of Chaos. Anna Leri claims she's got to work all night to get a gown ready for Lady Beth, so she won't be able to make our usual rendezvous…

“Normally, I'd find another lucky lass to share my bed, but it seems Anna Leri's told the other maids that I've got crabs to keep them from sleeping with me. Thus being out of luck, I'm free to do your bidding."

"Thank you, " Damien said with mock gratitude, "I feel so lucky to be served so faithfully by a demon in such high demand.” Antefalken nodded, with a slight smirk, accepting the gratitude in the spirit in which it was given.

Damien got a puzzled expression his face. "Crabs? They won't sleep with you over crabs? I can't even think they'd be able to tell. They haven't even noticed you're a demon yet!"

"I don't have crabs!" Antefalken finally stopped playing, "Anna Leri just told them that. And, of course, they know I'm a demon. That's why they want to sleep with me. After all, being 753 years old gives me more experience than any other man they're likely to meet. Plus you know how women always love an older man. Further, where exactly do you think all those legends of 'demon lovers' came from? I wrote half the book, and after one night, these maids know it! and they tell their friends."

"So why didn't you just tell them you'd gone to the Abyss and the crabs got burned off?"

"I tried, but apparently Anna Leri told them they were demon crabs and couldn't be gotten rid of short of a miracle from the gods." Antefalken moaned. Damien started laughing.





Chapter 34


Tom followed Rupert down the trail. Rupert was following the horses by several feet, and Jenn was on the first horse, as usual. Tom had given up talking to the girl. She was obviously as insane as any of the wizards. The only sane person in Astlan seemed to be Rupert, and if Tom was completely objective, he'd have say that Rupert was crazy for not being afraid of something as deadly as a demon.

~

Jenn continued to puzzle out the book in her hands. She'd tried several light probes but could figure nothing out about the spell that bound it. Whatever it was, Jehenna had gone to great lengths to secure it from prying eyes. Naturally this made Jenn even more curious. She was becoming convinced that whatever it was, it was probably the reason two masters had been assigned to the wagon train. Further, she was fairly certain it was what the demon was after. Why the demon just didn't grab it, she didn't know. Maybe it was waiting for her to figure out how to open it first, then steal it.

Jenn's thoughts were interrupted by a brilliant flash of what appeared to be fire in front of her. Her horse reared and started screaming in terror. Unprepared for the horse's action, Jenn went flying off backwards, onto the ground. "Whooooof" went Jenn as she had the breath knocked out of her.

"What the Abyss?" she tried to gasp, but lacked the air to do so. In front of her horse were two third order demons! Jenn would have screamed if she'd had the air. She didn't, so instead she tucked the book into one of her large robe pockets and frantically began reaching for spell components.

~

As Tom noticed a flash of red light from in front of the horses, he suddenly felt his arms grabbed from behind. Startled, Tom tried to duck and turn in midair, but found his wings and movement impeded by two demons hanging off the back of him. Shit! thought Tom. Just what I needed. He reached awkwardly around, over his right shoulder with both hands and grabbed the demon on that side. He grabbed the demon's head, poking himself on its horns. Without thinking he began to squeeze. The demon's head was tough. The demon howled in pain, but didn't let go.

Tom lost altitude and hit ground with the two demons still clinging to him. He heard Rupert shouting what sounded like obscenities, but didn't have time to pay much attention. He concentrated, squash! he thought, focusing all his concentration and strength on squeezing the demon's head. A red glow surrounded his claws. Suddenly there was a scream from the demon, and then a pop! as the demon's skull caved in. The demon let go. Its headless body sank to the ground and began to fade from sight. Tom flicked his claws to let the fading pieces of skull fall from his hands.

With one of his attackers down, Tom had more room to move. He swung around trying to grab the other demon clutching his left side. It swung around with him. Annoyed he reached over and grabbed the demon.

Wham! Crash! A flash of light from behind him startled him momentarily. Quickly he looked over his shoulder to see where two demons were attacking Jenn. One of them was reeling and smoking. It looked for all the world like it had been hit by a bolt of lightning. It probably had been, he thought raggedly. He ripped the demon off his side. Its claws raked along him, causing him pain, but he didn't have time to think.

He'd promised to protect these guys and he wasn't doing too great a job at the moment. The second demon got on its feet and charged Tom. Angry, frustrated and in a hurry, Tom took a deep breath, concentrated all his ki in his right fist, as his instructor had taught him, and brought it back, preparing to strike. As the demon charged in, Tom released his fist with all his strength and put his body behind it. His mind was tightly focused on the ki in his fist. The demon came in, Tom's fist moved forward. Tom imagined he could almost see the ki glowing in his fist.

Neatly, as if in slow motion, Tom's fist came together with the onrushing demon's face. As the two connected, Tom released the ki, with a loud "Kiya!" As the ki was released with the punch, Tom felt his fist smash into the demon, even as the demon was enveloped in a cloud of red light growing from Tom's fist, expanding as he felt his kiya expand from his lungs. The demon screamed once, loudly. The next thing Tom knew, there was a smoking corpse laying at his feet. Even that faded before his very eyes.

As the demon faded, Tom heard another nearby demon scream in pain. To his right, he quickly noticed that a fifth demon had grabbed Rupert and was holding him in the air, by Rupert's waist. The problem however, appeared to be that the demon was now bending over in pain while holding the boy. He was bending over in a way that Tom, as a male, fully understood. Apparently, having been lifted to the correct height, Rupert was able to get a good kick in to a critical anatomical piece of the demon. The kid must be a lot stronger than he looks to cause a demon that much pain, admired Tom.

As the demon was cringing over, Rupert, who's hands were free, pulled his hand back, and jammed two fingers into the demon's eyes. Once again the demon howled in pain. This time, however, in an attempt to cover its eyes, it dropped Rupert. Bringing its hands up to its face. At that moment, Tom heard a loud scream from Jenn.

He looked over to where she was. She'd been grabbed by the two demons attacking her. Apparently they were only trying to capture her, not kill her, because they seemed to be taking pains to hold onto her. Knowing he had to get over to her, but also knowing that he couldn't leave Rupert alone, Tom decided that one good kick deserved another. With a flying charge, Tom moved into the demon who's hands were covering its face. With another kiya, he kicked the demon with all his strength, in the same critical location Rupert had. The hovering demon howled in agony and was propelled upward and over through the air for several hundred feet.

Tom moved toward Jenn, trying to make his way around the screaming horses. The demons holding her looked up and saw him coming. One of them seemed to smile. As he did, the other spoke something and a burning ring of fire appeared in the air behind them. Tom came around the horses as fast as he could, but even as he rounded them, the demons stepped back through the hole. Tom reached out to grab them, but already the hole was closing around his fingers. The hole popped shut, leaving Tom grasping nothing.

Tom heard shouting from behind him. It was the demon he'd just wracked. It was shouting obscenities at him and Rupert from a distance. Something about eternal vengeance, blah, blah; Tom didn't care. He was just ticked off. He began flying towards the demon, intending on forcing it to tell him where the others had taken the girl. As the demon saw him approach, it quickly shut up and closed its eyes. Before Tom could reach it, it had faded from sight.

Tom sighed, and turned back down towards Rupert. He flew down to where the boy had picked himself up. Rupert seemed to have tears streaking his face, but the expression on his face told Tom they were tears of frustration not fear. "They got Jenn! How could they do that? I couldn't stop them! Why couldn't you?"

Rupert danced around in frustration. "Tom, what'll we do. They'll probably rape and mutilate her! Oh goddess! Where can they have taken her? Where!" He looked up angrily at Tom.

"I don't know." replied Tom helplessly.





Chapter 35


Red-golden light shown through the Corinthian pillars to Exador's right. Exador had just teleported into the entranceway pavilion of his erstwhile allies. The pavilion was neo-Grecian in Exador's mind. Large white marble Corinthian columns, twenty feet high supporting a marble roof.

To his left, about forty feet away was a solid marble wall with a single large curtained entranceway in the middle. Ahead of and behind him were more large columns separating the pavilion from the outside. The outside was pleasant, if a bit unusual. The sky was a translucent red, streaked with golden strands of clouds. No sun was visible from Exador's position.

The ground around the pavilion was covered with a wide variety of pleasant looking, if scrub like, plants. The soil was a reddish brown in color. Actually, to Exador's mind, it reminded him of images he'd seen of the place the columns came from, except it was all seen through rose colored glasses. Even the sporadic local fauna, reminded him of the images, there were some people and also a number of reddish, vaguely demonic looking centaurs roaming the grounds, apparently tending the plants.

Not caring to waste any more precious time admiring the admittedly artificial landscape, Exador proceeded through the gold silk curtains draping the single entranceway. Through the entranceway was another large chamber, apparently some form of antechamber. Along each of the walls were more columns, similar to those outside. Directly opposite the portal through which he'd just come, was a set of closed double doors. To the left and right of the large doorway stood minor demons of about the second order. Exador marched directly towards them. They came to attention as he approached. Apparently, however, they were expecting him, as the one on the left opened the doors before him.

Exador kept right on marching, ignoring the demons, and went into the room beyond. As he stepped into the room, the doors closed silently behind him. This room was smaller, but by no means could it be considered 'cozy' by human standards. It was approximately twenty feet on a side and square, with no other visible exits. The floor had an inlaid geometric design of black and white marble with inlaid gold. Exador quickly assessed the design, and determined it was not used in any sort of magical trap. Turning his attention from the floor, he noted the walls had relief carvings of people and animals doing all sorts of things, including coupling. In the center of the room was a large marble table, with no chairs around it.

Across the table from Exador was the first of his 'allies' and to the left side of the table was his second. Both, were most unusual looking allies. The one straight ahead was obviously male, of gigantic proportions. He was approximately nine feet tall and built literally like a god. His skin was a brilliant bronze color that almost glowed of its own accord. His eyes were a piercing, brilliant deep black, with almost no pupil. For clothing, he wore more jewelry than actual clothes. His actual clothing was limited to a silk loincloth held up by an intricately carved, large golden belt. On his head and shoulders he wore what his ally described as a 'pharaoh’s crown.' What exactly a pharaoh was, Exador did not know, but presumably, it somehow tied in with the landscape.

In any event, it was a gold crown that streamed down the side of the man's head onto his chest, with a large gold striped white cloth covering the rest of his head. In addition the man was wearing golden wrist and ankle bands and a large pendent with a truly massive ruby in it. Not to be outdone by his own looks, the man, who's ego was probably even greater than Lenamare's, had styled himself Ramses Maximus. Exador, knew of course that it was completely fictitious. He had little patience for the panopolistic games Ramses Maximus liked to play, and so simply called the man RM, which tended to annoy him.

His other ally, the one to RM's right, was not quite so ostentatious in attire or attitude, but was, in fact even more striking. She, and she was unquestionably a she, was only six feet tall, but her appearance was even more radical than RM's. For one thing, she was completely nude, except for an exquisite golden collar that while good sized, was not out of proportion to her body.

Bess, as she liked to be called, was the perfect figure of the ideal, shapely woman. Perfectly proportioned and completely sleek. Her skin color however, was ebony. Not ebony as in human black, but true ebony. She looked like an ebon statue. Her very skin was shiny and smooth like a statue yet incredibly flexible and lithe. Her skin however, was not her most unusual feature. Her most unusual feature was her head. Bess, had the head of a cat. Or rather, Bess had the head of an ebon statue of a cat. She had no hair like a cat, but rather her face appeared to be that of a cat's carved in ebony, with small pointy cat ears on the top of her head.

Both of his allies' forms were as artificial as their calling names and as artificial as the grounds around them. Exador had little patience for such games. He much preferred shape changing others rather than himself. Unfortunately, sometimes one had to take one's allies as they came. At least until they could be disposed of. Exador braced himself for the question he knew was to come, and looked Ramses Maximus in the eyes.

The question came, however, from Bess. "So, Lenamare got away? We thought you said you could take him with no problem?"

"I said," Exador corrected, turning his eyes to Bess, "that I could take him. That it might take time, but in the end, I could take him and get the book."

"It appears, however, that he's gotten away from you," stated RM.

"It appears," Exador retorted, sarcastically, "that he took out most of OUR army, and escaped with the book."

"Yes, that was most annoying." Bess purred.

"He's made it to Freehold, and is petitioning against me in the courts. The petitioning is just a stalling game, to give him time in the relative safety of Freehold."

"Time?" asked Ramses.

"Time to figure out how to open the book. He needs to hole up some place that he thinks is safe from me, to give himself time to study the book. By going through the legal process, he has good reason to be at Freehold, and further, to try and keep me and mine away from him while there."

"So you don't think he's succeeded in opening the book then?" asked Bess, staring at him intently.

"Would we still be standing here discussing this if he had?" responded Exador.

"Perhaps," interjected Ramses, thoughtfully, "it might take him a bit of time to get around to us. With his ego, he'd likely try to fry bigger fish than us first."

"Maybe, but I doubt he's so insane as to start out without some practice first. And if he had started, the Courts would have been in a state of total uproar." Exador countered. "If he'd succeeded with someone higher up than ourselves, he wouldn't lay low about it, and if he'd failed, he'd be dead."

"What about this fourth order he pulled out of nowhere? Are you sure this isn't his practice." Bess asked.

"No, it's legitimate. He either had it around for some time, keeping it a secret, or he just got lucky. I think the latter. I'd almost have to say it's a fresh catch. While extremely powerful, it isn't using its abilities to their fullest potential. If so, we'd have had a hell of a lot more trouble from it. That would indicate that it’s either new, or it’s playing political games with Lenamare."

"How often does one end up finding a newcomer that's fourth order? Not that often. If it's not using its abilities, I'd assume its master-demon politics and Lenamare just really doesn't have a clue to what it should be able to do." Ramses stated.

"Or doesn't want to push things, by allowing it too much freedom. Lenamare is not stupid, I remind you," added Bess. "He may know exactly what it can do, and just doesn't want to chance giving it a free hand."

"Either way, I am sure the demon is incidental. Lenamare hasn't opened the book yet." Exador insisted emphatically.

"So what's the next step?" Ramses asked.

"Well, one of our bungling search parties located a fleeing caravan. They intercepted it and got trashed by the fourth order. This was probably Jehenna's caravan. Lenamare may have been in it also, but he is already in Freehold, the caravan couldn't have made it there yet.

"I've sent out demons to intercept the remains of the caravan and hopefully they can tell us where the book is or more precisely what Lenamare is up to. I am relatively sure, however, that Lenamare has the book with him in Freehold. He'd be a fool to let it out of his sight." Exador explained.

"So we can confirm what we're already pretty sure of. How do we recover the book?" Bess asked.

"We've got to get someone into Freehold to steal the book for us. If we get anyone from the caravan, I may be able to influence them, or trick them into stealing the book from Lenamare, once they're reunited with him."

"Any possibility of a more overt move?" asked Ramses.

"I don't like relying on one of Lenamare's people being subverted. What about one of our people going in directly?" Bess proposed.

"The council members are blind fools, wrapped up in their own petty concerns. If something went wrong with this, and we were exposed in doing something; it would complicate things enough to get them questioning the whole situation. We don't want them to know about the book," Exador stated.

"What about one of our people or us, shape changed to look like one of Lenamare's people?" Ramses asked, pacing back and forth at his end of the table.

"Possible, but we'd need to know who to impersonate. It would have to be someone relatively high up in the school, and someone we'd have in our custody, dead or at least out of the way."

"Jehenna?" asked Bess, licking her lips.

"If she is with the caravan then maybe we can. However, as if impersonating her wouldn't be hard enough, if she’s not in the caravan then getting her out of the way in Freehold would certainly be difficult and noisy." Exador stated, exasperated. Bess had a couple three bones to pick with Jehenna.

"We must come up with something, however." Ramses insisted, trying to get the others to start coming together on a plan.

"We will," stated Exador, "our lives depend upon it."





Chapter 36


"Let go of me you stupid, lichen eating, moss bearing, demonic scumbags from hell!" Jenn shouted as she squirmed trying to make the demons let go of her. By any measure that she could think of, she should be scared out of her mind. Her anger seemed to be keeping fear at bay. For the moment at least; or maybe the close proximity of that stupid fourth order demon for a prolonged period had numbed her sense of self-preservation. Jenn didn't know, but she did know she was upset.

The demons had grabbed her and pulled her through some sort of gateway before Tom could get to her. At first she'd been scared they'd take her to the Abyss and do vile unspeakable acts of violence upon her person. After the nerve-shattering transition however, she'd found herself and the demons in the middle of an army camp. An army camp that had lots of wounded. From the insignias on the soldiers' uniforms she was pretty sure it was Exador's army, but it was a lot smaller than before and she didn't see Lenamare's castle over the tents surrounding her and the demons. Surely Lenamare couldn't have destroyed the entire castle as well as this many men. Exactly how powerful was that spell of his?

One of the demons held her tightly as the other explained to a guy in a uniform with lots of medals exactly what had happened. The officer, or so Jenn assumed he was, looked her over a couple times as the demon accurately described her kidnapping. Finally the demon finished and the officer stood lost in thought for a moment. At last he looked up to where the hovering demon was holding her and addressed Jenn directly. "So, you were wandering the countryside in the company of a greater demon? Amusing. You don't look old enough or powerful enough to control such a being, but maybe you had some control device?

"In either case, I am sure Lord Exador will wish to speak with you upon his return."

Aha, her guess was confirmed. She was in Exador's camp. Where, though, was the rest of his army? What exactly was that device of his that got so many soldiers wounded? Finally, where was Exador if he wasn't here now?

"Remove her robe, and make sure she has no spell components or magical items in her clothes underneath the robe. Then bind her hands and feet and put her in the prisoner tent." The officer instructed the demons.

Working together, the two demons quickly had Jenn trussed as directed. Despite her best efforts to struggle, they were just too strong. When they took her robe, Jenn became concerned. The mysterious book was in it, and she really didn't want them getting a hold of it. While she didn't know what it was, she was pretty sure Lenamare would be upset if it fell into Exador's hands. The loss of her spell components was also annoying, but expected. She could make do without them, assuming she ever got her hands free. Fortunately the weather was warm enough that her blouse and riding breeches would be warm enough without the robe.

The two demons hauled her over to a large center pole tent that had two human guards at the entrance. At the demons' approach, one guard raised the tent flap and stepped aside so the demon holding her could toss her in.

She fell hard on her face. The demons had tied her hands behind her back and her ankles were also tied together. As she rolled to her side, the light in the tent darkened as the tent flap closed behind her. The tent was basically empty except for a rather worn rug on the floor, and one other human inhabitant. The other prisoner was tied similar to herself and was leaning against the center pole of the tent. He was dressed in clothes that resembled a hodgepodge of Lenamare’s soldier’s uniforms and silk clothes. He was young, maybe slightly older than Jenn and his golden hair was disheveled, his face was red with white spotches. It appeared that he'd been crying a bit recently.

While he looked familiar, it took Jenn a little while to recognize him. It was one of the wizard's who'd ambushed her party. The one the demon had let run off. "You!" She accused.

~

Gastropé looked up at her. Until she'd shouted at him, Gastropé had only been vaguely aware that she was there. He'd paid just enough attention to be sure they weren't coming to get him when the tent flap had opened, and then sunk back into his misery. When he looked up at the shout, he recognized the caravan wizard who'd entangled him in weeds. He was momentarily startled. "What," Gastropé said flatly.

"You're one of the murdering scum that attacked my caravan. You're one of Exador's men! What are you doing in here?"

"I failed, your caravan won, thanks to that...that...demon thing of yours. Exador's annoyed, now he's going to punish me. Kill me; turn me into a toadstool; torture me; I don't know. It is all your fault though." Gastropé said, getting slightly angry towards the end.

Jenn was taken aback. "My fault! You attacked me? And it’s my fault you got your butt kicked?"

"Well, if you'd just surrendered, we would have taken you back here, and you'd be in the same place you are now, but I'd be in good standing. So , yes, it’s your fault." Gastropé said, seeming to perk up a little as he thought about it. They did capture her, thanks to his information; maybe Exador would be lenient.

"You have plenty of nerve. You and your buddies killed people I knew and cared for, and you have the nerve to blame me?" Jenn was mad again, mad enough to feel mean. "You're absolutely crazy! You talk tough now, but you weren't looking too mean last time I saw you. If I get my hands free, I'll summon my demon and see if you don't feel like being more reasonable." Gastropé blanched when Jenn said this. She immediately regretted having said it. Goddess knew how much the demon frightened her, and this kid had even more reason to fear Tom than she did. Not that she'd ever be stupid enough to summon the demon, but even so, the threat wasn't very nice. She couldn't take it back though. He had been asking for it, hadn't he?

They both sat in silence. There wasn't much to say. All they could really do was sit and wait for the return of Exador. Jenn, of course, decided to use the time to figure out how to escape. If only she could teleport. Of course, she'd still need to get the book back first. But if she could teleport, things would be a lot better. At the moment things didn't look too good.





Chapter 37


This is not my day; or rather, not my current incarnation, thought Tom. He wasn't exactly sure what to call it, but this current trip to Astlan just wasn't working out that well. He was sitting around bored in his cave, and this Jehenna Cut'n Run calls wanting help. So what's he do, he comes to Astlan, of his own free will even. The next thing he knows, he's knee deep in the dead; doing things no human being should ever be able to do. First of all, no one should be powerful enough to take out a whole band of soldiers with his own bare hands. Second, no decent human should be able to so blithely murder so many people so quickly, and feel so little about it.

That was part of what was bothering him. He really should feel more remorse over killing all those men. Why didn't he? He'd gone in and ripped men apart with his own hands without even thinking about it. What sort of person could do that? As far as he could figure, the only people who should be able to do that sort of thing and feel so little were serial killers. Did even they feel so little?

Even now, he was more upset about not feeling bad about killing them, then he did about killing them. Sure, he'd heard of a kill or be killed instinct taking over people in times of war or battle. But was that sort of attitude really justified in his case? There really was no kill or be killed. Those soldiers couldn't have killed him. At worst they could have damaged him enough to send him back to the Abyss, and it was extremely doubtful that those guys could even do that.

Following that -- for who knows what reason, boredom? Something -- he decides to play hired gun for a girl that hated him and a little kid making puppy dog eyes. So ok, maybe it was the right thing to do, despite the girl's cynicism. Even if it was the right principle, he had screwed that one up too. Demons come along and kidnap her, and he doesn't stop them. Demons that he knows the girl and the kid don't stand a chance against, but which he knows he can take on without running out of breath. He blew it. Now the girl, who he'd agreed to make his responsibility was gone. Kidnapped by vile creatures of hell.

Well, actually, they were really men like himself, but that was part of what worried him. He was afraid of the sort of violence he'd seen himself commit without thinking. He knew what he was capable of. What about these other demons, who could in fact be bitter after years of slavery and be more than willing to take out their hatred on a young wizard. Consider what Boggy had done to his accursed master!

Here, as a demon, Tom was continually finding himself incapable of controlling his emotions and his actions. He, who had always prided himself on being a calm, cool headed, analytic type, was literally running amuck. How he could trust someone who might not even have the semblance of control that he prided himself on having, someone of obvious criminal intent. Criminal intent? Well wouldn’t purposefully kidnapping someone require criminal intent? Certainly, but killing a few dozen soldiers doesn't! Hah! Tom almost laughed hysterically at himself.

What was happening to him? Why was he in this situation? why me? Tom wanted to cry out. He didn't, of course. Rupert was there, running around in circles wanting to know what to do. Tom had to keep a stiff upper lip as the British always said in the movies. He couldn't show weakness. Rupert was counting on him, him! to solve the problem and get Jenn back. How was he going to do this? How did he get stuck in this farcical hero role? If he were a character in a book he was reading, he'd damn the author to hell. Hmm, well, given the circumstances, at least he could then punch the author in the face because they'd both be in the same place. Tom almost laughed hysterically again.

As it was, there was no one to blame for his situation. Except maybe Lenamare and Jehenna for enslaving him, this Exador guy for warring on Lenamare, his friends Paul and Reggie who gave him the joint, his mother for moving them to Harding, 'to get away from the old place,' and forcing him to have to go to a stupid party to make new friends. His stepdad for divorcing his mom. Finally blame the whole stupid party for making him take the damn joint.

Blame himself for taking the joint. That was it, of course. It was his own fault. No one else's. One lousy joint, and here he was literally damned to hell. A little severe, but maybe those right-wing preacher types weren't all crazy. They were certainly correct in this case. Oh, sure, it wasn't exactly what they'd meant, but the idea was there. It was kind of, Tom thought, like believing that you can't get pregnant by having sex just once without protection. No one ever died from one joint! Not until now. Now he was doomed to being some sort of robotic killing machine going around munching up humans at the beck and call of some two bit wizard. Ok, maybe, thought Tom, an eight bit wizard. Tom almost smiled to himself. If the guy can throw nuclear bomb spells, then he's definitely worth a buck. The guy was certainly playing with a full byte.

Of course, all of this useless philosophizing wasn't getting him anywhere. One would think he was the villain, going on for hours on end with a boring monologue of their innermost thoughts, rather than the heroic man of action. Heroic Man of Action! Hah! So what action could he take? How was he going to get the girl back so she could continue hating him.

Of course, if this were a movie, or a book, and he rescued her, then the hero handbook would require her to fall madly in love with him. She'd forget the fact that he was a demon and love him for what was inside instead. She'd realize that he was the good guy and everyone would be happy, they'd marry, the book would end. Then in the sequel they'd set out together to rescue their half human-half demon children from some other evil megalomaniac. What could they do for a trilogy?

Give it up, Tom told himself, you really are going insane. "So, what are the chances these demons that grabbed Jenn work for the guy besieging the castle?" Tom asked Rupert.

Rupert stopped pacing abruptly. Tom had been quiet for so long, that his voice had startled him. "Well, I don't know. Why would Exador's people want Jenn? Do you have any enemies? Could it be some ancient feud of yours? Could they having been trying to sabotage what they thought was your assignment?"

"I doubt that. I don't have any enemies that I know of."

Rupert looked at him curiously. "Oh. You killed them all off? Little gruesome, but practical I suppose. Cuts down on revenge crazed maniacs."

"No! I didn't kill them, I've just never made any enemies that would be around here." On Earth maybe, but doubtful, Tom thought.

"Really, in all those centuries, you've never made an enemy?"

Tom looked at the kid exasperatedly, "No. Just exactly how old do you think I am? Never mind, is there anyone else who might send demons to kidnap Jenn? Lenamare or Jehenna?"

"Lenamare or Jehenna waste that kind of magic on a student? Not even if the student's life depended on it. Jenn didn't have any enemies that powerful, that I know of. Her parents weren't nobility or anything."

"So then, it must be Exador. Would they have taken her back to the army?"

"You're the greater demon. Where do you normally drag women off to when you kidnap them?"

"I don't drag them off," he looked at the kid, harshly, knowing what he was thinking. "No, I don't just kill them on the spot either."

"I didn't say you did. But I don't know. Seems as good a place as any."

"Of course, if Lenamare nuked the army, there probably isn't anything left to take her back to."

Rupert nodded, he didn't know much of anything about the spell, other than it was supposed to be powerful. He supposed Tom would understand such things. "I don't know where Exador's castle is. Thus the school is the only place they could have taken that we know where it is.

"Unless they took her to the Abyss..." Rupert added a second later.

"The Abyss? Well, yeah, I guess, but what would they do with her there."

Rupert got kind of pale.

"Sorry, assuming they work for Exador, and he wants something from her, then what would they do with her in the Abyss?"

"Hold her there. It would be impossible for her to escape from there. She isn't a good enough wizard to get out. Actually, I don't think any wizards are that good."

"True, but then, how would we find her? Finding her there would be just as hard as finding her here."

"Would it? I've never been there. Would you take me some time?"

Tom looked at the kid askance. What the hell? literally, was wrong with this kid?

"But anyway, wouldn't she stick out like a sore toe? After all, how many humans can there be in the Abyss?"

Everybody, Tom thought, but it wasn't worth going into right now, he knew what the kid meant. "True, but even so, we can't search every cave in the Abyss. It just isn't practical."

"Do you have any connections? Other demons that could tell if something like this was going on there?"

"I don't think so..." Tom paused, thinking. He doubted Boggy or Tizzy would be able to find anything like this out. "No, not really."

"Well then, I guess that means there is only one place to look."

"Back to the castle. I guess I'll carry you so we can go faster."

"Ok then, but what will we do with the horses? They won't let me get close enough to unsaddle them, nor will they let you. So just turning them loose is going to be a problem."

Tom was tempted to say 'Eat them?' but decided the joke would be in poor taste, given the situation. He just shrugged and stared at the horses, pondering what to do.





Chapter 38


The courts hadn't changed much since the last time Antefalken was there. Which, given that he was last there two weeks ago, was actually saying quite a bit. The Courts of Chaos tended to change with the moods and temperaments of the people dwelling there. Currently it was in the ever popular urban-punk mode. The Courts, which essentially comprised a small city, looked like the standard post-atomic, no nuclear war, societal collapse city. Antefalken believed the current in vogue phrase was cyberpunk, but since he didn't know for sure what a cyber was, he wasn't sure if that was the accurate term

As he wandered down the streets he noted the typical street demons dressed in blue jeans and leather jackets. Naturally, most had holes cut out of the human apparel to accommodate assorted demonic appendages. While, he supposed that they tended to look rather intimidating to the outsider, from years of dealing with the courts, he knew that most were simply gutless sycophants, and court lackeys and hangers-on who had nothing better to do with their immortal existence than to play dress up games. Which was fine with Antefalken, to each his own. He, however, would rather spend his immortal existence in bed with a fair damsel, or even the good old standby, lusty wench.

As he wandered down the street, giant crumbling steel, glass and concrete buildings towering over him, Antefalken tried to wander in the direction of the town center. It wasn't always easy, as occasional burned out vehicles lined the streets and every now and then a car with a gang of street toughs would zoom by, trying to shoot him with lightning bolts or fire darts. Every few blocks he'd encounter a road block of some sort, either a collapsed building or toll trolls, and he'd have to detour on a side street. He wasn't in any particular hurry though. It was always kind of fun to meander down the streets.

The vast majority of the demon punks he encountered were class two. A few threes were mixed in, now and then, as well as a few class ones. The class ones, tended to avoid the courts. For one thing, most weren't powerful enough to handle the games that went on within the courts. The other reason was that many type one demons were essentially trapped full time in servitude, with very little free time.

Actually, many of the indentured demons tended to stay away from the courts. Most indentured demons were younger and less interested in playing games, even if highly deadly games. They just hadn't become bored enough with immortality to want to meddle in court intrigues. Now and then, Antefalken would spy a limousine zooming by carrying some important fourth order or maybe even a fifth. Those individuals played power games that left the petty jealousies of the lower demons in the dust.

Unfortunately, it was just those power games that Antefalken was walking into. If he wanted information, he'd have to go to the top. Or at least close to it. Fortunately, there didn't tend to be too many bardic demons running around, and thus Antefalken was held in fairly good esteem in the courts. By his own private admission, he wasn't the greatest of bards, not that he'd ever let anyone else know. However, by the standards of this court, he wasn't bad.

Eventually he reached the center of the city. The river Styx actually narrowed considerably and ran right through the center of the city. Since it did narrow so much, it moved incredibly fast. Often hapless individuals who fell in were carried completely out of the city before they could get out. While demons were largely immune to the effects of the Styx, it did tend to give them some short term forgetfulness for a year or two. On the opposite side of the river from Antefalken, on the far side of a large brown brick suspension bridge, stood the center of Demondom. The Palace of the Concordenax.

Currently and for the last two hundred years, the outside, at least, of the palace was modeled after some late medieval cathedral from some backwater plane. Due to the strange name of the cathedral, the cathedral's name had stuck, and for the last few centuries no one called it the Palace of the Concordenax, but rather by the cathedral's own name. Antefalken had never been a particularly religious man, but he thought that if he were, this would be the name of any cathedral he'd build, the Cathedral of the Notorious Dame.

Actually, Antefalken thought, as he walked across the long bridge towards Notorious Dame, that name was a lot better than Palace of the Concordenax. After all, it wasn't like anyone had actually seen the Concordenax in the last couple millennia. As far as anyone could tell, he'd taken a permanent vacation and gone off to parts unknown. Thus it was that the Abyss was ruled in his stead by the Triumvirate.

The Triumvirate, now there was a nasty lot. Antefalken got nightmares every time he'd had to play before them. While they'd never taken any offense at his carefully guarded melodies, they'd never seemed much inspired either. Antefalken was more than happy to restrict his playing to Archdemons and Greater Demons when he was in need of demonic favors. Demon Princes were just a bit too powerful for his peace of mind.

Antefalken walked up the blood red stone path to the main doors of the cathedral. The two demonic guards at the doors simply continued to stare straight ahead as he approached. As usual, the centermost large doors opened of their own accord, allowing Antefalken to pass within to the most unhallowed halls in all the Abyss. Inside the main doors, the design of the cathedral departed widely from what Antefalken expected the original designers of Notorious Dame intended.

Inside the light level was three times as bright as what the outside's dingy stained glass windows could be expected to provide. Antefalken entered a long foyer that opened directly in to the main throne chamber of the Triumvirate. This particular chamber was only used for highest ceremonies and was large enough to squeeze several hundred demons or a thousand mortals in at one time. The chamber was all in brilliant white marble with heavy tracings of silver and gold adorning everything. The hall was originally designed, some said, to mimic the throne room of one of the greater gods of law and justice. Since its original conception, seven thousand years ago, the original intent had been forgotten by most. While the outside and most other rooms in the palace changed with time, and the city even more frequently, the throne room had remained constant. It was a symbol of the Triumvirate's unwavering rule, more powerful and longer lasting than any mortal ruler could ever dream.

Antefalken chose one of several passages to his right and proceeded down one that he knew quite well. It was a long walk through seven different corridors, up one elevator, up one then down another spiral staircase, up one escalator and a ride on one moving sidewalk. Eventually he reached the large set of obsidian double doors, framed in malachite that he'd been heading for.

Quickly, he brushed his hair with one hand and straightened his collar with the other. He didn't like dealing with the Triumvirate, but he would get close, very close. He pulled the unopened bottle of Louis XIII out from under his arm as he knocked on the doors. The echo on the other side was surprisingly loud for the heaviness of the doors. The doors opened almost immediately, as if he'd been expected, as he probably was. He glanced through the doors, blinking in the hazy red light coming from inside, a smile lit his face. "Lilith, my dear, how long has it been?" He asked as he stepped through the doors.





A Treatise on The Hierarchy of The Abyss.

By Glashow mac Allum

Sage to the High Lords of Gizzor Del

Demons are, in general, a rowdy and chaotic bunch of malefactors; as such, they respect few rules, except that of force. To the best ability of wizards and sages to determine, demonic society is highly chaotic and disorganized. It is much more strongly feudal than that of humans. Extremely powerful demons lord it over weaker demons, who in turn hold sway over even weaker demons. Even so, the treachery and backstabbing is still extreme. All demons are clever and crafty, always seeking advantages over others, even their own kind and their own leaders.

Even so, at least at the true top levels there is some constant, semi-stable hierarchy based solely on power. The Demon Princes, of which there are very few (13 it is believed) rule unchallenged. The Arch Demons serve the princes and the class IV demons often serve the Arch Demons and from there on down things become tangled. Further, it should be noted that at least some of the Arch Demons and Greater Demons owe only nominal allegiance to those above.

To the best ability of Astlanian sages to determine, there is or was, one supreme demon over all. Apparently, however, this unnamed being, known only as Demon Father, or the Concordenax, has been gone/dead/missing/out of the picture for the last millennium. Directly below the Concordenax are two incredibly powerful demons who currently, effectively, rule the Abyss. Their true names are of course unknown to all; their calling names however, are Sammael and Lilith. Sammael seems to be the more powerful, male demon, and Lilith is his consort. They rule as emperor and empress. They are referred to as the Cofactors of the Abyss. Below them is the Triumvirate. The Triumvirate is essentially the daily governing body of the Abyss. The Prime Ministers if you will. The calling names of these three demons are believed to be Asmodeus, Baalzebul, and Mephistofeles. Together the Triumvirate and the Cofactors form the Quintenal Cabal. The ministers below the Quintenal Cabal are the Supreme Septat. The Supreme Septat consists of 7 Demon Princes of slightly lower power.

Thus at the base of all is the Concordenax around which all revolves (1), followed by the Cofactors (2) with the Triumvirate (3) the last two of which form the Quintenal Cabal (2 + 3 = 5) and finally the Supreme Septat (7). The numerology is obviously with the demons. (1 + ( 2 + 3 {=5}) + 7 {= 13}), the principal primes adding up so nicely is surely some form of power omen. The full significance of which is not completely understood by the best of the sages of men.

Below the level of the Demon Princes, things are not well understood by men. The belief is that the Concordenax is something possibly above a normal Demon Prince there are thus two top levels, the Concordenax and then the Princes. Further, of the Princes there are three groups, (Cofactors, Triumvirate, Supreme Septat). Thus, many sages insist, the third level, the Arch Demons, must, by numerological consistencies consist of five groups (the next prime). In addition they say, these five groups must (following the ordering of 1, 2, 3, (5), 7, (13)), consist of 17, 19, 23, 29 and 31 each in that order of power. Now, this means there are 119 Arch Demons, while this number is not prime, 119 has a prime factorization of 5 x 17, the number of groups times the number of demons in the first group. While not ideal, this is an auspicious enough theory as to hold some weight with the sages. Similar counting arguments can be used to determine the number of Greater Demons on down. However, things become less auspicious and the information gleaned is not sufficient to warrant too much faith.

As to what level of allegiance the various demons owe their overlords, it is not completely clear. What is clear is that the closer demons are to their overlords in physical proximity or their overlord's power base the stronger their allegiance to that overlord. Logical enough.

As for the geography of the Abyss itself. The Abyss is essentially infinite in size. It is reported that the temperature is well over the boiling point of water at all times, and that pillars of stone may rise straight up for miles from red, rocky and otherwise lifeless desert floors. Further, in some regions there are vast mountain ranges easily twice as high as any found in the planes of men. High enough, some say, that snow may be found on their peaks, even though wine itself boils at sea level.

Not only is the heat unbearable for mortals in the Abyss, but fire itself is a constant enemy. Great balls of fire and heated plasma will suddenly expand from nothing in the middle of the air, engulfing all for hundreds of feet before disappearing as quickly as they came.

In addition, the mighty River Styx is said to flow through the center of the Abyss on its eternal journey delivering the souls of the deceased to their final resting place. How it is that the river itself does not boil in the infernal heat is not clear, but then nothing about the River Styx or the Abyss itself is clear.

It is further said, that in the Abyss alone, does mighty Charon, the boatman ever relax his eternal vigilance, and sometimes allow a demon to swoop down and scoop up one of the unwary, yet damned, passengers on the boat. What the demons do with the hapless souls is unknown, as is why Charon should allow this. What is clear is that one should seek to take the boat going the other direction in the afterlife.

This concludes most of what can be said in certainty about the Abyss and the hierarchy thereof. Not much is truly known, for the only way to really know, is to consort with demons. Most demons being unwilling to divulge information freely (most likely they are all merchants at heart) they must be tricked or tortured into confessing what they know.

Needless to say, this is neither an easy nor safe task to undertake. Further, all of what demons say must be considered suspect, since it is well known that among their greatest passions is lying (the others being rape, murder {not necessarily in that order}, cheating, wholesale slaughter, destruction, debauchery, gluttony, and lewd conduct as well as general maleficence. Oh yes, and foremost, thwarting their master's aims and plans and seeing to his eventual ruination). As that is all that can be said, I thank you for your attention.





Chapter 39


"Well, yeah, that probably was a small nuclear device Lenamare activated." Tom said as he peered through the distance to where the castle had been. It was dark out, and the ex-castle was far away, but as Tom had discovered, neither was much of an impediment to demonic sight. Not that the dark mattered too much. The crater in which Lenamare's castle had stood, except for a small finger on which Exador's army was perched, glowed an unnerving blue. The trees around the crater had been burned to grayish stumps.

"I'm not so sure it's a good idea for those guys to be camped there," Tom commented, thoughtfully.

"Why not?" asked Rupert who was twisting around in Tom's arms to see the encampment.

"Radiation. If, as the blue glow would seem to indicate, that place is highly radioactive, everyone inside will get very sick."

"Well good," Rupert said, "they are the enemy after all. However, while I don't know what this radiation stuff you're talking about is, you can be pretty sure Exador would have taken precautions to protect his people from it. He's at least as good as Lenamare."

"We can hope so, because enemy or not, radiation sickness is pretty bad from what I've heard. Besides, we think Jenn is down there. Right?"

"Oh, yeah. I guess that’s right." Rupert conceded.

"So, how do we find out if she's there?" Tom asked. "I'm not exactly inconspicuous."

"Well, I thought about that," said Rupert. "I can walk down there, acting like I'm lost and crying for my big sister Jenn. They capture me and put me with her."

"I don't know," Tom said, unsure. "One, it sounds kind of corny, and I doubt they'd go for it, and two, it’s way too dangerous for you. Finally three, then you're all captured, what good does that do?"

"Well, once they capture me, all I have to do is get a fire going, and I have flint and steel, then I can use your true name to conjure you; if you are willing, I don't need any spells. Then, once you are there, you can maul our way out."

"Hmm great," Tom was just thrilled at the prospect of killing more people. "It's still too dangerous for you."

"Look, they're people, they may be the enemy, but they're not going to kill off a harmless little kid immediately. At the very least if they know I'm a student they'll want to torture me to make me talk."

"Oh, that really convinces me there."

"Look, if they torture me I can use the flames they heat the irons with to summon you." Rupert said smiling. "Look, they're not going to hurt me. I can take care of myself."

"Uh huh, and what if they've got more demons down there? They might not care, and just see a little wizard kid and kill him."

"I'm not afraid of demons."

"So...I've...noticed..." Tom said. "Look, I can't be responsible for you getting caught, hurt and maybe killed."

"Tom," Rupert said, in that way little kids get when they're exasperated with a stupid adult, "I know what I'm doing. They're not going to hurt me. It's the only way, unless you can shape change into a little kid? or an animal or something."

"Uhmm." Tom didn't know about that. He'd never tried and wouldn't really know where to begin. "Let me think." What was he going to do? He couldn't let the kid go down there and get himself captured. Even if they did capture him and didn't kill him, there was no guarantee they had Jenn in captivity or would put Rupert in the same place as her. He just couldn't think of a better plan.

This was insane, true, it was keeping in line with every other thing he'd seen these wizards do, but still. Sending a nine year old kid into the middle of the enemy encampment didn't seem like the heroic thing to do. On the other hand, if he just went marching in, a lot of people would get killed including Jenn.

"All right. It's against my better judgment, but I don't know what else to do." Tom conceded.

Rupert just smiled in triumph at getting his way.

~

The ground squished muddily under Rupert's feet. He was trying to get close to the sentry's position without giving away the direction he'd came from. He wasn't sure why, since he was going to give himself up anyway, and Tom would be gone back to the Abyss to wait for his call. It just seemed like the thing to do. He'd known Tom would see it his way. It was the only reasonable plan. Further, for whatever Tom's protestations, he had to know there was no way the soldiers were going to hurt him. He'd come up with the plan on the couple hour flight back to the castle, and he was proud of it. It was his first major battle plan.

His hearing detected the step of a marching sentry nearby. Quietly, he snuck closer to the sentry’s path, and purposefully broke a stick. The sentry stopped. The air in the clearing where they were was quiet. It stunk like ashes, and not even a cricket was chirping. "Who goes there?" the sentry called out. Rupert made a small whimpering noise. He picked up some ashes and threw them in his eyes to make them water. "Halt I say. Stay where you are," the sentry marched closer to Rupert's position, but still didn't see him.

What an idiot, thought Rupert, Exador should have him hung. Well, if I've got to do it myself, I do it myself. Rupert made another whimpering noise and then tried to bolt through the long grayish grasses that had been concealing him. He pretended to trip on a root and cried out. "Got you!" said the sentry as he grabbed Rupert by the shoulder as he floundered. "Halt or I gut you."

Like I am really scared of you, guy, thought Rupert. Nonetheless, he halted and stood trembling in mock fear, tears running down his face. "Who are you?" asked the soldier. Rupert just sniffled and trembled some more. "Come on kid, tell me who you are and I won't hurt you."

Rupert trembled some more and snuffled, "Wupert, sir."

"Rupert? What are you doing here Rupert? You know you shouldn't be here."

"Looking for sissy," Rupert mumbled.

"Looking for your kitty?"

Give me a break, Rupert thought, how did these guys ever force us to leave the castle? "No, my sister. She was in the castle...snnnffff...snnnfffff...and now it’s gone...waaaahhh...waaahhh..sniff sniff"

"Hmm, I'd better take you to the major. If you're from the castle, he'll want to know."

Take me to your leader! thought Rupert. Let's get on with it already. The soldier marched Rupert into the center area of the camp. Rupert shook his head as he pretended to sob and snuffle. What sort of stuff were they teaching these soldiers? The man just abandoned his post to take a bawling brat to the commander. If only Rupert had had an army waiting in the trees. Here he was, a little kid and he knew more about strategy and tactics then these grown soldiers in Exador's army. Rupert just couldn't get over it.

He was led to a large tent. The tent flap was opened by two other guards as the sentry approached. "Major?" the soldier called out as they entered the tent.

"Yes," said a tall man in a red uniform with lots of shiny medals.

"I found this kid out on my patrol. He was trying to sneak up on the camp. Claims he's looking for his sister."

"He was doing what?"

"Sneaking up on the camp."

"Did you check to make sure there weren't any others as well?"

The soldier paused, looked abashed, "uh, uhm, no."

"You are lucky Lord Exador isn't here, or you'd be regretting it for the rest of eternity. You take more men and scour that area, immediately or I may just tell him." The major thundered. The soldier let go of Rupert's shoulder and ran out the tent.

The major looked down at Rupert. "Now, were there any others?" Rupert shook his head no. "What were you doing out there, son?"

Rupert shrugged, acted scared, he mumbled, "looking for my sister."

"So you told Dobson. Why did you think she might be here?"

"Cause she was in the castle, and now there's no castle. What did you do to it? Did you kill her?!" Rupert let his voice escalate getting shriller and shriller.

"No, no son." The major put his hands on Rupert's shoulder, Rupert flinched. "We didn't do anything, the castle people did it themselves. It's not clear if your sister survived, but many others did. If you promise to be a good boy and stay here with us, we'll find your sister for you. Ok?"

Rupert nodded shyly. The major smiled, satisfied that he had a willing prisoner, which he did. "Now son, for a little while, I'm going to have to make sure you don't cause any trouble, until I know you don't have any friends hiding out there. So I'm going to have to bind your hands." Rupert looked frightened. "It won't be for long, only until I can verify your story and I won't tie them too tight. Ok?"

Rupert pretended to look scared, but nodded acquiescence. The major took his nod for agreement, and walked over to a small nearby table. As Rupert's eyes followed the major, they lit up when they saw what was on the table with the rope, Jenn's robe! So they did have her. And there was her not quite a diary beside it. She'd thought that book quite important. Was there any way he could get it? He thought quickly. He'd never tried it, but it had been in one of the books in the library he'd snuck a peak at. He twiddled his finger in the way he thought he remembered, concentrated on the doorway and said under his breath, "Major come quickly!"

Outside the tent, a rather high pitched voice said somewhat indistinctly, "Major come quickly!" The major looked up, looked over at Rupert and said, "stay there." He ran outside the tent, the rope in his hands.

Rupert hurried over to the table, grabbed the book and ran back to where he'd been left. He stuffed the book down his trouser leg, hoping he could hold it between his thighs, and trusting that his pants, tucked into his boots, would keep the book from falling out if he couldn't. A few minutes later, the major came back in, looking puzzled, shaking his head. He walked over to Rupert. "Strange. Put your hands together in front of you." Rupert did, and the major tied them, firmly but gently.

"Jorgen." The major called, summoning a guard from outside. "Lead this lad over to the prisoner tent. Treat him nicely though, he hasn't done anything wrong, yet." The soldier nodded and took Rupert by the shoulder. Rupert shuffled along, pretending fear, and hoping he could keep the book wedged in his pants, between his legs.





Chapter 40


Jenn was beginning to figure out that there was no easy way to get out of her bonds, when she heard soldiers approaching the tent and greeting her guards. Great, she thought, Exador's probably back and wants information. Won't this be fun. She hadn't felt like talking too much to Gastropé since her first encounter, but he had insisted on cataloguing things that Exador had done to past people on his hit list.

It wasn't pleasant, and hadn't made Jenn feel any better. Fortunately, she felt herself to be of sterner stuff than Gastropé. The poor wizard, whom she'd actually come to view with a mix of pity and contempt, was getting desperate. The more he talked, the more nervous he got, the more he started spouting off crazy ideas on getting away.

The flaps to the tent parted, and a really short person was instructed to enter the tent. The only light in the tent was a small brazier between the door and the center pole. It had been lit a few hours earlier as the evening started to approach, to take the chill off in the room. As the short person entered the tent, Jenn gasped, it was Rupert! How in the Abyss had they managed to capture him? What was that damn demon doing anyway? Some guardian. Unless the demon had turned Rupert in, because he knew Jenn had the book and the game was won. That must be it, Jenn thought angrily.

Rupert stumbled into the tent, clumsily; he seemed to be walking kind of funny. His face was also rather red, as if he'd been crying. It took a lot to make Rupert cry. What had those bastards done to the poor kid? Jenn tried to move forward. Maybe it was the demon's betrayal; Rupert had placed all his trust in the demon and now he saw it for what it really was, it must hurt. "Rupert, what are you doing here?" Jenn asked as she tried to rock forward, the ropes on her ankles and wrists made it difficult in her current sitting position.

Rupert shook his head in a short quick manner, and pursed his lips as if to say, "Shh shh." He glanced covertly behind him to make sure the flaps were closed again, which they were. He shuffled over to Jenn, as he did, he noticed Gastropé. "What's he doing here?" Rupert asked in a whisper.

"He botched trying to take us, so now Exador is going to punish him." Jenn answered also in a whisper. She wasn't completely sure why she should whisper, neither she nor Gastropé had bothered earlier. "More importantly, what are you doing here?"

Rupert moved around behind her, out of both her sight and Gastrope's. "I'm here to rescue you."

"Rescue me!" Jenn exclaimed, a little too loudly.

"Shhhh, be quiet!" Rupert hissed vehemently.

"How are you going to rescue me?" Jenn asked, twisting around to try to see what Rupert was up to. He'd moved around behind Gastropé. Jenn's eye's bulged and she gasped slightly. Somehow, when Rupert went behind her, he'd managed to slip his bonds, and was now tearing a piece of his shirt off, very quietly. "What are you doing?" she asked. "How did you get free?"

"I'm just a kid, they didn't tie me very tight," Rupert replied. "I'm ensuring we aren't given away."

"Please," Gastropé broke in, unable to see what was going on; he was shifting around but was apparently tied to the tent pole. "Please, if you’re going to escape, take me with you!" Gastropé whispered urgently. "I won't give you away, I don't want to die! I won't give you away." He was sounding extremely desperate. Desperate enough that Rupert paused for a moment.

"I don't believe you, you're the enemy." Rupert stated as he stuffed the strip of his shirt into Gastrope's mouth as a gag.

"No, no, please, Exador is going to kill me or shape change me or do something hor...mmmmphh," Gastropé was cut off by the gag.

Jenn was torn, true he was the enemy, but certainly, he was going to face an awful fate. Wait, Jenn thought as she stopped herself, this was ridiculous. She was thinking like they were actually going to escape. There was no need to feel like she was leaving Gastrope', because they weren't going anywhere. "Rupert you still haven't told me how you think we are going to get out of here. You've got to be crazy."

"No," Rupert answered, smiling back at Jenn. "I'm not, but you're going to think I am." He moved behind Jenn. She couldn't see what he was doing, but he was messing with her bonds. "Jenn, lay on your stomach, please."

"Why?"

"Because I said so. Come on Jenn, we haven't got much time." Rupert responded. Jenn decided to play along, given the earnestness in his tone. She flopped over and placed her bound feet near Rupert. Rupert reached down and a few seconds later her feet were free. He had a knife! The little squirt had smuggled a knife in! That was how he broke free of his bonds!

"Rupert, why didn't you tell me you had a ...." Rupert's hand went over her mouth.

"Shh, we don't want the entire world to know," he told her. She felt him messing with her wrist ropes again, another few seconds and a bit of tugging later, her hands were free.

"Great, thanks Rupert!" She whispered gratefully. Her wrists and ankles were so sore; she just sat up and rubbed them for a few moments.

"Now comes the part where you'll think I'm crazy, and why I had to gag him." Rupert gestured over to Gastropé who'd been watching the whole thing with pleading eyes and tears dripping down his face. Jenn's heart went flip flop seeing him look so pathetic.

Rupert went over and hunched down over the brazier as if trying warm his hands. What was he doing Jenn wondered? He seemed to be talking to himself. He'd obviously lost his mind. Rupert went on for almost a minute, getting almost feverish in his mumblings. Jenn's feet and wrists were just coming back to life from being a sleep. As soon as they felt a bit better, she'd go over and comfort the boy. He was obviously traumatized. Behind her, Gastropé gasped.

Jenn turned to look at him. He was staring wide-eyed at the boy. It looked like some sort of fearful comprehension was illuminating his face. Like he knew what the boy was doing, and it terrified him. Jenn felt a chill race down her spine. Surely, surely, the kid couldn't be that addlepated could he? Even if he were, there was no way a nine year old boy could pull it off. Was there?

As Jenn turned to stare fearfully back at Rupert. A sudden updraft in the room seemed to suck all the air right towards the fire. The fire roared up, towering above Rupert. Rupert stumbled back, surprised but excited and smiling in triumph. The flames shot up, lapping against the ceiling, roaring like a bonfire and producing even more heat. There was no way any normal brazier of that size could produce that much flame.

Commotion started from outside the tent as the guards realized something was definitely wrong. Rupert stumbled over by Jenn as the flames widened, blocking Jenn's view of the tent flaps. The flames were starting to eat at the roof of the tent. Pretty soon the entire tent would burn down! What the hell had the kid done? They'd all burn to death if the demon he conjured didn't kill them first. The guards by this point, had opened the flaps and were screaming and yelling for help.

As the first of the guards started through the flaps, or so it seemed from Jenn's obscured view, a hole seemed to appear in the middle of the fire. It was as if someone were literally ripping a hole in the fabric of space, directly in the middle of the fire. Giant demon claws emerged from the hole, widening it further. This was certainly not the traditional method for demons coming into Astlan, Jenn thought. Through the hole, Jenn could see what looked to be the fourth order demon, and as the hole got large enough, what appeared to be some sort of cave behind him.

A guard came stumbling into the tent with a coat in hand, trying to get close enough to smother the flame. As he came around the fire, he saw the demon claws already through the hole, and then a giant hoof coming through the hole. He screamed at the top of his lungs and cowered back. Almost immediately three other guards came charging into the tent and around the fire. Apparently, they couldn't see the hole from the other side.

By the time two more guards had come in, the demon had stepped completely through the hole. Its horns were ripping against the ceiling of the tent which was blackening with fire from the flame in the brazier. The demon's massive hooves were causing the very rug to smolder and start to smoke. "Good job, Rupert!" The demon thundered in a gravelly bass voice. Jenn was gasping, partly from the smoke, but mainly from the fact that Rupert had actually managed to summon the damn thing.

Somehow or the other, despite the confusion, Jenn heard or noticed Gastropé over the yelling of the guards and the roar of the fire. She glanced over, he was squirming madly, trying to get free of his bonds and the tent pole he was tied to. She had a moment of panic; even if the demon somehow got them out of there, Gastropé would surely get burnt alive by the flames. The entire ceiling of the tent was now ablaze and bits of it were falling down. She had to duck as she got to her feet to avoid them. Seeing Gastropé's desperate attempts, she knew she couldn't leave him to die, enemy or not. She ran over to the tent pole and began fumbling with the knot in the rope binding him to the pole.

As Jenn struggled with the knot, one of the soldiers stabbed at the demon with his sword. The sword bounced off the demon's hide. The towering demon turned its gaze away from Rupert and Jenn and directed it toward the offending guard. Almost faster than the human eye could follow, the demon's right hand shot over to his left side and grabbed the blade of the sword. Fire spewed down the blade of the sword from the demon's hand, washing over the guard and onto the soldier's hand and arm. The soldier screamed in pain, releasing the sword and stumbling back against the tent wall.

As the guard hit the tent wall, the center pole swayed dangerously. The tent was now sufficiently aflame as to weaken the overall structural integrity, and it almost went down. Almost, but not quite. Looking at the guard with eyes blazing with power and hatred, the demon shouted. "All of you soldiers! Run now, or I will slay you where you stand!"

The soldiers ran outside the tent. One slashed a hole in the side of the tent and ran out that way. Through the large hole he cut, which began to rip upwards, towards the flaming roof, Jenn could see a ring of soldiers surrounding the tent. Finally, she gave a last tug and the rope holding Gastropé to the pole came free. At the same moment, the rip in the tent reached the remains of the ceiling, and the flames racing along the ceiling reached the top of the tent. The tent pole began to slowly fall over, taking the now blazing tent with it. They were all about to be roasted alive.

The demon looked around hurriedly. Apparently, it recognized the danger of the flaming tent to the people inside, and further noted the ring of soldiers outside. It seemed to pause for a second, then looked back to the hole through which it came. The hole had been shrinking slowly since the demon's full emergence, but was not yet completely closed.

The demon stepped over to the hole and stuck its hands in, pulling it wider. "All of you," it thundered at the three of them, "through the hole. Now!" It shouted as they hesitated. Rupert leapt through, between the demon's hands. Insane kid, Jenn thought, out of the fire, into the lava. Panic began to seize her.

There was only one place that hole could go. The Abyss. To go into the Abyss was surely death for a human. No mortal could withstand its flames, nor the millions of terrors that existed there. The Abyss was the home of Evil. Only the damned were sent there, to be tortured and defiled by demon kind. Unfortunately, Jenn was seeing no other alternative. She could stay and be burned alive, or she could throw herself into the Abyss. Literally to damn herself to certain extinction, her soul to eternal damnation. Better to perish cleanly in the flames of the tent, she thought.

Death by flame would have to be the choice. Except that Rupert had already thrown himself in. That sweet and innocent child had unknowingly thrown himself into damnation! She couldn't let his soul rot for all eternity in the Abyss! But what could she do? Jenn couldn't fool herself, she knew she had no power to bring them both back from the Abyss. No mortal being had that power. But it was her fault he'd gone. He'd come to rescue her, and now he was damned until the end of time. It was her fault, and she'd promised herself that she'd protect him. Jenn closed her eyes in pain, indecision and agony.

"Come on you fools!" The demon shouted.

No matter what the choice, the boy was in her care. If there were any shred of hope that he could be salvaged, Jenn had to take it. She'd argue with the demon herself to force at least Rupert's return. No matter the cost to herself, no matter the sacrifice. If she could in any way save him, she had to try. She opened her eyes, fearful resolution and determination giving them an edge.

Steeling herself, she dragged the still tied-up Gastropé with her. Inch by inch she seemed to move. Parts of the flaming tent actually falling on her, and burning her slightly before she could shrug them aside and drag Gastropé the few feet to the hole.

The demon fixed its gaze on Gastropé then looked at Jenn in annoyance as she came up next to him. "Well, he was a prisoner also. I can't let him die. We humans just aren't quite as ruthless as you demons!" With that she gave a last heave and shoved Gastropé through the hole. Even as she did it, cold irony flooded her as she wondered what right she had to take the choice of damnation from Gastropé. She didn't care though; she might need the wizard to help get Rupert out.

Rather than get angry, the demon actually seemed to smile, horrific as that was. "No, but you'll gladly toss him into the Abyss!" It actually laughed as it ushered her through the hole. Jenn's spine went cold as she stepped through.





Chapter 41


Jenn's spine didn't stay cold for long. Out of the fire and into the lava may not have been a sufficiently strong of a metaphor for this situation. As she stepped through the hole she was hit by an unbelievable wave of heat. It was literally like walking into the hottest dry sauna she could possibly imagine. Her breath was nearly sucked from her lungs by the heat.

To make matters worse, as the demon came through the hole behind her, it closed it. With the closing of the hole, the last breath of relatively cool air from the inferno that was the tent vanished, along with the light. With that, the cave, or so it appeared to be from what she had seen as she stepped through, descended into complete darkness. Gastropé was lying at her feet gasping for breath in the heat. The demon was doing something to the hole, she had no idea where Rupert was. "Rupert!" she managed to croak. Summoning up her will in the face of the heat, Jenn quickly brought forth a Were Light. It was a simple spell that all students learned early on, but a useful one. A small globe of green light appeared above and in front of her face.

The light from the globe revealed that, indeed, they were in a cave. Actually a rather large cave. There was a single long passageway sloping upwards to her left and to her right was a crudely chiseled stone table, behind which was what could only be called a stone throne, with a large hole in the rear, near the bottom, and a groove in the seat, going out the back. Further, there were small rectangular holes, or niches in the walls. These could roughly be described as shelves, except that there was nothing on them. Other than this, there appeared to be nothing else in the cave, except for the people and the demon.

It felt like the sweat was literally being sucked from her body. She felt like she was sweating profusely, but the water seemed to evaporate as fast as she sweated it out. Her lungs began to ache from the heat of the air. What was she going to do? There was no sign of Rupert. Was she too late already? The heat was keeping her from thinking clearly. She doubted she could take much more.

"Cool spell..." croaked Gastropé.

"What?" Jenn asked as she looked down at him.

"Untie me, please, and then we can cast Cool spells on ourselves against the heat."

"What are you talking about? That little cantrip is used to cool liquids for drinking and such."

"Yes..." Gastrope' seemed out of breath. Jenn was sure the fiery air made it hard for him to speak, it certainly did for her. "But it can be adapted to cool a thin layer of air around your body. If you do it right and continue to maintain it, it will cool all the air coming through the layer and into your lungs also. If you untie me, so I can do it for myself; I'll show you how to do it."

What a weird idea, thought Jenn in a strangely surrealistic manner, it might actually work. She found it hard to concentrate on anything. She bent down and began untying his hands, behind his back. When she finished, he said "Legs also please, things will be much easier if I can stand." Jenn supposed he was right, and in the current situation he couldn't do much harm. She untied his legs.

Gastropé got to his feet, slowly. Every breath was painful. Despite this, as soon as he got to his feet, he cast the strange variant of the Cool spell, in a clear straight forward manner that Jenn was able to follow. As he completed the spell, he seemed to relax and breathe easier. Jenn quickly followed suit. Almost at once, she felt like collapsing. Her body was surrounded by cool air. Actually the air wasn't that incredibly cool, about like a hot summer day, but it was the best she could manage, given the outside heat. As it was, it felt incredible! She could breathe properly again. "Rupert!" she cried again. How would he survive this heat. She had to get the spell on him.

As she rapidly sucked in now cool air, she had time to notice that Gastropé was once again extremely pale and was staring fixedly behind her. She turned around. Obviously by this point her senses were completely out of whack. The sight of the towering fourth order demon behind her hardly phased her. She'd gotten used to it, almost. It however, was searching all over the room with its eyes, as if trying to locate something.

"Where the hell are we demon? What have you done with Rupert!" Jenn demanded.

The demon stopped looking around, and turned its baleful gaze upon her. Her insides withered at her gall. However, it simply smiled its evil, vicious grin at her, and seemed to leer right into her eyes, if that were possible. "Close, my dear, damn close. But actually you see, we...are in the Abyss."

"The Abyss." Jenn stated, "you've stolen my soul to the Abyss." There, she'd said it. Intellectually, she knew it when she stepped through. Thus her determination to save Rupert. The demon's saying it however, brought a new level of terror to her very being. Made it more terrifying real than she could have even imagined on the other side of the hole.

"Not just your soul, but as far as I can determine, your entire body. Because as I understand things, if I had just taken your soul, you'd be naked at the moment." The demon answered almost mockingly it seemed.

Thoughts overwhelmed her being. All her childhood memories and training told her that good girls, like her, never got sent to the Abyss. Here she'd gone and willingly thrown herself in. How would they ever get out, even if she could find poor Rupert before he suffocated. There were rumors and legends among the students of spells capable of transporting people to the Abyss bodily. Old wives’ tales of maidens being abducted by demons to the Abyss, ran suddenly through her mind; no one took those seriously. It seemed like she should have. She'd find a way though, she'd brought Gastropé along for help. Even if they had to bargain with their souls to free the boy, she would.

Suddenly a thought struck her, demonstrating once again the incoherent nature of her thinking here. How did Gastropé so conveniently know about this application of the cool spell? Stop it! Jenn told herself suddenly, First things first. She looked around the cave, but Rupert was definitely gone. He was nowhere to be seen. "What did you do with Rupert?" she once again demanded of the demon.

"Nothing!" the demon answered her in a bass that nearly shook her to the bone. "That's what I was looking around trying to determine a second ago.

"He definitely came through the hole and I saw him in the cave, through the hole. He isn't here now though." The demon almost, almost, sounded sincere. If, that were, such a thing was possible for a demon. She rigidly tried to hold herself calm. She glanced at Gastropé. He still seemed to be fixated on the demon, and didn't take his eyes off it, even though it paid him no attention.

Jenn heard voices from the tunnel. They were indistinct at first. One of them seemed to belong, almost, to an old man, rather high pitched and crotchety. The other sounded like Rupert's. There was also some sort of droning noise, kind of like a giant humming bird. "So how many masters have you had?" Rupert's voice seemed to ask. Was Jenn delirious?

"Oh let's see, 47, I think. It gets hard to tell after a while, they all start running together. The only one that really matters is the now one of course. The others are just worm food and memories. Well, except for Maurice. Maurice never got to be worm food. Was food though. Yep. Mighty tasty food at that."

The voices got louder, and suddenly from the long tunnel appeared Rupert, walking slightly ahead of...of well, a demon. A very weird looking demon with four arms and four legs and insectoidal humming bird wings. Rupert was looking backwards, over his shoulder at the demon as he walked. Every bit as if he were having a stroll in the park with a friend.

"Rupert!" Jenn shouted. "What are you doing? Have you gone completely berserk!" She couldn't believe this. This had to be some kind of nightmare. Nothing like this could ever happen, it was just too unreal. The absolute absurdity of the casual nature of their conversation caused her mind to reel.

The octopodal demon stopped abruptly, staring at Jenn and Gastropé in surprise. He took them in, and then looked at the big demon. Rupert just smiled sweetly at Jenn as if nothing were wrong. "So Tom, what do you got here?" he gestured with a couple hands at Gastrope' and Jenn. "Wizard take out? Sound's good to me. I haven't been to a good flaying in years! Boggy, that low down buddy of mine didn't even invite me to the mutilation of his accursed master!"

Gastropé's eyes were finally distracted from Tom, over to the smaller demon. Fortunately for him, his face couldn't get any whiter; it could, however, turn a sickly yellow color. "Actually, it'd be a pretty good lesson for the lad here, boy needs to get his technique down young. You really can't start too young.

"I suppose you're gonna do the honors. After all, they're your toys. I'm sure you'll want the lass, but can I maybe have just a small bit of time with the sickly looking one?" Gastropé collapsed on the floor in a heap. Suddenly, Jenn was torn, she didn't know whether to be terrified or pissed. She supposed terror was the more rational response, but she was really just getting too numb. Her mind too overloaded. There was only so much terror and insanity one could deal with at time, before a person just said enough is enough. Pissed seemed to be more likely at the moment.

"No, Tizzy. These are my guests. I've given my word to protect all...three...of them." Tom looked rather sourly down at Gastropé, obviously stretching the truth and hating ever moment of it.

"Oh shucks, Tom. Why don't I ever get to have any fun?" The Tizzy demon whined. He stuck a long stemmed pipe in his mouth and took a large puff. Jenn had no idea where the pipe had come from, all four of his hands had been empty when he’d entered the cave. "Look, these two wizards here, they're gonna expire soon anyway. They can't keep their magic up too long, and then their gonna bake. If they're baked, they tend to be rather unlively and are pretty boring to torture! And what's more, they taste so much better raw! Like Wizard Sushi!"

"Tizzy! I said, no." Tom stated sternly, like a father to a naughty child.

"Spoilsport." Tizzy said sourly, not meeting Tom's eyes. Tom just stood there looking at Tizzy, making sure he had the idea. Tizzy looked away taking several long draws on his pipe.

"Ok then," Tizzy looked over at Rupert. "Why don't you come with me then, Rupert. I'll show you the Courts of Chaos. You'd find that a fun place I'm sure. Maybe I can get us an audience with Mephistopheles. He's starting to warm to me. Last time he only had his guards whip me for a month non-stop when I stopped into see him unannounced."

Rupert looked excited. He looked from Tom to Jenn and back and forth. "Can I? It'd be real neat!"

"Rupert!" Jenn shouted. That was it! As soon as she got them out of there, the kid was going to the first doctor, or priest, she could find! He was obviously gone for. The heat had completely melted his brain! Like a marshmallow in a fire. He didn't have too stable a grasp on reality in the first place, and now it was completely gone.

"No." Tom said. Jenn did a double take. The demon was agreeing with her.

"Aaahhh Tom. You promised to show me the Abyss! And you're obviously busy right now. Tizzy can show me just fine, while you take these guys back some place."

"You what!" Jenn shouted, again staring aghast at Tom. She was starting to get hoarse from all the shouting.

Tom looked at her in annoyance, then back to Rupert. "You know I promised no such thing. You are not going with Tizzy. You're going with the rest of us...wherever that is."

"To.o.ohhhmmm..."

"Don't try that with me Rupert! It was stupid enough of me to let you go wandering into that army camp alone. I'm not going to compound it by letting you run all over the Abyss with Tizzy."

~

Rupert got a sour look on his face. It really disappointed him. He'd love to go see the Abyss, especially the Courts of Chaos. Actually, though, he couldn't complain too much. After all, Tom was behaving just the way Rupert had always wanted him to behave. The way he'd always dreamed of. Be careful about what you wish for, Rupert thought, you may get it.





Chapter 42


What a day! Tom thought to himself. This has got to take the cake. Here he was, the responsible hero who lets a little kid wander into the enemy army camp and purposefully get captured. True it worked, but that was another issue. The more he thought about it, the luckier he had been.

After Rupert had gone down into the camp, Tom had allowed himself to fade back to his cave. He'd then sat and tried to 'listen' for Rupert. He'd also replayed the scene with the demons who'd captured Jenn in his mind. Somehow, they'd opened some sort of physical gateway to take her physically through. They didn't just fade out. That would be a handy trick he decided. For one thing if he could do it, then he could bring stuff from Astlan to make his cave nicer. Finally, he heard Rupert calling his name, and it had been very hard to hear, he was glad he'd been listening. At that point, Tom had decided to try a different approach from his normal one. Instead of fading, he tried to imagine a doorway or hole that led to Rupert. He'd concentrated on it, and imagined Rupert calling him from just the other side. Eventually, he was able to see Rupert, in much the same way he'd seen Jehenna, and this time he just punched a hole through the image and opened a hole. From there he'd just stepped through.

It had been a completely different sensation, more like a momentary sense of vertigo and then there he was. No fading, no gentle switching of planes, he just stepped through, as if stepping over a large chasm. They'd all been damn lucky he had done it this way. If that hole hadn't still been there, he didn't think he'd have been able to get the others out. The soldiers had surrounded the tent.

Naturally, he could have killed them all, fairly easily, but in the time that took, Rupert and Jenn would probably have died in the fire or by the arrows of the guards. It was also nice not to have to kill anyone for a change. All he'd had to do was slightly maim a guy. That seemed like a major improvement. Nonetheless, it had still been too close for any real comfort on his part. He'd almost blown it completely. He really needed to think a little more first. He wouldn't always be so lucky.

Tom looked over to where Jenn was trying to wake up the passed out Gastropé. Tom had hoped he'd seen the last of that guy. Unfortunately, for whatever reason, he'd been tied up with Jenn. He really couldn't blame her for wanting to rescue the guy. Under more normal circumstances, say as in back in Harding, he would have done the same, probably. At least he liked to think so. Now of course, like in so many things, he seemed much more detached, more cavalier about such small things. Small things? he was talking about a man's life after all. Not exactly small, but that was the problem, Tom just kept finding himself thinking and acting ruthlessly.

Not that Tom was the only one with mental problems in this group. Actually, he thought, all of them had severe issues. Gastropé was a coward of the first degree, no confidence what-so-ever. Jenn had one severe attitude problem, probably came from being a wizard. Rupert had finally lost the few remaining face cards in his deck, and there was no question that Tizzy was blatantly psychotic, neurotic, and a few other -otics to boot. The worst part was that Tizzy and Rupert were over there in a corner talking back and forth like old buddies. The little demon was certainly not helping Rupert's condition. Whatever that condition was.

Fortunately, Rupert had agreed to listen to reason and not go gallivanting off with Tizzy. Following that, however, Jenn had informed him that she and Gastropé couldn't keep their spells up for long and that she expected him to return them all to Astlan very soon. He didn't know what spells she was talking about, unless it was the light spell, but Tizzy had made the same comment before asking about eating them. So, he had to get them out of there, he guessed. The question was, how?

He might be able to open another hole, it had been slightly tiring, but not too bad. Unfortunately, he didn't know for sure where to open one at. Boggy had once mentioned something about needing a focal point for demons to find a place in Astlan. A wizard conjuring them, or something similar. The last two times he'd gone willingly to Astlan, he'd had someone calling him that he could focus on. He didn't have that now. Would simply imagining a place he'd been, be sufficient? Was fire needed? it had always been there in the past. He just didn't know. They really needed something like Demon-Ed. After all, if you had to take a class to drive a car, shouldn't you also have to take one to be a demon? Being a demon was a lot more dangerous; to others at least.

Well, what did he have to lose? All he could do was try. Everyone else was busy, so he might as well try. What first though? His Tae-Kwon-Do instructor always said that a clear head was the first step in any process, so Tom guessed some form of meditative trance might help. Tom went over and sat down in his chair. He closed his eyes and began to relax his body.

Actually, despite all the craziness going on around him, Tizzy and Rupert babbling on, and Jenn comforting Gastropé, trying to convince him he wouldn't be eaten, it wasn't as difficult to achieve a trance like state as Tom had feared. He simply concentrated on blankness, on whiteness. He let the sounds of the others wash over him. Pass him by, and go on, like water rolling over a stone in a brook. He remained calm, serene, unchanged by it. He cleared his mind and slowed his, hmm, he didn't seem to have a heart rate. After a moment's pause to consider his lack of heartbeat, he resumed his blank state. He wiped all the confusion, all the warring thoughts and clamoring memories from his mind.

Tom concentrated on images of Astlan, as he remembered them. He concentrated on fire. Consuming fire. Fire which ate all, which gave all. Fire, the birthplace of the Phoenix. Fire, the warm bath which could only caress him, fill him with gentle warmth. He imagined himself encased in fire, he was the living flame itself. He remembered when he was first conjured. The chanting, the braziers, he brought them back into focus, as if they were there.

Suddenly they were there. The braziers, the flame, the chanting, all were there. A voice was chanting a summons. Tom felt no compulsion however, the summons wasn't for him, but for some other. It was also a weak summons. Tom felt that even if it had been for him, he could easily have resisted it. Nonetheless, Tom concentrated on the summons, focused his will upon it, his very being.

Tom saw a room, different then Lenamare's. True, there was a lot of paraphernalia lying about, but very different sorts. Not so much bat-wing and blood magical, but more incense and reverence magical. A bald headed little man was chanting over a small flame adjacent to the one which was Tom. He was waving a small medallion on some sort on a chain.

"By the Holy Azrael and Azaphael, I summon thee. Come thee oh demon Krysfalkenon. Thy Holy Master Verigas calls thee to do his bidding. Answer demon! The Lord Tiernon will not tolerate insubordination to his Blessed Priests. Come demon! I conjure thee by thy true name. Come demon, come now." The little man suddenly stared into the flame that was Tom. "I sense thee demon, get thee into this chamber. Come, come into this most Holy Place of Power!"

Ok, Tom thought, I don't really need a second invitation. Tom began to imagine his body as the flame, began to allow himself to fade. Then he remembered why he was doing this, and pulled back slightly. He couldn't fade through, he needed a gateway. Crap.

"Arrest ye demon. Thou canst not depart! I have summoned thee, thou must come!"

Annoyed, Tom said, "Don't worry, I am coming." The little self-styled priest jerked suddenly, aware that something was dreadfully wrong. He'd heard Tom, and he knew it wasn't any little Krysfalkenon demon coming through the flame. Suddenly the priest's chanting changed. It seemed to Tom that he felt the ties to the room weakening.

We can't have that, Tom thought. Tom concentrated on the room, imagining a small tear in the space between him and the room. With a mental hand he stuck a finger in the hole and began widening it. Wider and wider so that soon he could get a mental hand in. The priest was now shouting commands at the top of his lungs. Apparently growing slightly desperate. Tom opened his eyes. There before him, between the chair and the table was a small hole in space, surrounded by a ring of fire.

Apparently the others in the room had heard him call out to the wizard, because they were all staring at him and the hole. He spared a moment of his attention for Jenn and said, "Well, you said you needed to go back? Are you ready?" He then turned back to the hole and stuck both hands into the hole, tearing it wider. On the other side of the hole was the room with the priest.

The priest was jumping up and down. As the hole got wide enough for the priest to see Tom, the priest stopped chanting and screamed a scream of bloody murder. For some odd reason that Tom couldn't understand, and in fact, disturbed him greatly, the man's scream caused him to smile. He opened the hole wider and stepped through.





Higher Realms

Curriculum Vitae: College of Wizardry

University of the Council States

The World of Astlan, is but many of a large number of worlds that exist in transcendental spaces beyond the vision of mere mortals.

These transcendent realms are the homes of beings of both great beneficence and terrible malevolence. These realms include the Worlds of Men, the Deific Realms of the Gods, the Elemental Planes of Nature, the Astral Plane and lastly the dreaded Abyss.

Linking all of these realms of existence is the Astral Plane, it provides the bridge to all other transcendent worlds. We mortals exist in the Worlds of Men, yet the Planes of Man are many, Astlan is simply one version of diverse set of "alternate realities." Similarly the Deific Realms are composed of many worlds each ruled by a mighty pantheon of divine beings. There are 5 Elemental Planes corresponding to each of the five elemental forces. Lastly, there is but one Abyss, where all that is evil in both the higher and lower realms are consigned to eternal damnation and suffering.

Infinite Worlds that Might Have Been

The planes of man are the multiple planes of existence upon which mankind (mankind here includes elvenkind, dwarvenkind, and other sentient races) reside. In principle there are an infinite number of planes of man, but only those most recently divergent from our own are accessible. Thus only the plane of Astlan, and major alternate versions of Astlan are accessible. Rumors persists of methods of traveling to other planes with alternate physical laws, but the Astral Plane certainly does not link the Astlanian worlds to them. Incidentally, note that not all the divergent Astlanian worlds use the same name. We use the name of our own reality to describe all those planes of man where the same laws of magical science and nature apply. Thus only the planes of man where the same laws of nature and magic apply, are accessible via the Astral Plane. Certainly, no individuals from other planes of men have ever been seen, nor has anyone ever found a point of egress to one of these planes on the Astral Plane

Theories do abound that methods similar to the very direct Demonic Gateway spell could potentially be used to contact such worlds. However, no such spells currently exist.



Finally, there seems to be some sort of minimal quanta of difference necessary to access the true "alternate realities." Theory suggests that one should be able to reach worlds in which a loved one did not die, etc. However, to date, no one has been able to fine tune or adjust any spell tight enough to select out such worlds. Currently only Astlanian-like worlds separated by a certain minimal amount of change are accessible. Typically these are worlds in which major events had very different outcomes.

The reasons for this are not known, however theoreticians have hypothesized a set of Laws of Plausibility that require understanding of extremely advanced mathematics and wizardry to comprehend. Essentially, many of the alternate possibility worlds (i.e. did I have coffee or tea this morning) diverge only for short durations before collapsing back into the primary reality wave function. Hence, some suggest, the reason you may not be able to remember what you had this morning for breakfast in 20 years is because that information has been lost in the collapse of the current probability wave. In simpler, more philosophical terms, neither the past nor the future exist, only the present is real.

The Home of the Gods

The planes of the gods are relatively unknown and hard to classify scientifically. For detailed, if highly unsubstantiated, views on these different planes it is perhaps best, if not wisest, to hold converse with a cleric of a particular pantheon in whose plane one is interested.

They will certainly give you very good ideas about what their deity has told them about the plane and their 'afterlife,' but since most deities seem to have aversions to speaking to reliable witnesses (they only speak to prophets and fanatics. Of course, admittedly, speaking to a deity may very well make one a prophet or fanatic, but this is beside the point.) Despite wizardly skepticism of various deities and religions, there is absolutely no doubt that such beings do exist. Their presence and power, as well as the effects achieved by their clerics cannot be denied. Too many instances of apparent divine interventions on scales beyond normal wizardry have occurred, to discount their existence.

The Elemental Planes

The elemental planes are five planes that consist of nothing but raw elemental forces. The five elemental planes are: Fire, Earth, Water, Air and Spirit. The plane of Spirit is also sometimes referred to as the plane of Anima, or even in some circles as the plane of the Element of Raw Man. This represents the fact that mankind as represented on the planes of men is the quintessential embodiment of spirit in flesh, the ideal union to which both spirit and matter aspire. In general, the elemental planes are of a harsh and inhospitable nature to both physical flesh and spirit. They are nothing but raw elemental forces and forms. It is from conflux of these 5 planes that the planes of men are formed.





Chapter 43


Verigas, High Priest to the god Tiernon, in the city of Gizzor Del walked surreptitiously down the long corridor of his own temple. It was late at night, and while no one would really stop to question the high priest, in the unlikely event he encountered anyone, he really didn't want to raise even the possibility of questions about where he was going. At last he stopped at the correct spot along the ornately carved wall of the corridor. He scanned quickly to make sure no one else was in the corridor; there was no one. The wall depicted various blessings of the god Tiernon being bestowed upon loyal followers. Verigas placed his hands in two specific locations, mumbled a short phrase and pushed. The indentations on which he pushed, receded into the wall.

There was a soft click, and a panel separated itself from the wall. The carvings were so finely wrought that no one would notice the outline of the panel when it was sealed. Verigas pushed on the panel, revealing a small room with a ladder leading down through a hole in the floor. Verigas, looked once again to make sure no one was present and stepped inside. He quickly shut the panel behind him. Down the ladder he climbed, down into a tunnel running below the temple.

It was truly a shame, Verigas reflected, that he, the High Priest, had to skulk about in his own temple. Unfortunately, while what he was doing was for the greater glory of Tiernon, if his superiors in the Supreme Temple of Tiernon were to find out, they'd have him excommunicated. They were a little bit conservative. It wasn't precisely that Tiernon had, himself, ever forbidden the summoning of demons, he'd simply advised against it, except in the most dire of situations.

It had been complete coincidence that Verigas had discovered the Book of Reskelion four years ago. He'd been digging through old boxes in the temple library's storage room, when he'd found it sealed in a wooden box with guard spells on it. Curious, he'd spent many hours to safely open the box, and found the only treatise on demonology ever written by a priest of Tiernon. The book even had recipes for summoning demons!

He'd known that the church superiors had forbidden such spells, but how could he resist. Think of the good that could be done by the right individual. A priest of high moral fiber, in complete control of a minion of evil could make the foul creature do deeds to serve all mankind. The temptation had been too much. After much searching and studying, he'd been able to decode the name of a lower demon, which had been carefully hidden in the text of the book. He'd been scared to death the first time he'd summoned the demon, but he'd taken all the proper precautions and Tiernon had protected him.

At first he'd had little use for the demon he'd bound, but eventually he found small things the demon could do to further the aims of the church. Punishing the wicked for example. The demon was also extremely useful to influence those who were intransigent to the desires of the local temple. A little demonic visit, and they'd soon be banging on the temple door for help. Naturally, the god Tiernon always came through, after a small donation or favor was done, and the demonic plague would end.

Verigas made his way down the tunnel; eventually it left the grounds of the temple and went out underneath the city proper. It ended soon in another ladder, this one led up into another small room. After opening a secret door in this room and stepping through, Verigas was in a small chapel he'd built in what used to be a private residence in the city. There were only two ways into the room, one the secret passageway he'd just taken and the second a door to a back ally that was completely barred from this side. The only other door in the room led to a small living area.

The chapel room was Verigas' demon summoning room. Over the years he'd gathered all the necessary paraphernalia to conjure his particular demon, as well as the tools to summon others if he ever so chose. With a little judicious prodding, Krysfalkenon, the demon he'd first summoned, had been able to acquire for him some other texts on demonology. These later books, from wizards, were not quite so useful for spell casting as the first book, but their general information level was most useful. Having read the books, he knew that these wizards were exactly what many had suspected, vast perpetrators of sin and evil. Any group of people so well versed in the demonic arts couldn't be good. For one thing, they didn't have the moral guidance of religion to help them, nor, Verigas was sure, the overall moral fiber that one such as he had to resist the call of evil.

Verigas went about the room, making sure everything was as he'd last left it. He always kept the room prepared for summoning; one never knew when one might need a demon in a hurry. He lit the many candles in the room, pausing to say small prayers now and then as appropriate. Soon the room was filled with warm, glowing light. He then went to his wardrobe and began to don the proper vestments for the summoning.

It was nothing too fancy, simply the appropriate robes and a few specific talismans of power. He then cleansed his hands in the Basin of Purification, offering up a small prayer to Tiernon that his hands might be consecrated for Holy Action. At this point, he walked over to the main pentacles and began lighting the braziers, being careful not to break any of the carefully etched lines on the floor. Soon all was in readiness. The main brazier was burning, and his small votive brazier was also going.

He began with a small ritual to exorcise any evil spirits within the room, and then brought up the Immaculate Holy Wards of Lesser Demon Containment. The pentacles seemed to glow with power. It was time, Verigas thought. He began to chant, slowly at first and then with more vigor. Reaching out with his mind and soul, searching for the demon he was summoning. "Krysfalkenon, it is I thy Master Verigas, I summon thee. By the rites of high binding, thou art mine to summon. I summon thee. The angels of Tiernon witness my commands, I summon thee to this room. Come by thy true name Krysfalkenon! Come I conjure thee." Vergias felt a slight stirring in the flames; the demon had been a bit reluctant; he wouldn't tolerate that. The demon should know who was master.

"By the Holy Azrael and Azaphael, I summon thee. Comest thee, o demon Krysfalkenon. Thy Holy Master Verigas calls thee to do his bidding. Answer demon! The Lord Tiernon will not tolerate insubordination to his Blessed Priests. Come demon! I conjure thee by thy true name. Come demon, come now." There! Verigas felt the demon. It was about time, he'd have to teach this demon a lesson. He stared into the primary brazier and continued. "I sense thee, demon, getest thee into this chamber. Come, come into this most Holy Place of Power!"

Verigas could feel the demon forming in the flames. Strangely, Krysfalkenon seemed to be manifesting a bit more powerfully than usual. Suddenly Verigas felt the demon backing off, as if it were changing its mind. "Arrestest thou demon. Thou canst not depart! I have summoned thee, thou must come!" commanded Verigas. He was tired of playing these games; why wasn't the demon behaving in its usual manner.

Suddenly, a tremendously deep bass voice, like thunder on a cloudless night, rang through the room. "Don't worry, I am coming." Verigas nearly swallowed his brain. That was not, NOT the voice of Krysfalkenon. Krysfalkenon had a high pitched whiny voice. What had he done? Tiernon above! Below and all around. Protect thy servant. Verigas prayed suddenly.

How could this have happened? He'd gotten the wrong demon! Tiernon's mercy. He was doomed. This thing, by voice alone, by actions as well, had to be something seriously more powerful than Krysfalkenon. He'd seen warnings of such dangers in the wizard's books, but never heeded them. Even though they said such an occurrence was extremely rare. What could he do?

Not knowing what else there was to do, he began reversing the spell. Trying to send the demon back. "Return demon, return from whence thou hast come! " This wasn't going to work! He began chanting in the Holy Tongue of Tiernon. Saint Brian's Exorcism should get rid of anything reasonable. The flame in the primary brazier didn't shrink like it should have, instead it began to grow. Sweat began to drip down Verigas' forehead. The center of the flame seemed to ripple, as if the space was being disturbed in some strange manner. The exorcism wasn't working!

The only thing he had left was Exorcism True, it was supposed to work against any spirit or demon. Unfortunately it wasn't a ritual he cast often. In fact, never before. It was in the Most Blessed Thirteenth Order of Holiness, more powerful than a Miracle even! If he could get it right, it would exorcise anything but a Greater Demon or Arch Demon, and it might even work on them. For the ritual, quite a bit of motion was necessary, Verigas was up dancing around in time with the chant. He'd never prayed so hard in his life. He glanced worriedly at his wards. If only he'd cast more powerful ones. He didn't know anything better than Esther's Holy Wards of Intermediate Demon Containment, but surely that would have been enough! If nothing else, it would have at least been better.

Suddenly, a hole seemed to open in the middle of the flame. A hole in the very reality of existence! Verigas had never even heard of this happening before. Tiernon! Forgive me, I know not what I've done. I'll never conjure another demon, just let this exorcism work! The hole ripped wider, suddenly Verigas could see what was on the other side. It was HUGE! Unreal, beyond his worst possible nightmares. He'd seen demons summoned by others, including wizards. He'd never seen anything this big and powerful. It was easily twice as massive as any of the Higher Demons that were used in the most deadly and world shaking battles. Only rough sketches in some of the wizard's books gave him any clue. The thing had to be at least a Greater Demon! He was dead! His soul was about to be consumed by the Forces of Evil for all his Sins and Trespasses.

Oh! He knew now the errors of his ways. His foolishness! He saw it all flash before his eyes, in what he knew were the last few moments of his life. His soul would never go on to join Tiernon in Tierhallenon! It would be fodder to a Greater Demon's lust. Verigas screamed for his lost soul. He screamed for the ignoble infamy of his loss. He screamed a scream of infinite sorrow at the loss of his Immortal Soul and the Extinguishment of His Flame! Through tear streaked eyes, from a face pointed towards the sky, Verigas saw the Demon step through the hole, into the room. It was smiling a twisted grin of Supreme Evil, sure now of its Evil Victory over the Forces of Good.

Verigas fell to the floor, weeping bitter tears of defeat and sorrow. His chanting ceased, he knew he could not succeed. He was doomed! Vaguely, in a state of near hysterical weeping, Verigas watched the demon step over the Wards of Containment without a pause. Verigas thought he was at his endurance's limit, he thought he'd seen the worst possible fate, but what he saw next made him throw up from fear and lose his bowels simultaneously. It wasn't just one demon! A second one emerged behind the first. Smaller, but incredibly bizarre. It had four arms and four legs and was flying on humming bird wings. Further, Verigas could see more beings through the hole preparing to come through! It wasn't just a Greater Demon! It was an entire horde of demons! Verigas had unleashed an Army of Darkness upon the unsuspecting city of Gizzor Del!

"Tiernon, Tiernon, for thy love of man! Have mercy on thy people! Why must they pay for my sins!" Verigas mumbled bitterly and incoherently. The entire city would be destroyed, the souls of entire families would be consumed by demons! All because of him! Next through the hole, Verigas noted in his now completely hysterical state, were two humans, a young man and a teenage girl. Both were ragged and dirty. Obviously they'd been held prisoner and tortured in the Abyss! Now the demons were bringing them back. But why? Verigas wondered. And then he knew. Once again, he sank to an even deeper level of despair. Human sacrifices! That was it. They would sacrifice the humans to make a bigger gateway for all the demons from the Abyss to come through! He'd heard of such things, he was sure.

Then, then the final confirmation. The confirmation Verigas couldn't bear. Through the hole next came a young child. A child. Nightmare of nightmares! Legends ran deep, but Verigas knew! A Demon Prince could only be summoned by a virgin sacrifice. However, it had never been done before, no Demon Prince had ever entered Astlan before, it required too much power, too many sacrifices. This was it. Not only a Greater Demon, not only an Army of Demons, not only a Huge Army of the Damned, but an Army of Ultimate Evil led by a Demon Prince. Truly it was time for the Last Battle, Ragnarok, the Apocalypse, Armegeddon, the End. While Verigas' religion didn't endorse any such belief, he knew of many that did, and this was surely confirmation. It was the End of All and it was all Verigas' fault. He couldn’t handle anymore. Verigas fell over and passed out.

As oblivion was claiming him, deliriously, he almost thought he heard the Greater Demon exclaim, "What the hell? What is it with you people and fainting? Does everybody on the damn planet do it?"





Chapter 44


It was late, the second hour past the middle of the night, when Exador finally teleported into the room his servants had reserved for him in Freehold. He almost felt tired. While normally he didn't need much, if any, sleep, the long heated battle planning session with Ramses and Bess had gone on for a long time. Too long, he was sure. The price of dealing with fools, Exador decided.

He'd just decided he would sleep, and was undressing for bed when he felt a tingle in the medallion around his neck. Now why, Exador wondered, would his people be contacting him at this hour of the night? The medallion was Object Linked to medallions worn by all his wizards. While it did allow him to locate them at any time, which was technically unnecessary since he'd bound them all to him personally, the primary purpose of the medallions was to allow them to contact him whenever needed. Fortunately, after a few graphic examples, they'd learned not to contact him frivolously.

He grasped the medallion in his hand and opened his mind. In his head formed an image of the wizard Treledor. Treledor was the senior-most wizard with the army. The mental image of the wizard seemed to be sweating. How strange, thought Exador, preparing for bad news.

Lord, the mental voice of the wizard began, we've had a bit of a problem here.

Problem? Exador inquired, maintaining his calm.

Well, m'Lord, as you instructed, we sent demons to fetch the rest of the caravan that the wizard Gastropé found.

Yes, Exador stated.

The fourth order demon was still with the caravan, or what was left of it, only a girl and a small child. They were able to capture the girl and bring her back. The child was too close to the fourth order to be kidnapped.

Fine. Exador’s patience was beginning to wear thin, but Treledor was getting even more nervous.

Well, Major Zachs questioned her, took her possessions, and placed her in the prisoner tent to await your return. Exador said nothing; he waited for the wizard to continue.

Sometime later, a few hours ago, the sentries found a small boy wandering around the perimeter, crying and looking for his sister. Exador's eyes narrowed.

The wizard continued, fearing a trap, the major sent men to check for the possibility of more people around the perimeter. The child seemed harmless, so he was tied up and placed in the prisoner tent.

Get on with it. Exador instructed, impatiently.

Well...well, very shortly after that, the prisoner tent caught on fire. Treledor reported hesitantly.

Fire? Exador stated, beginning to get angry.

Well, it seems that, well...when guards ran into investigate, the girl was free and so was the boy. One of them, presumably the girl, must have been Jehenna in disguise, she summoned the fourth order demon! Exador was gritting his teeth. He was not going to get angry, he told himself, he would keep control.

Uhm, well, the demon took out the guards and then opened a gateway for Jehenna, the boy, and Gastrope’ to escape. Uhm.

Gastropé? Exador decided then and there the young wizard was worse than dead the next time he saw him. Amazing really, how well he was handling this, Exador congratulated himself. He was incredibly angry at the moment, but he was sure it barely showed. His people were all incompetent. Did it ever occur to anyone to see if the young boy was the same one with the caravan originally? Did it ever occur to anyone there that he might be used as a locator for the FOURTH ORDER DEMON? Exador asked, increasing his mental tone as he went on.

Uhm, no, but, well, I wasn't informed of this until too late, the major.... Treledor was cut off by Exador.

Fine, this girl, what did she have on her? It was doubtful any of his demons could have captured Jehenna, must have been some other girl, Exador thought.

Not much, uhm, let me think...just normal spell components that a journeyman wizard might have, no spell books, but oh, yeah, a small red diary that was magically locked. Strange sort of.

Magically locked book? Exador went deathly still. His anger was forgotten. His mind totally fixed on what Treledor was saying. Did you try and open it? Determine anything about it?

Well, yes, but it was a really strange spell, none of us could figure it out. Certainly something more powerful than any journeyman should be able to cast. That's why we think she was Jehenna.

Praise be! Praise be! Exador thought silently to himself, he was almost jumping up and down. The book! The damn book was in his hands! It had to be! Here it had fallen directly into his hands. Surely, fate favored him! He was jumping up and down, plans running through his mind. His! All his!

Don't touch that book! I will be right back for it. I think I know what to do with it. Exador admonished. He had to be careful, he couldn't make it sound too important until he had it in his own physical hands. He couldn't wait. He had to remain calm he told himself.

Well...you know...that's the funny thing, Treledor commented. Exador went cold, very cold. Treledor continued on, oblivious, the book seems to have disappeared in all the confusion. Maybe the demon got it...

Many miles away, for the second time in as many days, there was a large explosion in the field where Lenamare's school had been. For the second time in the same evening, tents became raging bonfires. This time it started with the tent of the wizard Treledor. It had suddenly burst into a giant incandescent ball of fire. The fire had been so intense, in fact, that it melted the soldiers in the adjacent tents. A bit further away, Major Zachs was glad he hadn't been the bearer of bad news. He was not, however, looking forward to Exador's return.





Chapter 45


The psuedo-sunlight of the Courts' version of morning was shining through the windows of the tavern in which Antefalken sat. He was seated in the corner of one of his favorite taverns on the outskirts of the Courts sipping a fresh hot cup of Denubian Choco-CoffeeTM. It was a nice morning, as such things went in a land with no sun. The Courts of course, for the comfort and amusement of most of the inhabitants, had periods of light and darkness, but these were completely artificial, imposed by its rulers. It had now been light for several hours and Antefalken had taken his leave of his evening host an hour or so ago.

While the night had been not as satisfactory in terms of information as he’d hoped, it had not been wholly wasted. Lilith was always enjoyable. It wasn't often that he got to be with 'an older woman,' but then, as far as he knew, there weren't any women older than her. Not that he'd be so crass as to say so to her face, mind. Not that her face looked it even, on the contrary, she could look, and did look, like any woman of any age, of any species. Of course while this could be amusing for fantasies, it did become a bit unnerving when she changed appearance during the act itself. Howling like a wolf-bitch in heat had a completely different meaning for Lilith. Nonetheless, they both enjoyed getting together every decade or so for a quick roll in the hay. Although then again, that new bed of spikes of hers wasn't exactly hay, Antefalken reflected, but it was the thought that counted.

Unfortunately, she'd had little information of use to him. Mainly just the standard intrigues of any court, demonic or otherwise. It also seemed Faust was convinced that some of the Arch Demons had run across some item guaranteed to upset the hierarchy of the Abyss, permanently. He was convinced that they had some plan to enslave the Demon Princes and set themselves up as rulers, but then Faust was always paranoid. Probably because he'd come to power in much the same manner, reflected Antefalken. Other than that and a few other interesting but useless tidbits, he'd come up dry. Not in bed, that was, but in terms of information, he quickly corrected himself in his thoughts.

"Anty! Dear chap!" a voice called. He looked over to where the voice had hailed him. He noted a familiar looking demon, wincing and holding its head, obviously regretting the loud nature of its own outburst. Near the bar, just getting a cup of choco-coffee was Bogsworth. He hadn't seen Boggy in at least a quarter of a century. When Boggy looked up again, after recovering, Antefalken waved him over.

While Boggy certainly didn't run in the circles where the information Antefalken needed was likely to be found, talking to the loquacious demon was always amusing, and sometimes informative. Plus, Boggy was a good friend, as demons go.

Boggy made his way over to Antefalken's table, carefully guarding his choco-coffee against spillage. By his movements, Antefalken noted a severe hangover on Bogsworth's part. For a demon, that indicated a truly prodigious amount of alcohol. The equivalent of a couple gallons of pure grain spirits at the least. Boggy sat down clumsily, across from Antefalken.

"So Boggy, what's the cause for celebration and inebriation?" Antefalken started with.

"That most joyous of all occasions in a demon's life! Oh..." Boggy winced and picked up his choco-coffee for a sip.

"You offed your Accursed Master?" Antefalken asked, pleasantly pleased for Boggy.

"Most certainly. And most naturally, thereafter, I cel-ebriated." Boggy sipped some more choco-coffee, his eyes still squinting in the morning's light. "Perhaps a bit too much."

"Aaah, but how often do you get the chance? Now you're a free man again."

"Aye, for a few decades at least. I'm pretty sure I took care of all loose ends." Boggy said, the choco-coffee starting to bring him back to life. There was nothing like Denubian Choco-CoffeeTM to bring a demon back into action. Only Denubians and demons could drink the stuff, it was just a bit too strong and bitter for mortals. Also the caffeine rush tended to cause immediate cardiac arrest in many mortal types.

"Well, I hope you didn't celebrate alone. I wished I'd known; I'd have joined you for a drink." Antefalken toasted Boggy with his choco-coffee.

"No, no, had several friends around," Boggy looked around, "not sure where they went..." Boggy signaled the bartender to bring over another cup of choco-coffee. "Actually, managed to get in a couple knock-down, drag-out brawls along the way too. I think...I don't recall too well." Boggy tenderly fingered his ear. He seemed to recall getting it ripped off at one point. "Course, it'd been real nice to have Tom around then. Nothing like a four in a bar brawl. But him being a newbie and all, he got a little squeamish when I regaled him of the glorious event."

Antefalken's ears pricked up. He went from pleasant reminiscence to intense curiosity at Boggy's words. "A newbie you said? and fourth order?" This was just what he was looking for.

"Yep. Kid's got guts. Tougher than nails too. Someday he's gonna be mighty kickass if he ever figures out what he can do. Already he's probably a match for any of the weaker fours. Just gotta get over this silly squeamishness of his."

"Who's his A.M.?" Antefalken prodded, this could be it.

"Ahhh jeessse, I don't know, it's hard enough to think after the last couple nights." Boggy stopped to try and remember, "Lenny something. I don't know, an Accursed Master is an Accursed Master."

"Lenamare..." Antefalken said softly.

"Yep, that's the one! You know him?"

"By reputation only, supposedly got a real big ego."

"Could be, could be. Certainly using the kid for rather podunk stuff."

It would probably be best not to give away too much of his interest to Boggy, he really didn't want Boggy telling any fourth order, new or not, that he'd been asking about him. "Well most those wizards do. Have to have big egos, I'd suppose, in order to think they can go around enslaving anybody they feel like." Antefalken diverted the topic. He knew this would get Boggy going on for a few hours. Now if only he could somehow indirectly find out where this newbie lived.

~

Master Hortwell gently floated down from his flying perch in the sky. It was certain, some other small army was camped to the south. Must be Zilquar, late as usual. So what to do? Hortwell guessed the best thing to do might be to meet up with Zilquar's people. Then what? Take out the remains of Exador's army? It was not worthwhile, still probably too many wizards and demons to allow them to take it easily. March around Exador's people and head to Freehold? Hortwell knew that was where Lenamare and Jehenna would be heading. Lenamare would probably need all the support he could get.

Actually, that was probably where he should be now, anyway. Unfortunately, he'd been unconscious for some time and when he'd come to, he'd been too weak. Then the big boom spell went off, and he'd used up all the mana he'd regained as well as draining his reserve amulet to shield them from the fallout By the time he'd recovered from that, things started getting interesting down in Exador's camp and he decided to stay the night. Then about an hour ago, it'd gotten interesting again.

He'd just gone up to look to see if things had calmed down any and had spotted the other fires to the south. There wasn't much he could do about it now; it was rather late. It would probably be best just to try and sleep for the rest of the night. He still wasn't comfortable sleeping with Zargoffelstan roaming free while he slept, but he had to admit, the demon hadn't killed him while he was out. In fact the fool thing had even gone and tended him and built a hut! Imagine that, it had certainly surprised Hortwell more than he could possibly admit. Why a demon should behave so out of character was rather unnerving, even if he had known the demon for a great many years. Zargoffelstan had always been a rather low key demon as demon's went, but even so, this was most intriguing.

He hadn't probed the demon too hard about it. It was, after all, roaming completely free. He'd like to have penned it up or sent it back, but with all the soldiers around, sending it back didn't seem too wise, and penning it up seemed a bit rude at this point. Further, the last time he thought he'd had it penned up, it got free and killed the soldiers, so penning didn't seem too practical, at least not without wasting a lot of energy that could be better spent for other spells.

Things were as things were, Hortwell supposed. He might as well sleep while he could and join Zilquar in the morning. He walked back over to the log cabin and went to his makeshift cot. The demon really had done a remarkable job. He'd have to think of some form of suitable reward for it. Hortwell was a firm believer in just rewards and punishments. Some reward was certainly appropriate in the current circumstances; he would just have to determine what.





Chapter 46


Tom stared down at the fainted priest. These people were really unbelievable. The only people who didn't seem faint were egotistical psychotic wizards like Lenamare and small children like Rupert. He wasn't sure he'd ever understand them.

"So where are we?" Jenn asked, she was looking around at the chapel.

"Astlan!" Tizzy said, "and under no duress." Tizzy made a beeline for a barred door at the opposite end of the room. He lifted the bars and opened the door before Tom could halt him. It was dark behind the door, but it apparently led to the outside. Tom could hear crickets, he could also smell something unpleasant. Apparently they were in some sort of city.

Tizzy poked his head out the door, looked around, then ducked back in. He looked to Tom, "Thanks for the gateway Tom. Got some unfinished business to take care of. Later!" and with that he darted out the door and off into the sky. Tom ran to the door, four steps away for him, nearly hitting his head on a ceiling beam and stared out. There was no sign of the little demon.

Tom feared this didn't bode well. He hadn't counted on Tizzy coming too. Now the little demon was probably off to messily kill his master. That would be another death on Tom's shoulders. He just prayed that Tizzy wouldn't kill anyone else on the way or cause too many other problems. Schizophrenic demons were not a good thing to turn loose on unsuspecting people.

He shut the door. It apparently led into some form of alley, but nonetheless, he didn't want anyone wandering by to see a large demon standing in the doorway of some church. He didn't know much about Astlanians and their religions, but he suspected that a demon running around in a church could be taken by some as a bad omen.

"Where did he go?" Jenn asked.

"I think to kill his master." Tom answered her.

~

"Oh." Jenn turned rather pale, Gastropé was already pale. Jenn happened to look over to Rupert, only to find the boy with his hand down his pants, groping for something. "Rupert!" Jenn exclaimed in shock. The boy looked up, and as he did, he pulled a book out of his pants.

"Here, I rescued this for you, from the major's tent." Rupert handed her the magical book that her diary had been mistaken for. She blushed, slightly ashamed of herself for her thoughts. That naked demon there, flaunting itself, just kept bringing her mind back to the gutter. She'd forgotten completely about the book in all the confusion. Too bad Rupert couldn't have gotten her spell components; those would have been more useful at the moment.

She looked down at the priest. He was still out cold. She sympathized with him; it had probably been a pretty big shock. Nonetheless, they'd probably better tie him up and gag him before he alerted the local populace to the presence of demons. She looked around for something to tie him up with. All she found was a wardrobe with some clothes in it. She went over and found a robe that she started ripping into strips. She asked Gastropé to help her, and pretty soon they had the priest bound and gagged in case he came to.

~

While Jenn was doing this, Tom went exploring. He had to duck a lot, due to the wooden ceiling beams. Besides the exit, there was only one other door in the room. This led into what appeared to be a small kitchen. Or at least a room with a large fireplace with a spit, a table and chairs and some cupboards. No running water or sink apparently. There were some large bowls though, that could presumably be used as wash basins. Rather weird for a church Tom thought, but who was he to judge. These days he seemed to be a member of the opposition as far as religions went.

He looked through the cupboards, but found nothing of interest. He went back into the main room. Jenn and Gastropé had finished tying up the unconscious priest. They'd also gagged him. Tom hoped the man's screaming hadn't alerted anyone. He really didn't see how it could have failed to do so. Of course, if this had been New York, he'd have nothing to worry about. From the looks of the outside though, they appeared to be in an ally in some sort of decrepit ghetto in a large Dark-Age city, probably crawling with thieves, assassins and other lowlifes. He thus had no reason not to expect the people in this place to be as indifferent to screams in the night as those back home.

"I think we should get some sleep," Jenn suggested. She and Gastropé were certainly looking beat. "We can figure out what to do in the morning. We can also figure out where we are." Hearing no disagreement, she cleaned a spot on the floor and laid down. She glanced at Tom, apparently deciding whether or not she needed to admonish him not to kill them in their sleep.

Gastropé apparently was still not so convinced. While he too cleared a spot and laid down, he couldn't keep his eyes off Tom. Tom noticed his stare, and figured out the reason. While Gastropé seemed pretty useless, he figured the guy would be even more useless if he didn't get any sleep. So Tom decided to go back into the kitchen. He really didn't need any sleep, but he could at least sit and rest in there.

He went in and hunched down by the fire place. It still wasn't easy, given his form, but he was getting more adept at sitting on the floor. About ten minutes went by, Tom just squatting there thinking, when Rupert came in and sat down beside him. Tom smiled at the kid, it was kind of nice to have some company. He didn't feel quite so alone in this world when he had Rupert around.

"Thanks for taking us to the Abyss, Tom," Rupert said quietly. "I really enjoyed seeing it and meeting Tizzy. Will you take me back sometime and introduce me to more of your friends?"

Kid! Tom thought, what is wrong with you? "Yeah, well, first we gotta figure out where we are and what we're going to do to get you guys to Freehold." Tom also spoke softly, so the others could sleep.

"Yeah, that will be a bit of a problem," Rupert admitted. "We're obviously in a city. Getting out with you is going to prove difficult. Further, if it is a city, then even if we get out, we may be in an area more populated, and with fewer wizards running around. You're going to attract a lot of attention."

"I know," Tom admitted. "I was thinking about that as Tizzy ran out the door. I'm not exactly easy to hide. On the other hand, I don't dare leave you guys alone if Exador is still after you."

"Uh huh." Rupert was silent after that. They both sat there in silence thinking. After what seemed like another ten minutes Rupert said, "Tom?"

"Yes," Tom answered, breaking out of his reverie.

"If you don't mind my asking...why don't you just shape change into a human form?"

Tom thought about this for a moment. Boggy had said some demons could do it, but only the most powerful. He had no idea how to go about it. "To be honest, Rupert, I don't know if I can. I've never done it. Not all demons can."

Rupert was surprised. "Never? How can that be?"

To Tom, Rupert sounded genuinely shocked. "I just haven't had the need." He really didn't feel like admitting to this kid who practically worshipped the ground he walked on, that he'd only been a demon for maybe two weeks at most.

"Well...well, I'm sure you can. You've just got to try. You can open Demonic Gateways, that's a lot harder than shape changing. Or at least, as hard." Rupert amended.

"I suppose. But how do I start? Just will it?"

"Sort of," Rupert said softly, but with authority, as if he really knew what he was talking about. "You just kind of relax all your muscles and imagine yourself as you'd like to be. Get an image of what you should look like in your head and superimpose it on your current image. Then you just sort of force the one on top of the other. It's real hard at first, but it just takes effort. It helps if the form is something or someone you're really familiar with."

How this kid could know this was a mystery; must be a wizard thing, Tom thought. "Hmm," Tom said, "Why don't you get some sleep? I'll think about it."

"Come on Tom," Rupert sounded disappointed.

"You need some sleep, I'll see what I can do. I promise."

"Ok." Rupert relaxed, but didn't seem overly thrilled. No kid liked to go to bed. He closed his eyes.

Tom leaned back and thought about what the boy said. Would it really be that different from what he'd done to open this latest gateway? There he'd really imagined himself the flame, completely merged himself with the flame. If he did the same with an image of his old self would that work? Boggy had said it took a lot of energy, and the perceptions and demands of the wizards usually forced demons to return to their 'true, demonic, form.' Actually, Boggy had been talking about doing it in the Abyss, not in Astlan. Would it even be possible for a demon to alter his form here?

It seemed to Tom that a lot of this stuff about a demon's form, which was intrinsically magical was wrapped somehow in people's perceptions of him. As Tizzy and Boggy had said, they expect you to look like a demon, so you do. If he could change people's perceptions, could he also change his form? If that were true, then Gastropé and Jenn would need to think of him as a human. New people he met, would never know any difference. Just exactly how much did the beliefs of the Astlanians influence reality? That was the question.

There was, Tom decided, only one way to find out. Taking a deep breath, which of course, being a demon he didn't need, he began to relax. Just as he'd done with the gateway, he put himself in a trance. He began to call up an image of his old self. He built a complete image of himself as he remembered from the mirror. He figured it was important to get the whole thing correct. That wasn't too hard, like many adolescents, he'd worried a lot about his growing body throughout puberty. He knew each little imperfection well. Soon he had the image in his mind. Then he created an image of himself, as he felt himself now. He hadn't really seen much of his current form, except during that first summons, but he knew what it felt like.

He also knew what his old body felt like. He superimposed the images in his mind and the feelings of the two bodies. He willed, believed, imagined the sensations and appearance of his old body on top of his new one. Imagined himself shrinking to the smaller size. Imagined that he could actually feel hair growing on his scalp, his tail receding. His hooves turning into the balls of his feet. His lower joint becoming his heel, forming the entire foot. His claws retracting, becoming the fingers he remembered. He imagined, he believed, he knew. He opened his eyes.

He felt like he was holding his breath. He felt like he was about to explode. He felt like he was wearing clothes fourteen sizes too small. His breathing was ragged. His eyes almost seemed to be watering with the effort to keep from exploding. It was almost all he could do to keep from bursting apart.

Tom looked down at his legs. All he saw were these puny pink things with small wisps of hair on them. As he bent his head down to see the pinkish white flesh that was trying to contain the explosion, a lock of curly black hair fell over his eyes. He was himself! "Aaah, aah" Tom gasped.

~

Rupert woke, hearing a strange noise. He'd just dozed off thinking about Tom. He looked over to the demon. The demon was gone! In its place was a teenage boy! A naked one at that. Squatting down in the corner was a boy about six or seven years older than himself. He had long, very curly black hair and some faint freckles on his cheeks. His body was thin, but not skinny, and dusted with some dark hair on his legs and forearms. The boy was breathing hard, as if he had been exerting himself a lot. "Tom?" Rupert asked incredulously.

The boy smiled at him and nodded. Suddenly though, the boy gasped and bent over double. He began moaning in pain. Almost immediately his skin turned beet red and seemed to blister. The boy's hair fell out, as he raised his head as if to howl in pain. His nose began pulling upward, his jaw coming forward to form a short snout. Horns began poking through the skin on his forehead. His whole body was bloating. Literally, his muscles were swelling like melons. His feet stretching, becoming lower legs. A short tail was thrashing its way up from his rear, growing longer and longer. Finger nails thickened and grew black and long.

Within only a few moments, the boy was gone and the demon was back.





Chapter 47


Tom ached all over. The pain of turning back into his demon form was almost as bad as the first time. Not quite, but at least similar. For once, since coming to Astlan, Tom actually felt relieved to be a demon. This form, hooves and all, felt more comfortable. He didn't feel like he was about to explode anymore. It just felt, 'right.' What a strange thought.

He felt like he could really relax. In the short time he'd been human again, his whole body had felt under deep stress. As if forcing itself into some unnatural position. It was altogether unpleasant. "Aaagghhh," Tom sobbed. Talk about your Chalker-esk nightmare. Somehow he seemed to be mentally conditioned to prefer this form. Conditioned so that his old body was the unnatural one. Tom wanted to cry. He was a boy! not a demon! Naturally though, demons had no tear ducts so he couldn't. What was he going to do? Even if he could somehow shape change into his old form, he knew he wouldn't be comfortable. He'd always be fighting the urge to be a demon. There seemed like there was no going back!

"That was fantastic Tom!" Rupert's voice brought Tom's thoughts back into the kitchen. "I know it was hard, but for a first try that was great. It gets easier the more you do it."

Tom hoped so. He couldn't keep it up if it didn't. "Yeah?"

"Yes, now try again. It's the only way."

Tom really didn't feel he had the energy. Oh, sure physically he was recuperating fine now that he was back in his demon form, but mentally he just didn't feel up to it. "I don't know. Maybe I should wait awhile."

Rupert was impatient, "And when the priest wakes up, and morning comes? How long do you think we can stay here. We'll have to leave soon, you gotta practice. What happens if you pop back into demon from in the middle of the market."

"A lot of people start fainting." Tom answered testily. He knew the boy was right, he just couldn't bring himself to want to try again. It was, Tom was sure, like the damn bicycle/horse etc. analogy, if you fall off, try again immediately. "Very well," he couldn't stand Rupert's stare.

Tom relaxed, it wasn't any easier this time. In fact it took longer because Tom had trouble concentrating and going into a trance state. Eventually however, he managed to superimpose the images, the feelings. Eyes closed Tom felt himself shrinking, contracting into the repellent puny pink and white form. From the inside, his skin felt feverish, again he felt like a bomb waiting to go off. He opened his eyes. Rupert was grinning at him.

"Can you manage to talk?" Rupert asked.

"Yess..." Tom answered hesitantly. His voice sounded weak, whiny. "I think so." Tom had to concentrate to keep from exploding while he talked. He decided to gingerly test things. He stood up. He swayed and almost fell over. God, this damn form had no balance. He swayed gently, balancing as best he could he took a few steps forward. The floor felt really weird under his bare feet. He looked down, it was just a smooth wood floor. It must just be his feet, they seemed awfully tender compared to his hooves.

As he turned, he was trying to come up with a story in his mind about what to tell Jenn and the others. Given this belief thing, he didn't want them to know he was the demon. But what could he tell them? Concentrating too much on what to tell people and not enough on his lack of balance, Tom began to fall over. He reached out and his hand rammed into the stone of the fire place. The shock of pain in scraping his hand along the rough stone jolted him. Agony ripped through his body as he lost control and his muscles started ballooning to gargantuan proportion again.

~

Jenn woke, she didn't know how much later it was. Probably some time, considering how rested she felt. It was hard to tell though as there were no windows in the chapel. She glanced around; Gastropé was still asleep. The bound priest was wide-awake and staring at her fearfully. What was she going to do about him? The candles had burned out but light was coming under the door to the outside.

She got up and stretched. She was also hungry. She decided she'd explore the other room, the demon had gone in there, but hadn't said what it was. She walked over to the doorway and looked through. It was a bit lighter in the kitchen as some filtered light was coming down the wide chimney. Sure enough, it was a kitchen. Actually rather strange for a temple, but then not many temple's she'd been in looked like this place. The kitchen, however, proved to be rather bare upon closer inspection. No food was on the shelves. Actually, she suddenly realized, there was no demon or Rupert in the kitchen either! Where were they? She ran back out into the main room. They weren't there either!

"Aaaaaggghhhhh!" Jenn said in frustration. What had that damned demon done? Had it kidnapped Rupert back to the Abyss? If so, the poor kid was gone. How could she ever get him back? The sound of her voice woke Gastropé.

"What's the matter," he asked, rubbing his eyes.

"The demon! That's the matter!"

Gastropé immediately jumped to his feet looking around wildly. "Where?"

"He's not here, nor is Rupert! That's the problem, I don't know where they went!" Even as she said this, the door to the outside opened. Goddess! they'd forgot to bar it again. How stupid could they have been? Light, albeit not incredibly bright due to the overhang in the ally way, poured into the room. Rupert stepped into the room. Jenn sighed a sigh of relief.

"Rupert, where have you been, you don't know how..." her voice trailed off as a young man followed Rupert into the room. She had no idea who he was. He was roughly her own age, but a bit taller, with rather long curly black hair. He was wearing breeches tightly belted at the waist and a shirt that didn't fit too well. Actually, he was rather cute, she thought in the back of her mind. As he carefully shut the door behind them however, Jenn noticed that he seemed extremely tense. Like he was trying to keep something bottled up. He was almost gritting his teeth. She imagined he'd be turning red in a moment from the stress he seemed to be under.

"Who are you?" Gastrope' asked the young man.

"His name is Edwyrd," Rupert said quickly. "He's my cousin."

"Your what?" Jenn asked. She didn't know Rupert had any cousins. Certainly it was unlikely he'd just pop out and find one immediately after entering a strange city.

"His cousin," the young man said tensely. "Amazing really. I'd just entered town, passing through, and I stopped in the market to get an apple when who should appear out of nowhere but Rupert." The fellow seemed to be forcing himself to seem casual.

Gastropé and Jenn looked at each other. It sounded just a little too strange. Coincidences like that just didn't happen. Jenn stopped suddenly, where was the demon? "Rupert where'd the...." she paused, thinking of the priest, and this unknown Edwyrd fellow, "Tom, go?"

Rupert looked up at Edwyrd and said, "uhm, he had to return home suddenly. Something about some conclave of ...uhm," he looked at the priest, knowing what Jenn actually meant, "...animages, meeting." He didn't care so much about letting the priest know anything about the demon, it was just that it was probably better to play along with Jenn so she wouldn't suspect Edwyrd.

Gastropé was looking back and forth between Rupert and Jenn, totally lost. "Who's Tom? and what about the d...."

"You know," Jenn said cutting him off suddenly, "Tom was the fellow who got upset with you when we first met." She gestured with her head to the priest and the hand by her side to Edwyrd. Gastropé caught on, sort of.

"Oh. Yeah."

What was Rupert talking about? Conclave of animages? demons, she supposed he meant. Why would the demon all of the sudden leave them for a meeting of demons? What did that portend? A meeting of demons, could it have something to do with this book? The whole thing didn't make much sense, but she couldn't exactly question Rupert more closely in the presence of the priest and Edwyrd. She really didn't want to freak people out any more than necessary.

Actually, Rupert had looked at Edwyrd before answering. Ah, maybe that explained his tense look. Maybe Rupert had told him about the demon. Any sane person would certainly get tense and look like that if they had to worry about a demon popping up at any moment. Goddess knew the demon made her feel that way. Of course, he could also be kind of tense because he'd just walked into a temple in which three ragged individuals were holding a priest hostage. He might be leery of the company his cousin was keeping. She couldn't blame him for that either. Not that she exactly trusted Edwyrd for that matter. It was just too strange for Rupert to just wander out and find his cousin like that.

"Fine, well, ok. So you went out. You really should not have gone alone, that was really stupid, Rupert. What's the name of the city then?"

"Gizzor Del," Rupert answered.

"Gizzor Del? where's that?"

"I don't know," Rupert said. Gastropé also gave her a blank look. "It is however, ruled by a guy named Duke Swery."

That didn't help much. She looked at Edwyrd. He came in through the gates, he should know. "Where is Gizzor Del?" she asked him. "I would think you would know, since you were passing through."

He looked at her in surprise, it took him a moment to say anything. "Why don't you know? You had to come in the same way, didn't you?" That shut her up. The priest knew how they came in, but she wasn't sure she wanted to explain it to this Edwyrd fellow. It was really just a bit much to try and explain to a complete stranger. Ok, this wasn't going to get her any further. She turned to look down at the priest.

She walked over to him. His eyes were lit up in fear. She bent down to remove his gag. He whimpered softly.

"How far is it to Freehold from here?" Jenn asked him.

"Lord Tiernon protect me from evil. I repent my sins fully. Lord save me from these forces of..." She gagged him again. She shook her head. Why did everything always have to be so difficult?





Chapter 48


Tick tock tick tock. How long could he hold it? It was beginning to remind him of having to hold his bladder, only worse. He'd held human form now for almost three hours. Neither he nor Rupert had gotten any sleep last night. He'd kept practicing his human form throughout the night. The first ten times had been real difficult. Eventually however, he learned enough tricks to hold it without turning back whenever something shocked him. After Rupert was able to successfully kick him in the shin without him losing control and turning back, they'd decided they could take some chances. They needed to, they had several details to work out.

For one thing, Tom needed clothes. These they found in the wardrobe in the other room. Tom hoped the priest wouldn't notice him wearing his clothes. The other problem was how to explain Tom. They couldn't call him Tom, that would be too blatant, so he suggested they use his middle name, Edward. Rupert liked the idea and started calling him Edwyrd. Secondly, how to explain his presence. Rupert came up with the cousin idea. Unfortunately, if that were to be the case, they'd have know something about the city. Since dawn had just arrived, they decided to wander about.

Actually the thought had made Tom nervous, but he'd have to go out some time, better with just him and Rupert rather than with all of them. Tom had gone back to demon form to rest for a little while, then changed back. They’d snuck out, making sure all the others were still asleep and wandered the city.

Actually, it wasn't that incredibly large of a city. It wasn't that incredibly savory of a city either, but then Tom had little to judge cities in Astlan by. Tom, or Edwyrd didn't have much spare attention to pay to the city in any event. Every other second was spent on concentrating on his human form. He really didn't want to lose it in the middle of the street.

One problem they'd quickly realized was lack of currency. Rupert had a couple copper pennies, but that was all. Edwyrd, naturally, had none. It would also be doubtful that either Jenn or Gastropé would have any either, having just been prisoners. They'd need money to at least get some supplies. Further, if this Gizzor Del as they discovered its name, was far from Freehold, they'd need horses for Jenn and Gastropé and probably a wagon for Edwyrd and Rupert since Rupert was scared of horses and it was doubtful if the horses would like Edwyrd.

It was unfortunate, but Tom doubted that he could just carry all three of the wizards and fly. If they could ditch Gastropé then he could take Jenn and Rupert, one in each arm, if she'd allow it. With three, though, he was afraid he'd drop one. Unfortunately, he wasn't sure he could convince Jenn to abandon the idiot wizard in a strange city. Actually, he wasn't sure he could agree with it either. It wasn't as bad as just killing him, but the thought did kind of bother him.

Eventually they had returned to the little church place and found everyone awake. It was then the fun began for Edwyrd. He was really nervous that under close scrutiny these guys would figure out who he was. If they didn't believe him, then he was afraid their disbelief might keep him from holding form before others in the city. Edwyrd suspected that Gizzor Delians would be much more upset by his form than even Jenn or Gastropé. Thus it was that Edwyrd stood there while Jenn paced up and down trying to figure out where they were. Edwyrd hoped she wouldn't return to asking him questions, he didn't have a clue to the local geography.

"Our other problem," Rupert said, causing Jenn to halt her pacing, "is money, Edwyrd here, just spent the last of his funds on his apple and I don't have anything but pennies. Do you guys have any?"

Jenn frowned and shook her head. Gastropé just pulled his tattered pockets inside out. Actually, if they weren't going to attract too much attention, they'd have to get Jenn and Gastropé new clothes as well. Their current ones were rather ragged and singed. Edwyrd just shook his head as problems mounted.

~

"Maybe the priest has some," Gastrope' suggested. "They are always taking collections."

"But that's for their god..." Jenn protested.

"Who needs it more now? His god or us? Besides if his god is one of the good guys, the money should be for the poor and indigent. I think we all fit in that category at the moment." Gastropé pointed out. He walked over to the priest. "Any money priest?" he asked as he pulled down the gag.

"Tiernon shall protect me, his sword and his shield shall enfold me."

"Well you can enfold yourself all you want later, just answer my question or I'll enfold you inside out." Gastrope's right hand started to glow. Jenn grimaced at Gastrope's trick of using Were Light to threaten the priest.

The priest turned whiter. "In the big robe’s pockets in the wardrobe." Gastrope' regagged him. Jenn walked over to the wardrobe. Strange, it didn't seem like there were as many clothes in there as last night. She must have been more tired than she thought. She reached into each of the pockets in the only robe left. In the back pocket she found a small green pouch. She took it out.

Pulling its mouth apart, she gently poured three gold coins and nine silver ones onto her hand. Not a lot, but hopefully enough. She showed the others. Gastropé nodded and looked down at the priest. "Thank you for your donation, gentle sir." A lot of his courage had come back now that the demon was gone, and he was away from Exador. "Now you could perhaps tell us how to get to Freehold from here?" He brought the intensity of light on his hand back up into the visible range as he removed the gag again with his other hand.

"Don't know. I...I...never heard of the place."

"Never heard of the place." That gave Gastrope' pause. If a supposedly educated priest had never heard of Freehold, it couldn't be too close.

"Turelane?" The priest shook his head. "What about the wizard Exador? You ever hear of him?" The priest was about to shake his head, then stopped and thought for a moment.

"North and east, I think. I'm not sure though. He came to visit Duke Swery about four years ago." Gastropé looked over to Jenn.

"Well it's something. Maybe we can find a sage with a map. Look," she turned to Edwyrd, "you're Rupert's cousin you should know where he lived."

Edwyrd took a moment, "I know where he lived before he went off to school."

"Oh." Unfortunately, Jenn didn't know where that was. It wasn't clear to her that a little kid like Rupert would know how to make the necessary coordinate translations between the school and his old home. It would probably just be easier to find a sage. "Ok, gag him again. I guess we'll go look for a sage.” Gastropé complied.

"What are your plans? You said you were passing through," Jenn asked Edwyrd.

"Well, since he seems to somehow have gotten separated from his teachers, I feel it's my duty as his cousin to make sure he gets back safely." Edwyrd responded, also starting to pace slightly.

"So you're coming with us."

"Looks that way." Edwyrd smiled rather shyly.

"Fine. Now we've got to go out and get supplies and directions. The problem is, I don't want to leave the priest alone."

"I can watch him," Edwyrd volunteered. Tom really didn't want to go back outside again so soon. He was afraid he was going to lose it any moment. If these guys would all leave, he could go into the kitchen away from the priest and turn back into his true form. True form! Aaaggghhh, Tom thought. What's happened to my mind? This is my true form, not the demon one.

Gastropé looked at Edwyrd closely. "Aren't you even going to ask why we have a priest tied up in his own temple? Before offering to guard him?" Gastropé asked suspiciously.

"Well...Rupert explained to me that he was this evil priest that had captured you after his henchmen attacked your caravan and killed a bunch of the people. You managed to turn the tables on him and now had him tied up so you could get away. Isn't that what happened?" Edwyrd asked, as if trying to confirm Rupert's story.

"Close enough," Jenn said, trying to cut Gastropé off before he gave too much away. "Rupert, do you think it's a good idea to leave the priest with Edwyrd?"

"I'd trust my cousin here, with my life. The priest won't get away while we're gone."

"Ok then," Jenn looked to Gastropé for agreement. He just sort of shrugged, apparently having nothing else to offer. "You wait here for us, with the door locked behind us." She said to Edwyrd. "We'll be back in an hour or so and we'll knock like this," she demonstrated. "Don't untie him for anything."

"Sure." Edwyrd said, looking a little less tense for the moment. Jenn went and opened the door carefully, looking to make sure they weren't observed. She motioned for the others to precede her out the door. When they had, she said "bye," to Edwyrd and shut the door behind her.

Tom went to the door and put the bar across it. He looked over at the priest who was staring at him with pleading in his eyes. "Sorry," Tom said. "But I've got my instructions. How can I trust you after what my cousin says you did?" The priest shook his head. Tom shrugged an apology and went into the kitchen.

As soon as he was out of sight of the priest, Tom started to relax. The change hurt still, but not quite so bad. Suddenly, Tom realized he had a problem. His clothes! Already his legs were constricted in the pants, and the shirt had come untucked by his growing taller. He concentrated on halting the process. It wasn't easy and the breaches creaked as if the stitches were about to give way, and then it stopped. Concentrating on his human form as hard as he could, he felt the clothing get looser again.

Heaving a sigh of relief, he quickly stripped the clothes off into a pile. Finally, Tom thought and let the change occur. He gritted his teeth, but the pain almost felt like pleasure, this time he controlled it a little better. He changed slower, less abruptly. Finally he could completely relax. He was himself, or rather, he corrected sadly, he was his demon self.

This was really bothering him. This horrid demon form just felt so much better. Even now, not under any pressure, just thinking of trapping himself in that flimsy little white bag of flesh that was his old body made him feel uncomfortable. Why? A week ago, he'd have thought that's all he wanted. Actually, even now, he'd love to go back to his normal old life. At least he thought he did. It was just that his old body was so weak, so flimsy. Actually, he thought, and this really disturbed him, it was rather ugly. Ugly? Like who should talk. This demon form was monstrous, as a human he at least looked normal. Why then, did he all of the sudden find normal so repellent?

Tom rested his head in his hands. Looking down at the pile of clothes on the floor, he thought how lucky he'd been not to rip them to shreds like the Incredible Hulk. A thought struck Tom suddenly. He looked at the clothes, he looked down at his body, his demon body. He was naked! He'd been running around naked all this time as a demon! It had never even occurred to him! Here he'd gone out in public, flown around, hung out with a girl! naked! Even now he was sitting here in the nude, and other than the fact that he didn't want someone walking in and seeing a demon, he didn't care if they saw him without any clothes!

Tom was shocked. Not by his nudity, but by the fact that he didn't care about it, not before, not now. Intellectually, he knew he should be embarrassed to have people see him naked. Well, not exactly embarrassed. He gave a small smile of pride looking down between his legs. Not embarrassed at all.

Humor aside, he should feel uncomfortable naked, he always had before, now he no longer did. It was like he had no shame. Kind of like Adam and Eve before the apple, he thought suddenly. He supposed, though, that at least for the sake of others, he should put something on, even as a demon. Looking down at the clothes however, he remembered how strange they'd felt, even on his sickly, oversensitive human skin. They'd been most uncomfortable. Not as uncomfortable as the thought of wearing something now in demon form, but they hadn't been pleasant. At the time though, the sensation of needing to blow up had overwhelmed him and he hadn't noticed the additional discomfort.

He tossed around the idea of a loin cloth, but even that sounded kind of restraining and unnatural. He'd only be wearing it for others, and they hadn't objected before. Actually, his demonic privates hanging out in the wind probably didn't disturb humans as much as simply his overall demonic presence did. He guessed it would be kind of like trying to cover up one part of a giant toxic landfill in your backyard with a throw rug. Actually, it was also a moot point for the moment, since he was planning on only going out in public in Edwyrd form. Edwyrd would have no choice, society would demand clothes on him. Not to mention the fact that his tepid looking skin would probably get sun burned and otherwise damaged without clothes.

That was really one of the nice things about his own nice burgundy colored hide. Not only didn't he get sunburned, he didn't really feel hot or cold unless he was trying to. He also usually didn't feel swords, daggers and spears either. Dragon blood and other demons hurt, but not much of anything the humans had thrown at him even bothered him. He almost had to laugh at the guy in Exador's camp who whacked him with the sword. Poor fellow didn't stand a chance in hell. Literally.

Tom supposed that if he were to be objective in fact, preferring this demon form wasn't necessarily totally crazy. So far, he'd been upset about his seeming brainwashed preference for his demon form over his old human body, but what if it was just his common sense? After all, if he really thought about it, why shouldn't he prefer the demon form?

True it was rather frightening and turned people away and caused them to faint. That hurt, that hurt a lot, but was it always his problem? How much of it was people's irrational (OK, so maybe rational, given history) biases against demons. If people gave him a chance they'd like him, he was sure. Look at Rupert; well maybe he was a weird case. Look at Jenn, she didn't trust him completely, but she was at least starting to deal with him as a person, not an object. He also had Tizzy and Bogsworth as friends. Gastropé was still a problem, but he wasn't sure he wanted that guy as a friend anyway. Yeah, he felt lonely, but no lonelier than he'd been in Harding, and things were getting better.

Now true, the demon form was also symbolic of the slave state he was in, although since Jehenna had summoned him last, and then cut and run, he hadn't had to worry about his slavery too much. He wondered what those guys were up to? In the end, it was also true that he was stuck in this form for a long time. Well not completely stuck, he now knew he could pretend to look human. If he really wanted to. The scary thing was, he was no longer sure he wanted to. Ever.

After all, if he looked at the positive side, there was a lot to be said. One, he was stronger and tougher than anybody he'd met, at least physically. He could fly, that was fun and handy. He hadn't really worked much with it, but apparently he could shoot some form of energy bolts and things like that. Or at least his Tae-Kwon-Do was translating a little too literally around here. All of his senses were keener than the wildest animal's. He had telescopic vision, some form of infrared vision, and who knew what other similar things. No normal weapons could hurt him, even if they did, it was nearly impossible to kill him. At worst any wounds would send him back to the Abyss, where he could regenerate. He could shape change! Crap, he was damn near a superhero!

He didn't get hungry or thirsty. He wasn't like one of the little humans so dependent on shelter and weapons to protect themselves from nature. Humans got hungry, humans got sick and came down with diseases. As far as he could determine from what Boggy and Tizzy had said, he wouldn't age either. He was immortal! He could live for thousands of years.

If he was going to toil his life away in slavery, that could be a problem; but if he went out and did something with his life.... Talk about a chance to overcome existential dread! Given all that, who would want to be a scrawny teenaged boy? Who would want to go back into the tiny little alabaster pimple of a body that humans got stuck with.

Face it Tom, he told himself, what are you bitching about? It was every guy's dream come true. Superhuman powers, flight, super strength, invulnerability, telescopic vision, trans-dimensional hearing, energy bolts, shape changing, dimension hopping. What comic book hero could ever do all that? If this were a video game, he’d kill to have a character like himself! He was almost a minor god! Well maybe not a god, let's not get carried away here, he was not that powerful. Most the wizards he met could bend him to their thumb. Something close to godlike but not so powerful, and with more limitations. What he was, Tom suddenly realized, was a demon!





Chapter 49


A demon! Well, it had literally been staring him in the face for some time. He'd even kind of pretended at it for a while. It had simply never hit him like that before. It was kind of a, what was the word? an epiphany, that was the word. So what kid wouldn't be thrilled to be a demon? 'I Was a Teenage Demon!' was a perfect name for a grade B horror movie Tom thought. A TV show would be ‘Teen Demon’ or better yet, the ‘Demon Diaries’. Who wouldn't be thrilled? Well apparently he wasn't.

Not to take away from his moment of revelation, but Tom had to admit to himself that he hadn't been having the greatest time of his life. Subjectively, at least. Of course, it seemed to Tom that that was one of the rules of having an adventure. 'Never enjoy an adventure while you're on it. Wait until it's over and look back on it with longing.' That's always the way it seemed to work. He just didn't have the necessary objectivity to view the whole thing like he was reading a book, or remembering it from a long time past. How was one supposed to get that level of objectivity? Tom certainly didn't know. At the moment this 'adventure' was just a pain. Tom halted himself in mid-thought. To be fair, he had to admit that cruising around Astlan was a lot more fun than sitting in an empty cave waiting to be called by his 'master.'

On the other hand, compared to just getting up in the morning in his own home where his mom was, and going to high school every day, caused both cave and Astlan to pale. At the time, he hadn't really realized what he had in Harding. Things always seemed better in hindsight. So great, Tom thought, I now know how stupid I was not appreciating Harding. So I guess this is the part where I click my Red Hooves together three times and say 'There's no place like home, There's no place like home, There's NO place like home!'

As was to be expected, not much happened. He still wasn't in Kansas, or in Tom's case, New Jersey. Actually, Tom had to admit, a lot of Jersey was more like the Abyss than Kansas anyway. Tom sighed. He was just standing there looking down at Edwyrd's clothes. He tried to walk around a bit, softly, so as not to scare the priest. He'd love to go out and stretch his wings a bit. The little Edwyrd body had made him feel claustrophobic and the fact that he kept gouging the ceiling beams with his horns didn't help. He leaned against the wall so he could stick his legs out and stretch them. His knees in each leg were starting to get a bit stiff, or so he imagined. He was sure it was just being cooped up that made him feel that way.

How long had it been? How long had he stood there wrestling with the horns of his dilemma, or more precisely with the lack of horns of his dilemma, thought Tom looking at Edwyrd's clothes. The others might return soon. While they couldn't walk in and surprise him due to the bars on the door, if Edwyrd wasn't already back by the time they knocked, it might get tricky. He doubted he could change back and dress quickly enough not to arouse suspicion.

Of course, Tom thought, still looking at the clothes, I could stay in this form; point to the clothes and say I'd gotten hungry and eaten Edwyrd. Tom smiled, it wasn't completely wrong, Edwyrd was inside him. He suspected, however, that it wouldn't make Jenn trust him any more than she already didn't. But...he reminded himself, he could see Gastropé faint again, especially if he could manage to make his stomach growl while he was looking at the wizard. "Tom, you're just evil," he said to himself softly with a smile.

Edwyrd wandered out of the kitchen. It really was rather dark in this place since the candles went out. The light seeping around the doorway didn't do much. In his Tom form he didn't notice the darkness, but Edwyrd's feeble human eyes had trouble seeing. Tom supposed that if he ever got good enough, he could probably make improvements on Edwyrd's body. Strength, eyesight, little things so that Edwyrd still looked human, but had some of the advantages of being a demon. Unfortunately, for the moment, it was all Tom could do to keep control just being Edwyrd.

There were some cupboards with more candles in them, Edwyrd supposed he should light some, but he wasn't sure how. He didn't have a lighter or any matches, and didn't know how to use flint and steel even if he found them. He knew from experience that Tom could probably light them by force of will alone. He was afraid, though, that in his current form, if he concentrated hard enough on creating fire, he'd lose control over his body. That was his real problem. No matter what he did he felt like he had to hold part of himself back to maintain control.

Idly he looked through some drawers, hoping to find some way to light the candles. The priest went "Mmmmphh, mmmmmph." Tom looked over to the priest. The priest was wiggling trying to attract his attention. Actually, Tom thought, here was a chance to maybe get some nonbiased information about Astlan. Of course the guy only wanted to escape, but maybe he'd talk, thinking that by talking he could get free sooner.

Tom walked over to the priest and sat down rather stiffly on the floor. It felt really weird to sit down like that. He hadn't done it in so long. He kept expecting to bend his tail painfully at any moment. He pulled the gag away from the priest's mouth.

"Son, son, you've made a terrible mistake, you've been fooled by a group of evildoers." The priest quickly tried to warn Tom. "You've got to help me get free. There is great danger to the entire city. Nay to the entire world!"

Tom would have to try to turn the guy's attention for a bit if he was going to get any information. "Why should I believe you? After all, didn't you summon a demon to attack my cousin and his friends?" Actually Tom was pretty amazed at how easily lying came to him. He supposed that being a demon made him a natural.

"NO! Not at all. All to the contrary. They are demonic cohorts. At first I'd thought they were slaves of a Greater Demon, but now I see that they're actually wizards! Wizards of such vast power as to be able to command the very lords of the Abyss. They came and brought with them two demons of horrific might."

"I don't see any demons around here now." Edwyrd commented, looking around as if for demons.

"I know, I know, I don't know where the foul beings went. I don't know why I am still alive! I suspect that it is so they can sacrifice me later! You must beware lest they sacrifice you to."

Egads, this guy had some imagination. It was no wonder he fainted. Tom also had to admit, that if he really were Edwyrd, and had just walked into as strange a situation as had existed this morning, he'd be half tempted to believe the priest. He looked up at where the braziers were. "Then do you deny summoning a demon?"

Verigas followed Edwyrd's eyes to the braziers. His eyes began to fill with tears. "No, no, I admit to a small Conjury. I was just trying to summon a first order demon that occasionally runs some small errands for me. Unfortunately, it all went wrong this time. I don't know how or why but my spell was usurped by a greater demon for its evil machinations."

"Hmmm, well it seems to me that if you're going to go around conjuring demons, you get what you deserve." Edwyrd stated looking the priest in the eyes. After all, he did admit to being a slave owner.

The priest sniffed sadly, "I know, I know, Tiernon has shown me the errors of my ways. If I get out of this alive, I'll never summon another demon again."

"Well, that seems pretty reasonable." At least some of the crazies could be scared into good behavior, thought Edwyrd. "I know if I'd been through a similar experience I wouldn't want to.

"So what do you do in this city anyway? When you're not conjuring demons."

The priest did a slight double take at the change of topic. "Uhhm, I'm the head priest of the God Tiernon here in Gizzor Del. I know the Duke. I can assure you, that if you free me, I'll be able to provide you with the full protection of the church and the Duke's men. Your cousin's friends won't be able to retaliate."

"Hmm, but you said," Edwyrd paused for dramatic effect, "that they had a greater demon. If that's true, what sort of protection are the church and the Duke's soldiers? After all, you are the high priest and they captured you."

The priest started getting teary eyed again. "I know, I know, but we must try, we can't all be vanquished by the evil machinations of wizards and their demons. We must try and fight for our lives and our city."

The guy, Edwyrd thought, was at least not the total coward he'd seemed earlier. He at least seemed sincere in trying to stand up against what he perceived as a threat. He'd been cowering earlier, but given the circumstances, that could probably be understood. It was sad, of course, that he had to be scared into believing all this. Edwyrd felt rather depressed that he had to scare the guy so bad, but he didn't know what he could have done differently.

Knock, knock....knock....knock, knock. Came the prearranged signal at the door that the others were back. Edwyrd quickly replaced the gag on the cleric. He gave the man a slightly apologetic smile as he did so. He then stood up and walked carefully over to the door to unbar it. He opened the door and stepped aside as Jenn hurried in, followed by Gastropé and Rupert.

None of the three seemed to be carrying much in the way of supplies. "Any luck?" Edwyrd asked.

"Well, I found a sage who had a semi-reliable map." Jenn answered. "It looks like we need to head northeast from here."

"Over a sea," Rupert chimed in.

"A sea?" Edwyrd asked uncertainly.

"Yes," said Jenn, "it appears that we need to cross a small sea to a port called Hoggensforth. From there it’s only a bit over a week’s ride to Freehold."

"How are we going to cross the sea?" Edwyrd asked, getting nervous about the answer.

"By boat of course," Jenn answered somewhat condescendingly.

"Yes, but can we afford that? I don't have any money." Edwyrd was actually more concerned about being trapped on in close quarters with a bunch of people when he might lose control at any moment.

"That's where I came in," spoke up Gastropé. "We went to the harbormaster and found a ship going to Hoggensforth. After a lot of persuasion on my part," Gastrope' said with a proud smile, "I was able to get us a discount rate."

"A discount rate," Edwyrd asked suspiciously.

"Well," Jenn said sourly, "it seems there's a slight problem with pirates on this sea. By convincing the ship's master that he'd have three combat trained wizards on board, he was able to make a deal that we could afford." She looked pointedly at Gastropé with a frown on her face.

"Oh." Edwyrd said, then his brows furrowed. "Three wizards?"

"Well," Gastropé said depreciatingly, "I did have to exaggerate a little."

"A little?" Jenn asked, obviously annoyed. "I am not combat trained, and I doubt you exactly are either." Gastropé sniffed at this. "And Rupert doesn't even count as a wizard, he's just a very junior student at best. Besides who would even take a little kid seriously as a wizard anyway?"

"We don't have to tell them which three of us are wizards." Gastropé returned. "We can just let them assume that Edwyrd is the third wizard."

"Oh, yeah, and what if we run into pirates?" Jenn asked angrily.

"We improvise." Gastropé threw his hands above his head. "Trust me, it'll work if you don't lose your calm."

"They'll expect him to be able to cast spells or something if it comes to a fight. I mean..." she suddenly turned her attention to Edwyrd. "What exactly do you do for a living anyway?" she asked.

"Uhm," Edwyrd was taken unprepared. He thought quickly, trying to come up with a plausible job for an Astlanian. Something he could be sure they had. What was it Rupert had said earlier about Tom? "I'm a, uh, animage."

"An animage?" Jenn seemed taken aback. She blinked a couple of times. "Really? Why didn't you say so earlier." Her eyes narrowed slightly, suddenly, and her head tilted. "Really?" she repeated.

Crap, what have I got myself into, thought Edwyrd, he didn't even know what an animage was. All he could do to salvage the situation was to try and carry the bluff through. He noted out of the corner of his eye that Rupert was grimacing. "Yeah, really. I mean, I'm not the greatest, but I get by." That sure sounded stupid Edwyrd thought even as he said it.

"Hmm," Jenn acted as if she wasn't sure. "Well then, we should talk sometime, I'd be very interested in trading some theories of mine with you. Get your perspective on some healing issues."

"Yeah, sounds good." Edwyrd said, almost out of the corner of his mouth, trying to keeps his smile from looking too fake.

"Ok," Jenn said turning back to Gastropé, "then at least it wasn't a total lie. We've got three mana wielders at least." The tone of her voice was such that Edwyrd could tell she wasn't totally convinced. He was going to have to ask Rupert exactly what one of these animage guys was, so he wouldn't say anything too terribly out of place.

"Fine, so," Gastropé said, seemingly happy that the matter was apparently resolved, "we need to get ready to go. The ship leaves with the second tide, this afternoon."

"Second tide?" Edwyrd asked, he didn't know much about tides and such, but that didn't sound quite right.

"Yeah, second tide." Gastropé repeated, both him and Jenn were looking at him as if they couldn't understand his confusion. Edwyrd decided he'd better shut up, before he gave himself completely away.

"Sounds good. Uh, what do we do with the priest?" Edwyrd asked. Gastropé and Jenn both paused in thought. That changed the subject, apparently.

"I don't know. We can't leave him tied up forever." Jenn said after a moment of deliberation.

"Well, we could just put him to sleep for a long time so that we'll be long gone when he wakes up." The priest meanwhile was looking at them all with really large eyes. Obviously concerned about his own fate.

"Yeah, and I could bind him magically, so that after the duration of the spell, he would be free to leave," Jenn added. "OK, let's do both."

"Well, let's get ready, we only have two hours before the boat leaves and there are a couple of other things we should get before we leave." Gastropé said.





Astlanian Calendar

Uropian and Anuropian Cycles

Astlan has two moons. The larger-appearing moon is Uropia and the smaller is Anuropia. Uropia represents the feminine aspect of nature and Anuropia the masculine.

Both moons are actually the same size, (balancing male and female), but Anuropia is farther away and thus appears smaller. Both moons have synchronous periods of revolution, although Anuropia's is one half that of Uropia.

Thus, for every 2 months of Uropia, Anuropia has one. Each month of Uropia has a name but Anuropian months are not named, as a whole, rather the quarters of the Anuropian month are named. The five Anuropian months correspond to the five seasons. The logic behind this comes from the Anuropian phases.

Having two moons does make for interesting tidal pattern as well as other Ropian based effects (as the joint moon cycles are called). However, unusual moon effects are further complicated by Anuropia's unorthodox behavior. Uropia revolves in the plane of the ecliptic (it follows the same path as Fierd, the sun). Anuropia, however, in a manner that some would insist is completely masculine in its contradictory behavior, has somehow managed to achieve a polar orbit (it traverses the sky north to south and south to north, passing over the poles), much to the consternation of more than one sage. This orbit is also perpendicular to the motion of Astlan about Fierd. The polar orbit of Anuropia, combined with the more stable motion of Uropia is what drives the Ropian cycles, the months and the seasons.

Months of the Year

There are ten Uropian months and thus five Anuropian months (thus 5 seasons). Each Anuropian month is divided into quarters indicating the moon's current position in the sky. Each Anuropian quarter is 20 days long (thus a month and season are 80 days long), and each Uropian month is 40 days long. There are thus 400 days in one year.

Fortunately, the Fierdal year also happens to correspond to the same length of time, approximately. Slight differences in Ropian and Fierdal cycles result in leap years every 5th year, and to keep the calendars in balance, these leap years require 1 day to be added the calendar every five years to keep the cycles of the moons in line with the cycles of the sun. This leap day always occurs between the 20th and the 1st quarter-month. It also has its own day of the week so as not to throw off the other days of the week.

Aspects of the Months

The combination of the two moons' phases gives rise to the various aspects of the months. The Aspects are combinations of the negative and positive phases of the moons and the masculine, feminine combination of the moons.

Phases of the Moons

Ultimately it is the phases of the two moons that drive the entire life cycle of Astlan.

Uropia: Uropia has four phases: Submissive (when it is between Fierd and Astlan, thus unlit); Ascendant (moving towards Dominant); Dominant (on the other side of Astlan from Fierd, full moon); and Descendent (moving away from Dominant, towards submissive). Further, when Uropia is visible in the day sky, it is said to be in its Negative Aspect and when it is visible at night, it is in its Positive Aspect.

Anuropia: The polar orbit of Anuropia gives it very unusual behavior. For one-half of its month it traverses over the northern hemisphere, and the other half it traverses over the southern hemisphere. When in one hemisphere, it is not visible from the other. If Anuropia is traversing the opposite hemisphere and not visible, then Uropia is the only moon present, this period of time has a Feminine Aspect. When both moons are visible in the sky (not necessarily at the same time, e.g. one could be up in day and the other at night) that period of time has a Masculine Aspect.

What one actually sees with Anuropia's motion (in the northern hemisphere) is that after a period of forty days of absence, Anuropia appears upon the daytime horizon. At this point, it is between Astlan and Fierd and thus is unlit by Fierd and is in its Submissive phase. On this first night, due to the rotation of Astlan, Anuropia (unlit however) appears to walk along the horizon from East to West. On each successive day it traverses the sky farther and farther North (and becoming fuller), until eventually it reaches the North Pole where it does not traverse the sky at all. This motion, from South to North over a period of 20 days is called retrograde motion. When Anuropia is in retrograde and simultaneously visible during the day, (which is always the case, due to the orbit, retrograde and Anuropia's daytime presence always occur together) this is its Negative Aspect (like Uropia’s Negative Aspect). When it reaches the North Pole, Anuropia is now in its Ascendant Phase (and half of it is lit up by Fierd).

Upon reaching the Pole, for a few days, it appears to never set (since being at the north pole it is visible to people on both the night side and the day side). After reaching the North Pole, it then begins to progress over the night sky North to South. While it traverses from the North to the South, it is in is in its Positive Aspect (it's in the night sky where moons have power, and it's no longer moving retrograde). As it nears the horizon of the night sky, it becomes fuller and fuller until it is Dominant at the equator.

After it falls below the equator, once again the Aspects of the Months are Feminine, as Anuropia moves in its Descendent state moving towards Submissive when it will dare to climb into Uropia's sky, forty days after disappearing. Naturally, if one lives south of the equator, things are simply reversed.





Astlanian Calendar



Qtr Month

Uropian Month

Anuropian Qtr-Month

Astrological Influence

Uropian Polarity

Uropian Phase

Masc/ Fem (NH)

Season (NH) Anuropian Month

Season (SH) Anuropian Month



Element

Anuropian Polarity



1

Infiernan

Volcus

Fire

Pos

Neg

Des/ Sub

Masc

End Harvest

Spring



2

Phoen

Fire

Pos

Pos

Asc/ Dom

Fem

Begin Hearth

Spring



3

Chrysan

Labyrin

Earth

Neg

Pos

Des/ Sub

Fem

Hearth

End Spring



4

Grub

Earth

Neg

Neg

Asc/ Dom

Masc

Hearth

Begin Summer



5

Hydran

Waven

Water

Pos

Neg

Des/ Sub

Masc

End Hearth

Summer



6

Seamonth

Water

Pos

Pos

Asc/ Dom

Fem

Start Winter

Summer



7

Vacuan

Nilis

Air

Neg

Pos

Des/ Sub

Fem

Winter

End Summer



8

Mantican

Air

Neg

Neg

Asc/ Dom

Masc

Winter

Begin Harvest



9

Animan

Angelios

Spirit

Pos

Neg

Des/ Sub

Masc

End Winter

Harvest



10

Titius

Spirit

Pos

Pos

Asc/ Dom

Fem

Start Spring

Harvest



11

Fluan

Damia

Water

Neg

Pos

Des/ Sub

Fem

Spring

End Harvest



12

Remorth

Water

Neg

Neg

Asc/ Dom

Masc

Spring

Begin Winter



13

Arian

Gryphos

Air

Pos

Neg

Des/ Sub

Masc

End Spring

Winter



14

Cyclos

Air

Pos

Pos

Asc/ Dom

Fem

Start Summer

Winter



15

Moltan

Electh

Fire

Neg

Pos

Des/ Sub

Fem

Summer

End Winter



16

Demoni

Fire

Neg

Neg

Asc/ Dom

Masc

Summer

Begin Sustenance



17

Palean

Mon

Earth

Pos

Neg

Des/ Sub

Masc

End Summer

Sustenance



18

Foundate

Earth

Pos

Pos

Asc/ Dom

Fem

Begin Harvest

Sustenance



19

Necran

Nieron

Spirit

Neg

Pos

Des/ Sub

Fem

Harvest

End Sustenance



20

Morthus

Spirit

Neg

Neg

Asc/ Dom

Masc

Harvest

Start Spring





Example of weekly calendar for the Uropian month of Infiernan, which has two Anuropian months, Vulcus and Phoen. Infiernon is the first month of the year on the above calendar.



Anuropian Qtr-Month

Uropia's Phase

Uropian Month of Infiernan



Vulcus

Descendant

1. Fierday

2. Desday

3. Anday

4. Suday

5. Restday



6. Landay

7. Asday

8. Urday

9. Domday

10. Godsday



Submissive

11. Fierday

12. Desday

13. Anday

14. Suday

15. Restday



16. Landay

17. Asday

18. Urday

19. Domday

20. Godsday



Phoen

Ascendant

1. Fierday

2. Desday

3. Anday

4. Suday

5. Restday



6. Landay

7. Asday

8. Urday

9. Domday

10. Godsday



Dominant

11. Fierday

12. Desday

13. Anday

14. Suday

15. Restday



16. Landay

17. Asday

18. Urday

19. Domday

20. Godsday





Notes on Aspects and Phases: One thing to note is that Anuropia is rarely completely dominant, as half the time that it is in the night (or day) sky, Uropia is also in the sky. The height of the Masculine aspect occurs when Uropia and Anuropia are on opposite sides of Astlan, (e.g. Positive Anuropia and Negative Uropia or vice versa). The strongest such occurrence is with Uropia in the Negative Submissive Aspect, and Anuropia in the Positive Dominant Aspect. This is occasionally a time of greater strife; in the Northern Hemisphere it also occurs in the last week of each season, in the Southern Hemisphere during the first week of each season (except that in this case Uropia is in its Dominant Phase rather than submissive).

One other thing to note is that due to Anuropia's motion, Anuropian Eclipses of Fierd are not uncommon. More uncommon is an Uropian Eclipse of Fierd, and most uncommon and always of great import is a dual Uropian-Anuropian Eclipse (when Fierd, Anuropia, Uropia and Astlan are all aligned). Other rare but important moments also occur when Uropia and Anuropia are on exact opposite sides of the planet, with Fierd also in complete alignment (major upheavals usually occur).

Notes on Southern Hemisphere: In the Southern Hemisphere the Masculine-Feminine Aspects are reversed. The Polarities however, stay fixed. The phases of Uropia stay the same, since its orbit is equatorial. Thus, quarter-month 20 is Morthus, which in the NH is Negative Masculine Spirit, whereas in the SH, it is Negative Feminine Spirit. Further, note that in the SH there is no month of Hearth before Winter. Rather after Winter there is the long period of Sustenance. The reason for this is that due to the elemental oppositions; in the NH the long cold, but dry season of Hearth comes before the wetter and harsher season of Winter. In the SH, on the other hand, the cold dry season, Sustenance, comes after the coldest and wetter weather of Winter. At least this is the general case, and obviously local weather conditions may vary from season to season, and no place too near the equator gets cold or snowy, but it does get wet in Winter.

Finally, in the NH, Anuropian months begin when Anuropia is at the North Pole, while in the SH, Anuropian months begin when Anuropia is at the South Pole.

Weeks: Astlanian weeks are based upon the Uropian month and her phases. Each week corresponds to a phase of Uropia. The names of the weeks are thus Desen, Subime, Asen and Domine. Each week is 10 days long and is exactly one half of an Anuropian quarter.

Days: There are 10 days in a Uropian week. The ten days are Fierday, Desday, Anday, Suday, Restday, Landay, Asday, Urday, Domday, Godsday. In many lands, Restday is a day of relaxation, and Godsday a day of religious celebration. Different lands and cultures, however, do tend to vary from this.

The numbering of the days is generally done in either one of two ways. Most commonly the days are numbered 1-20, in accordance with the days of the Anuropian quarter-month, and the date is written as QM/Day/Year, where QM is the quarter-month (1-20) and the day is the day of that quarter-month. A more archaic form is to number the Uropian months (1-10) and the days of the Uropian month (1-40). However, since mixing both can lead to confusion, the general convention if using the Uropian system is to give Day-Name of Month-Year. From a practical point of view, the first system based on the Anuropian quarter-month is usually preferred, since among the common people, more people can count to twenty than can count to 40.

Every five years is a leap year. At this time, a single day is added between the 20th and 1st quarter months (10th and 1st Uropian month). In other words, add an extra day between the fifth and sixth years. This day does not fall on the regular calendar, and even has a special name, so that the names of the days of the week will not get out of synch from year to year. The name of the leap day varies from place to place, but is usually either referred to as Leap day or Festival. The second name is more common because in most places, great carnivals are given at this time. It is also a popular time for Coronations, if the demise of the previous ruler can be arranged conveniently enough.

Hours: Time keeping in many parts of Astlan, is not always an exact science. Most common people divide the day into quarters or fifths with major meals or getting up and going to bed marking the turning point. More precise measurements are done using clocks and other devices, however, the scaling factors on these devices tend to vary from maker to maker. However, logically, and from a Ropian point of view, it would make sense to divide the day into 20 hours. This accommodates both people who divide days into fifths and those who use quarters.

The one surety in all timekeeping is that during the Positive Masculine Aspect of the moons, Anuropia is directly overhead at midnight. During the Negative Masculine Aspect, both Fierd and Anuropia lie in a line in the sky directly overhead. This fails, of course, during the Feminine months and when Anuropia is at the Pole.





Chapter 50


The new clothes actually felt rather nice for a change. Jenn simply wished she'd been able to clean up better before putting them on. They'd managed to scrounge up some rags and get some well water to wash up with, which she'd promptly done in the kitchen, but a full bath with warm water would have been nice. The shopkeeper had looked at her strangely when she'd insisted on getting pants and blouse rather than a dress, but Jenn was determined that if she could only afford one set of clothes, those clothes were going to be suitable for riding and any other activities. A good chunk of their remaining silver had gone to getting her and Gastropé new clothes. Fortunately, Rupert could make do with his, and Edwyrd's seemed in pretty good shape, if poorly fitting.

Actually, Edwyrd's were in amazingly good shape. Apparently, he had no baggage or other clothes, and was just out wandering the countryside as is. Given that strangeness, she didn't know if it was any stranger than the fact that his clothes were remarkably clean for having been wandering the countryside. She pondered over the rather strange young man walking a little bit ahead of her as the made their way down the narrow winding street down to the dock. He was really quite an anomaly. While she couldn’t deny a definite family resemblance, the strange coincidence of Rupert encountering him immediately after entering town, was incredible. Further the disappearance of the demon and the strange behavior of both Rupert and Edwyrd were all hard to understand.

For a short while, she had the paranoid notion that Edwyrd was really the demon in disguise. That the creature had somehow managed to assume human form and was trying yet another scheme to wrangle its way in to her confidence. She realized of course that this was completely ludicrous; still, if it weren't for the fact that any demon capable of doing such things would be able to come up with better lies than Edwyrd and Rupert had been telling, she'd almost be tempted to indulge her paranoia.

Jenn had to dodge suddenly as a heavy set woman tossed a bucket of water out an overhanging window above, down onto the street below. Jenn was quickly remembering why she hated cities so much. The narrow confines of the stone and stucco walls made her claustrophobic, and the crude behavior of the inhabitants, both the ones above and the ones like she was now stepping over on the street, made her uncomfortable. Dodging the occasional garbage or manure pile in addition to the periodic drunk didn't help a lot either. Actually, given its relatively small size, Gizzor Del seemed to have an inordinate number of drunks. Those drunks probably came from the large number of taverns they'd been passing, filled even at this hour by rowdy looking patrons.

Animage, my herb garden, Jenn thought, returning to the subject at hand. Said subject was apparently torn between gawking at the city inhabitants and acting like he was going to be attacked at any moment, Jenn noted. He was certainly acting nervous and hesitant. Like he was hiding something, certainly he was behaving strangely, and such behavior piqued Jenn's curiosity. He was a mystery, and it was kind of nice to have some other mystery to take her mind off her current series of problems.

The party, led by Gastropé, turned a corner, and Jenn had to dodge a teamster loading his wagon in the middle of the new street. She still had no clue what this book she had was. She only knew that Lenamare and Jehenna would want it back, and that they'd be annoyed to find she had it. If only she could find a way to open it. Of course, if she did, and either of those two air-filled wizards found out, she'd be in even bigger trouble. This of course assuming, Jenn thought as she bumped into Rupert while trying to avoid a man sitting on the edge of the street on a bench carving wood, that if they ever managed to make their way Freehold, that Lenamare and Jehenna would be there.

Getting to Freehold wasn't yet a done deal, they were now further than ever from the city. While it was doubtful they'd have any more trouble from Exador, there was still the possibility of those stupid pirates at sea. Why did all this have to happen to her? Jenn wondered, squinting as sunlight suddenly found its way down onto the street they were walking on. Here she was, getting effectively hired to fight pirates on a sailing ship. How was she supposed to do that? How many damn weeds would there be on a pirate ship for her to entangle people with? Pirates would just be the fruit filling to her pie, she thought angrily.

Jenn didn't even want to think about the long-term future. No school, scattered students and teachers, would her life ever return to normal? As things looked now, she might as well consider her education over. Hopefully, her parents could eventually get a refund for this year. They finally reached the dock area as they emerged from the buildings. Edwyrd was glancing all over at the harbor. Staring nervously at all the people wandering the docks, as if they were all out to get him.

Great! Jenn thought, he's probably got people hunting him, who'll now be hunting us, for all we know he's probably an escaped convict or slave. Actually Jenn wasn't sure they had slaves in this part of the world. Slavery was outlawed in Turelane, but earlier they'd passed by something that looked suspiciously like a slave block in one of the town squares. Jenn had never seen one before, but the raised platform with large numbers of posts with manacles brought old stories to mind. Personally, she found the whole process barbaric; forcing a human being into servitude against their will was reprehensible. Other cultures however, apparently didn't share her view, or her land's view of such things.

Jenn decided suddenly, as they walked onto the boardwalk of the pier that would lead them to their ship, that she was being too pessimistic. After all, the demon was gone. That was something to be grateful for; she didn't like having demons around, even less when it was patently obvious that the thing wasn't under someone's direct control. It was rather worrisome about where it went, or where its friend, that bug-like demon, went to. She really didn't like the idea of that multi-limbed horror buzzing around on some sort of bloodbath holiday. She'd have to mention something about it to Lenamare, maybe next time he conjured the big demon, he could make it tell him the smaller one's name so it could be bound, so it wouldn't hurt anyone.

The other reason that she decided that she was being overly pessimistic was that they'd managed to find a ship going where they wanted almost immediately. Who could ask for better luck? Even if she did have to play mercenary wizard. She really hoped it didn't come to that though. She couldn't do much about pirates; Gastropé could probably do a little, and neither Rupert nor Edwyrd would be useful. Even on the off chance that Edwyrd really was an animage, what could an animage do against pirates?

Actually, she really wasn't sure exactly what the limitations on animages were. All she knew is that most were very good healers and that they tended to manipulate mana directly with their minds rather than with spells. Very strange, but she doubted if it was particularly effective. Given the vast amounts of mana required for any serious undertaking, the pure mental concentration would be insurmountable without a well-designed spell framework to control the energy. If he were an animage, she really would like to talk to him about his profession.

At this point the four had reached the ship. "Ahoy!" called Gastropé, yelling up to the top of a gangplank. A man in a red and white striped shirt stepped to the railing. The ship was a carrack, a three masted vessel with a large forecastle and sterncastle, and thus well suited for carrying passengers.

"Ahoy yourself," called the stripe shirted man. "Are you then the wizards?"

"Indeed we are," replied Gastropé.

"Then come on up," the man called, "the captain is expecting you." He disappeared beyond the rails. Gastropé went up, followed by Rupert, then Edwyrd who looked very unhappy at boarding the ship. Finally Jenn went up after Edwyrd. As she reached the top of the gangplank, a tall thin man with a large black mustache wearing a long blue coat emerged from a small door in the stern castle on the port side. The man nodded to Gastropé.

"Welcome wizard, these are the others?" he glanced at Edwyrd and Jenn, barely sparing a glance for Rupert.

"Yes, we're all here and ready to go as agreed." Gastropé said as he handed over two gold coins.

"Fine then, Evert will show you to your quarters." He pointed to a barefoot and shirtless boy standing nearby. "There's one for the three men," he looked down at Rupert while saying this, "and one for the lady. You can take meals in the officer's mess. Evert will show you that as well. The cook has food available at the first hour of the morning, midday and an hour before sunset.

"I'll expect you to basically stay out of the way, unless we encounter pirates or some other problem you wizards can deal with. We'll hit Hoggensforth in about five to six days. Any other questions?"

Jenn glanced at Gastropé, then at Edwyrd, both she and Edwyrd shook their head in negation and Gastropé said, "No, I don't think so, captain."

"Fine then," the captain nodded. "Evert," he motioned for the boy, and walked off towards the forecastle. Evert nodded respectfully towards them and motioned them to follow him down through the small doorway through which the captain had originally emerged. He first led them to a room on the port side. "This one's for you three." Gastropé nodded and opened the door. With a quick look at the cramped quarters and a nod towards Jenn he went in with his small bag of belongings. Rupert then Edwyrd followed him in.

As they closed the door behind them, the boy nodded again to Jenn and made a motion to his forehead and a small bow and proceeded down the short corridor and around the corner to the starboard side, and a door squeezed against the rear wall. "For you ma'am," he gestured.

"Thank you," Jenn said as the boy opened the door for her. She smiled at him and went into the small room. As the boy closed the door behind her, she noted that small was the descriptive word. Her back against the door, she was in the only standing space in the room. Immediately to her left was a small table with a bowl inset in top. Apparently designed to keep the bowl from falling on the floor in rough weather. Ahead of her was actually a surprisingly decent, if short and shallow bed. It seemed to have a semblance of a real mattress and actual sheets. Below the bed were drawers inset in the base. Above the bed appeared to be some sort of box that ingeniously lowered from the ceiling. Upon closer inspection Jenn realized that it was another bed that could be lowered for an additional occupant. That would certainly be tight Jenn thought.

Well enough, Jenn thought as she put the small sack she that held her few belongings in one of the drawers below her bed. At last she'd be able to sleep in something like a real bed. For that she was grateful. She only wished, as she looked again at her sack, that she and Gastropé had been able to afford more in the way of spell components. They hadn't had much time or money to gather many, just the very basics, and the few natural things she could find in a park they'd passed. Hopefully it would do. Most of her good stuff was still in her robe at Exador's or on her horse. She wondered what Rupert and the demon had done with the horses.

She'd tried to gather components for the few spells she knew that she'd thought might be useful at sea, or against pirates. Unfortunately, having specialized in thaumaturgy, the science of earth magic, she could be very effective on land, but on water she couldn't do much. They really needed a Sorcerer, someone especially trained in the element of water. Gastropé was a pyromancer, and while he thus had some very useful offensive spells, he was literally in his element of opposition while riding on a ship . Rupert of course wasn't specialized in anything, and again, she doubted an animage could do much either. Assuming, of course, that Edwyrd was really an animage.

As she sat down on her bed, she noticed that the ship seemed to be rocking more. Apparently they'd gotten underway and were heading out from Gizzor Del's small harbor. Five plus days on this ship was going to get tedious. At least, she thought, thinking of the guys, she had a room to herself.





A Treatise on the Nature of the Multiverse

by Heward

Editor's Note: The following is a treatise believed to have been written by Heward. Heward in and of himself is an extremely interesting historical figure. He has been known by a great number of titles, all of which are attributed to the same individual. The likelihood of all such appellations belonging to the same historic and quasi-mythic figure is almost unbelievable, but nonetheless, tradition dictates that there was only one Heward. He was a man who's life apparently spanned several centuries. In various times and places this individual has been referred to as Heward, First Sage of Sagemoor, Wizard of Armedia, Animage of Aremethia, as well as Knight of the Order of Bastion and Tae Kael Master of the Fourteenth Rose. If legends are to be believed he was also reputed to be a sometime priest of the God Hierelegon and also a Shaman to the Tribes of Dartsuth. Whatever the truth of these legends, he is held to be perhaps the most learned man in history on the nature of things magical.

In the beginning, and so in the end, are the Five Elements of Creation, and thus of Destruction. These Five Elements are Earth, Air, Fire, Water and Spirit. None of the Five should be confused with their more mundane manifestations upon the Planes of Men. The Five Elements are the ultimate archetypes from which all else is descended. We as mere mortals simply use the closest words in our vocabularies to describe these things which defy finite comprehension.

Thus when we speak of the Five Elements, we are truly speaking of a model, an interpretation of reality that allows us to comprehend things that are truly vast in proportion to ourselves. Therefore do not confuse Fire with that which cooks your food. While the fire which cooks your food is an Aspect of Fire, so is the lightning in the sky and the light of the sun as well as all forms of heat energy. All of these are Aspects of Fire. Fire is fast and direct and cuts directly to the point. Fire is the energy that drives creation, and the conflagration that destroys.

Likewise when we speak of Water, we mean all things liquidic in nature, moving and mutable. Acid and water are both Aspects of Water, as is knowledge and truth. For when we speak of knowledge and truth, both are relative terms that are not absolute. Water is also calm and engulfing, Water surrounds all in a shifting embrace. Water provides balance to creation and destruction, it regulates and calms the energy of Fire.

Earth is steadfast; it is the ground beneath our feet and the minerals in our bodies. Earth is that from which living creatures spring. Earth is hard and immobile, slow to change yet eternally loyal. Earth is iron and Earth is rock. It is the foundation upon which creation stands.

Air is ephemeral, it cannot be touched, it is both the life giving gas that allows us to live, and it is the suffocating smoke that chokes us. All forms of gases are Aspects of Air, as is the absence of gas, vacuum. Air is transient and fleeting. It may perceived one moment and not the next. Like clouds that are its Aspect, Air can appear to be many things. Air sweeps through with reckless abandon, like the wind it can be an element of destruction.

Spirit is the Element of Life. Spirit is the essence of life, it is that which provides sentience and that which directs the creation and oversees the destruction of the universe. Do not confuse the spirits of the Planes of men with Spirit, nor any bodiless such beings. While Spirit is akin to the energy of life, the life force, it is not Alive in itself. Only through interactions with other things may true life come. This may seem like a contradiction, Spirit is Life, but it is not Alive, and perhaps it is. Spirit in itself is a contradiction and perhaps the least understood Element. For Spirit brings life, and while the other elements may destroy the physical form of living creatures, only Spirit may truly destroy Spirit.

The Five Elements of Creation are in eternal conflict and eternal balance. As on the Planes of Men, Fire and Water are in opposition, as are Earth and Air. Spirit is in opposition to itself. However, this is not the only conflict, Water and Earth are also in opposition, although to a lesser extent as are Fire and Air. Fire and Earth however, tend to be in conjunction most of the time, as are Air and Water. Spirit is not directly in opposition to any but itself, and in fact it is the conjunction of Spirit, Fire, Earth, Air and Water that creates material life.

The Elements while in eternal opposition also come together in balance. It is the balance of the Elements that forms the Planes of Men. Only on the Planes of Men do you see all the Elements working together (and occasionally warring together). From the union comes life. From the union comes Man.

The eternal conflict between the Elements produces frictional energy. This energy is called Mana. Mana is what is left when two or more Elements collide. Paradoxically, Mana is also that which holds the Elements together. It is like a sticky resin, produced by damage, yet which provides healing and joining together. This Mana may be used to manipulate the elements, to summon or banish them, to combine them in union and to force them to destruction.

As Mana is produced by the conflict of the Elements in Opposition, so Animus is produced by the Elements in Union. As Spirit combines the other Elements in life and union, Animus, the Energy of Life is formed. Animus feeds upon the Mana generated by the interaction of the Elements, Spirit directs its growth and the other Elements provide its form.

Normally Animus, the Life Force, or Life Energy, is housed with vessels of the Elements. This is because, as with most unions, Animus is fragile. However, under some circumstances, Animus may be housed with vessels of pure energy, or Mana. Mana can be used to protect and shield Animus, even as physical matter normally protects it. The primal manifestation of Animus are the gods. The gods are the archetypes of life, the patterns of Elemental design that shape creation. The process of Creation began with the gods and as the gods were created, some say by themselves, the creation of the Planes of Existence were dictated and driven by the gods. The gods oversaw creation, as they were the first of its children.

The gods first created servants: these were the angels and later came the demons who were Angels that rebelled against the gods. Gods, angels and demons are all beings of nearly pure Animus and Mana, able to don and shed Elemental (and material) forms at will. The shear levels of Animus and Mana in the gods, angels and demons are what give them their ability to link with matter. They achieve with sheer force that which lesser beings must do through finesse

The gods and their servants created the planes and populated them with beings. Early on these beings were crudely linked to matter, large amounts of Mana were required to sustain them. These beings were the Fey races, or the Sidhe. At this time the Fey races included not only sentient beings, but Fey animals and Fey plant life as well.

Later as creation evolved, and the gods became more experienced and wise in the ways of creation, the union of Animus and Matter was perfected. A finer intermingling requiring little mana for maintenance was achieved. The beings were known as the Mundane Races and the Mundane World was born. This is the world of humankind and the natural world of today.





Chapter 51


"This is going to be rather cramped." Gastropé said surveying their quarters. The room consisted of three bunks, one atop the other, three feet of access space in front of the bunks and some short drawers built into the forward bulkhead. The bottom most bunk was nearly on the floor and had very little light. The middle and top bunks lay across windows looking out from the stern castle to the port. Gastropé awkwardly placed his belongings on the top bunk. There was barely enough room for the three of them to stand side by side in front of the bunks.

"I think, I'll go out and get some air. Watch the city as we leave." Gastropé said looking pointedly over Rupert and past Edwyrd to the door.

"Good idea, I'll join you soon." Edwyrd said, looking a little sweaty as he opened the door to the room while Rupert crawled onto the bottom bunk to get away from the door. Gastropé squeezed out and Edwyrd closed the door behind him. "This is not going to be fun." Edwyrd said, twisting his head to look at Rupert who was scrunched up on the bottom bunk.

"It is going to be a little tight," Rupert acknowledged with a grin.

"A little tight? In my normal form I'm bigger than this whole room!

"Plus! How am I ever going to keep this form for the entire trip? It's not like I can lock the door and change. There isn't room for me in here." Edwyrd was looking very sweaty. While it was quite warm and stuffy in the room, it was not that hot to Rupert's mind. Edwyrd sat down on the middle bunk, hunched over due to the upper bunk. Rupert crawled out and joined him on the bunk. He didn't have to do more than bend his head.

"Maintaining this form isn't exactly easy on the best of conditions."

"I know," Rupert said, "but don't worry, you'll get used to it."

"For five days though?" Edwyrd said. The two sat quietly on the bunk for a few minutes, each lost in his own thoughts. "So. I told them I was an animage. What's an animage?" He looked over at Rupert.

"Um." Rupert hedged. "I'm not completely sure."

"Not sure? What do you mean not sure?"

"Well, I am a kid you know. I can't know everything." Rupert said with mild exasperation. "All I know is what I've picked up from rumors. They're not exactly common you know."

"Unlike wizards or demons." Edwyrd commented.

"Well," Rupert admitted, "O.K. I guess to be fair, in the general population, wizards aren't exactly the most common profession, unlike smiths or cooks. Demons of course are very rare."

"We just seem to hang out with the wrong crowd." Edwyrd smiled at the boy.

"Yeah, looks that way." Rupert smiled. "So for all I know animages may be as common as wizards, but I don't really think so. For one thing, they're not particularly popular."

"Why?" Edwyrd asked with some trepidation. He felt a moment of dread that he'd gotten himself stuck in another position where everyone would hate him.

"Well, I don't mean they're hated or anything, just not really trusted. It's partially for some stuff way back in history, and partially because of the rumors and legends about them being able to do things to people's minds."

"Do things to people's minds?"

"Yeah, you know, read minds and such, implant commands and thoughts."

"Telepathy and mind control?" Edwyrd tried to clarify the details.

"Uh-huh. Course wizards can do the same stuff and no one really cares because they gotta do it with spells. If they use a spell, then they gotta be saying something or waving their hands, so you know they're up to something. Animages, on the other hand, don't have to do anything. Actually, if I were to believe the legends, animages can do a lot of things similar to wizards, maybe only not so flashy or complex. But, they just do it with their minds. They don't need spells as frameworks for magic, they somehow manipulate it directly with their minds.

"Kind of like a demon," Rupert added, suddenly, as if the thought had just come to him.

"So they're like psionicists, of some sort?" Edwyrd asked.

"They're what?" Rupert looked at him. "I don't know that word."

"Uhm, psychics? individuals with extrasensory projection, telepathy, teleportation, that sort of thing."

"Psychic? Well, maybe, but psychics are usually Seers or such. Although come to think about it, there does seem to be some sort of overlap. A lot of animages supposedly also have or had second sight. Some of them can also heal, like Healers. Maybe there is a connection." Rupert stared down at his feet, thinking.

"I don't know," Rupert finally spoke up, "Jenn would be the one to ask. She probably studied this stuff."

"Well, since I've already told her I was an animage, I don't think it would look too good to ask her." Edwyrd said wryly.

"Yeah. I guess." Rupert chuckled kind of softly. He appeared distracted, as if his mind were elsewhere. He bit his lip and looked over at Edwyrd.

"Tom," he said suddenly very serious, yet almost hesitant.

Tom waited for the boy to go on, but he just looked down at his foot and continued to bite his lip. "Yes?" Tom asked, prompting the boy to go on. He didn't know what the boy wanted, but it seemed important to him.

"Tom, why did..." Rupert stopped suddenly and looked the other way. "Never mind." He shook his head. "It really isn't important." He stood up suddenly. "Let's go up on deck and get some fresh air." He opened the door and looked at Edwyrd.

Edwyrd wasn't really sure what had come over the boy. Obviously he'd been about to ask something and changed his mind at the last moment. He wasn't sure if he shouldn't pursue it. It had seemed pretty important to the kid. He didn't know, maybe Rupert just wasn't ready to talk about whatever it was. Whatever the case, it did cause Edwyrd/Tom a bit of concern.

As they emerged on deck, the ship was just clearing the last of some buildings on the edge of the city, preparing to exit the river gate of the city. Actually, the docks hadn't been anything like Edwyrd had expected. Instead of a being in a harbor, the docks were in a small river that ran through the town. The river exited the town through some large river gates and then the river almost immediately fed into the sea.

Immediately to the south of the gate they were exiting was some sort of island. It was a few hundred feet from the city wall, and had what looked like a ruined fortress sitting on it. Another, smaller, island lay off to the northeast a short bit. This second island had a round tower occupying most of it. Ahead lay the sea, no land in sight on the other side.

As they came on deck, sailors were scurrying around, up and down the deck. Climbing and descending ropes to the sails. Edwyrd had never actually been on a sailing ship before, nor any ship for that matter. His only water experience was with small motor boats.

Rupert pointed forward to where Gastropé was standing near the rail on top of the forecastle. He had apparently found someone to talk to. Edwyrd and Rupert carefully made their way to join Gastrope', Edwyrd eyeing the stair-ladder with a little perspective uncertainty. He'd gotten so used to his demon form and size that the tiny ladder looked a bit tricky. It proved, however, to be no problem for Edwyrd's little body.

As he came up the ladder, Edwyrd got his first glance at Gastropé's companion. The individual was of medium height, wearing a loose brown robe with baggy brown pants and a vest, with some sort of sweater-shirt underneath. A wide black belt, with a dagger, surrounded his waist inside the robe. The man's skin was tanned dark by the sun. His hair, done in a crew cut, appeared pure white, and he had something a bit more than a five o'clock shadow. He appeared to be in his early sixties.

As he saw the man, Edwyrd's first thought was, Obi-wan-Kanobi! The guy did look startlingly like the old Jedi master from Star Wars. The resemblance wasn't perfect, but it was close enough to make Edwyrd smile. Use the Force, Tom! he thought to himself. As the two of them approached, Gastropé turned to see them coming. The man tilted his head to nod at the two as they approached.

"Talk about your coincidences, Edwyrd!" Gastropé exclaimed as Edwyrd stopped beside him.

"What?" Edwyrd asked.

"Well, first you running into your cousin Rupert and all, but now here this. Maelen here," he gestured to Obi-wan-Kanobi, "is an animage, just like you."

Edwyrd's smile faded slightly as the man nodded to him politely. He was even able to feel a sick feeling in his midsection over the otherwise distracting annoyance of keeping himself from exploding. Edwyrd nodded politely back.

"I mean, can you imagine that? I'd never even met one animage before today, and here I meet two in one day. Remarkable." Gastropé seemed immensely pleased. Edwyrd certainly wasn't.

"So, Edwyrd," Maelen said in a deep, strong voice, not completely out of keeping with the Obi-wan-Kenobi image, "Gastropé here tells me that you're one of my colleagues."

"Um, yes." Edwyrd tried to think of a way to lie gracefully. "Unfortunately, not one of the better, but I try."

"Yes," Maelen said appraisingly. "But isn't that what is really important? Trying?" He smiled slightly. As he did so he squinted his eyes slightly as if to get a better look at Edwyrd, then his eyes popped wider and he tilted his head and looked at Edwyrd even more intently. It was as if he was trying to get a better look at him. Maelen shook his head as if to clear it, then smiled again, rather less certainly this time. He stuck out his hand. "Nonetheless it is a real pleasure to meet you."

Edwyrd shook the proffered hand. "What exactly is your specialization?" Maelen asked conversationally as he shook Edwyrd's hand.

"Um, I like to take a more liberal view of things. Study a bit of this, a bit of that." Edwyrd hedged as best he could. The man didn't seem to notice too much. He seemed to be concentrating on the handshake. Finally, after what seemed like an eternity to Edwyrd, but was probably only a moment, Maelen released Edwyrd's hand. Maelen closed his eyes for a second and tilted his head as if looking at something on the ground through his eyelids. His eyes opened again, and this time he smiled more genuinely.

"Yes, very nice to meet you. I'm always interested in meeting new people in the profession. Liberal studies, hmm?" Maelen shifted his gaze to Rupert. Again he tilted his head, this time he arched an eyebrow and looked back and forth a couple times between Rupert and Edwyrd. "As you know, not many of our profession have the patience anymore for a liberal education. Everyone wants to specialize immediately. I myself am more liberal in my background than most. Even so, I mainly stick to healing and a bit of Clairomastery now and then."

Maelen pursed his lips, tilted his head and looked from Rupert to Edwyrd again. "So, Gastropé didn't say much about our young friend here. Is he your student?" Maelen inquired.

"My student?" Edwyrd repeated, surprised. That was not at all the question he'd been expecting. "Uh, no, he's my cousin."

"Cousin," Maelen commented softly to himself. "Well that could explain the similarity then, I suppose." He said this very softly, to himself, although Edwyrd heard him anyway. Maelen shook his head, as if to change gears. "We must get together some time during the voyage, do some shop talk you know." Maelen said much louder, also more friendly then he'd first seemed. His eyes almost glinted. Glinted with something, Edwyrd wasn't sure what. Amusement, curiosity? guile? Edwyrd didn't know which it was, but it didn't seem bad, just different.

That was all he needed, Edwyrd decided. Another person wanting to quiz him in depth on being an animage. How did he get into this? Oh, what a tangled web we weave, when first we practice to deceive, was the thought that came to Edwyrd's mind. He'd have to start being more careful, he was really getting in over his head. Not that he'd exactly been floating like a duck since he first arrived in Astlan, but things weren't getting any better on that score.

~

"Hello! Anyone home?" Antefalken shouted into the cave. He waited politely a few moments before calling again. He was pretty sure no one was home, but it paid to be sure. When he got no response he entered the cave's long passageway. He felt slightly guilty, entering another's home while the individual was away. It wasn't like breaking in, there was no door after all. Nonetheless, he needed information.

He'd actually hoped this Tom fellow would be home. He'd managed to wrangle the basic location of the demon's cave from Boggy, and from there he'd preceded to search for likely caves. The symbol over the door seemed to be a good sign. This had to be the cave.

A cave! For Sammael's sake! A fourth order demon living in a cave. What was the world coming to? Only Bogsworth or Tizzy would recommend a cave to a fourth order. Oh, sure, given that the guy was supposedly new, it probably wasn't a bad idea, for starters. Especially given that he was bound and probably too busy with that to set up a decent place. Still, it was slumming more than just a little for a four. First or second order, sure, even quite a few of thirds, but Antefalken couldn't think of any other fours that lived in a cave. Not that there were that incredibly many, a couple hundred or so, but still.

Antefalken himself, would never be caught living in such a location. Caves seemed to be a real turn-off for women. Something deep down inside, going back to the ' drag them by the hair' caveman days that just seemed to put the nix on romance for most women, Antefalken presumed. Palatial buildings with silks and other soft cloths, plus lots of jewels, seemed to work much better.

By this point, Antefalken had reached the main area of the cave. The furnishings weren't much, mostly hand carved, literally. Stylistically he'd seen better, but O.K. for a first try. The chair and table were functional, the bookshelves too, although empty. No real sign of any Astlanian materials; either this Tom wasn't able to do physical transport or hadn't figured out how yet. Not surprising, not many demons could. The majority of fours could manage something though, maybe not much, but at least small things.

Antefalken drew in a breath through his nose, preparing for a sigh. Hmm, Antefalken thought. He'd almost missed something. That was the annoying part about not breathing. If you didn't breath regularly you didn't smell things. From his just completed whiff, he detected a rather unusual scent. Something a little out of the ordinary from the run of the mill sulfur, brimstone and smoky smell of the Abyss. It was a slightly sweet, slightly sour odor.

Perspiration, he decided. This was most intriguing. Demons, naturally, did not sweat, unless they worked rather hard at it. More effort than it was worth by all accounts. Except during sex, he reminded himself. Then it was completely appropriate and in fact considered rude in some parts if you didn't. However, all of this was beside the point, he definitely smelled perspiration, and unless he missed his guess, rather recent and rather human.

Human perspiration in the Abyss, remarkable really. Not remarkable that a human would sweat of course, it was a bit on the warm side even in this cool cave, no, it was remarkable that a human had been in the cave recently at all. In fact, unless he missed his guess, as he repeatedly sniffed around the room, there seemed to be two distinctly different patterns. Male and female it seemed. While he didn't use his sense of smell often, Antefalken had to admit that it was at least as good as his other demonic senses.

Now, how would this demon have gotten two humans into this cave? Unless the humans came by themselves, of their own free will, which was most unlikely, the demon must have brought them. That seemed to squash his theory that this Tom didn't know material transport. Given that the humans were sweating, they must have come bodily to the Abyss. Bodily meant that he'd used an Abyssal Gate of some form or the other, and one large enough to drag anything through.

The question was, if the demon could do that, why not bring some decent furniture? Antefalken peered around again at the rather shoddy cave. Unless, of course, all this was a front. Perhaps some higher up demon slumming it for some scheme? Pretending to be a novitiate demon? Very possible, Antefalken thought to himself, stroking his chin as he paced around the room. While admittedly, it had only been a moment ago he'd been chiding the demon on not knowing any matter transport, safely transporting multiple humans implied a bit too good of control for a novice.

It was a lovely puzzle, certainly. Antefalken would love to talk to this Tom fellow. Find out for sure what the guy did and did not know. Unless the man were exceedingly clever, Antefalken felt certain he'd be able to place this Tom in the overall scheme of things. This story of Boggy's, insisting that Tom was only 16 or so, didn't seem to hold water. While the cave would support this hypothesis; a teenager undergoing a shock bigger than puberty, suddenly turning around and transporting humans back and forth to the Abyss and messing around in big league politics in less than a month's time of being a demon just didn't ring true.

Damien would certainly love this. Antefalken wished he had some form of prescience so he could scan the cave to get more information, but no such luck. He carefully inspected the rest of the cave with all his normal senses, looking for any other clues. He found no others unfortunately. He decided he'd just have to be happy with what he had. He'd also have to come back later in the hope of catching Tom at home.

~

Edwyrd stood by the same rail on the forecastle at which he'd met Maelen. He was gazing up at the stars in the night sky. He breathed the salt air in through his nose and mouth in large, deep breaths. It had only been an hour ago that he'd realized that he hadn't been breathing. He'd have to be more careful about that. As in his true form, no, he corrected himself, as in his demon form, the Edwyrd form didn't need to breathe and so out of recent habit, didn't, except to talk. He'd realized that that could be dangerous if anybody happened to notice.

That Maelen fellow would probably be the one to notice also. The man seemed just a little bit too observant. The way he looked at Edwyrd made him nervous, as if the man were trying to see right through him. Edwyrd hoped the man couldn't read minds. Rupert had hinted that some animages could. He was a goner if the man could.

Actually, between trying to avoid Maelen and trying to avoid expanding back into demon form and ripping his clothes to shreds, Edwyrd didn't know how he'd made it through the afternoon. It was for that reason he stood up on the deck, trying to relax. Relax as much as possible and not shift back, that was. He'd had to plead seasickness to avoid having to eat about an hour ago, and told people he needed fresh air.

Actually, he should have thought about the food thing earlier. He hadn't had to eat when he was Tom, and Edwyrd's body didn't seem to get hungry either. Having never eaten in Astlan at all, he wasn't sure what would happen if he did. He hoped he had some sort of normal internal organs, but he wasn't sure. Boggy had indicated that demons could eat, drink or breath, but Tom had never tried. Breathing seemed to work. As far as he could tell he had lungs, his chest expanded when he inhaled What bothered him was that when he'd fought the dragon, he'd gotten ripped apart pretty good, but he didn't recall seeing any real internal structure or organs in his demon body.

He assumed he had normal plumbing internally and that everything worked, but he hadn't seen any evidence so far. He cursed himself for not taking a moment of privacy to explore this before. Presumably, if he ate stuff, it would be processed in the normal manner. Again it came down to the close quarters of the ship, he had to live under real close scrutiny. Eventually he'd have to eat, and excrete, just like he had to keep remembering to breath. If he didn't, people would surely catch on. All these annoying little details humans had to put up with. Demonic life certainly was simpler.

Edwyrd nearly jumped out of his skin, literally, when a hand rested on his shoulder. He turned his head to find Maelen having come up behind him. Cornered! He hadn't even heard or sensed the man, he couldn't believe his worthless human senses were that bad, but apparently they were. He'd really have to work on that somehow. The man had come all the way across the deck and up the ladder beside him and taken him completely unaware!

"Good evening, Tom." Maelen said quietly with a smile. It took Edwyrd a second to realize what bothered him about Maelen's greeting, and then he did a double take. "Uhm, I'm sorry, but my name is Edwyrd." Edwyrd protested, looking the kindly smiling man in the eyes.

"Oh, I'm sorry, my mistake. Somehow I just thought the name Tom sounded better on you. Actually Tom is a rather unusual name, I'm not sure where I came up with it." Edwyrd wasn't sure he believed the man. In fact he was pretty sure he didn't.

"Uh, that's...O.K. It happens some time." Edwyrd didn't really know how to recover.

"You know, I suppose," Maelen said almost conversationally as he looked out over the dark expanse of the ocean, "that you are something of a puzzle to me."

"Really? Me a puzzle?" Great! thought Edwyrd, what was he going to do if the man started yelling 'Demon!' all over the place.

"Yes, when I look at you, I see a young man who may be what he claims, a journeyman animage who manages to get by as best he can." Maelen glanced sideways to judge Edwyrd's reaction in the dark. Edwyrd hoped the man couldn't see too much of his expression.

"However, when I Look at you, I see so much Animus and Mana, all tied up into one being, that there is no way I can believe you. Surely, I say to myself, he must be a relatively powerful practitioner, possibly disguising himself, or else he's under some major enchantment." Maelen paused at this, "but not a wizardly enchantment, I don't detect that. So, what? I ask myself, is he hiding?"

Edwyrd was feeling rather tense at this point. He didn't know how to respond. The guy was obviously capable of seeing through him. Just how far the man could see, was unclear. What the man would do with his knowledge was even more unclear. Maelen was staring out to sea as he continued.

"However," and the old man paused for dramatic effect, "when I See you, I see a confused young man who is in over his head. A young man lost and far from home, trying to get by as best he can. A good young man." At this point Maelen was once again looking over his shoulder and into Edwyrd's eyes. Somehow finding them unerringly in the dark.

"It's an interesting dichotomy, really." The man remarked, as if to himself. "Which do I believe? I've trusted both for almost all my life." He turned his head away again, putting his hands on the rail in front of him to lean on. "The other thing I see are demons."

"Demons?" Edwyrd echoed weakly.

"Yes, demons." Maelen glanced back over his shoulder again. "Several demons, some of them extremely powerful. Past or future, I don't know for sure which, but I suspect both.

"Now, of course," Maelen went on in a tone similar to a lecturer, "this would explain why you are in over your head. Any young man mixing with any type of demon is in over his head. Especially when mixing with ones this powerful."

Edwyrd gave a small mental sigh, the man suspected him of something. Not the truth, however, he hadn't gotten that far yet. Was there any way he could divert the man that wouldn't make him more suspicious? He couldn't think of any. What exactly was the man saying with the funny emphasis on 'see' and 'look' was he some sort of psychic? Rupert had admitted that these animages might be able to do such things.

Maelen stood up suddenly, placing both hands on Edwyrd's shoulders. "I know you're not ready now, but if you should need someone to talk to...I am available. At least for the duration of the journey." Maelen paused, then tilted his head with a small quirk of his mouth, and added more hesitantly, "And maybe again in the not too distant future."

He removed his hands from Edwyrd's shoulders and stood up straight. "Well good night Tom. I hope you have pleasant dreams." He nodded with a smile and then walked fairly briskly back to the ladder and then down.

Edwyrd watched him go with a strange feeling inside. He didn't know what to think. He slowly turned back to the sea, placing his hands upon the rail. He took a deep breath to clear his mind and watched the starlight and the just emerging moonlight dance along the waves.





Astrology and the Elements

Curriculum Vitae: College of Wizardry

University of the Council States

As any good wizard will tell you, there are five elements: Fire, Earth, Water, Air, and Spirit. Fire and Water naturally oppose each other, as do Air and Earth, while Spirit opposes itself. Moreover, as the druids explain, there are positive and negative manifestations of all things, including the elements, themselves. The positive aspect of an element is the active, assertive side of the element, the way the element makes its impact on the world at large. The negative aspect is the receptive, passive side of the element, the way the element is acted upon by the world.

Taking these two factors into consideration; it becomes clear that there must be ten element-manifestation combinations thus there are ten astrological signs in Astlan. Each has an element and embodies either the positive or the negative manifestation of its particular element.

"Of course there are ten signs," the wizards reiterate. "Five elements plus three oppositions (fire-water, air-earth, spirit-spirit) plus two manifestations of each element equals ten." They continue, "ideally, there would be a prime number of signs, but ten is the sum of three primes and is a pyramid number, since 10 = 1+2+3+4."



The Astrological Signs of the Astlanian Calendar



Name of the Sign

Elemental Icon

Traditional Symbol

Element and Polarity



Infernos

The Volcano

The Phoenix

Positive Fire



Chrysos

The Cavern

The Rockworm

Negative Earth



Hydros

The Wave

The Hydra

Positive Water



Vacuos

The Fog

The Manticore

Negative Air



Animos

The Angel

The Titan

Positive Spirit



Fluos

The Waterfall

The Remora

Negative Water



Arios

The Tornado

The Gryphon

Positive Air



Moltos

The Lightning Bolt

The Demon Steed

Negative Fire



Paleos

The Mountain

The Gargoyle

Positive Earth



Necros

The Shadow

The Wraith

Negative Spirit





Description of the Astrological Signs

Infernos -- Hotheaded, outgoing, boisterous, talented, tireless, eloquent, irritable, and mostly combustible: these are the watchwords of the sign of The Phoenix people. Many are skilled artisans due more to pure talent than inspiration of design. Because they often get into scrapes, Infernos individuals frequently have to start over several times in life, but like the legendary phoenix, they always rebound.

Chrysos -- Chrysos influences people in a much more subtle way than its positive earthen counterpart, Paleos. Negative earth people are generally calm, unassuming individuals with a knack for using patience to achieve the impossible. Rockworm people are imminently trustworthy, reliable, and honest, or at least maintain such a reputation.

Hydros -- Positive water's influence makes Hydros individuals skillful entertainers, storytellers, swindlers, salesmen, and public figures. Many of Astlan's most famous bards, dancers, crooks, and monarchs were born under the sign of The Hydra. In the same way that the hydra has many heads, Hydros people can hold many opinions and morals at once and can flow like water to apply the one most appropriate at a given moment.

Vacuos -- This is the sign of the wise cleric, the ancient druid, the solitary sage, the individual who knows much but says little. If there is a secret to be discovered, a riddle to be solved, or a code to be broken, a person born under the sign of The Manticore can handle the conundrum quite adroitly.

Animos -- This is the most extreme of all the signs. Those under the influence of The Titan seem to do everything by sheer willpower and have a talent for inspiring others to do the same. Animos people often overestimate their capabilities, but still accomplish what they set out to do, again through force of will.

Fluos -- Just like their symbol, the Remora, these people frequently intend to help others, but are often misunderstood. Not as extreme as their Hydros counterparts, Waterfall individuals take a more balanced approach to life. They make excellent sorcerers and seers and seem to know almost as much as Vacuos people. Fluos individuals usually specialize in one profession and rise to the tops of their fields due to their calm, patient natures.

Arios -- Where Vacuos works in a subtle manner, Arios takes a more dynamic approach. The Gryphon seeks knowledge frenetically and many adventuring sages, spell-seeking wizards, and fanatical clerics fill the Arios roster. Ironically, Arios people strive to stamp out ignorance and backward thinking, while they, themselves, are usually quite opinionated.

Moltos -- Moltos is the negative fire, the flame that burns slowly, that tempers, that warms. People born under this influence make excellent healers, artisans, and chroniclers. They are usually generous (though some are more generous with other people's things than with their own) and they are forgiving (sometimes forgiving their own faults too readily).

Paleos -- Paleos people make excellent mercenaries, workers, and friends. They are rugged individuals and many enjoy strong ale and ribald stories. Slow to anger, but even slower to forgive, those born under the influence of The Gargoyle are steadfast allies and relentless enemies.

Necros -- These are quiet, intelligent, untiring people who usually mind their own business and expect others to do the same. They are often misunderstood, as is their sign: negative spirit is a necessary part of the cycle, but unenlightened souls see Necros only as the death sign.





Chapter 52


Arch-Vicar General Barabus looked back over his shoulder into the room he'd just exited. The room shone brightly with the early morning sunlight. In the center of the room, at a plain oak table sat the High Priest Verigas. The man had just finished recanting a rather fabulous tale to Barabus and his associate, the Arch-Diocate Iskerus. Barabus shut the door behind him.

"Well, do you believe him?" Barabus asked the other as they stood in the narrow marble corridor outside the interview room.

The Arch-Diocate grimaced. "Unfortunately, I don't have much choice. I did a Test of Truth upon him the entire time. He, at least, believes he is telling the truth."

Barabus nodded solemnly in agreement, "I did the same."

Somewhat sadly the Arch-Diocate went on, "Further, it also seems coincident with the Visions this brother Ferenas in Halfenfork reported."

"The major war coming upon us? You read those reports too?"

The Arch-Diocate simply nodded sourly. "I hate living in such amusing times, Lord Barabus. Don't you?"

"I could certainly do with a bit of retirement, if that's what you mean." The 63-year old Arch-Vicar General looked longingly up at the ceiling. "Such it appears, is not the will of our Master."

"So, you are our resident military expert, Barabus, what do you suggest?"

The Arch-Vicar General paused for a moment, looking down at his feet. He sighed heavily. "I suppose we have no choice. One of our own brought this about; we must correct it."

"Incidentally," Iskerus interjected, "Verigas will have to answer for this demon summoning business, Archaedemon aside."

"Of course, of course," Barabus agreed, "but I feel part of his restitution should come in helping to clean up the mess."

"Naturally," Iskerus agreed.

"I will summon the Rod. I believe I can have the legions ready to sail for Freehold within a day. Short notice as it is, but we do pride ourselves on being ever vigilant." Barabus shook his head sadly as he spoke.

"Sir Talarius?"

Barabus closed his eyes. "I was afraid you'd mention him."

"I know you're not overly fond of the man, but he is Knight Rampant. The highest of our knighted cadre, and one of our few demon slayers."

"He has slain more than a few demons in his day," Barabus admitted. "I just can't say I approve of his attitude though."

"He is efficient at what he does."

"Yes," Barabus agreed morosely.

"You agree then?"

"Yes, I suppose we do need him. Although you did not hear that from me."

"Fine, then I'll arrange to have him notified."

"I suppose you'll have him meet us in Hoggensforth? He'll be bringing that horse of his." Barabus observed.

"That’s probably best. I shall send a message to Talarius. And arrange for the necessary replacement for Verigas while he is with you."

"Let the Rod be drawn."

"Let the Will be done."

"As Tiernon's fight is won." The last line was spoken in unison with upraised heads, as the two priests started to begin their preparations for a battle they must win.





Chapter 53


Maelen stared eastwardly across the sea. His Sight, as ever, was true. Normal eyes could now reveal the craft on the horizon. It was gaining rapidly. Extremely rapidly. He'd alerted the ship's master an hour ago. For once, a layman had taken him completely seriously with no question. The captain had obviously been expecting something similar.

Maelen cursed his luck to be on this ship. Luck, no, he cursed fate. He knew the only luck was that which he made for himself. Try as he might, his choices were constrained. His Sight limiting him in more ways than laymen could imagine. Perhaps fortunately, he wasn't truly a great Seer; that would be a curse.

He'd had trepidation as soon as he'd spotted the vessel in the harbor. Something definitely amiss about it. While there were multiple routes to his arranged meeting with this sorcerer Johen wanted him to speak with, he had, unfortunately, Seen himself in Hoggensforth in the very near future, and this ship was the only way to get there on schedule. He could have ignored the Seeing, but all the other possibilities his limited Sight revealed to him were much less appealing.

He'd overheard the captain talking about pirates to the other four passengers. Pirates was close, but not accurate. Perhaps, avenging police force might be a better word, or words. Captain Asmeth was a smuggler, Maelen was nearly positive. While as far as he could determine, Asmeth wasn't actually wanted in Gizzor Del, like anyone ever was, nor was he wanted in Hoggensforth; the man did have enemies.

The matter was not helped by the fact that Maelen could easily extend his eyesight and reveal the flag of Oorstemoth flying on the approaching vessel. Maelen had only been there once, long ago. The people had a rather overzealous attitude towards law and order. Not, as Maelen could see it, any logical law and order, but some strange code of their own. Violators were hunted down rather ruthlessly. Recidivism among criminals was nil. No defendants ever seemed to survive the judicial process. Maelen was also relatively certain that he, as a passenger on Asmeth's ship, would be considered an accomplice by Oorstemothian law. Thus, if he joined Asmeth at the bottom of the sea, so much the better.

Maelen glanced around the deck. His fellow passengers had apparently been hired to guard the ship in such an event as this. The young woman was pacing around in circles near the center of the middeck, she seemed to be biting her nails. Bad habit there, gave too much information away to casual observers.

The wizard Gastropé was peering at the Oorstemoth vessel through a telescoping device. He seemed rather calm, overall. The young boy, Rupert, was full of energy and excitement, peering over a stern rail at the approaching ship. Either the boy was so young he had no sense of the real danger, or he knew something about their chances that frankly escaped Maelen.

While Maelen had seen himself in Hoggensforth, there was no guarantee that he'd chosen the correct path to get there. He hadn't seen any other, but he may have missed it, and chosen a dead end path instead. He didn't feel, however, that he could afford the energy for another Seeing at the moment; he'd need it all too soon for healing. Also, he really wasn't sure he wanted to know at this point.

The fourth passenger, Tom or Edwyrd, whichever his name actually was, also seemed nervous. Or perhaps tense with dread might be the better phrase. The lad had been extremely tense the entire journey, and, in fact, avoided Maelen more than any other young animage in his position would have. Most students at that age, if that’s what Tom actually was, who were pursuing a liberal education, were doing so on their own and hence always on the lookout for someone who could teach them something.

This reticence, which he'd sensed immediately, had at first led him to suspect the boy. However, when he'd looked at Tom's aura, it had shown him so much power and life, that he'd nearly reversed his opinion completely. The young man was positively overflowing with it. Certainly not as well contained as one would expect from an animage with that much power, but so much life and magic that he had to be some form of Manipulator. The lad's aura didn't match any of the well-known patterns for wizards, nor did it seem to connect with the surroundings like a druid's aura. While there were no obvious links to any divine sources, such as a priest would have, there was some form of minute link running extra planar. If, as seemed the only possible answer, Tom/Edwyrd really was an animage, then he must have some knowledge of astramastery.

Again, however, the aura wasn't controlled like any animage with that much power would be. Certainly if someone that powerful was disguising themselves as a student, they'd also disguise their aura at the very least. Failing that, and no disguise, they'd simply be in better control of their essence. Truly puzzling, and that didn't even add in what he'd Seen when he shook the lad's hand.

It had been exactly as he'd described to Tom/Edwyrd last night. Wizards and demons all scheming around this innocent. Innocent? perhaps that was not the proper way to phrase it. Certainly this Tom was less innocent than any of his compatriots, except perhaps for Gastropé, but even so, the image of a young man thrust out on his own, against his will, out of his normal environment and in over his head persisted in Maelen's mind. Another puzzle: while he'd seen a fundamental basis of good intent and a certain honor in the lad, he'd also seen blood and death. The reconciliation of all these images was not easy, Maelen had decided the lad was, at heart, 'good;' however, circumstances and fate might force his hand otherwise at times. Supervision, or at least observation, was called for. There was too much power here, to be left completely unobserved. If nothing else, others would try and use it.

Altruism aside, Maelen had also sensed a link between his own future, and Tom's. After leaving Tom/Edwyrd last night, he'd contacted Johen in Seren. He'd shared his Seeings, and Johen had concurred. Perhaps more disturbingly, Johen had hinted that he already knew something involving this group of travelers. Or at the very least knew something about demons and their involvement in upcoming events. The events in fact, that Johen wanted him to discuss with this sorcerer, Elrose. Maelen hadn't liked the sound of that, he'd Seen nothing that clear, and Johen had been reticent to reveal more until they were physically together.

Maelen broke his reverie as the pace of the crew increased to a slightly more frenzied level. The Oorstemoth ship was closing relatively quickly. Very soon it would be within ballista range. Maelen looked around again. The young wizard girl was busily sorting through some spell components, Gastropé simply rubbing his arms up and down. On the top of the stern castle, Rupert was pacing in circles, and Edwyrd/Tom was just looking rather seasick. Maelen cleared his mind, trying to prepare for the healing he knew he'd have to do soon.

Crack!

Maelen jumped. He hadn't expected that. The foremast was falling over! There had been a brilliant flash of light and then the loud crack. He quickly turned his vision to the Oorstemoth ship. Why hadn't he noticed before! There were two wizards on board. The weaker one was at least as powerful as their own two young wizards. The stronger one's aura glowed red-hot. pyromancer, Maelen thought. It was times like these he wished he'd studied more pyromastery. That man was definitely a match for their group.

Maelen's stomach fell a bit more. This choice of paths was not looking hospitable at all. He shook his head as crewmembers began clearing the debris of the fallen mast. The mast was only broken halfway up, even so it had to be cut free lest it help capsize the ship when the damage got more severe.

Crack!

Another bolt of lightning lanced between ships. This one however was apparently from Gastropé. It looked like Jenn was busily rattling off some form of protection spell.

Whoosh!

A ball of flame went scurrying across the deck. Maelen had to back up a little to avoid the trail of flames that swept along beside the ball. Fortunately the ball didn't hit directly and only lighted some incidental small fires on the deck. The crew rushed buckets of water to put these out. Other crewmembers were madly arming ballistae trying to fire on the other ship, but it was still too far.

Crack!

Crack!

Crack...Slam!

Another volley of lightning between the two ships was exchanged. The third crack belonging to the bolt that slammed into the main mast and split it. The mast, cracked at the base, began to tilt heavily to port, the ship rolling with it. The mast was broken enough to fall over, but by no means broken free of the ship.

Jenn ran up and quickly began doing something to the mast. Maelen couldn't tell what she was doing, but it seemed to require a lot of effort on her part. Maelen looked back to the other ship. So far they'd only faced the junior most wizard. The stronger one had simply sat back and absorbed the bolts that Gastropé was sending.

Crash...Crack...Boom!

The ship rocked violently. Maelen hadn't seen anything from the enemy, he glanced over his shoulder. Jenn was covered in wood chips, but the mast had broken free of the deck. She'd apparently caused the remaining mast connections to rot rapidly and come free. Currently she was levitating one end of the mast off the deck of the ship. The top end was in the water already. Jenn was keeping the mast from dragging the rest of the ship with it. Actually rather impressive, Maelen thought, that mast had to be extremely heavy.

Maelen noticed a sailor laying on the deck where he'd fallen from the mast. Maelen quickly ran over to see to the man. As he bent down and began scanning with his mind for injuries, he heard another series of lightning volleys.

Crack.

Crack.

Crack.

Whoosh!

Crack.

Whoosh! Boom!

Maelen couldn't spare much attention as he willed the sailor's broken skull to knit back together. He calmly rerouted blood to and from the wound and the head and brain as necessary. Despite this, he was pretty sure that Gastropé had just taken a fireball direct on the forecastle. From the corner of his eye he could see Jenn waving her arms trying to put out flames in that region. He had to stop the swelling in the man's brain, make a quick patch to a crack in the man's spinal cord. Accomplishing this, he was able to begin the hard part, repairing the damaged brain tissue.

A good thing he'd gotten there when he had, another moment and the sailor would have been dead. Maelen had always hated head wounds, in the seventy-five years he'd been healing, head wounds had been the most difficult. All that nerve tissue. Nervous tissue just didn't respond well to healing and regrowth. While he could have stopped with just eliminating the swelling, the damage had been sufficient to probably cause permanent mental impairment if not promptly repaired. Thus he had to take additional time. As he finished, and the sailor blinked, conscious again. Maelen stood and hurried over to the forecastle.

Zzzt...Zap...Crack!

Crack...Crack...Crack!

Gastropé was back in business. He got off a whole succession of quick bolts to the other ship. Maelen bent down over a badly burnt sailor. In less than a minute he had the burns stabilized and healing. He'd get the process going and head to the next one. At this point he didn't have time for full healing, three other sailors were down as well.

More bolts continued to rage back and forth, along with the occasional fireball. Jenn was busily putting out fires with her magic. Tom hadn't done much of anything except clear debris. As he finished the last of the sailors, Maelen glanced up to Gastropé who was looking at the end of his rope. He'd been going one on one with the other two wizards by and large. Actually the big wizard still hadn't attacked, just the lesser one.

Gastropé took a large breath, and twiddled his hands some more, suddenly from his hands sprung a long cone of brilliant light that sprung between the ships, hitting the weaker wizard directly. With that, Gastropé dropped to the deck, panting. His singed and smoking clothing causing him to cough from his own smoke. Jenn too was looking a bit bedraggled; the mast had apparently sapped her strength.

Things were not good, Maelen decided. He extended his vision a bit more to see what was happening on the enemy ship. The younger wizard, for so the weaker one was, had collapsed to the deck, but was not dead. The older wizard finally seemed to be taking an active role. "Jenn," Maelen shouted, "the stronger wizard is getting ready to cast something!"

Jenn looked at him blankly for a moment. "Stronger...wizard?" She closed her eyes and began mumbling something. Maelen returned his eyes to the other ship. As he did so, he saw a giant bolt of lightning almost majestically arc between the enemy ship and his own. Almost as if time had slowed, as it does in those moments when adrenaline starts pumping through one's system in large quantities, he watched it head for the forecastle.

The ship lurched forward suddenly, as Jenn's spell apparently tried to move the ship out of the way. Jenn collapsed, exhausted by the effort. At the same time-slowed instant, the bolt streaking across the water struck the ship on the stern castle. Maelen watching it, almost hypnotically, saw it strike one of the seemingly frail humans on the sterncastle.

Suddenly, time started to speed up as Maelen realized it was Edwyrd that the bolt had hit! The young man's entire body arched as this incredibly protracted lightning bolt, with easily five times the electricity of the younger wizard's bolts released its energy into his body. The electrical discharge was immense, to say the least. The very air around Edwyrd seemed to glow. His body leaping into the air and crashing back on the far side of the deck. Maelen shook his head in sorrow. He'd seen wizard's lightning bolts like that before. The man was a true master of the art. No one unprotected could have survived that. Maelen wouldn't have enough left to heal by the time he got there.

Jenn saw this, even as she was collapsing. "Edwyrd! No!" she cried. Maelen began hurrying over to the body, even though there was nothing he could do. As he hurried over, he heard Jenn yelling at no one in particular, "What the everlasting goddess have we gotten into? That maniac wizard's got to be nearly as powerful as Trisfelt or Hortwell! Whoever heard of pirates with that kind of firepower?"

Even as he reached the main deck from the forecastle, he was doing a double take. Edwyrd was staggering to his feet. Maelen had to blink. The young man was totally naked, his clothes apparently disintegrated by the lightning. The startling thing however was what Maelen's enhanced eyesight could see, the lad wasn't even burned! He had literally seen the electrical discharge arcing all over the boy's body, yet not a burn on him!

As Edwyrd staggered to his feet, he snarled and began to rush to the railing closest to the enemy ship. Even as Edwyrd reached the railing, Maelen noted that the big wizard was preparing another spell. Edwyrd reached the railing and raised his right hand, making a fist and pointing it towards the wizard on the other ship. Maelen had halted in his tracks, amazed by what he'd seen.

However, any doubt about what he'd earlier seen when he'd Looked at Edwyrd vanished in a moment. Even as he watched he saw Edwyrd's naked body shimmer. Flames danced along the boy's body, running up and down his calves and thighs, spreading up and over his waist and chest. Along his arms and finally engulfing his head. For the first second, Maelen thought it was another spell of the enemy wizard, but then he realized that Edwyrd was not being consumed in the normal way.

Edwyrd was being consumed, his body dissipating beneath the flame, but not by burning. It was as if his body were being systematically superimposed upon by, or replaced by, orange and yellow flames. Piece by piece, from the outside in, flame roared and lashed over Edwyrd's naked frame. Within moments, Maelen couldn't even see the pink flesh beneath the flame. Only fire was present.

Fire in human form. Edwyrd's shape was perfectly formed out of flame. Here and there small bursts and rolls of flame coruscated up and down his body, but in all it was as if there was a man made out of fire on the deck. "The Living Flame!" Maelen whispered to himself. He was literally shocked.

He hadn't seen the Living Flame performed in ten years. It was at the Conclave in Rasparta. The Living Flame was the final test for an animage wishing to earn the title of Pyromaster. The aspirant proved his or her worthiness for the title by literally transmogrifying themselves into elemental flame. True union, the Living Flame was the ultimate joining of Anima and the Element of Fire. Maelen really hadn't expected this.

The enemy wizard was once again releasing a spell however. This time a large jagged bolt or spear of ice was flying across the water like a javelin. This time, however, Gastropé was back on his feet. Jenn was at his side, madly they were shouting something in unison. Suddenly from their two outstretched hands came a blast of lightning, bigger than any the two had achieved separately. The bolt streaked across to the ice javelin, even as it reached the midpoint of its arc of flight.

Crash...Boom!

The bolt exploded into thousands of tiny shards, some of which pelted people on the decks of both ships. Gastropé and Jenn, however, had apparently used the last of their energy in a desperate attempt to stop the bolt. Both seemed to collapse unconscious, together in a heap on the deck. Maelen sent a quick probe out to them to assure himself that it was only normal mana reserve depletion from spell casting and not anything that required his assistance.

Maelen quickly began to attend to the few sailors wounded by the ice shrapnel. As he did so, he returned his ever more divided attention to Edwyrd. He had to admit once again that he was impressed by these youngsters. That last bit of spellmanship from Gastropé and Jenn was highly unexpected, and surprisingly effective. Further, even if pyromastery was the only discipline Edwyrd, this student, who “just managed to get by”, knew, he was still an animage worthy of the name. However, even so, Maelen wasn't sure what good the Living Flame would do. While his body was now flame and could do damage to whatever it touched, there was still several hundred feet of water between Edwyrd and the wizard.

Maelen didn't have to wait for the answer, even as the question formed, Edwyrd proceeded to answer it. Edwyrd's flames grew brighter and brighter, racing up and down his flame body. Almost majestically his outstretched arm of flame began to lengthen. In cycling jets, the flames of his arm shot outward farther and farther. First racing out, then retreating slightly, but not completely. Seemingly slowly, but in reality, quite quickly Maelen was sure, Edwyrd's flame bridged the distance between the two ships.

As Edwyrd's flames began to lick the edges of the ship, causing a worried scurrying among the crew, the big wizard quickly aborted whatever spell he'd been casting and switched. Suddenly white flames dashed out from the wizard's hand, blocking the progress of Edwyrd's arm. As Edwyrd's flame broke upon the white-cold flames of the wizard, they began to mushroom out and around. The wizard's cold shield expanded horizontally and vertically to cover it.

Maelen was once again more than impressed. Most aspirants to the title of pyromastery could never do what Edwyrd had just done. While it took great skill to assume the Living Flame, extending it that far across water, its diametrically opposed element, would take almost half again the training and skill.

Edwyrd's flames continued to beat upon the cold shield. The cold shield, though, remained firm. Edwyrd began to pulse harder, sending ever increasing waves of flame, soaring in a continuous stream across the water. Maelen blinked suddenly realizing the problem. Edwyrd had so far contained his flame so that he did no damage to the deck or rail beneath and beside him. As he escalated his flame, that was no longer the case. Maelen shouted.

Rupert who was standing near the wheel and the captain, who was on his knees at this point, heard Maelen and realized the problem. Quickly Rupert dashed up to Edwyrd, nearly touching the flames themselves. Maelen decided then and there that that child had no common sense of danger what so ever. Given the heat, that even Maelen could feel it from midship, radiating from Edwyrd, it should have been unbearable for the child. Nonetheless he was shouting in Edwyrd's ear.

Suddenly Edwyrd's flame's flickered as he realized what Rupert was saying and tried to compensate. His flames flickered and for an instant seemed about to go out. Within less than a second they reappeared in full strength as Rupert backed away to stand safely behind Edwyrd. The deck, while slightly blackened, no longer seemed to be charring. Edwyrd's flames reached back in full force against the wizard.

The waves of intensified flame became stronger and stronger, faster and faster. Maelen projected his sight over to the other ship to observe the wizards. The stronger wizard who was maintaining the cold shield was beginning to sweat with exertion. He was motioning something to the younger wizard, who was once again on his feet. Before Maelen realized what was happening to shout a warning, the younger wizard stepped out from the side of the cold shield and fired off a lightning bolt larger than anything he'd cast previously. The bolt streaked right for Edwyrd even as Maelen yelled.

As he yelled, Maelen realized it was pointless. Edwyrd was pure flame, lightning couldn't affect him. Especially since lightning was simply another Aspect of the Element of Fire, even as Edwyrd was at the moment. Maelen's relief was short lived, however. The bolt did pass right through Edwyrd, but Rupert was standing behind him!

Rupert screamed heart-wrenchingly as the bolt struck him in the chest. While not quite as powerful as the bolt that had struck Edwyrd, Rupert was enough smaller of a target for the discharge that the effect was similar. Due to the angle this time, however, Rupert's electrified and glowing body was knocked backward into the wheel and then bounced off and around.

Apparently, Edwyrd heard the scream and turned to see Rupert's body go careening off the wheel. Once again his flame nearly died. However this time, Edwyrd roared, extremely loudly. Suddenly, the Living Flame that was Edwyrd nearly doubled in size and breadth. The arm of flame across the water was no more, but a living giant of pure flame stood upon the deck of the ship. Slowly the giant of fire seemed to be growing a large cloak around it. It took a moment for Maelen to realize that it wasn't a cloak though! They were giant pinions, wings! No longer was there a flaming giant on the deck, but rather now an angel made of flame, a living Avatar of Fire. Essentially an intelligent Fire Elemental!

The Avatar of Fire spread its wings and rose into the sky. As it did so, it shrieked blasts of flame that rocketed across the water to the enemy ship. Frantically the two enemy wizards tried to douse the flames with limited success. Suddenly, however, the flame that was Edwyrd turned blue-white. Arcs of blue-white flame streaked across the gap between the ship and the Avatar of Fire. The more powerful wizard flung up his cold shield. The shield however, lasted but a few moments before the onslaught of blue-white flame, then collapsed. Down streaked the blue-white flame, striking the wizard full in the chest.

Fire exploded on the enemy vessel all around the wizard. The blue flame continued for several seconds pounding on the wizard. The wizard's last line of defenses gave and suddenly he began to burn, charring. Charring even faster than the body of little Rupert had from the lightning. The wizard's body crumbled to ash as the flames continued to sweep the deck. Within moments the entire ship was a single huge bonfire.

As the ship became completely engulfed in flame, the Avatar of Fire flickered. Its flames went back to yellow, then to orange and finally red. At that point it seemed to lose all energy and fell from the sky. It plummeted like a rock to crash into the sea, raising a great cloud of steam.





Animages

Curriculum Vitae: College of Wizardry

University of the Council States



As everyone most likely knows, animages as a profession are neither well known nor extremely common. This is due to a wide variety of facts, including the fact that the term animage is met with uneasiness and trepidation in many parts, and even fear in others. Why this should be so is unclear, but many feel that in large part it is due to the fact that many animages are rumored to be able to read and control minds. Things that Sorcerers and Enchanters may also do, but which, nonetheless, animages have gotten a bad reputation for. These beliefs in the invasion of mental privacy have made many uneasy.

These paranoid beliefs in fact have led to a rather strong code of ethics about this very thing, subscribed to by most animages and instilled in almost all pupils. Nonetheless, the rumors still persist. For the sake of literary honesty, historians hint that there may have been cause for such trepidation a long time ago, before the ethics were enforced. Certainly legends of the rule of the Anilords and their elite forces the Time Warriors still instill terror in young children everywhere. Such fears are not helped by periodic resurgence in rumors about mad mentalists and the supposed Twenty First discipline. Fortunately, there is no such discipline and the few remaining organized animage groups do much to publicize this fact.

Regardless of the reason for such fears, the fact remains, the number of individuals actually referring to themselves as animage is pointedly few. Almost no schools referring to themselves as such exist in the world today. This not to say none such exist, rather none exist under that name. The great animages of legend are thought to be true liberal scholars, rather mixing and matching disciplines as a matter of personal interest, and being fairly well versed in all of them, regardless of the sacrifice in power this cost them by not concentrating in only a few disciplines. As stated, such 'true animages' today are few. Due to the lack of schools, all known such animages are generally taught by a single master with a single pupil as they wander the countryside, or live in a tower or whatever. Naturally having only one teacher does not give a truly liberal education, thus most eventually leave to seek other masters or try and teach themselves.

If there are few such 'true animages,' and this an admittedly annoyingly vague term, where are the rest? These other animages are not actually uncommon; they just go by other names. The names they go by are generally representative of their specialization. Common animage specializations often thought of by laymen as separate professions include Seers, Elementalists, Summoners, Mentalists (or any other of a dozen pseudonyms), Healers and the now extinct Time Warriors.

Of these other 'subprofessions,' most actually do have schools here and there, especially the Healers and Elementalists. The Summoners occasionally do, and while there are Seer schools, Seeing is most often taught on a one to one basis with a single master, like traditional animages.

Mentalists or whatever they may call themselves in different countries to avoid suspicion, do infrequently have schools, or temples, but are also just as often outlawed altogether.

There are no Time Warriors left alive, as far as any one knows, but given the very nature of their disciplines, they may only be on hiatus.





Anilords

Curriculum Historia: College of History

University of the Council States



No term inspires more sheer terror than the term "Anilord." The last of the Anilords were slain over one thousand years ago. Unfortunately, knowledge of exactly who they were and what they were capable of largely died with them, at least from a scholarly perspective. All that remains are the myths and legends of these beings, most of which have been tailored to frighten children.

What scholars do know, is that a little over 1900 years ago, the Council of Anilords, made up entirely of animages and proto-wizards, overthrew the Council of Magi, the ruling body of the two continents of Norelon and Eton. This new body ruled the two continents with a black iron fist of terror for nearly a thousand years. Between their elite Time Warriors who could bend the very forces of time around themselves, and the dreaded "Mind Reavers," capable of splitting a sentient being's mind apart like an onion, there was little opposition to their reign.

One clear distinction is that there was no such thing as modern wizardry as we know it today. Wizardry as we know it was actually a sub-discipline of Animastery. In fact, what few surviving treatises we have from the time of the Anilords refer to wizardry as "crude mana engineering."

Modern wizardry is an outgrowth and extension of this "mana engineering" that came about as an effort to codify the knowledge of the animages, and make it safer and more accessible. Politically, its promulgation among the magi and the churches was also, in part, to help ensure that the abuses of the Anilords would not be repeated.





Chapter 54


Talarius watched the oily black clouds of smoke twist their way skyward, as if in some macabre dance, harshly outlined against the dark grey overcast of the sky. Twenty-five, twenty-six, twenty-seven, twenty-seven sickly black pillars of smoke, each unique. Unique like the beings who made them. He brought his eyes down to the source of the smoky trails. Twenty-seven pyres, one for each of the villagers who'd succumbed.

Talarius grimly watched the scene. Dimly making out the barely visible gyrations performed by the agonized figures, hidden by the flames and smoke of their own living funeral pyres, moaning and pleading for release upon their stakes. Talarius blinked as a particularly pungent curl of black smoke licked at his eyes. He wanted to close his eyes. Wanted to shut out the grisly scene from hell. He forced himself to watch. Watch his own work.

The sight of each blazing bier, containing some former villager, some man, woman or child, bringing back painful memories. Memories he'd rather forget. Memories he would never forget. He hated this. Tiernon knew he hated this. Situations like this were what made him question his vocation. Situations like this, that in the end, always reaffirmed it.

If only this was the plague he was dealing with. The plague might be more frightening in the minds of many, but at least the plague killed its victims. Bubonic plague cast a long dark shadow over many lands, bringing death to thousands. Death, clean and simple. Death with the chance of reward or punishment. Death, something final. Not this. Not the unending hunger that these poor souls were damned to. Not the lifelong agony and unholy thirst that would drive men and women to perform actions otherwise unthinkable, in order to survive.

For that's what it eventually came down to. Survival. Survival at any cost. Survival and temporary surcease of the agony. Any cost, even that of cannibalism, even that of one's immortal soul. Talarius allowed himself to close his eyes for a moment, remembering. Melissance...he forced his eyes open, forced the memories back.

No cost was worth that. Better to die. Die, burnt at the stake than to be forced to eat the living flesh of others in order to survive. Better to die than to risk passing on the disease. Die early, before the weight of sin dragged what little was left of one's soul down to the depths of the Abyss for all eternity. Hopefully, by dying now, even unshriven, these poor souls might, just barely, escape damnation in the sight of their respective gods. Talarius prayed to Tiernon it might be so. Prayed as he had every night for twelve incredibly long years.

Many of the figures had ceased their moaning. Succumbing at last to the cleansing flame. Succumbing to the flame even as they'd succumbed to the foul creatures that had done this to them. Talarius gritted his teeth. If only, if only Sir Etrian hadn't failed. Failed in his test of faith. If only he hadn't succumbed to the lure of damnable immortality. If only he hadn't given in. If he hadn't failed in this test, then the foul bloodsucking creature of the night would have been stopped sooner. Perhaps stopped before any more victims had fallen to their half-finished attacks.

Half-finished, if the vampire didn't completely kill its victim, or lead it into damnation, this was what was left. Victims half dead, knowing their state, hating every moment of it. Hating the all-consuming agony in their bodies that drove them to seek the living flesh of others to try and ease their own half-dead state. Trying to bring a little more life into their drained bodies. It never worked. Not for long. Oh, they could appease the hunger for short whiles, have a few moments of respite, but the hunger would return, they would be forced to prowl again.

To rend, to tear the very living flesh of friends, family, strangers, any living being they could find. All to digest a little bit of that person's vitality to prop up their own beleaguered state. Not just blood, like a vampire. Their systems weren't refined enough for that. No, ghouls needed the flesh and needed it in greater quantities. Talarius had seen that early on in his life. No, he would not dwell in the past. She was gone. Gone as these poor wretches.

Talarius was sure it was the acrid smoke causing his eyes to water. He couldn't let himself pity these few remaining writhing individuals. Their fate was unkind, but so much better than if they'd been allowed to continue in their hellish state. Etrian, Talarius cursed the man. He knew it was wrong of him to pass judgment on other people. Etrian however, had given up that claim. Given it up when he'd renounced all he stood for as a Knight of Tiernon when he'd sold his soul to that blood sucking fiend.

Talarius cursed Etrian now as he'd been unable to when he drove the stake through the former knight's heart. Then he'd only been doing his job. No curses, no remorse at the loss of a friend. Only a job. Only knowing that his fellow knight would never experience Tiernon's reward, but would at least be spared too great a weight of sin in whatever afterlife there might be for the truly damned. With vampires, there probably wasn't even damnation. From the effects of their passing, Talarius had to suspect that they simply ceased. Whatever life force they had simply dispersing into nature.

Talarius had killed the other fiend in the same manner. The only really effective manner, stake through the heart, cut off the head, a day of sunlit exposure. Failing the sun, as had been the case here in this grey and dingy land, a dousing with Holy Waters and then a burning would suffice. The ashes had to be scattered to the four quarters, of course. Not trivial. Not pleasant. But far better than this. Burning ghouls, former people, at the stake.

The other villagers, the survivors, hadn't been too receptive to the idea. Eventually he'd managed to convince them that there was no other choice. No cure. No release but death in flame. It had taken all of his most persuasive talents; he hated using them in this manner, but there was no other choice. Tiernon knew if there were, Talarius would have found it. Found it twelve years ago. Perhaps the worst were the mothers, knowing their sons or daughters were damned, both on Astlan and in the hereafter, and the only possible hope of avoiding the second was to burn horribly at the stake.

They were survivors though. They'd lived through one of the worst nightmares a village could go through. They'd survived. In the end, Talarius was sure that that experience, more than any charisma on his part, had persuaded them as to the necessity. They were a brave folk, even though none had come to join him on this vigil. He didn't blame them. He didn't want to be here, watching. Someone had to though. If not only to bid farewell to these poor souls, then to also assure none escaped.

The fires continued to burn, but Talarius could hear no more sounds from the stakes. He could see no more contorting bodies. It was nearing the end. All that was left was to watch these remaining fires burn out. Watch, as he had the day before when he'd burnt the bodies of sixteen of his men. Twelve had been dead. Killed outright. The other four had been in the same Tiernon-forsaken state as these sad creatures. He felt the loss of each of those men as if they were a part of himself.

He couldn't let that loss stop him, however. He had a job to do. People to save, a mission. He would meet the challenges set forth before him. He would meet and conquer them, as he had in the past, as he would in the future. While he would grieve in his own way, if he faltered or halted in his mission, Tiernon alone knew how many would pay the price of his hesitation. How many had already paid in the past. Melissance...Trian...Kiernon...Baxtion. Talarius shook his head. He would lead men wherever the right took them. He would never let his own inactions allow another innocent to come to harm again, not if he had any say in it.

The last of the fires had burned out. Twilight was beginning to set in. It was hard to tell in this dark land where the sun never seemed to shine, however the general light level seemed to be decreasing. Talarius trudged back towards the village. He would get the villagers to bury the remains of the ashes, or whatever they cared to do with their loved ones. The ashes were not his concern. He'd inspected every smoldering burned out heap of ashes. Inspected them to insure that nothing evil had escaped. Clean. Clean and pure at last.

The mud and wattle huts of the village seemed to almost blend into the brown and grey landscape and sky. He wondered how the villagers could go on here, day after day. They did though. Perhaps that was what he most admired in the human spirit. The ability to carry on, no matter what. To fight against the odds, to grit one's teeth and hang on against all that the gods threw at one.

As he entered the village, the mayor, or what passed for a mayor, came out to tug pitifully at his cloak. "Sir, Lord Talarius? Is it over?" Talarius looked sadly down into the man's frightened eyes. The weight of pain and fear seemed to bow the man over, as if he bore a great burden. Given all the troubles the village had undergone, he probably did.

"Not Lord, Gasmon. I told you that before. I am simply Talarius. No more, no less. If you wish, you may call me Sir Talarius, but that is the highest honor I aspire to. I am but a man, like yourself. And yes. It is over. Finally over."

Talarius looked back over his shoulder to the charred remains of this man's friends. The man's wife even. "It is over. They have all gone to what awaits them in the afterlife. I pray that many of them have been forgiven and will find the rewards they so otherwise deserved." He rested his hand gently on the man's shoulder. He smiled gently, but sadly, down at the mayor as he said. "You may go and do as you see fit with the remains of your people. No more harm will come from them or to you." The mayor nodded his thanks and quickly scurried off to gather his fellow villagers.

Talarius made his way towards War Arrow. He'd sent his few remaining men on ahead. He'd left this last task for himself alone. He stopped by the bench outside the inn to gather his saddlebags. He'd left them there this morning, in preparation for leaving as soon as this job was done. He then continued on up the road to his steed. As he approached his companion, he shook his head, trying to clear it. This chapter was over, another was about to begin.

He had already received a request for assistance from Iskerus. Demons it seemed. Talarius almost smiled. Not quite, but almost. Demons were much harder to deal with than vampires or ghouls. Demons were the worst of the forsaken. They were the very essence of the Dark. Nearly impossible to permanently kill or defeat. A challenge if there ever was one. A challenge he grimly relished.

With demons, there was no question. The entire issue was black and white. No humanity involved. No lingering doubts about doing the right thing. Demons must die, must be defeated if mortal kind was to survive. Demons were the antithesis of all that was good, all that was life. In slaying a demon, Talarius wasn't killing some poor monster that had once been human. No creature who's soul had been sacrificed at the vile whims of another. No being that had foolishly given up his or her life in the pursuit of fleeting dreams of physical immortality, and who might later regret such a hasty action. With demons, there was no question of killing unshriven. No worry about forgiveness. Demons had no guilt, no remorse, no doubt, no repentance. Even if they did, they were the most damned of the damned, there was no possibility of parole or pardon. With demons, it was out of Talarius' hands, his mission was clearer with demons, there were no doubts, no fears. Only action.

~

"Any luck?" Lenamare asked Jehenna as she walked into their chamber, not really expecting a positive answer. He was not disappointed; he didn't get one.

"None. I retraced back to the ambush sight. Apparently, some of our people survived. Our dead seemed to have been buried, and the wagons salvaged. From the looks of things, the survivors headed for Freehold. The book was gone." Jehenna reported.

"So! If our people lived, then they must have won, and taken the book. If they're heading to Freehold, they'll be here any time. Naturally, out of deepest concern for my students, I should personally arrange to go and meet them. And the book, of course." Lenamare jumped from his chair in excitement over the thought of getting his book back. He began pacing the room, planning. Jehenna was already shaking her head though.

"One would think so. However, I followed the trail all the way to Freehold. I found some of our horses wandering free, plus the packs. No sign of the people, or the book."

"Damn! How sure are you?"

"Very, it's hard to miss things in spirit form when you know how to look for them. I then scanned the entire area. No sign of anyone. Given that there isn't really any way to leave the trail, until much closer to Freehold than they could've gotten, they must have flown or teleported."

"Exador excrement!" Lenamare shouted. "They could be anywhere on the damn planet! Why are those idiots doing this to me? Do they enjoy frustrating me?" Jehenna said nothing.

"How? How am I going to find that book? I can't even get the Abyss blessed fourth order to answer a summons. None of my other demons will have a clue on how to find the book or the students."

"You could send them all on a wide scan search, I suppose." Jehenna didn't sound too convinced her own suggestion would work.

"No, there are not enough of them. Of the ones I can rely on, I've only got two thirds, three second and three first. Besides, if I did that, Exador would certainly find out and know we'd lost the book. Then he would be out searching for the thing. At least for the moment he's penned up here with us at Freehold."

"I suppose." Jehenna decided to change the topic. "Any luck on your end?"

"Some. I've managed to contact both Trisfelt and Hortwell. Elrose is still unaccounted for."

"That is something, I suppose. No word on the other groups?"

"None, but they're irrelevant. Actually if Trisfelt could get back in time for the council meeting it would be a nice touch. He's got the kids in tow. Their tear-streaked muddy faces could do a lot to persuade the council. Unfortunately, when he bugged out with them he went to his old home in Scarpsdale. It's about a day short of Hoggensforth. Since he hasn't been to Freehold in the last twenty years, he's a bit squeamish about teleporting blindly here with a bunch of kids.

"Man's always needed a push now and then for anything, " Lenamare added. "I decided I need the little urchins bad enough not to argue with him. He'd do what he wanted anyway, I'm sure."

Jehenna just shook her head. "And Hortwell? He's still alive."

"Yes, it wasn't clear exactly what had happened to him. He wasn't saying. However, the important thing is that he's with Zilquar's army. They're just out of sight of Exador's army. Staying invisible, I guess."

"Zilquar's army? He made good time. Given the time it would have taken to raise his forces, he must have come 600 miles in about 5 days. That's incredibly fast for supply wagons and footmen."

"Aaaahh!" Lenamare smiled. "Why do you think I called on him, despite his distance? Why did I ally myself with someone so far away?" Lenamare paced the room, his arm waving above his head, in a rather excited lecturer format. "You see, I knew that no one, such as Exador, would believe any distant ally like Zilquar could get there in time. But you forget that which many wizards forget when considering Zilquar. What are his school's main areas of expertise?"

Jehenna shrugged, "Enchantment and Thaumaturgy I believe."

"Exactly! Air and Earth! Like so many, you miss the military implications of his areas! Despite the fact that they do little Pyromancy or Conjury, they still are extremely useful for military situations. You see, one of the things that he routinely has his students making as an exercise, is flying carpets!"

"Of course. He flew his people in!" Jehenna seemed a bit miffed that she'd missed this.

"Well," Lenamare conceded, "I suspect, to get an entire army, plus horses, he partially flew them in. I would guess he had all his horses and cavalry riding hard. His foot soldiers and supplies he probably flew.

"However, in addition to being able to arrive very quickly, his larger carpets would have made the perfect platforms from which to launch aerial attacks against that usurping son of a swamp lizard and his now glowing army." Lenamare stopped and scowled at the floor. "Unfortunately, we had no time to reveal my plan. That demon and what's his name, the dead student, conspired against me." He waved his hand at any possible argument Jehenna might consider. "Oh, I know. Not directly conspire, I'm not that paranoid. Indirectly though, their incompetence aided my enemy, thus I use the word conspire, albeit rather loosely."

Lenamare sat down again, resting his chin on his fist. "The problem," he tilted his head to look up at Jehenna, "still remains. We don't have the book. Nor does Exador, fortunately. We must have that book. Since, at the moment, we can't get it, and since I suspect the council would find itself disagreeable to my venting steam by doing another Fission spell here at Freehold, I must find some other way to release my anger. Why don't we plan the destruction of Exador? Yes, what can we do to discredit and ruin him here at Freehold?" Lenamare smiled to himself. Jehenna simply shook her head and pulled up a chair.

~

Maelen finished up the last of the wounded sailors. He then ran up to the forecastle to quickly look Rupert over. The boy's body was a mess, severe burns, charred at the edges. Giant blisters had formed almost immediately. In a couple places on the outer extremities the very bone itself was showing through. His teeth appeared locked in a rictus of pain. Maelen did a quick scan for life. He found none. Admittedly, his senses were slightly obscured by the residual mana still clinging to the boy's body.

The lightning spell had apparently been powerful enough that, even now, the mana used to create it, hung over the boy's body in a haze. Animus was also present, however, it was not in the body as it would be with someone still alive. Rather it was the hazy disbursement of animus found shortly after the body was vacated by the soul. Actually, there was quite of bit of left-over animus, more than a boy of this age should have left. On the other hand, he'd noticed the boy had very high animus and mana concentrations while alive. That had been what had led Maelen to believe he was actually Edwyrd's student. They both seemed to have very strong animus and mana auras. Much as he regretted it though, there was nothing he could do for the boy.

Edwyrd, on the other hand, was a different story. He'd plunged out of the sky and into the sea. It was pretty clear that he'd used up all his reserves in doing his last attack. Actually, Maelen would never have guessed the lad had enough reserves to do what he did. Edwyrd had had to use a fantastic amount of power. The Living Flame alone was taxing, add the prolonged strike against the Oorstemoth ship, finally the Avatar and then the increased heat of the blue-white flames must have drained him to the core.

Obviously, Edwyrd was more than just a one discipline idiot-savant. While one could specialize enough to become a pyromaster at the expense of other disciplines relatively easily, only a true master animage would have the power reserves to do what Edwyrd had done. Maelen didn't have those kind of reserves, even if he had known pyromastery. Judging by mana output alone, Edwyrd would have to be a Seated Member of the Society of Learned Fellows, entitled to the Chevroned Robe and Mortar Board.

So why did he look like a lost youth? By all actions, save the use of pyromastery, he appeared to be exactly what he claimed, exactly what Maelen had Seen. This, however, indicated that his aura was actually correct, that he was a master in disguise. Maelen shook his head, he really would have to have a long talk with the lad. If he lived. Maelen began busily scanning the area of the sea with both his eyes and his Sight.

He waved to a crew member to attend him. He'd need help to pull Edwyrd out of the water, if he found him. There, about a hundred feet from the ship, below the surface. A large collection of animus and mana that had to be Edwyrd. Maelen used his limited telekinetic strength to try and lift the lad’s head above water. He only hoped it wasn't too late.





Animus and Mana

Curriculum Vitae: College of Wizardry

University of the Council States

Animus

Animus is the "energy of life" it is roughly speaking the spirit or soul, the "living" part of all living creatures. All things that are alive have animus. Animus inundates every cell and the very molecular and genetic structure of living creatures. It is what separates organic compounds from living organisms. When a creature dies, the animus leaves the cells of its body and either disperses into the world around or in the case of high animus concentrations, may travel to other locations or planes.

Higher levels of animus result in higher-level beings. Plants and non-thinking life forms have the lowest levels of animus, animals considerably higher, and sentient creatures higher yet. Many theorists have hypothesized that it is actually the concentration of animus that causes thought and eventually consciousness. If the animus collects beyond a certain point, thought and instinct become possible, and then, past some other point, true consciousness, or awareness occurs.

Animus is not static. It grows with the thing to which it is attached. Or more precisely it is both generated by the interaction of the elements within the body and also collected from the environment. As something ages, or becomes more experienced, its animus grows. In the case of sentient beings what this means is that as a being grows in life and experience the animus grows with it. Individuals collect it in the process of their daily life, the more they get around, experience the world, the more animus they are able to collect. In particular, at a given time there is only so much animus in any region; thus travel truly does broaden one’s horizons, and one’s animus.

Where does this additional animus come from? Ultimately, it would seem, from mana. Animus by its very nature attracts mana. The more animus a thing has the more mana it attracts. Some of the attracted mana is apparently "consumed" by the animus and the animus grows.

In principle, on the physical plane, animus must be contained or it will quickly disperse. Larger concentrations take longer to be dispersed; thus when a plant dies its animus tends to go back into nature rather quickly, breaking back down to other substances and perhaps back into raw mana. When a sentient creature dies, its concentration of mana is large enough that it usually has time to exit the physical plane, usually with the assistance of some higher being (a god for example). In certain cases, discussed later, it may be possible to contain the animus with mana, and the spirit may stay around on the physical plane for a longer period of time.

Mana

Mana is the fundamental energy of the universe. It is a fundamental property that is either created by, or intrinsic to, the elemental forces. All of the elements radiate mana into their surroundings. It is this radiated mana that binds the elements together. Some theorists have thus referred to mana as the Binding Element of the Universe, or the Raw Energy of the Elements. Whatever it is, it is usable by those who understand it.

As mentioned earlier, animus attracts mana to itself from its surroundings. The more animus, the more mana collected. While all creatures collect mana, only those specially trained can hold on to it, or do anything with it. Non-magical, and non-magic using creatures, accumulate mana, and store some of it in themselves to sustain their animus. The rest radiate it away either to the environment, or they can channel it to some other being, such as a god, through prayers, sacrifice, and religious rituals.

High emotions tend to cause mana to bubble to the surface of a being more easily. Thus it can either be radiated away faster or given up in religious rites more easily. It is for this reason that priests often like to incite religious fervor and emotion, in order that the worshippers may more easily donate their excess mana to the god. It is also for this reason that certain dark and nefarious creatures and beings thrive on fear and pain, as this can make the mana an individual has, easier to "harvest." Finally, it is also this reason that causes battlefields to be large regions of mana which consequently causes a larger number of ghosts.

Animus must be contained or it dissolves away. If after death (the separation of Animus from its physical host) the Animus (spirit) can collect enough mana, it can form something similar to a "mana body," and thus one has ghosts. Similarly, spirits can sometimes collect enough mana to reanimate a dead body and contain the animus within it; however, in this case, the mana is no longer infused within the cells of the body but is just sitting in it with the mana keeping it inside. This reanimation is where one gets revenants, Liches, and other similar creatures. (Note that zombies and other truly "lesser" undead are different, zombies are corpses reanimated by mana, but with no animus huddled inside.) It is because emotion can free up so much mana, that one most often finds ghosts and such creatures being the product great battles or highly traumatic experiences.

Mana Absorption and Transmission:

Unless something else is done with it, excess mana simply dissolves back into nature. Certain magical spells and magical creatures are capable of harnessing this mana before it is absorbed by nature. Strong emotions greatly amplify the rate at which mana is radiated from an individual and make it much easier for the mana to be harnessed by other beings.

Creatures that absorb radiated mana include ghosts, ghasts, wraiths, revenants, the Ban-Sidhe, pooka and many of the other 'malevolent' races of fairy. Vampires also steal mana as well as animus, however they steal directly from the individual rather than from the mana radiated by the individual. Liches also may steal mana from individuals, but if so, then it is by standard Necronomical spells. For most such creatures fear is the predominant emotion they prefer to tap for getting mana.

Divine entities may also, and in fact almost always do, tap the mana radiated by individuals. The normal method is through the prayers of their worshippers. Prayers channel all excess mana during the time period of the prayer to the deity. Extremely devout and fervent prayers may actually transmit all of the mana the individual would normally collect in twice the period directly to the deity. In either case, the person 'dries themselves up' for that time period; thus by praying in the presence of a mana absorbing creature, one can prevent them from absorbing mana (it is be rerouted to the deity). It also tends to make the creature really mad.

Finally, the mere presence of a deific individual (normally a saint, etc.) absorbs radiated mana. Physically present deities automatically (unless they will it otherwise) absorb much of the radiated mana from all creatures who view the deity, regardless of whether they are worshippers.





Chapter 55


Tom fell like a rock. Out of the sky and into the cold water. Steam and vapor hissed around him as he felt his body submerge under the waves. He didn't think he'd ever felt anything that felt so good. His massive body continued to sink slowly, the water undulating over his flesh, no longer flame now. He slowed his descent with his wings, coming to a halt about thirty or forty feet below the surface.

Tom sighed in contentment. Not only did he actually feel the cool caress of the waves on his body, they seemed to sooth his mind as well. He couldn't describe how good it felt to be back in his own body again. To no longer be cramped in the Edwyrd form, as he had been for more the last few days. He could finally just relax all the muscles in his body and soak. Soak like in a soothing bath, something he hadn't had in way, way too long.

His eyes closed, he just floated, heedless of all but the gentle water around him. Cool, no more flame. He'd released the flame as he hit the water. That too felt good. At first, when he'd allowed himself to become one with the flame, it hadn't been taxing at all. Soon however, it had started to feel rather draining. Launching the all-out attack on the ship had really felt draining. He didn't feel exhausted though, just worn.

Actually, he also felt rather pleased. He hadn't been sure he could maintain both the Edwyrd form and do anything demonic. It had been for that very reason that he hadn't done anything against the pirates for a long time. He was afraid if he tried anything, he'd pop back into his true form. Lose his true form, he corrected himself mentally, the Edwyrd form was his original form. However, when that wizard had hit him with the lightning bolt...

That had hurt. Not as much as the original formation of his body, no, nothing was that bad, but certainly it had hurt more than anything since, including the dragon. Part of that may have been due to Edwyrd's intrinsically flimsy shape, even so, it had hurt. He had lost the Edwyrd shape then. He'd transformed back into the demon form during the attack. That was what had destroyed his clothes. He'd reverted as quickly as he could, he hoped no one had noticed.

However, the lightning had pissed him off. He'd decided to try something, anything. Allowing himself to become one with the flame, was something he'd tried before when he was plane shifting, this time he just carried it all the way through to its logical conclusion. The form had come easily enough, as had the ability to stretch himself to attack the other ship. Unfortunately, the wizard had proved more powerful than he'd thought.

It had taken more and more energy to try and penetrate that shield. Then when the second lightning bolt had flew at him...Rupert! My God! Tom came to a halt in mid-thought. What had he been thinking of? Relaxing here in the water, when for all he knew Rupert was lying dead! Rupert getting struck had unhinged him. He'd reverted to his demon form then, but somehow kept the flame. At that point all hell had broken loose, and he didn't care anymore. He'd fried the damn wizard and his entire ship. This was one killing he didn't regret. If Rupert was dead then he'd do his best to see that that wizard's soul rotted in the Abyss. He'd personally torture the bastard for a thousand years!

Oh God! Rupert! Tom thought again. He had to get back. He had to get to Rupert. He'd sworn to protect the kid, and here he was, having a jacuzzi while Rupert lay dying. He couldn't go up in demon form though. He would have to switch back. Mustering what little of his wits as he could, he willed the switch. As he was doing so, his still demon eyes caught a glowing light over by the burning ship, beneath the level of the sea. Some form of life? a survivor? he didn't know, at the moment he didn't care he had to see to Rupert. He quickly began to swim to the surface, as he did he felt a strange tugging, as if invisible hands were pulling him up.

His head broke the surface of the water and he looked around for the ship. There it was off in the distance. He started swimming for it as fast as he could. He'd worry about that survivor later. Rupert was the important one now. He only hoped Jenn or this Maelen fellow had gotten to Rupert fast enough.

As he reached the side of the ship, a rope ladder descended the side. He grabbed it. He had a little difficulty at first, it was a bit tricky making it up the swinging ladder. Eventually however, he made it to the top. Maelen was there, reaching out a hand to help lift him aboard. As he came over the rail, he sucked air into his lungs so he could croak, "Rupert?" He ignored the awed stares coming from the sailors on deck.

Maelen frowned and shook his head sadly. "I'm sorry, Edwyrd. There was nothing I could do." He pointed up the ladder to the stern castle deck.

Tom let out a small cry of despair, "No!" He ran up the deck. Maelen stayed behind, at the rail, simply shaking his head. After a moment he walked to the forecastle to see to Jenn and Gastropé.

As Edwyrd reached the top of the ladder, he spied Rupert's melted body, a little way from the wheel. The captain was still hovering in the distance, near the rear rail, he was giving Edwyrd a fearful gaze. Edwyrd ran to the body of the little boy. On his knees he bent over the form.

"God, why?" Even Tom could see there was no hope. Rupert's body was worse than anything he'd ever seen in a horror movie. Worse than any of the messes he'd made out of people as a demon. Everywhere, Rupert's body was either charred black, or swelled with blistered burns. The skin a bright red in other patches. Worst of all, were the places where the flesh had been burnt away to the bone. "Why Rupert?" Tom moaned as he rested his tear streaked cheeks lightly on the boy's chest.

Why? Why did it have to be Rupert? Why did the most innocent always have to die? Rupert was the only real friend he'd had on this stupid world. Tizzy and Boggy were there, yes, but they didn't seem to care quite as much as Rupert, besides, they were demons. Rupert liked him even though Rupert was a wizard. Only Rupert had treated him like a person, not a monster. It just wasn't fair! "Rupert, damn it. Don't be dead. You're my only friend. I love you, you damn idiot kid!" He'd never had to face death this personally before. Slaying faceless soldiers was completely different. This was the first time since his dad’s death that someone he cared about died on him. And even his dad’s death had been surreal, the explosion had vaporized the body. Oh, how he wished it had been him rather than little Rupert.

Tom simply knelt for a moment, sobbing. He didn't want to get up. He just knelt there, listening with the best of his senses, hoping against hope he would hear a heartbeat. Nothing, the kid was dead. "Oh Rupert!," Tom finally began to pull his head away. He'd just have to go on, somehow.

"T...o...h...m..."

Tom blinked. It had been very faint, extremely hoarse. He didn't think anyone who hadn't just been trying to hear every sound there was, would have heard it. He looked to Rupert's face. Was there movement there? Had the gritted teeth parted slightly? The lips seemed stretched or burnt away from the teeth. Could he have heard something?

He put his ear down near Rupert's mouth. There, a tiny indrawn breath?

"T...o...h...m, Tom." Definitely! He knew he'd heard something. Rupert was alive! "Tom....please...take...take me down... to the cabin."

"Rupert! Rupert, wait, I'll get Maelen and Jenn, they can help you." Tom was sure the captain was looking at him even stranger than before. He didn't care though.

"No!" Rupert croaked emphatically. His whole body even twitched as Tom moved to pull away. "No, they mustn't see me...like this. Please, just you...take me down to the cabin. Lock the door. Don't let them see."

"Rupert, you're delirious! You need help. I'll get it for you."

"No...Thomas...Edward...Perkinje...if you care for me at all. Please, I beg you, take me down to the cabin, and don't let anyone in." Rupert could barely utter these words, yet he stilled seemed frantic, pleading.

Tom was torn. He shook his head. First he'd get the boy to the cabin, then he'd worry about healing. He knew it was a stupid thing to do, he should get Maelen. But the boy's pleading stare, through nearly melted eyes--Tom had to. He'd just been so afraid of losing Rupert.

Carefully he gathered up the little boy. The captain was looking at him in fear from ten feet away. Ever so gently, he stood up with Rupert, hoping he wouldn't drop a piece. Rupert moaned in pain. The agony had to be incredible. He tried to be gentle; he knew how much burns hurt to touch. Actually, Rupert seemed heavier now then he had when he'd been carrying him earlier. Of course, he'd been a demon then, not an Edwyrd.

Ever so slowly he edged his way down the ladder, his back to the stern. He didn't know how he got down the ladder. At the bottom was the lad Evert. "Open the door." He nodded to the door to the inside of the stern castle. Evert, eyes wide, obeyed. Tom spared a glance to the fore of the ship. Maelen, fortunately, was still busy with Gastropé and Jenn. He nodded Evert to go first. "Open the cabin door too."

As Tom edged sideways into the room, carrying a softly moaning Rupert, Evert looked down at Rupert's face in amazement. "Go stand guard up near the doors, make sure no one comes down here without my approval. Understand." Tom looked Evert in the eyes. Evert nodded solemnly.

Tom carefully placed Rupert on the middle bunk, shutting the door with his foot behind him. Rupert squirmed as he was put down. Moaning a bit louder in pain, "on my side."

"Your side? don't you think..."

"Please."

Tom sighed and helped Rupert to his side. Rupert then finally seemed to move some, curling into a fetal position. Tom stepped back to wipe his brow. He wasn't sweating, it just seemed like the appropriate response. That bunk was small. Rupert's fetal position covered the entire breadth of the bed, and stretched out, he would almost have touched the end. Funny, how one's perspective changes. Earlier Tom had thought Rupert would be the only one comfortable in the tiny bunks. Now it looked just as bad for Rupert as anyone else.

"Tom, please hold my hand," Rupert croaked.

Tom got back down on his knees and took Rupert's hands in his own. "Rupert, I really need to get you help."

"No, please, just let me lie here, please, no one must see me."

"Oh Rupert," Tom didn't know what to do. The kid had never been particularly strong on common sense.

Rupert seemed to be breathing much stronger now, but in short gasps, as if in great pain. "I...huh...didn't know...it would...ah...hurt--so much."

"Hurt? you crazy kid? You were electrocuted. You were nearly dead, burnt to a crisp. It's supposed to hurt! Let me get you some help."

"Tom...no...you know better. Please."

Tom just bowed his head, nearly touching Rupert's. He sat there with Rupert, not knowing what to do. Trying just to be there for the kid. He listened as the kid breathed in his short gasps. "Ugghh..." Rupert grunted. Tom opened his eyes and stared sadly at Rupert. There wasn't much light in the room, maybe it was just the little light there was, but the poor kid was looking even redder than before. The shadow hid the blackened burns.

God! The kid's nose had essentially been burned off! Tom stared in sorrow. He didn't have any idea how they'd cure the kid. Even if Rupert would eventually allow it. This world didn't have plastic surgeons or huge teams of burn experts. Even on Earth, they'd have been hard pressed. All the hair on the kid's head was burned off, and he had large oozing sores on his back. Tom closed his eyes again, trying to will a little bit of help through his hands. He didn't know how to send anything but death through them, but he'd try a little life. He doubted it would help.

Tom closed his eyes again for a bit, praying for Rupert. "Aaaaghh...Tom...this isn't fun. It really hurts, I didn't think it would hurt so much."

"Silly kid." Tom opened his eyes again. He had to stretch his legs. He stood carefully, so as not to release his hold on Rupert's clutching hands. He wondered if there was any way to make the kid more comfortable on the tiny bed. If he could, then he should, and then go get some help, regardless of what the kid wanted.

Looking over the bed he didn't see what would help. Rupert had uncurled a bit from his fetal position, although he was still hunched. Rupert's head was almost against one wall, and his feet neared the other. He already filled the bed width wise. Maybe his eyes were playing tricks on him, but Rupert didn't look quite so charred anymore. He certainly looked a deep dark bloody red though. Tom didn't know much about burns, he didn't know if this was some worse state they went to. Rupert shook as if with a chill. Tom freed one hand and drug a blanket from the end of the bed over the boy. Only thinking afterward that contact with the blanket would probably aggravate the burns more.

"Rupert, I know you don't want me to, but I think I need to get some help." Tom started to dislodge his remaining hand.

"Tom..." Rupert gasped. "Please, stay with me for just a few more minutes. I don't want to be alone right now. I'm frightened." Tom could feel Rupert's hand quivering. He looked down into Rupert's pleading eyes. "I've never done this before. It hurts."

"Of course you've never done this before, very few people have." Tom just shook his head . He got back down on his knees and once again took Rupert's hands in his own. Wincing slightly as his palm got jabbed by Rupert's fingernail, or maybe even a finger bone from beneath Rupert's burned away flesh. He couldn't tell since he'd covered Rupert's hands along with the rest of him.

He closed his eyes again, leaning his head lightly against the boy's shoulder. Rupert's breathing became stronger, but shallower. Occasionally he moaned or twitched. A couple times he even shuddered. Tom didn't know how long he sat there with the boy, maybe another five to ten minutes. Finally though, he decided he couldn't stand the boy's pain any more.

He carefully stood up, slowly and methodically disentangling his hands from Rupert's rather long fingers, under the blanket. As he freed himself, Rupert just whimpered, but said nothing. Apparently in too much pain to say much. Tom shook his head sadly. He noted that the cover had gotten pulled forward at the end of the bed. Tom reached down and carefully pulled it to cover Rupert's hooves.

Hooves?

Tom blinked. His eyes must really be playing tricks on him. He quietly adjusted his position to get a better view and pulled back the blanket over Rupert's feet. No, hooves was the correct word. Rather than the feet he expected to see, Tom saw black cloven hooves. Extremely similar in nature to his own, although smaller. He pulled the blanket back further. Hooves weren't the only anomaly. Rupert's skin was a deep burgundy in color, a fine scaling starting to show through. Like Tom, his hooves were where his toes should be, his foot looked like a lower leg, his heel more like a backwards ankle.

Tom shook his head and moved to the other end of the bed. Rupert was definitely taking up the entire bed now. Why he hadn't noticed in the shadows a moment ago, he wasn't sure, but Rupert's bald head was also burgundy. His ears, no longer looking like blackened potato chips, were pointy and getting pointier by the minute. Large black knobs seemed to be growing from Rupert’s skull as well. Where his burnt off nose had been, was a small snout.

Tom gently pulled back the rear part of the blanket, sure enough, there were wings, and lower, a spade-like tail. Replacing the blanket, he lifted the front of the blanket to verify Rupert's long black nailed claws. Naturally, his biceps and other muscles seemed to have swelled a bit, and seemed to be continuing to do so.

Tom stepped back and ran his fingers through his hair. He wasn't sure, but unless he missed his guess, Rupert looked exactly like a smaller copy of himself.

Tom sat hunched on his knees again. His hand resting lightly on Rupert's shoulder. Shock did not quite seem adequate to describe what he felt. Rupert was a demon! It did explain certain things that hadn't made a whole lot of sense before. Actually it explained a lot of things, the more he thought about it. What couldn't be explained is why Rupert looked like Tom.

Rupert shuddered suddenly. As Tom looked down at the boy, demon, Rupert opened his eyes. He'd stopped breathing also. This, however, did not worry Tom, since he wasn't breathing at the moment either. "So Rupert?" Tom smiled at the boy, "anything else you forgot to mention?"

"Heh...no, I think this was the only big thing." Rupert's voice had easily dropped an octave or two. Tom simply continued to stare concernedly down into Rupert's eyes. "I don't hurt quite so bad, but I do feel rather funny, and I ache."

"Yes, well I'd expect so. But experience tells me the aching will go away."

Rupert closed his eyes again for the moment. "Tom?"

"Yes."

"What do I look like?"

"What do you look like? You mean you don't know?"

"Heh, well, I have a rough idea, but I've never let myself go all the way."

"What?" Tom was startled. "You mean you've always looked like human Rupert until now?"

"Yeah, actually, until I was ten, I really did look like human Rupert."

"Until you were ten?" How old was the kid, Tom could swear he wasn't any older than ten, or hadn't been earlier in the day.

"Yes, a year ago, just before I came to Lenamare's school. Up until I turned ten and then puberty started to kick in. Only it was a lot worse for me. I started growing a tail, and horns, you know."

"Fun."

"Yeah, well, mom had always denied the rumors townspeople spread. But as soon as it became obvious to others in the town what was happening to me, we were driven out. They don't seem to like demon-get for some reason. They, they hurt her...bad." He paused for a moment, Rupert thought he was going to cry, but of course, demons didn't have tear ducts. Rupert took a deep breath. "I eventually learned to suppress the changes by force of will, but it was too late, she died.

"I'm sorry."

Rupert sniffed. "Yeah, well, anyway, I managed to lock my old form in, from before I started to change. I then managed to get myself enrolled in Lenamare's school. It wasn't easy, but by passing myself off as two years younger than I really was, I looked like a prodigy."

"Why would you enroll yourself in Lenamare's school." Tom was curious at such a notion. Seemed rather antithetical for a demon, or half-demon as Rupert claimed to be.

"Well, I had to do something to eat, and have a shelter." Rupert said. Tom decided not to mention the fact that demon's didn't need to eat, nor did they really need shelter. "Besides, I wanted to become a great conjuror."

"Conjuror! Why in the world would you want to become a conjuror!" Obviously the kid was a bit strange even for a demon.

Rupert paused at this. "Tom, tell me, what do I look like?"

Tom did a double take at this evasion. Since Tom hadn't answered this question yet though, he did now. "Quite handsome really," he said with a smile, "you look exactly like a smaller version of me."

Rupert smiled widely then, and seemed suddenly to relax a great deal. Any human would have been terrified by the smile, Edwyrd got chills down his spine, but Tom recognized the expression. "I wanted to be a great conjuror...so I could summon you."

Tom's jaw nearly dropped to the floor. "Why? Why would you want to conjure me?" Tom was completely flabbergasted. This was not at all the sort of answer he'd expected.

Rupert smiled again, and when he spoke, Tom finally thought he understood what it was that Jenn and Gastropé seemed to enjoy about fainting. "Why," Rupert answered, "doesn't every kid want to meet his father?"





Chapter 56


His father? What? Tom didn't know what to make of that response; he was completely at a loss. Why would the kid think... "Jesus..." was all he could say.

Rupert tilted his head on the pillow, "Who?"

Tom waved his hand, "never mind..."

"Where is he? I've got to see him!" Jenn's voice came loud and clear from outside. She was apparently trying to enter the sterncastle. "Get away from the door!" Tom couldn't hear Evert's response; Jenn was obviously screaming for her voice to carry so well. He looked to Rupert, Rupert looked rather concerned.

"Can you shift back yet?" Tom asked. Rupert seemed to gulp and concentrate, then shook his head negatively. Tom closed his eyes for a moment, thinking what to do.

"Let me through, I said. Maelen claims he's dead for Goddess' sake! Then this captain claims Edwyrd took his body to the cabin! I've got to see him, I know healing, I can help!" There seemed to be a small scuffle. "Curse you to the Abyss, I'll summon a demon so damn big it'll bite your stone-filled head off in one chomp! Get out of my way!"

"I'd better see to her. You just rest, she won't get through." Tom stood.

"Thanks."

Tom just nodded and turned to open the door. As he did so, he realized that he was completely naked. He stopped, looking around. He shrugged slightly to Rupert, then borrowed his blanket. While Tom didn't care about being naked, he suspected it wouldn't improve his credibility when trying to convince Jenn to stay away. He wrapped the blanket around his waist and slid out the door, firmly closing it behind him.

As he opened the outer door, it bumped slightly into Evert's back. Evert, surprised, stepped aside. As he stepped out, again closing the door firmly, he noted that the second door to the stern castle was being guarded by another soldier. Jenn was glaring evilly at Evert, and now at Edwyrd. Maelen and Gastropé were standing a ways away watching the situation.

"What seems to be the problem?" He looked directly at Jenn, forcing her to meet his eyes.

"He," she pointed to Maelen, "claims Rupert is dead! He!" she pointed to the captain, also watching from nearby, "claims you took his body inside." She put her fists on her hips. "I will see him now!"

"No," Edwyrd replied equally forcefully, "you will not!" He raised his hand before she could utter another protest. "Rupert is very much alive, but he was hurt very badly. I've done what I can to heal him, but he needs to rest. In private and with no interference."

"You! heal him? What do you know about healing. If he's really that bad he surely needs more than a few bandages."

"You're right, he did." Edwyrd admitted. "However, I am an animage. I can also do some healing." Out of the corner of his eye, he saw Maelen looking on suspiciously. "I've done all that is needed. You have my promise that he will be fine. He just can't be disturbed, by you or anyone."

"But I can help! I should at least check your work!" Jenn protested.

"No. It's a very tricky process and you'd only be tempted to interfere. While you probably wouldn't do him direct harm, you would disturb him. That would be bad. He needs all his concentration and all the power I can give him to heal properly. If you go in and disturb him now, it will only slow the process and prolong his pain."

"But..."

"No. I am his cousin. I really care for him." Edwyrd was looking very intently into her eyes, trying to be as earnest as possible. This last was really true, he did care for Rupert, even if everything else he said was a lie. "I will not let any harm come to him." He already had of course, but that was another story. "You must believe me when I say he'll be fine shortly. You just have to wait. Maybe in a few hours you can see him."

"Edwyrd..." Jenn said with a sigh.

He placed his hands on her shoulders. "Jenn, you know as well as I that undisturbed rest is essential in any healing. In just a couple hours you can check on him. If you prove me wrong then, and everything isn't OK, you can exact whatever punishment you want. Including a demon to bite my head off." She blushed with embarrassment at this last.

She nodded slowly, then looked at him with a determined glare. "If you are wrong, Edwyrd, you won't face any demon but me. You should fear me worse." She then turned and walked back to Gastropé and Maelen. Gastropé took her arm and led her off to a far rail. Edwyrd turned to Evert and nodded.

"Thank you for doing as I asked. If you could stay a little bit longer as an added precaution, I'd appreciate it."

"Certainly, Master Edwyrd. Anything sir." Evert made a sort of saluting motion with his hands. Tom was slightly disconcerted by the obvious respect in the young man's voice. He turned his head and smiled and nodded to the other guard. That man also returned the nod with a small salute.

As he shook his head and turned to look out again at the ship, he found Maelen had snuck up on him again. "Healer as well? Is there any limit to your abilities, Tom?"

"Aaahh," Edwyrd didn't know how to respond. He was sure Maelen had seen the whole fire thing.

"Rupert was dead. I know. I've been healing people for seventy-five years now; I think I know dead when I see it. His spirit had evacuated his body." Edwyrd tilted his head back and forth, trying to come up with an answer. "Even I can't cure death yet.

"Not that I wouldn't like to, mind you. And not that some people can't. Physically, of course, the mechanics aren't so bad. It's just getting the soul back somehow that takes work. That can be difficult, you have to find it and bring it back to the planes of men. Then even after healing, you've got to reattach the soul to the flesh." Maelen scratched his chin thoughtfully.

"I have to admit, you impressed me mightily with the Living Flame. Further, your final all-out attack proves to me that what my sight read of your aura is true. You are a very good animage. However, in order to bring back the dead, you'd have to be at least as good in at least three other disciplines as you are in Pyromastery, and nearly as good in a few others. While there are probably less than few dozen animages in the world capable of your level of Pyromastery, there are not many more animages capable of raising the dead. I don't know of anyone that overlaps between Pyromastery and healing to that level."

Edwyrd coughed. He'd have to come up with something that would convince the guy. He tried to dredge up some of what Boggy had told him about souls and planes and other junk he'd read in fantasy novels. "Well, actually. Rupert did a lot of the work himself." That was certainly true. Maelen looked on, skeptical.

"What you saw was true. His spirit did leave; but Rupert is capable of projecting his spirit out of his body via astral projection. When his body got so damaged, he did this, and used everything he had to keep his silver cord connected, tenuously, to his body. I noticed this when I went to him. So I just took him to the cabin to work and then just healed his flesh. Something most anyone could do." Edwyrd had no idea if this was true about animages, but..."When it was sufficiently healed, he was able to reenter his body with me providing a little extra energy." Edwyrd shrugged, trying to decide if the intent stare meant Maelen believed or not. "Naturally it was very traumatic, he's a little bit tired now, and needs to regain his strength."

Maelen turned his head, looking out over the sea. He chewed his lip, deep in thought. Edwyrd had no idea if what he'd said made any sense at all. From Boggy, he knew that what he'd done at the party was basically astral projection, the wizards had severed the silver cord tethering him to his body. Maelen tilted his head and looked back to Edwyrd, scowling slightly.

"What you said could have worked, I suppose." He paused for a moment, then started pacing slightly in the cramped hallway. "It is certainly--more plausible than you being the greatest animage on the face of the planet. Further, given that Rupert also seems to share an aura similar to yours, and I know what you can do, I won't disbelieve he could do what you claim. However for a little kid to be able to know so much..."

"Well, he is older than he looks, and he is extremely bright." At last Edwyrd was able to say something that was true. Maelen stopped, looked at Edwyrd, shifted his jaw and shrugged.

"Ok, I'll at least allow myself to believe this for now. It is better than anything I can come up with. But I would like to look at the boy after he's rested." Edwyrd nodded in acknowledgement of the demand, what else could he do.

This seemed to satisfy Maelen as he nodded his head in satisfaction. "Fine then, do you have any more clothes? or would you like to borrow some of mine?" He glanced meaningfully down at Edwyrd's blanket wrapped torso.

~

Rupert lay on the bunk. He'd have liked to roll over on his back, but his new wings made that a bit difficult. He closed his eyes in contentment. The aching was disappearing. He felt a bit strange still, but it felt right. He'd gone for so long suppressing his true nature, his true self, that he hadn't even noticed how bad it was until he'd shed his old self.

He hadn't realized the constant tension, the pressure he'd put on himself. Now he could relax. For the first time, he was as he was meant to be. A demon, he was a true demon, just like his father. Rupert smiled. True, Tom hadn't reacted quite as positively as he'd hoped when Rupert had revealed what he knew, but he hadn't denied it, hadn't laughed. Of course, it would be pretty hard to deny it. Tom himself said Rupert looked just like him. Tom hadn't rejected him, he'd even gone out to keep Jenn away, to help Rupert.

Even though Rupert had known, or hoped he knew why Tom had come, known that Tom had come to claim his half-demon son, he'd still been afraid he'd been wrong. Afraid that Tom hadn't come for him, hadn't even known Rupert was his son. Worse yet, been afraid maybe he wasn't Tom's son at all. Now though, it was clear. Since no two demons ever really looked alike, how could Rupert be anything but Tom's son if they looked so much alike.

All those years as a child growing up with only his mother to ease the pain of the taunting of the other children. Children mimicking the fears of their parents. Then when his mother had died from the stoning, he hadn't know how he'd go on. All he knew was that he'd have to find his long lost father. Before she'd died, his mother had described his father. That was one way that Rupert had been able to recognize Tom. Oh, true, a few small differences, but given the time, the circumstances and the fact that she'd been on her death bed, there could be no mistake. Especially after he'd come to Rupert in his hour of greatest need.

At first he'd been overawed by Tom's size and might. Then to find out what a really great person Tom was as well as being the most ferocious looking creature in existence. Rupert wished he had a mirror. He wanted nothing more than to be able to see himself. See himself in his full glory, his true form. See himself as the gods had intended him to be.

Thinking back on it now, it was hard to believe he'd managed to suppress this for so long. It just felt so good! While in reality he was really drained, quite tired actually, his limbs and whole body still felt supercharged. He felt better than he had in a long, long time. In fact better than ever. Actually, he really rather dreaded changing back.

This was him! He really didn't ever want to be human Rupert again. It was as if he'd lived his entire life in some sort of trunk or wardrobe. He'd finally broken free and he didn't want to get back in it. He felt as if his new self wouldn't even fit. He had the crazy urge to get up and go out on deck and say, "Hey world! I'm the demon Rupert, son of Thomas! Look on me and live with it!"

Jenn of course would fall through the deck and out the bottom of the ship. Gastropé would jump overboard. He was sure Tom would be proud though. Proud, at least until he got after Rupert for making Jenn go through the floor and sink the boat. Rupert smiled, his tongue running over the back side of his unbelievably long teeth. He knew it was crazy.

Even though it was crazy, he really kind of wanted to do it. He twisted his head to look out the window behind him. He'd love to just be able to go out there and fly through the sky. He'd never flown before on his own; Tom had carried him, of course. He could imagine soaring through the skies, like a giant bird of prey. Rabbits and deer running like mad as he swooped down from the sky. Tom would be there, they'd fly high, up until the sky turned to night. They'd then soar at high speed toward the ground, pulling up at the last moment, only to do it again.

His wings twitched. He stretched as best he could, it wasn't easy on the small bunk. Rupert looked down to his feet. If he stood up, he was sure he'd be nearly six feet tall. Someday, when he was full grown, he'd be as big and tall as Tom. As he stretched, he tried to wiggle his toes. It was weird not having any toes to wiggle; or only two sort of toe hooves on each foot.

He swung his legs over the edge and tried to rotate himself out of bed. As he brought his head up, his head suddenly jerked. It wouldn't go any further, but he hadn't hit the top bunk. He pushed again, wood creaked and his head seemed to get stuck. That was weird. He raised a hand towards his head, admiring his beautiful ebony claws. He got shivers of joy just looking at them. Feeling carefully above his head he quickly realized the problem. His horns were stuck. He'd forgotten about them. They were long enough above his head that they gouged into the wood of the top bunk before his head hit it. He had to jerk his head down a few times before his right horn came free, but it did. He twisted his head to look at the bunk above. He'd left a really big gouge in the wood. He would need to be more careful.

Slowly he stood up. He winced slightly, more from anticipation of pain than pain itself, as his wings also caught on the bunk. He wobbled a bit and had to steady himself. His new legs would take a bit of getting used to. It was so nice to stretch a bit, not much, his horns hit the ceiling when he stood up all the way. He flexed his claws and went up and bounced on his knees and heels a bit. Oh! if only he could go out like this. Wouldn't it be great! No bullies would ever pick on him again. He'd show them. He, Rupert, was someone worthy of respect. He was someone! He was a demon, and he was Tom's son.





Chapter 57


Edwyrd knocked on the door to the cabin. He'd been away for the last hour and now wanted to check on Rupert and see if he'd be able to change back so Jenn could visit him. The boy had thought he would be in a little bit. He'd actually suggested, sheepishly, that he'd rather stay as he was and have Jenn have to deal with him being a demon. Edwyrd had just looked down at him with a 'you've got to be kidding' look. Rupert had admitted it might not be the best thing to do on a closed ship.

Amazingly enough, Rupert seemed to be extremely happy being a demon. A rather remarkable difference to Tom's opinions, Edwyrd thought. At least a difference to his original thoughts. He wasn't so sure now. Being Edwyrd certainly made social situations easier to deal with, but being a demon did have undeniable advantages. As long as one was not enslaved that was. Tom could admit however, to understanding Rupert’s reticence about turning back into a scrawny human. Human flesh was really almost unbearably fragile and tiny.

What Edwyrd didn't know how to deal with, was Rupert's assumption that Tom was his father. The idea was absurd for obvious reasons. The most obvious being that it was physically impossible. Even if he'd been a demon all his life, rather than a few weeks, he was still only five to six years older than Rupert. The problem was that the kid was obviously so excited about being Tom's son that Edwyrd didn't want to crush his dreams so soon after being electrocuted. The other problem was that Rupert looked so much like Tom, that if he denied it, Rupert would be sure he was lying. After all, how could two completely unrelated demons looks so much alike? Actually, Edwyrd wasn't even sure that related demons should look alike. How many demons had relatives? Or, at least, demonic relatives, he corrected himself, thinking of his parents and relatives.

Of course, if he completely explained the situation to Rupert, that he was just a brand new demon and couldn't be Rupert's father, Rupert might understand. The problem was, he was almost certain Rupert wouldn't believe it. He knew Jenn would laugh in his face if he tried to convince her he really did look like Edwyrd. These people, especially wizards, were so conditioned about demons; they would never believe the truth. He had to admit, the longer he went on, the more he had trouble believing it.

Not that he didn't believe it. No, intellectually he knew it, it was just the longer he participated in this shared hallucination about demons, the more he believed it. He kept finding himself thinking of demons as demons, fiends of the Abyss, not human beings in weird shapes. Kept thinking of himself as a demon disguising himself as a human.

Actually, this really frightened him. The longer he went on, the more he thought of himself as a demon. One would hope that being Edwyrd would help him get in touch with his humanity. On the contrary, it seemed. The longer he was Edwyrd, the less he wanted to be human. More and more he just wanted to switch back to being a demon. Was he losing his humanity? Already, his life in Harding seemed like it was in the distant past, and not just a few weeks ago. Edwyrd was frightened that if things went on much longer, he might forget all about his past life. He might stop wanting to go home.

A chill went down Edwyrd's spine. No, that was ridiculous. He definitely wanted to go home. If he could, he would do it in an instant. Without any hesitation he'd give up this Edwyrd form, give up running around with nutso wizards for no good reason other than he gave his word. Give up his demon body and powers. In an instant he'd put Jenn and Gastropé, pains in the rear, both, behind him. He'd go back to Harding and forget about being a demon, forget about Rupert. He would, wouldn't he?

Actually, he didn't know. That scared him. What had these wizards done to him? What had he allowed himself to become. He wasn't even sure of himself anymore. He didn't know what he wanted. He knew what he should want, he just wasn't sure that he did want it.

Rupert was one of the truest friends he had in a long time, even if the kid was friendly for the wrong reason. Boggy and Tizzy were pretty good guys too. While Jenn and Gastropé weren't much, especially when he was Tom, they were at least as good of friends to Edwyrd as any he had managed to make in Harding. Sure, some of his old friends had been closer than Jenn or Gastropé, but closer than the others? Again, he didn't know. Why couldn't things be clear-cut and simple. Why must everything be a shade of ambivalence?

Edwyrd took a deep breath and knocked again. "Rupert? Are you awake? can Jenn come in?"

"Yes, I'd like to see her." Rupert's voice sounded like his old one, plus he seemed to be sounding weak, tired. Jenn, standing behind Edwyrd, smiled a smile of relief. Edwyrd glanced at her, seeing a lot of built up tension drain away. He opened the door a crack and stepped back. Jenn hurried in. Edwyrd glanced back to Gastropé standing in the doorway to the main deck, watching.

Tom heard Jenn talking softly to Rupert. She sounded like she was sobbing tears of relief, a bit. Suddenly, he distinctly heard her call, "Edwyrd!" Edwyrd quickly opened the door wide again and looked in at her. She was staring at him in surprise. "What have you done?"

"What do you mean?"

"His hair!" She brushed her hands through Rupert's hair, "his face!"

Edwyrd moved in for a closer look in the poor light of the room. He hadn't seen Rupert since he'd changed back, but he quickly spotted what disturbed Jenn. While Rupert still looked unmistakably like Rupert, his hair was a lot curlier, the angles of his face were ever-so-slightly different. He had more freckles. In short he looked a lot more like a young version of Edwyrd than he had before! Edwyrd glared into Rupert's sweetly smiling, angelic, face.

~

Edwyrd shut the door to the deck behind him as he marched down the corridor to their cabin. A small oil lamp, carefully protected, gave off enough light for him to see his way down the corridor. He wasn't sure how he'd survived the remainder of the afternoon. Jenn had spent quite a while checking over Rupert, then Maelen had run his tests. Neither seemed to find anything amiss. Other than the fact that Rupert suddenly looked more like Edwyrd's little brother than his cousin.

After she'd finished her examination, Jenn had cornered him on that one. He'd babbled something about the special animage healing link bringing them very close together, and temporarily bringing out a stronger family resemblance. He assured her it would pass with time. He wasn't sure he'd convinced her. Maelen had just looked at him askance when he finished his examination. Thankfully, he hadn't wanted to question Edwyrd further.

Jenn and Gastropé had then been distracted by the captain. Apparently, he wanted to know if there was anything the wizards could do to speed them on their journey. The loss of one and a half masts was a rather significant impediment to their journey. He'd overheard Jenn say something about maybe trying to increase the wind slightly tomorrow, after she'd had time to rest. For some reason, none of the crew approached Edwyrd with any such questions. In fact they all maintained a rather good distance from him, and an overly respectful attitude.

Obviously they had all seen what he'd done. Thankfully, neither Jenn nor Gastropé had seen him. He was pretty sure they'd have figured out what was going on, especially if they'd seen him in his demon shaped fire manifestation. They'd apparently passed out after launching their combined lightning bolt. When they asked him what happened, he'd just told them that their blow had stunned the wizard long enough for him to get through with fire. That the wizard had tried to defend himself magically and messed something up, and the entire ship had exploded.

It seemed that they didn't bother to inquire of others on this, and in fact seemed quite willing to believe that a wizard under attack could mess up a spell and blow himself up. Edwyrd had just made that up, but they seemed to accept it with no problem. Apparently, he was getting good at lying these days. Except that he was going to clear up one misunderstanding, now. He was going to have a talk with Rupert.

Thankfully, Gastropé had suggested that maybe it would be better if he didn't try to crowd in the small cabin also, what with Rupert being in pretty bad shape. Maelen had mentioned a spare bunk in his room and offered it to Gastropé. Edwyrd thus had the evening to straighten things out with Rupert. He wasn't completely sure just how he would do it, yet, but he was sure he had to.

He opened the door to their room to find Rupert perched on the bunk, gazing out the open window onto the moonlit sea. As Edwyrd entered, Rupert turned around to see him. It was dark in the room, but thanks to the moonlight, Edwyrd could see the smile of pleasure on Rupert's face as he shut the door absently behind him. This was not going to be easy.

"Rupert, we need to talk."

"I know," Rupert said with a smile, "and I'm sorry about the thing with the hair. I just couldn't help myself." Rupert gestured to the bunk beside him. Edwyrd sat down, reclining against the windowsill so he wouldn't bump his head. As he sat down next to the boy, Rupert said, "Will you hold me? Father?" Edwyrd could hear the nervous trepidation in the boy's voice, fearing rejection.

The kid certainly knew how to make it rough on a person. Not wanting to get off on the wrong foot, in an already touchy conversation, he put his arm around Rupert's shoulder. Rupert leaned into Edwyrd, resting his head on Edwyrd's chest. Edwyrd sighed, no, this was not going to be easy.

"Do you know how long it’s been since someone held me?"

"Uh, no..."

"Well, actually I guess it was you a few days ago." Rupert said more sprightly, "until then however, it had been a long time." Rupert got quieter, and much more melancholy, "After I started changing, Mom no longer wanted to touch me." Rupert sniffed. "Then she died, and I was alone." Edwyrd groaned mentally, he'd better stop this soon, or he'd never be able to tell the kid the truth. He just didn't quite have the heart to interrupt. "I was afraid. So afraid I'd always be alone. That and be different. It was so hard. I mean the villagers were mean, made me feel like a monster, and then I had no one to turn to. All I could do was try and carry on. Try to find you.

"At times I thought it was a stupid, foolish thing. But I didn't know what else to do. Then when you showed up, it was like the entire world turned upside down. You'd come for me, like I knew you would. How many other fourth order demons could there be that fit your description and would just show up when I needed them." Rupert snuggle closer, his eyes closed. "When you carried me on the road, for the first time in my life, I felt safe.

"All my life, I'd lived in fear. My mother had let me know early on that I was demon-get, and that I could never tell anyone. Of course, I heard all the horror stories about demons and demon offspring. I didn't know what to think. My mother, she wasn't much help. She refused talk about you. She tried to be there, but even so, she sometimes seemed afraid of what I might become." Rupert sniffed. "She couldn't always help, but at least she tried, and then they killed her. Stoned her for 'sins of the flesh.' I managed to get her free, and we escaped, but she'd been wounded too much." Edwyrd could feel Rupert shaking, sobbing slightly.

"I don't know. I don't know what I'd have done if you hadn't come. I don't think I could have held out much longer. I might have jumped off a tower or something. Of course, now I'm not so sure that would have done any good. It's so hard to live in a world where you're different. Where you have to live every moment in fear of discovery, fear that people will find out, and hate you for what you are." Tom grimaced, he had certainly been finding that one out for himself.

"I was the only person like myself I knew. I'd never really seen a demon before you, just drawings or paintings, and hints from what was happening to me. All I knew were the evil stories they told children and students. It's frightening to hear those stories and know they're talking about you, about your own people."

Tom, by this point, felt like shit. He knew he couldn't let Rupert go on believing he was the kid's father, but he'd have to be asshole of the century to say anything at the moment. Part of the problem was that Tom did understand. He'd had some similar thoughts very recently when he'd first gotten stuck in the demon business. He guessed he also knew a little bit about Rupert's loneliness.

While his stepfather had been around until recently, they’d never been super close. He'd always been busy with work, or as his mother later said, late night assignments with his secretary. Even before the divorce, his mother had also gone back to work. Trying to get her mind off what she feared was happening in her second marriage. Tom had spent years missing his real father after the explosion at the lab. A leak in a very large hydrogen tank and an electrical spark was all it took to take his father from him.

Rupert continued, "But then you came. Finally, someone I could lean on. Someone who knew, who understood. Who I could trust." The pit of Tom's stomach rolled, here the kid trusted him and Tom was effectively lying to him by not saying anything. "Someone who wanted me. Someone to hold me occasionally."

Tom gave Rupert a hug. The kid certainly knew how to guilt trip a guy, even if unintentionally. How could Tom say anything after this? Not tonight, maybe in a day or two, but not tonight. He gave Rupert a tighter squeeze, bringing his other arm around to pat Rupert's head. What was he going to do? As much as he hated it, he wasn't the kid's father, couldn't be, but how could he tell this to someone so dependent on him?

"I just need someone to be there for me now and then. Someone with whom I can be myself, who'll accept me for who I am. Someone to teach me, someone to talk to, who understands me and what I'm going through. Someone to be there."

That was another big part of the problem. Tom had never had anyone who depended on him. It actually felt kind of good. He'd never had someone who really looked up to him, someone to protect. Someone to care for. Who knew, maybe Tom was somehow wanting to be there for Rupert as a mirror for his own desires for more attention when he had been a child.

Good grief! Here he was getting all these weird paternalistic feelings all of the sudden. He'd never even thought about having kids. Only as one of those distant certainties in the future. Of course, he supposed that if he did have a kid, he'd want one just like Rupert. Strong, smart, independent, but who occasionally needed a hug. Needed support now and then.

Another log to the bonfire of my emotional instability, Tom thought. He really didn't know how to feel about this Rupert thing. He did care about Rupert, a lot. Rupert was in some ways the little brother he'd never had, or the son he might actually like to have some day. As a friend though, he owed Rupert the truth, even though it would surely hurt him. Tom felt sick about even deceiving Rupert by not saying anything. Yet the thought of crushing Rupert's dreams with the truth made him just as sick, or more so. What could he do? He leaned his chin down against the top of Rupert's head.

When added to his other uncertainties, about his humanity, about being a demon, when added to his still lingering anxiety about the death of his real body, and the pain it must have caused his mom, this whole Rupert situation only served to mess up Tom's emotions like a meat grinder. Tom realized suddenly, that maybe what really sucked about this whole Astlan thing, was not being a demon, it was not being enslaved, it was not just being hated by every rational creature; no, what really sucked was the confusion and uncertainty it brought to his life.

It was confusion and uncertainty about who he was, what he was doing and what was the right thing to do. He no longer knew his place in the world; he didn't know where he stood. If only he were Rupert's father, or at least older, maybe old enough to be Rupert's father. He was pretty sure if he was an adult, he wouldn't have this confusion, this uncertainty. He was sure he'd know what the right thing to do was. He'd be the sort of person Rupert really could look up to.

Tom shook his hand slightly as he cut it on the tip of one of Rupert's horns. From the texture of his skin, and the sudden lack of hair, Tom could tell that Rupert had relaxed back to his demon form. Luckily, Tom had raised his head or he'd have been stabbed in the chin by a horn. He could also tell because Rupert was a lot bigger now, and weighed more. Actually, Rupert was probably now bigger than Edwyrd. If Edwyrd were to change back into Tom, then proportions would return to normal, but there certainly wasn't room for that. As it was, Rupert's wings were brushing against the overhead bunk.

He supposed that it must look a little strange for pasty little human to be holding and comforting a demon bigger than himself. Tom didn't really care though. As he'd been wishing others would understand, it wasn't the outside that mattered, but what was inside. What was inside was a confused and frightened little boy going through rough times. Someone who needed, and thought they'd found, their father.

Well, maybe for a while, Tom thought. For a while, he'd let Rupert have his father, or the next best thing. He didn't like the deception, and knew there would eventually be consequences for it, but for the moment, it seemed like the only option humanly possible. He stared off into the dark, gently stroking his "son's" head.





Chapter 58


Since Tom no longer slept, except when severely drained, he needed to find some other way to occupy his nights. Lately, he'd been trying meditation. One of the worst things about not sleeping was that one never had the chance to just escape from having to think about things. A person who didn't sleep couldn't escape to oblivion for a short while. In order to simulate this, and to preserve appearances with the humans around him, Tom had decided to try and meditate.

He'd learned the basic techniques in his Tae-Kwon-Do classes, he'd also used it several times already in Astlan to allow him to open the gates and to do the fire thing. Last night he'd blanked his mind completely while Rupert and Gastropé had slept. He'd just picture a completely blank state, and slowly try to relax all the muscles in his body. The problem, of course, was that unlike in his demon body where it worked fine, if he relaxed too much as Edwyrd, he'd find himself putting holes in the ship's walls. Eventually, with some practice he managed if not a completely satisfactory meditative state, at least one that allowed him to blank his mind a bit.

He'd been doing this for some time, his hand resting on Rupert's head, listening to the ship and the sea, just being lulled by the gentle motion of a ship at sea. As far as he could tell, it must have been some time in the early morning hours when he heard the voice out the open window behind his head.

"There you are!" Edwyrd nearly jumped, only the rather heavy sleeping Rupert kept him from springing up. The voice had come from the window directly behind his head. Where no voice should have been able to come from, it was a twenty foot drop to the sea below the window. Edwyrd twisted his head around to try and peer out the window.

Blocking his view of the sea outside was a large shadowy object. It was hard to make out anything in the darkness; the moon had set some time ago. All he could really see were two glowing embers set about an inch or two apart. He also heard what sounded to be a droning, or soft buzzing noise. "Knew I'd find you eventually," the glowing embers said.

"Tizzy!" Edwyrd said aloud. "You startled me."

"Yeah, I'll bet. Mind if I squeeze in?" The demon placed two of its hands on the windowsills. The window was wide open, but there was only about a foot and a half by a foot and a half of area to squeeze through. Edwyrd wasn't sure how the demon was going to do it. Nonetheless, he gently shook Rupert to wake him, so they could move out of the way.

"Huh? What...." Rupert said groggily.

"Shhh...It's all right. Tizzy's just trying to crawl in through the window, so we need to make some room." Edwyrd whispered.

"Huh," Rupert looked out the window. "Oh, hi Tizzy." Rupert seemed to wake up more, glad to see Tizzy. He backed out of the bunk and stood a little uncertainly on his hooves in the small walk space in front of the door. Edwyrd backed out the other direction, to the forward bulkhead. As he did so, the droning noise ceased and suddenly Tizzy was squirming through the window.

The wood of the frame groaned alarmingly, and Edwyrd was afraid Tizzy would break the window. Apparently, the multi-limbed demon was more supple and agile than he appeared, however, for he shortly had wormed his way in without breaking the window. Tizzy certainly seemed bigger now than he had before, Edwyrd thought. The demon took up the entire bunk, easily. Edwyrd suspected that the demon was actually the same size he'd always been, Edwyrd was just a lot smaller now. It was really rather interesting to view Tizzy and Rupert from his perspective as Edwyrd. Both were much more frightening looking than he'd ever realized before. The dark really didn't seem to help a lot.

"Whew, tight one that." Tizzy commented, shaking random limbs as he adjusted himself on the bunk. He looked up at Rupert. "Glad to see you're feeling better. Look a lot healthier now." He turned his head to Tom, "you though. You don't looks so hot. Kind of pale and underfed. You been getting enough fresh air?" Tizzy queried. Edwyrd just shook his head at the demon.

Tizzy sniffed around a bit. "Hmmm, still got your pet wizards around?"

Edwyrd shook his head again, "they're not my pets, but yes they're in other cabins." Tizzy started licking his lips. "Anyone to eat on board?"

"No. You are not going to eat anyone on this ship." Edwyrd said firmly.

"You know. The problem with you youngsters, you just ain't got no appreciation for fine cuisine. Nothing like a bit of fresh sea-human to liven up the old palette."

Trying to change the subject, Edwyrd asked, "didn't you get enough to eat with your accursed master? I assume that is where you took off to."

"Why sure enough. Most fun. Took him a good day to croak. Raped him 69 times I did." Tizzy's voice was getting louder with excitement. Edwyrd made a quieting gesture with his hands. For once Tizzy took the hint. "Why don't you wanna wake anyone up?" He asked more quietly.

"I'd prefer not having everyone go jump ship when they found out a demon was on board. Someone has got to drive this thing to shore."

Tizzy blinked. "Think they'd do that for one demon on board? What would they do if they knew there were three?" Tizzy giggled, so did Rupert.

"Let's just not find out. OK?"

"I suppose, whatever you want. But why bother having someone drive it to shore? Why not just fly to shore? Seems a lot easier to me."

"Yes, well, we'd have to carry Jenn and Gastropé." Actually, Edwyrd thought, if they could let Jenn know Rupert was a demon, then flying would be easier, he wouldn't have to carry three people anymore. On the other hand, he doubted the two wizards would really go for being carried by demons. He also wasn't prepared to let Jenn know about Rupert yet. "And I, for one, don't want to do that. So we'll just wait to get into port."

"Gonna take a while with this ship. Doesn't seem to have much in the way of masts. Must be kind of a slow one." Tizzy looked thoughtful, "they don't got a steam engine on it do they?"

"No afraid not," Edwyrd answered.

"Probably no nuclear turbines either?" Edwyrd just shook his head. "How long to port?" Tizzy asked.

"Well, if we hadn't lost the masts, then it would only have been about another three days. As it is I'd guess it will take about another five or six."

"Five or six days!" Tizzy exclaimed. Edwyrd made hushing motions again. "I'm gonna get a little cramped on this ship for six days! Course, I guess I could fly around the deck a bit, get exercise." Edwyrd grimaced, he hadn't thought of Tizzy coming along for the rest of the journey. On the other hand, he would really rather have the unbalanced demon where he could keep track of him, than running off somewhere murdering innocents.

"I don't suppose you can shape change into a human?" Edwyrd asked.

"A human? Is that what you're supposed to be? Why in the Dungeon of the Concordenax would I want to do something like that?"

"To blend in?" Rupert piped up.

"Why would I want to do that? I'm proud of being a demon. Aren't you?"

"Yeah, now I am," Rupert announced.

"Tizzy, we're playing sort of a game here," Edwyrd wanted to put it in terms Tizzy could understand better. He wasn't sure what those terms might be, but he thought he should try. "You see, we're pretending to be humans to find out what's going on with the wizards. Therefore, to keep the game going, it would be nice if you could turn into a human."

"Hmm," Tizzy said . "Maybe, but since I can't, it's a moot point." Edwyrd shrugged; there went that idea. "How long you gonna play this game?"

"I don't know, as long as it takes. Until we get to Freehold, probably."

"Freehold! What you want to go to Freehold for? There's nothing there but wizards. Nasty lot, actually."

"Uhm, that's where Gastropé and Jenn, and" he looked over at Rupert, "Rupert are going."

"Well actually, Tom." Rupert spoke up, his gravelly voice held down to as close to a whisper as he could. "I had been going to Freehold, because that's where everyone else was going. But really, I don't have to. I'll go wherever you want to go."

"Yes, well, uhm," Edwyrd wasn't sure. He didn't actually have any place else to go, except return to the Abyss. "I promised Jenn I'd get her there. So, Freehold is where I'm going for now. Besides, since Lenamare's there, I'd eventually wind up there anyway. I'd rather go on my own terms."

"Hmm, well...could be interesting I suppose." Tizzy muttered to himself. "As long as none of them wizards knows my name, it could be a lot of fun. I'm sure they'll just love having an unbound demon running around terrorizing them in the night, and the day."

"Yeah." Edwyrd said unenthusiastically. Such a prospect would convince Tizzy to stay with him, rather than run amuck alone; however, he really couldn't let Tizzy terrorize Freehold either. He'd just have to deal with that problem later. It looked like more and more of his problems were getting pushed onto the back burners.

"So, what are we going to do with you?" Edwyrd asked.

"So you're saying you don't want your pets to see me on the ship?" Tizzy asked.

"I think that would be best."

"But it's ok for him to run around like that?" He pointed to Rupert.

Rupert looked down at himself. "He doesn't go out like that." Edwyrd answered the octopodal demon on his bed.

"Should. Really don't understand why you want to look like that," he looked contemptuously at Edwyrd's body. "Puny little thing. I can take those things apart faster than they can repair ‘em. Game or no game. Doesn't seem worth it."

"It's not really a lot of fun, to be honest. However, you told me you used to look similar, before you were captured." Rupert glanced curiously over at Edwyrd.

"Well, now. No need to bring up bad memories is there?" Tizzy sounded hurt. "That was before I knew better. Don't you know better now?"

"I'm not so sure, but maybe." Edwyrd admitted.

Tizzy smiled. "Knew you'd get over it. You're really much better off as a demon. Except for the damn wizards--if we could kill all of them off, things'd be a lot better. Smart lad, smart lad."

Tizzy looked back over to Rupert, smiling. "This here's another smart lad. Knew that the moment I met him." Tizzy stopped and stared at Rupert for a moment. He tilted his head back and forth a couple times. "You know, Tom, he looks mighty familiar. Kinda looks identical to you, only in miniature."

"Tom's my father." Rupert spoke up. Edwyrd groaned internally, he hoped Tizzy wouldn't say anything, the octopod knew that couldn't be possible.

Edwyrd could see the glowing embers that were Tizzy's eyes dart back and forth between Rupert and himself several times. Finally, "You do work fast Tom, gotta give you that. Used to take longer in my day. But, I can see the family resemblance sure enough. The kid's also got your personality too. Serious and dedicated type. Doesn't let shit get to him." Edwyrd sighed a sigh of relief. Tizzy certainly could have solved his dilemma for him. It would have been very awkward though.

Rupert was smiling at the compliment. If Edwyrd had actually been human, he would have cringed at the extremely wicked looking teeth the smile revealed. Watching Rupert, he was really beginning to understand why he freaked so many people out without even trying. Actually, looking at Rupert standing there, an exact copy of himself, he got this sort of funny feeling in his chest. Kind of like pride or something. He knew it was silly, Rupert really wasn't his kid, but...well, he felt that way. All of a sudden, he wanted to change back to his true form and take Rupert out flying. Rupert would never have done that before. It'd be like helping your kid take his first step or something. Tom could remember just a few weeks ago, after he'd finally gotten the hang of flying. It was so exhilarating.

Edwyrd shook his head. How he could have such crazy thoughts when he had so many problems on his hands, he didn't know. What was he going to do with Tizzy? Actually, Tizzy was about as big a problem as a rogue demon child. If Boggy would show up too, then things would be just great, he could play dad to them all, and they'd have the male half of the demonic Brady Bunch. He wondered deliriously where he could pick up a mom demon and her devilish daughters. Oh, Tom suddenly thought, remember not to forget another fiend for a housekeeper! That was it. Edwyrd shook his head again. He knew now that he was totally losing it. If he lost any more of his sanity he'd be as crazy as Tizzy.

Closing his eyes, he leaned against the wall of the cabin. He had to get a grip on himself. He didn't know who he was or what he was doing anymore. Sometimes he didn't know if he was Tom or Edwyrd. If he was Tom, was Tom a demon or that guy from Harding? Again, this would have to wait, like all his other internal problems; he had to deal with the situation at hand. "So," he said, opening his eyes, "what do we do with you? We really can't hide you in here for six days."

Tizzy looked away from Rupert, to Edwyrd, then down at the floor. Apparently, he was thinking about the problem, at least Edwyrd hoped he was thinking about that. "I could get out and push. Or rather, pull."

"What?" Edwyrd didn't know what the demon was saying now.

"Well, if we want to get there sooner, I could get a rope and pull the ship. In the dark, no one will see. We still have a couple hours of dark tonight. I can come back in here for the day then pull again tomorrow night."

Edwyrd blinked. Well, that would work, he supposed. He guessed he too could get out and pull. The boat normally moved about ten miles an hour under sail. He and Tizzy could probably double that during the dark hours. However, it just seemed a bit too risky. What if someone saw? The night watch would have to get curious when they noticed the ship moving faster than it should. If they investigated, which he was sure they would, they would quickly find out what was towing them, and then all hell would break loose.

"No, that is an idea, but I think it's too risky. If they found out, that would be just as bad. Further, I doubt it would speed things up that much if we only did it at night. And, we'd still have to hide you in the day." Tizzy shrugged.

"Do we have to hide him?" Rupert asked suddenly.

"Why, of course we do." Edwyrd stated, "I don't think people are going to be too happy about having a demon around."

"Maybe," Rupert said, "but what if Tizzy came openly in the daytime? Jenn and Gastropé already know he is cruising around in the world. He could just come back claiming to wait for Tom to return, and not leave."

Edwyrd looked doubtful. Rupert continued, "It's not exactly like Gastropé or Jenn can do anything about him. The crew will be freaked for a little while, but they're already convinced you're some sort of powerful wizard or animage. If you promise them that you won't let Tizzy hurt them, they'll accept it."

"I don't know." Edwyrd didn't like the idea. "How do you know what the crew thinks? You've been down here all the time." Edwyrd asked.

Rupert pointed to his ears. "Yeah, but I was down here in this form most of the afternoon and I can really hear good when I want to." Edwyrd had to admit the kid was right on that one. "I overheard them talking amongst themselves when you weren't around. They think you're some Archimage traveling incognito with his students."

Tizzy interrupted, sounding curious. "Why do they think you're a wizard?"

"Well, actually, I'm pretending to be an animage." Edwyrd cleared his throat. "However, I kinda blew up a boat with two wizards on it this afternoon. It seems to have slightly intimidated the crew."

"Blew it up? in that form?" Tizzy pointed a couple of hands worth of index fingers at Edwyrd.

"More or less." Edwyrd hedged, he really didn't feel like getting into the whole story right then and there.

"Why do I always miss all the fun?!" Tizzy pouted. "If you had at least let me know, I could have hurried back sooner."

"Look, it's not like I planned it." Edwyrd really wanted to get this thing solved. "Anyway, let's think about this. I'm not sure I like this at all. I just don't see another way."

~

Jenn stood by the rail of the ship, thinking. The early morning sun cleared away a lot of her mental cobwebs. She'd just finished breakfast and was feeling considerably better. Yesterday had been too much. First, she'd been sure they were all lost in that battle. Somehow, though, between luck and Edwyrd's--whatever it was animages did, they'd survived. Luck really; it was pure fortune.

One of the first things she'd learned on coming to Lenamare's school was not to overextend yourself in casting spells. Spells were tricky things, if you tried too far above your ability or knowledge, disaster would strike. She'd seen students burned badly by a mispronounced spell that was too powerful for them. Like all students, she was ingrained with the stories of great wizards failing at great spells and bringing havoc to their whole surroundings. The Verigone desert being the textbook example. Luck. She had said more than one prayer to the goddess last night on that score.

Then Rupert, she'd been so afraid she'd lost him. When the healer had said he'd died, Jenn was sure she was going to have a nervous breakdown. Again, Edwyrd pulled him through somehow. She had no clue how animages did their healing, but Maelen had admitted that Edwyrd's story was possible. Incredible, she could only think, to bring someone that far gone back. She could tell Maelen was just as puzzled as she was. However, she'd checked Rupert out herself, and so had Maelen. Aside from the strange change in his appearance, he was perfectly healthy, if weak. Again, thanks to the goddess were due. She only hoped his hair would straighten out, as Edwyrd promised.

Now the problem was that the crew wanted her or Gastropé to help them get to Hoggensforth faster. Not that it was a bad idea, the sooner they got there, the better. The problem was that she wasn't sure she could. Oh, true, she could summon a light wind, but air spells were in the realm of enchanters, and she wasn't that good at such spells. Nor was Gastropé, he apparently was a pyromancer with some conjury ability. Edwyrd, apparently, was into fire as well. Maelen called it pyromastery though, not pyromancy.

Actually, from the little Maelen had said, she gathered Edwyrd was far more than just a passable student. In fact, he seemed to be hinting that Edwyrd was a full-fledged master. If one could believe that. Not that she'd known him long enough to argue the point, but what sort of master animage would be walking penniless into a strange town with only the clothes on his back. Animages were strange, but that strange?

Jenn shook her head. As she was about to turn away from the rail, she noted a large bird approaching the ship, rapidly. As she looked again at the bird, she realized that it was a very large bird. As it got closer she realized it was a very large bird with eight legs! "Shit! That's no bird, that's the goddess-cursed demon friend of Tom's that tried to subvert Rupert." She quickly looked around, searching for Gastropé. He was on the other side of the ship. "Gastropé!" she yelled.

Gastropé looked up from whatever he was doing. "Come quickly!" Jenn yelled. "We've got problems." Gastropé trotted over to her. As he got to her, she pointed to the now very close demon.

"Holy birds of Draston!" Gastropé croaked. Quickly he began what preparations he could to hold the demon. A loud droning noise filled the deck. By this point, crew members had noticed the approaching demon, and were pointing and talking loudly among themselves.

As it became apparent that the demon was headed right for the two wizards, the crewmembers made haste to place themselves on the opposite end of the ship. The demon came down, fast.

Crunch! It landed heavily on the deck, cracking a few planks.

"Hey lunches! Where's Tom?"

"Back! Vile spawn of night-hags!" Gastropé commanded. He was quickly making some sort of gesture.

"My, my, aren't we testy? Relax your gonads before I roast them on their branch." Tizzy told him. Gastropé squinted, trying to determine if his spells were having any effect.

"What are you doing here, demon?" Jenn demanded.

"Like I told you. I'm looking for the Tomatic demon." Tizzy intoned with a certain echo effect in his voice on the last sentence.

"The what?" Asked Gastrope' obviously puzzled, and dripping with sweat.

"The big red handsome fellow, you know--the one who was playing taxi driver for you."

"What driver? Never mind," Jenn shook her head. "He's not here. He's gone back to the Abyss. Now leave."

"Well, aren't you Miss Congeniality? Where am I supposed to leave to? Remember, he was my ride as well as yours."

"Get yourself gone, demon. We command you." Jenn told the octopod.

"By what right? Do you have a binding on me? Did you summon me? Do you even know my name? You don't even have the right components for a ward." He pointed to the materials Gastropé had put together trying to construct some form of protection from the demon.

Gastropé, as was recently his habit with demons, was blanching severely and trying to stutter out some new form of protection spell. Jenn was just frowning. She'd faced down a bigger and nastier demon recently, and while it was probably a very stupid attitude on her part, she didn't intend to be cowed by this one. She'd just ignore the fact that it could easily rip her to shreds.

"Don't push us, demon. We've had about enough lately. Tom has left; he's not here so it does no good for you to stay. You might as well just leave." Jenn told Tizzy. At this point Maelen, Rupert and Edwyrd walked up. Edwyrd was helping Rupert to walk. That boy should not be out of bed yet.

"Hey Tizzy!" Rupert waved his hand at the demon.

"Hey Rupert!" The demon replied, baring its teeth in a fearful grimace.

"Rupert! Get back in bed! What the Abyss loving mother of dragons are you doing out of bed? You nearly died yesterday, and if you're not careful this fiend from the pits will finish you off. Get back inside."

"My, you really do have a type-A personality, don't you girl?" The demon asked. Jenn shook her head in annoyance, not understanding this crazy creature at all.

"Edwyrd, you will take Rupert back to his bed, this instant." Jenn commanded.

"Um, well, Jenn, Rupert says he knows this demon. If so, maybe he could be of some help in placating it. Maybe keep it from eating everyone on the ship?" Gastropé appeared to drip another gallon of sweat on the deck.

"Edwyrd, if you knew anything at all about demons, you would know that you can't placate them. The only way you can deal with them at all is from a position of power. Not by being buddy-buddy. Now get Rupert back to bed."

"Is she always this bossy?" Tizzy asked Rupert.

"Well," Rupert tried to be conciliatory. "She's under a lot of pressure right now; she just thinks she's looking out for me."

"Rupert!" Jenn was going to go beserk about any second now. Why did everyone have to be so unreasonable? Was she the only sane person left in the world? She glanced at the waterlogged Gastropé; well, one of two sane people in the world, she amended. This was a murder-loving demon they were dealing with. A fiendish monster from the fiery pits of the Abyss! Here they were standing around talking to it like some long-lost comrade.

"Demon! Would you just leave? You'll find no friends here. Your demon lord has returned, leaving you. So go get left!" Jenn was nearly shouting at the end.

"You really shouldn't get so worked up." Tizzy commented casually. "My thirteenth mistress was the same way. Eventually she burst a blood vessel in her brain. I didn't even have to help her!" Tizzy shook his head sadly.

Jenn swayed on her feet. She felt like she was going to collapse any second. She really wasn't cut out for dealing with demons. Nor with senseless human males like Rupert and Edwyrd. "Maelen, would you please make Edwyrd and Rupert go?"

Maelen coughed, clearing his throat. "Esteemed colleagues. While it is true that I sense no immediate danger from this demon, prudence would dictate that you return to your quarters."

"Enough!" Edwyrd said. "I can handle the demon, if it becomes a problem. You know that." He glanced at Maelen who looked rather uncomfortable all of the sudden. "Demon," Edwyrd addressed Tizzy directly for the first time. "What is it that you want? You've been told that the being you seek is no longer here."

"Ahh, mister?" Tizzy inquired politely of Edwyrd.

"Edwyrd." Edwyrd supplied.

"Mr. Wyrd, thank you for your politeness, some people could learn from your civil manner." The demon glanced at Jenn from the corner of its eye. Jenn simply glared at the demon. The demon continued in an almost too suave, too civilized, theatrical tone. "It seems that my ride has temporarily vacated this plane. Since I can't return without him, and since I am sure he will return to visit you, his...friends." He smiled leeringly at Jenn, raising his eyebrows suggestively. Jenn's face went red with fury. "I would like to wait with you, in the chance of encountering him again."

Jenn had been watching the smiling demon. Now she was ticked. It acted like it was playing some sort of game with them. "Impossible!" Jenn snapped. "You may not stay here."

"Well..." the demon returned its stare to her, tilting its head, and flexing four of its claws. This time it spoke in a higher pitched, more thoughtful tone. "If you prefer. I could go out to the nearby countryside. I hear there's a lovely buffet. Nice ripe little children. Ready for picking and roasting." The demon smiled evilly, a small flame sprouting from its upper right claw. He licked his lips. Jenn now followed Gastrope's earlier lead, and blanched.

"You wouldn't." Jenn said horrified.

"Never know! Might. Might not!" Tizzy rocked his head back and forth several times. "I also hear there are some lovely virginal maids that direction." Now he leered directly into Jenn's eyes, licking his lips. "Nope. Hard to decide. So many choices. So many delicacies. I guess maybe you're right.

"Yes indeed. Jenn was it?" Tizzy asked. "You have the right idea. Why should I wait around here for Tom to return to take me back to the Abyss? Here I have every demon's dream. Free reign on the planes of men. All the young babes to eat, maidens to ravish and men's souls to consume, that I could ever wish for!" Tizzy began dancing around in a circle.

Suddenly, before she could react. Tizzy grabbed her head with his top two claws and kissed her full on the lips. As he stepped back, releasing her, she spat. She was horrified, sickened. "Thank you, thank you, Jenn. You have given me such a wondrous idea. Here I was just going to go meekly back to the Abyss once Tom returned! But you! You my dear have given me such wonderful ideas." Tizzy began testing his wings as if preparing to launch again.

Jenn was shocked. Almost speechless. She couldn't believe this. The crazy creature was about to go out and create goddess knew what mayhem on the world. All because she'd told it to go! It was thanking her! Goddess save her! "No!" she shouted.

"No? You don't want me signing your name in the credits after each massacre?" Tizzy asked, pausing suddenly. "You are a modest girl, but don't worry. I will see you get your credit. After all, there are union rules to follow here. I really must give you billing credit. After all, you have practically given me the script to follow. Don't worry, I'll sign your name up in blood, right there with my own. What was your family name again?"

"No! Demon. I do not want credit. I do not want you going out to do this. You will stay here, with me, until the other demon comes back." There, it had backed her into a corner. She didn't want it to stay. Gastropé was staring at her. She didn't have a choice, she didn't know if it would really go out and do all those things, but it was a minion of the Concordenax. A being of cruelty and evil beyond imagining, it probably would do exactly what it promised. She had no choice, even if it was bluffing; she couldn't risk that it wasn't.

"Good marsh gas girl, you are just the slightest bit mutable in your desires. First go, then stay! Have you tried lithium? I hear it can work wonders. Or," here the demon got quieter, as if trying to be confidential, "is it just, well, you know, female problems? That time of the month, hmm?"

Jenn took a deep breath, if not for the fact this irritating thing was a demon, she would have slapped it silly. She really didn't want to put up with this creature. "Demon, you will stay, and you will be watched every moment you are here. You will have no opportunity for mischief."

"Miss Chief? Who's she? Never met the lass. Although" Tizzy peered towards the hold, "if she does happen to be a goer, and she's hiding somewhere on board, well...I can certainly do the...thing." The demon leered again.

Jenn rubbed her forehead. "You know what I mean, demon."

Tizzy tilted his head. "You're sure?" It asked. Jenn simply nodded. "Really really sure?" Jenn nodded again. "So, would you say, you are asking me to stay?"

"I am telling you to stay, demon." Jenn said tiredly.

"You know you can't stop me from going?" Jenn sighed, the demon was right. She nodded, reluctantly. "So you are asking me to stay?"

"Yes." Jenn said through gritted teeth.

Tizzy crossed his four arms, tilted his nose up towards the sky and tapped his foot. "You didn't say the magic wo...ord."

Jenn's eyes stretched wider. "The--magic--word?" Jenn snarled.

"You know. The P word." The demon locked its lips together in a small grin, rocking its head slightly back and forth.

Jenn closed her eyes. Why her? "Please. Stay."

"Well, OK" the demon said suddenly. "But only because you begged me." The demon smiled broadly. "I'm sure we're going to be great friends."





Chapter 59


"An inquiry? Like my word isn't good enough. Like the obvious hole in the ground where my castle was, the remains of Exagas' army aren't enough?" Lenamare slammed the door to his recently furnished study's door. He and Jehenna were just returning from the first of what looked to be several council sessions regarding the dispute. Jehenna had preceded Lenamare into the room. She seated herself in one of the chairs in front of the desk while Lenamare raved on.

Jehenna looked around the room. It wasn't much. Cheap furniture, uncomfortable furniture if the truth were to be known. Unfortunately, while they both had suites in Freehold, they’d never stayed in them for any length of time, teleporting in and out as needed. For this reason they’d never bothered to completely furnish their suites.

The bookshelves had a few books on them. The books she and Lenamare had recovered yesterday when they teleported back to the ambush site. They'd have done it earlier, but so many other things had to be arranged. Fortunately, all the valuable stuff had been protected from the elements by spells. Their main spell books were safely cached away elsewhere, in a small extra dimensional space. They should have put 'the book' there. However, given its nature, they hadn't wanted to put it in any place so potentially accessible to extra-planar beings. Not that there were a whole lot of such people, only that those most likely to be interested in the book were intrinsically extra-planar. At least the room had a window.

If they were to stay for long in Freehold, they would have to find much better furnishings. However, neither of them wanted to be in such close proximity to the busy bodies on the council; so a completely new location was going to be required. A new school perhaps. Maybe not though, maybe it was time for a more private life. Jehenna didn't relish the thought of having to gather together a whole new set of brats. Most of the old ones were a lost cause. The only ones accounted for were the ones with Trisfelt. They were the next worst thing to all new students. Of course, all of this presupposed they lived through the current situation.

Actually, if they did live through it, that meant, almost by definition that they got the book back. If Exador got it, they wouldn't live through it. Of course, if Lenamare and she got it, Exador wouldn't live through it. Further, if they got the book back, that meant private life or new school were meaningless. If they got it back, they'd eventually get it open, then they'd have power. The sort of power to carve out, or repossess existing, empires. Ruling an empire didn't count as having a private life, Jehanna supposed. Too many demands on the ruler, still they were demands Jehenna would be willing to put up with.

The worst-case scenario, Jehenna supposed, was that this fiasco drag out for a long time. Which was part of what was giving Lenamare grief right now. Not that it was completely unexpected grief. "As I understand it," Jehenna interrupted Lenamare in his tirade, "an inquiry is standard procedure in such claims."

"I know. I expected one in fact. That doesn't mean I have to like it." Lenamare resumed pacing, one of his favorite habits. "In one sense, it does give us time. Time to find that book. On the other hand, it gives Exacretin time to look for it as well. Assuming he knows its missing.

"On the other hand," Lenamare continued, "an inquiry increases the chance that Damien or one of his fellow councilors will figure out what is going on. And finally, as you know, it slows our most recent plans for taking the rug out from under Exatoad. I've decided, however, to have Zilquar hold his position. The inquisition is going out to the school. Naturally, both Exafiend and I will be going along. Since he'll have his army, or what remains of it, there, I feel I'll need an army too." Lenamare stopped.

"I wonder if Damien will be taking any people with him?" Lenamare asked himself. Damien was leading the inquiry. He wanted to inspect the site personally. "Such individuals might get in the way if there was a confrontation. We should certainly plan for all eventualities."

"Is a confrontation wise?" Jehenna queried. "We didn't fare too well in the last one."

"Neither! I will point out, did Exador." Lenamare raised his index finger above his head to emphasize the point, as if lecturing to a class. "Things are a lot more even now. Or at least they would be. If I could find that damn fourth order demon."

"Do you suppose Exador took it out of the picture for good?"

"Destroyed it?" Lenamare started pacing again. Jehenna figured the cheap carpet wouldn't last a week. "Possible, but doubtful. Destruction of such beings is extremely difficult. While certainly something like a Cloud of Disintegration would take it out, there isn't much below that that can."

"So it's still on this plane?" She and Lenamare had tried twice more to summon the demon since their first failed attempt.

"Apparently. Or it's being shielded."

"By an archdemon? Nothing less could shield it."

"I know, thus we'd better pray to whatever gods will still listen to us that it's still on this plane. If archdemons are involved, we really are doomed. At least until we get the book back. At that point, archdemons better start running scared."

"So, if it is running around, it's got to be killing things. Eventually we'll hear about it. Random demon infestations aren't that common." Jehenna commented.

"Eventually is the key. It takes time, such information travels way too slowly. So, maybe the inquiry is for the best. It gives us that time. As long as Exaslime doesn't pull any tricks during the inquiry. For that we must be prepared."

"You've got good communications to Hortwell?"

"Yes, we've got mirrors on both ends. Zilquar is almost as good at preparing for things as I am." Jehenna raised her eyebrows, that statement was high praise from Lenamare. "I'll arrange some things with him later today. The inquiry is still gathering other documentation. The site visit won't be for a couple days."

~

Jenn didn't know. She just didn't know. Her mind was a complete haze these days. Somehow, someway, they'd finally made it to Hoggensforth. She didn't know how she'd survived. She and Gastropé had taken turns trying to manipulate the wind to their advantage. They'd had some success, particularly at night where they’d made great speed for some reason; it had only taken them three days rather than five or six from the time they started until they reach Hoggensforth. Thus they were only about a day behind schedule. Not that she had a schedule, but behind the time they'd planned to be there.

When they weren't directing the wind, they were taking turns watching the demon. Mainly her and Gastropé. She couldn't trust Rupert with the demon. He talked with it too much. The fiend would probably pervert or consume the poor lad's soul if the two were left alone. In addition, Rupert wouldn't be able to do much should the demon try anything. Not that she or Gastropé could do much, but....Edwyrd had taken turns as well. He didn't seem too concerned about the demon, but he took turns to keep her happy. Maelen took a couple, but he kept insisting he could keep an eye on it from anywhere on the ship. Maybe he could, but Jenn wasn't comfortable with this, so she often sat his shifts as well.

Because of this, Jenn was about ready to drop. She'd hardly slept, and what little sleep she'd gotten had been plagued by pirate nightmares. When she got this tired, things started looking different. For one thing, it must have been her imagination, but it seemed the crew gave Edwyrd a really wide berth. They kept their distance, and were always extremely diffident and respectful towards him. To Jenn's sleep fogged brain, it seemed they showed more respect to Edwyrd than the captain. She couldn't quite figure out why. The captain didn't seem to object, in fact, if anything, he was the worst of the lot in this regard.

The really strange thing was that she wasn't sure which the crew were more nervous of, Edwyrd or the demon. The demon they just tried to ignore, especially after Edwyrd promised them he wouldn't let the demon hurt them. As if the boy, for that's all he was, certainly no older than Jenn, could do anything to stop a demon. Jenn shook her head, was the entire world insane? Or was it her? Actually, the real piece that boggled her mind came a few moments ago as they were getting off the ship.

The ship's master had come up to Edwyrd and handed him a small bag, claiming that he was returning their cabin deposit. Their cabin deposit? Jenn didn't see in the bag, but it looked to her as if they were getting a refund. While Jenn had to admit they'd saved the ship from the pirates, the ship had been damaged anyway. The ship's captain was a merchant. Who ever heard of a merchant giving money back? The whole concept was absurd.

To be honest, they should have been paid as guards for the trip. Especially considering the fact that without them the ship would have been lost. That, however had not been the agreement. They'd foolishly agreed to pay for passage, rather than be paid for it. Before, the captain had been more than happy to take their money, and their protection. Why would he have a change of heart? Did he suddenly find honesty? It just didn't make sense. Unless he was afraid of insulting someone he feared? Could Edwyrd have so intimidated them that they felt it safest to pay him what they legitimately should have owed?

Jenn walked down the dock, having just departed the ship with her companions. She was beginning to come up with too many questions and too few answers. In her rather sleepy state, it took her a moment to notice all the people scurrying quickly off the dock as they proceeded down it. Why would they be doing that? She glanced behind her.

Curses! She'd completely forgotten about the demon. How could she be so careless? No wonder people were in a hurry to get out of there way. The multi-limbed nightmare was flying slowly down the dock behind her, Gastropé and Rupert. Behind the demon walked Edwyrd, and behind him, Maelen. The thing was certainly frightening enough. It was bigger than an average sized man, and had those humming bird wings, and four arms and four legs, but other than that, looked somewhat, vaguely, human. Splotchy greenish but, humanoid. Well, and it had two large sets of male equipment dangling below it, between each set of legs.

In her cobwebbed mind she had to laugh. If people thought that little thing was scary, they should just be glad she wasn't still toting that fourth order demon around. The whole city would be empty by this point if it were here. Actually, Jenn knew she had to be getting numb. The little demon, first or second order, didn't even bother her anymore. She'd been getting used to it, if annoyed by its rather crazy prattle. Finally, after living in constant fear with that fourth order for so many days, this demon was an ember compared to that bonfire of terror. All other terrors seemed inconsequential. She'd seen the Abyss itself, and lived.

~

Fiernon watched as the party with the wizards and the demon departed the smuggler's ship. He memorized their faces. Memorized them so he could accurately give their description to his superiors. Memorized them so that justice might be served. There was no question in Fiernon's mind that it had been this party of maleficious sodomizers and vile reprobates that had heinously and most foully murdered 34 officers of Oorstemothian Constabulary along with a Protectator and his very own beloved mentor, the Vice-Constable Pyromancer Trelgon. No question that these maggots of corruption and putrificence had been responsible for the destruction of sacred public Oorstemothian property in the form of the consecrated Protectorate Vessel Dielsmoth.

No, there was no question in Fiernon's mind. He remembered their faces well enough from the vessel. Remembered well the unlawful transgressions they'd performed upon his personage with their foul spells. Remembered well their unlawful and unjustifiable defiance of Oorstemothian law, their very refusal to submit to the due process of law. While true, Asmeth and his crew of smugglers would pay dearly for their transgressions. He'd see to that tonight when he put flame to their vessel while they slept. It was undeniably true, that the full might of the Oorstemoth Constabulary would be brought to bear against these vile, murdering, demon worshipping scumdregs from the pits of depravious lust and degradation, who even now surely deceived themselves into believing that they were escaping the hand of justice unscathed.

Fiernon shivered slightly as he stared after the transgressors. He seemed to have caught a cold in his long trek from the burning ship. All that cold saltwater had done him little good. Exposing a Constabulary Officer to Life Threatening Conditions, however, was a relatively minor capital offense these pusillanimous, philandering sadist exiles from the Abyss would have to deal with, compared to their other crimes. A clipped smile of chilled enjoyment played across Fiernon's face as he contemplated the justice these reprobationary microcephalic miscreants would receive. Yes, justice would be served, he would see to that.

~

Finally, they’d reached land; it had been a bizarre, cramped slow trip after the battle. If he wandered around the ship too much, Maelen would want to talk shop. He could stay in the cabin, Tizzy and Rupert spent the day on top talking; but it was cramped. Given that he didn’t sleep, all he could do was lay there. He did go up on deck a bit at night, but Tizzy would then start babbling along.

He settled for lying in his bunk for long periods day and night trying to analyze what he’d done during the battle, turning to flame and then back. He tried practicing summoning flames and controlling their nature so they either did or did not burn things as he willed. He’d had to figure that out ad hoc during battle; now he needed to figure out what he’d done and how to control it.

He did have to get out and wander around some, but he tried to keep to himself; fortunately, the crew was quite amenable to that. He really wanted some privacy so he could do the living flame thing again. If he could get that down, along without burning things, it would be a great way to change form without having to buy new clothes all the time.

Once they were off the ship, Edwyrd followed Tizzy down the wharf. He watched as people hurriedly scurried out of their way. Burly dock workers staring in fearful concern at Tizzy. On the one hand, it bothered him that people should look upon demons in so much fear; on the other, he was simply relieved that it was someone else who was the object of that fear, rather than himself.

Watching Tizzy, however, Edwyrd decided that the fear in people's faces didn't seem to bother the small demon. In fact, the demon was periodically making faces at people along the way. Most often it was at some woman in better clothing, who would faint when he would leer at her. Maybe, you just got used to it after a while and it didn't bother you. Tizzy had certainly been at the demon business a long time. Edwyrd didn't know how long, but he assumed about as long as Boggy, and he knew Boggy had been a demon for several hundred years. Of course, Tizzy was also completely mad.

Edwyrd just shook his head as they exited the wharf and made their way up hill. As they entered on to what appeared to be a main boulevard, Edwyrd once again noticed something he had noted in Gizzor Del. Astlan seemed to have a disproportionate number of really short people, if he were to be politically incorrect, he might have even called them midgets. It was really rather strange. It appeared that something like five to ten percent of the population were really short. Apparently, somewhere along the line a rather severe strain of dwarfism had entered the gene pool.

Edwyrd almost stopped in his tracks at that point. Dwarfism. Why hadn't he thought of that before? He looked more closely at the next several short people he saw. Beards, axes, these were dwarves! He didn't know why he hadn't figured it out in Gizzor Del. Astlan was a world with wizards and demons, why not dwarves? The place obviously operated under some sort of magical set of natural laws; didn't dwarves always seem to exist in such worlds? For some reason this simple revelation, that should not have been unexpected, almost floored him.

The existence of dwarves just seemed to put a whole new twist into his view of the world. If dwarves existed what about elves? They probably did exist. Actually, why he hadn't been thinking of this sooner rather surprised him. He had already fought a dragon, why not the entire range of magical beings? Edwyrd suddenly wondered if Astlan suffered from an inordinate number of subterranean caverns and excavations filled with monsters and treasure.

Edwyrd took a renewed interest in people going by. He'd decided he'd look for anorexics with pointy ears. Height would not be the thing to search for. After all, would the elves be the short, traditional Irish Sidhe, or the basketball player Tolkien type? It took him a few minutes, but eventually he spotted a number of different candidates. Willowy type individuals, most of whom had hair too long to see their ears. Eventually however, he found one with ears revealed. Sure enough, they were pointy. This individual was over six feet tall.

Just as Edwyrd was congratulating himself on having categorized Astlanian elves as being Tolkienesque, he saw an extremely skinny dwarf with pointy ears and a childlike face. Definitely not a dwarf, although of the same height. This individual, except for hair coloring, looked exactly like the tall willowy elves, only in miniature. Hmm, apparently the elves came in a wide variety of sizes. What about those other short people? Tolkien's hobbits? Or were they copyrighted material? Halflings, Edwyrd decided, was probably the politically and copyright correct term. He didn't really see any; would he be able to tell the difference between one of those and a dwarf? Lack of beard and really big hairy feet, perhaps?

Edwyrd was lost in thought as they wound through the city streets. As a side note, he noted that Tizzy was doing a good job of clearing the way for them. The streets they weren't on were much more crowded. He looked back over his shoulder. Maelen was still behind him. How would he word this so he didn't show off his ignorance. Casually he asked, "Maelen, you spent time in Gizzor Del, was there any trouble nearby with undead? Zombies and the like?"

Maelen blinked, apparently taken by surprise by the unexpected question. He increased his pace to bring himself alongside Edwyrd. "Not really, the old temple on the island to the south of the gate periodically has trouble. Also a bit of sewer infestation now and then. There were always rumors of necromancers living in the sewers, but lots of cities have those stories to keep children from playing in them. So overall, I'd say not that much worse than elsewhere. Why?"

"No real reason. Just thinking. What about other, aggressive non-humanoids?"

"Aggressive non-humanoids? You mean monsters? Mainly just the occasional demon," he pointed to Tizzy. "Occasionally someone would kill off some form of cerebus hound up in the more mountainous regions. About ten years ago, there was a hydra causing a bunch of problems. Other than that, nothing unusual. Most of the real problems, of course, come from people, as is always the case. Most monsters are too stupid to cause too much real trouble, unless they're something like a demon. Even then, those are mostly the result of some wizard playing games.

"Of course, that's why undead are usually more of a problem than your typical monster. Necromancers using them for various ends cause all sorts of problems. Naturally, since necromancy is illegal in most places, regulating the practitioners is a real problem, so these things can sort of get out of hand." Maelen continued. "No, Gizzor Del is something of a frontier town, so it does have its share of problems, but nothing too extraordinary though."

"Do you know anything about Freehold?" Edwyrd asked.

"Freehold. Is that where you're headed?" Edwyrd nodded, reluctantly. "What a coincidence. So am I." What a surprise Edwyrd thought sourly. How had he guessed? "Well, that's actually a tricky question to answer on the part of Freehold."

"Why?"

"Well, Freehold, for one thing, is a lot bigger. For the other, it's the home of both the Council of Wizards, which is the closest thing to an independent regulating body for wizards on either continent, and the Council of Magistrates, the regulatory body for trading and dispute resolution among the local city states. Thus it is also a major trading center, and the most powerful city-state for about a thousand leagues in any direction. As such, the city has a lot more magic running rampant around it than Gizzor Del, on the other hand, it's much more closely supervised than Gizzor Del."

Maelen shrugged, "So you are more likely to find a lot of unusual beings there, including quite a few demons and maybe some carefully controlled undead, but you won't find many that cause real trouble."

"How big is Freehold?" Edwyrd asked.

"Well, again that's hard to say, the flux of people is pretty high. I suppose I'd have to say there's something over a hundred thousand people." Maelen shrugged again, indicating his uncertainty. Edwyrd though, was rather impressed. While one to two hundred thousand wasn't a lot compared to New York, it seemed pretty big for a medieval city with no subway system. No cars or freeways for that matter.

Jenn had stopped up ahead. The group puddled together in a small square. "Well, how are we going to get to Freehold? Rupert, I assume still doesn't want to ride?" Rupert nodded shyly. At least Edwyrd understood why this time.

"I'm not so fond of that idea either." Edwyrd added in.

"Why, am I not surprised?" Jenn asked throwing a hand up in the air. "Well, we're too short on money, I think," she glanced at the pouch Edwyrd had, "to buy horses anyway." Edwyrd held up the pouch. He opened its drawstrings and poured out what was inside. The bag contained five gold coins. A refund plus three gold. "At least we're better off than we planned to be." She looked at Gastropé, then she noted that Maelen was standing there with them. She gave him an inquiring glance.

Maelen answered, "Well, Edwyrd says you're going to Freehold. Coincidentally that's where I'm going as well. If you don't mind, I thought I might travel with you. I can promise not to be a burden. Plus, I also know how to get there."

"Humph," Gastrope' said. "That's more than we really know." He looked from Edwyrd to Jenn.

"Fine," was all Jenn said. Edwyrd gestured his acquiescence.

"So OK, then I guess you're with us. The more the merrier. However, we need to get some food and supplies." Gastropé started looking around for a likely place to buy such.

Edwyrd handed him the pouch with gold. "Why don't you handle purchasing that? I'm not a particularly good negotiator at such things. Although I should get some new clothes, so I can give Maelen back his." Edwyrd had been wearing an old robe of Maelen's. He had given the money to Gastropé because he didn't know anything about pricing, and didn't want to end up like a tourist on the streets of New York. Further, since he didn't eat, he figured it only fair to let those who did choose the food.

It took almost two hours to assemble the food, supplies and additional clothing they needed. For clothing, Edwyrd decided to choose a robe similar to the one he was wearing, along with pants, shirt and underwear. Astlanian underwear, he noted, was not quite up to Inspector 12's standards, but it would have to do. With the money left from the priest and the extra gold from the ship captain, they had enough money for Edwyrd's clothes, some basic cooking utensils, bedrolls and enough food to last the journey. Actually, more than enough since Edwyrd didn't need to eat, nor did he suspect, did Rupert. Rupert, however, seemed to be in the habit of eating, so it was probably best to assume he would continue to do so. Maelen also chipped in money for his part of the supplies.

While all this was going on, Tizzy hovered around their staging area smoking his pipe. The demon was completely, abundantly—obviously, naked so he wasn’t sure where the demon was storing his extra tobacco. He saw nothing that looked like a tobacco pouch. Nor for that matter did he see any way for the demon to store his pipe when not in use. However, there were a great many times when the demon didn’t have his pipe in hand. Where was it going in the meantime? The only answer he came up with was prurient and juvenile, and if it was correct, the thought of the demon putting it in his mouth made him nauseous. Edwyrd just shook his head at his own thoughts.

In addition to the supplies, Jenn also insisted they purchase a small donkey to carry things, her argument being that they would be able to move faster if none of them were loaded down with large packs. They didn't have enough to weigh the donkey down, so it should be able to move at a reasonable pace. Naturally, the donkey didn't like Tizzy, and neither Rupert nor Edwyrd got close enough to it to determine how friendly it felt towards them. Thus it was that Jenn led donkey at the head of their procession. Gastropé walked along beside, Maelen followed the donkey, then Tizzy and finally Rupert and Edwyrd.

They started out with about three hours to go until sunset. While it might have made sense to stay in town and start out the next morning, they had no money left for a room. Thus Gastropé argued reasonably that they start out then and just camp. It only took Edwyrd about an hour and half of walking to figure out what was wrong with their entire plan.

Edwyrd's squishy little body was not made for endurance. Unlike a demon body, Edwyrd's got tired. While he remembered going for long walks in the past, as Tom on Earth, he hadn't done so for a while and his legs would probably have been out of shape anyway. Edwyrd's body on the other hand, had never walked that long. If he thought about it, Edwyrd was less than a week old. No wonder he got sore so fast. If only Edwyrd had the endurance of Tom, or rather demon Tom. As a demon he'd flown for nearly a day without stopping. That was endurance. If he intended to keep using this body, he'd certainly have to make some improvements.

"You know," he said quietly to Rupert, "I really like flying better. This walking thing is not all it's made out to be."

Rupert smiled up at him. "I'll take your word, for now. I can't wait to try. You'll show me how? Soon?"

Edwyrd smiled back. "Sure. As soon as we can get a chance to safely switch back." That really sounded like fun to Edwyrd. For one thing, the idea of changing back was extremely attractive, and the second was that having someone to fly around with here in Astlan also seemed nice.

As they were whispering, Tizzy's demonic hearing apparently heard their whispers, he rotated in mid-air. The octopodal demon kept flying in the same direction, only backward now. Edwyrd wondered how the demon did that. He didn't think it was aerodynamically feasible, but Tizzy was doing it anyway. It probably helped to be crazy and not know that what you were doing was impossible. "Don't forget me. I want to go out and cruise around some more as well. And I know a thing or two about the finer points of flying." Tizzy whispered conspiratorially. Apparently true, Edwyrd thought as watched the backward flying demon.

~

The night air near the docks was a lot noisier than Fiernon would have thought it should be. Apparently, the people of Hoggensforth were moral turpitudenalists of the lowest form, performing who knew what sort of vile and depraved acts of debauchery under the cover of darkness. Docks and the regions surrounding them were renowned in general as being dens of illicit moral and criminal iniquity. Fiernon was not surprised therefore, as he rounded the last building between him and the docks, that this one should be no different. He had hoped for quieter surroundings in which to exact justice upon the seagoing serfs of sin led by the perfidious Asmeth, but he'd have to do what he could. Justice must be served whenever the opportunity was available.

The people on the streets paid him no heed, as well they should not. Fiernon had cloaked himself in a government approved invisibility spell for the purpose of executing judicial removal of maleficious perpetrators. As with the Questioner or the Executioner at a sentencing, his identity was concealed to prevent anyone from confusing the higher ideal of justice as an abstract concept that always prevailed, with the actions of any single individual. As Fiernon moved invisibly down towards the dock with Asmeth's ship on it, he began to realize that most of the noise on the docks seemed to be coming from the region of Asmeth's ship.

He rounded a large crate and got his first clear view of the vessel of criminal mischief that was his goal. The ship was well-lighted from torches along the dock. Soldiers of some form seemed to be swarming all over it. Where had the soldiers come from? Fiernon wondered. They did not appear to be the local constabulary, if said organization could even be called that with a serious face. He scanned the surrounding docks and quickly realized where the soldiers must have come from.

There were currently twelve more ships in the harbor than there had been this afternoon. All twelve ships were identical in design and bore the same emblems. The same emblems were on the surcoats of the soldiers. White surcoats trimmed in red and black, with large golden starbursts centered on them. Superimposed on the starbursts were short metal combat staves. Rather combat rods, Fiernon thought. He cursed his luck. He recognized the emblem as belonging to soldiers of the Rod of Tiernon.

The soldiers of the Rod were actually a rather credible force; Fiernon had to admit. They were certainly some of the finest soldiers outside of Oorstemoth itself. They were also extremely thorough, and competent in other matters. He would not be able to get past them, invisible or not, to carry out justice. Technically, he supposed he should sentence the Rod as being obstructers of justice; however, that might be impractical at this time. Further, they'd obviously taken the ship into custody. Obviously, they were aware of the perfidious and malefactorious nature of its proprietor. They must be conducting their own investigation. Thus in their own small way, they were agents of justice.

Admittedly, as such organizations ran the Rod did try to uphold some semblance of justice and law, at least compared to most heathens and barbarians around the world. Even so, the Rod was a bit lax on certain key points, and at times had in fact been questionable in its actions regarding the preservation of law and order. Fiernon suspected that this came from ultimately serving a deity, rather than serving the law itself. In summary of this learned and legal discourse with himself, Fiernon was not quite ready to judge that the Rod was up to ethically questionable activities; that would require further investigation. Nonetheless, ethically questionable or not, they did prevent, or at least delay, the required judicial action.

Fiernon shook his head. This was most unfortunate. He would not be able to wait until the Rod had completed its investigation. His superiors had instructed him to follow the principal perpetrators of lascivious and wanton illegal destruction as soon as possible. If he stayed around to enact the requisite portions of the judicial code upon Asmeth and his crew, he'd most likely lose the trail of the more heinously guilty parties. Justice would have to be patient a while longer to exact its price upon Asmeth and his scallywags of surreptitious seagoing smugglers.





Chapter 60


The morning sunlight shone brightly down upon the sea below him. A gloriously bright and sunny morning to begin once again the quest to defeat the scions of sin and perdition. A morning to begin anew. The past forgotten. Talarius adjusted his visor slightly to reduce the glare. The wind of their passage penetrated his helmet as a gentle breeze. He peered down to his right, between War Arrow's neck and right wing. The city of Hoggensforth lay spread out before him.

Slightly to the north and to the east of the city, he could see the clearing in which the Rod had assembled. Unfortunately, the folk of Hoggensforth were denied the benefits of a full Temple of Tiernon, and thus a parade ground for assembling the Rod. The citizenry had to make due with but a small chapel dedicated to Tiernon.

He knew priests that would say it was truly a shame, that all should be allowed maximum opportunity to witness the glory of Tiernon, but that, unfortunately, material resources were always insufficient to cover all required spiritual needs. While he agreed it was a shame, that the glory of Tiernon could not be spread so, the more pressing reason he regretted the lack of a full Temple was the good that such a resource could have done in the community. Not only would it provide a bastion of light in the Darkness, but also in times less pressing it could provide aid and sustenance to the less fortunate. That was one of the challenges that Tiernon gave his followers, to overcome the adversity of material limitations, in order that they test themselves and prove their worthiness for his glory and love. Not that Tiernon could not be generous to those proven worthy, he certainly was. But first, one must prove oneself worthy. One must not fail in the never-ending battle against the Dark.

Talarius sighed, Tiernon had been generous and allowed him multiple opportunities to prove himself. Whenever he felt assailed by doubts, Tiernon would provide a suitable challenge to relieve those doubts. Tiernon had seen fit to grant him the rank of Knight Rampant, and challenged him many times with evil on which to test his worthiness and prove his faith. He knew that the vampires had been a test. A test of his faith and his spiritual and emotional strength. Now, once again though, as the cycles seemed to go, he was being given the opportunity to test his physical strength as well as his cunning and wits.

He'd stopped by to talk with Iskerus before heading to Hoggensforth. It appeared that an army of demons had entered the world through the actions of a priest who had failed in a test of worthiness. The demons, led by an Archaedemon, were on the march to Freehold, for Tiernon knew what sort of Dark-inspired activity. Talarius dreaded the damage that such beings would wreak upon the poor unfortunates in their path. Secretly, inside, however, he rather looked forward to being able to test himself against an Archaedemon. He'd never actually slain an Archaedemon before. Many a lesser demon than what he would now face, but this would be new. The sheer physical and mental challenge kept him from thinking of darker thoughts. Of memories best put behind with cloudy skies.

Talarius relished the opportunity to slay this archfiend from the pits. He'd spent the entire night in prayer and sharpening Ruiden. Not that Ruiden ever needed sharpening, but he wanted to believe, needed to believe, that the symbolism was also important. The battle was about to begin again. The eternal struggle against the forces of tyranny and evil incarnate. A clear cut, unblemished, challenge at last, after a year of slaying nothing but vampires and the associated problems they raised. Problems for those they plagued and the deeper, darker, problems they brought forth for Talarius.

War Arrow was now over the impromptu parade ground and was circling. A fine steed, Talarius thought, a fine friend. He had to suppress a momentary feeling of pride in their work together. Hubris had been the downfall of many a soldier for the good. Talarius would not fall into that trap. Not again. Not ever again. What he felt for his friend, was admiration. Admiration at her spirit and determination in the face of evil. War Arrow had taken him into many a campaign over their ten years together. Indeed, without War Arrow, fighting those cursed airborne demons would have been a lot trickier. Never a moment of hesitation, never a doubt. War Arrow understood the mission. Understood the danger of hesitation. Of faltering, the danger of failing those in need. War Arrow was a companion he could depend on. One who wouldn't succumb. Wouldn't fail the test.

Talarius absently brushed a wrinkle from the surcoat over War Arrow's magical barding as he searched for Barabus on the parade ground. It seemed he and the Arch-Vicar General were to be once again comrades in the struggle. The Arch-Vicar was a good man, if a little too soft on the Enemy for Talarius' taste. However, each must prove his worthiness in his own way. Talarius knew that he himself had once been too soft. Too afraid of doing what needed to be done. That wouldn't happen again though. One Melissance was enough.

It seemed that even as he spotted Barabus, so the Arch-Vicar General had Talarius' location pointed out to him. Talarius could see the Arch-Vicar shading his eyes and staring up into the sky in Talarius' direction. Talarius drew his sword in a salute to the Arch-Vicar General and the undertaking they were about to begin in the name of their Lord. He allowed Ruiden to flash brilliantly for a few moments, along with his own armor. He then allowed them to return to their more traditional, blessed, but naturally shiny state. He pointed out the place he wished to land to War Arrow, who quickly began the final descent onto the parade ground. Talarius placed Ruiden across his knees as they began the descent. He'd need Ruiden again, for a more formal salute when the landed. Under his helmet, Talarius once again smiled, grimly, at the prospect of the coming battle. A chance to prove himself. A chance to test strength against strength. A chance to forget.

~

Barabus shielded his eyes from the sunlight as his page pointed out the location of the winged horse in the sky. "Well, be ready," he said to the men surrounding him, including the recent high priest of Gizzor Del. "Here comes the man, the legend incarnate," he said under his breath so that no one else might here. Even as he peered skyward, he saw the knight raise his sword in a salute. Despite the angle of the sun, it appeared that Talarius' armor and sword were reflecting a great deal of sunlight, causing people to blink their eyes.

Soldiers, some of whom had never dealt with the knight murmured awes of appreciation at the spectacle. Barabus simply shook his head. He knew that it was no coincidental sunlight seeming to give Talarius' arms that glow. The man's armor, shield and sword, as well as his horse’s barding could give off light of their own when the knight willed it. Barabus had to admit, the man knew how to make an entrance, how to create a spectacle.

If only, Barabus wished, the man did it on purpose. That was part of what bothered Barabus about Talarius. If he didn't know the man as well as he did, he would have suspected the man to be an egotistical show off. Talarius, however, was anything but that. Every such action was unthought-out, completely genuine. The man really was the spectacle he seemed to be. A man too good to be true, thought Barabus, almost not human. Naturally, the man would correct any such statement to the effect. He would assure the individual that he was all too human, with all the human frailties of any other man. Unfortunately, Barabus had never been able to detect such frailties, except perhaps overzealousness.

Talarius had what might be considered a single threaded mind. Destroy evil for the greater glory of Tiernon. That was it. All else was secondary. Such was the case with Talarius' last adventure. Barabus had just read the reports this morning. Talarius had gone in to rescue another knight, Sir Etrian. Apparently, Sir Etrian had been trying to track down and kill a vampire that was plaguing a small village.

The report was imprecise, strangely unlike Talarius, but apparently Etrian had failed and Talarius had gone in to bail him out. In the process, Talarius had lost sixteen men and Etrian! Only two of his men had lived. Still intensely loyal despite the carnage they'd been through. Apparently, the vampire had been extremely powerful, but as usual, Talarius had prevailed; those following him had been less fortunate.

Barabus understood the difficulties the man faced; knowing the man, Barabus was sure Talarius had done his best to protect his men. When the thought of danger to others occurred to him. It just didn't seem to occur often enough. Encounters where only Talarius survived seemed be a common occurrence with the man. The man pushed himself to the absolute limits, limits far beyond those of others. That was the problem, those following him would try to meet his limits, and fail.

Talarius was a natural leader; men would literally follow him into the Abyss and back. Unfortunately, the only one who would make it back would be Talarius. Not intentionally, that was what was so infuriating about the man. He had no concept of overwhelming odds. He would gladly charge into any situation. The more dangerous the better. It was as if he had a death wish, although, Barabus knew that to be patently not the case.

Actually, whatever it was, it seemed to work for Talarius. There was very little that could be considered overwhelming odds for the knight. Barabus had literally seen the man slay two second order demons, who had popped out of nowhere one morning before breakfast, using nothing more than two daggers and while wearing only his undergarments.

Again, and he wished he could let this go: the problem was that the same was not true for those unlucky enough to be swayed into following him. He'd blindly lead men into battle, emerging unscathed but alone. True, he might seem to grieve a little for his lost men, but then he'd exclaim that they'd died in a noble cause and for the greater glory, and be off again to another battle. That was it, actually, if Barabus would admit it to himself. Perhaps it wasn't so much the losing men in battle, but that the man could be so unemotional about it. Sometimes it was if the man were made of stone and couldn't feel pain, or loss. Soldiers dealt with death all the time; they had to be strong. Talarius just seemed unnaturally strong.

Barabus didn't like the attitude such lack of emotion engendered. It got too many good people killed, for insufficient reasons in his mind. If one didn't feel the deaths of others, it was too easy to became callous in regard to life. Perhaps the worst of this was that he couldn't argue with Talarius about it. The man firmly believed that conquering evil, facing the challenges posed by Tiernon, was sufficient reason for anything. 'Evil in itself is reason enough; because it's there, it must be conquered,' Talarius had once told Barabus.

War Arrow, as Talarius called his horse, landed in a free space that had been set aside by Barabus for just such a landing. Awed and respectful soldiers stood around, watching as the greatest Knight of Tiernon, many said the greatest knight in Astlan, dismounted his horse. Josen, a lad who'd served with Talarius before was standing near to take War Arrow's reins. The fully armored knight gently patted the boy on the back as he handed over the reins.

As always, Barabus shook his head at the knight. Any normal man wearing such an incredible set of plate armor would have been clunky and clumsy to the point of needing help to move once he got off his horse. Talarius in full battle regalia was more agile and dexterous than most men naked. He was literally the paladin of myths; he made even the most difficult of actions look graceful and skilled. Talarius returned the respectful nods of the soldiers he passed as he made his way to Barabus. A path opening as if by magic to give him room.

He came up to Barabus and gracefully removed his full helm. He shook his head and his blond ponytail came free over the back of his armor. His blue eyes matching the smile on his lips as he tucked his helm under one arm and raised the other, with his sword, in salute to Barabus. "Hail Arch-Vicar General Barabus! I Talarius, humble servant and knight of Tiernon, salute you as we prepare once again to fight the good fight!"

Barabus nodded formally, receiving the salute, and then raised his bare hand in a return salute. "Hail Talarius, Knight Rampant of Tiernon. Your presence is most welcome in our coming battle with the minions of the Concordenax.”

"Let the Rod be drawn."

"Let the Will be done," returned Talarius.

"As Tiernon's fight is won." The two completed the ritualistic phrase in unison with the soldiers of the Rod around them. Swords and staves rattled against shields in a thundering roar.

~

"So General," Talarius said, as he placed his helmet on the table. He and Barabus had just entered Barabus' tent. The knight was down to business now; there was a war on. "What exactly are we up against? Iskerus wasn't able to give me all of the details."

"Well," sighed Barabus, "that's part of our problem. We don't really know. What we do know is that an Archaedemon subverted the works of Verigas, our high priest in Gizzor Del. The subversion allowed the demon to enter Astlan bringing one or two other powerful demons with it, and what appeared to be human wizards. It is Verigas' belief that the demon intends to march to Freehold, where it will, either itself, or through the aid of its pet wizards summon forth its horde."

"How much do you trust this Verigas? And his story?"

"Fairly well, we both did the Test of Truth on him while he recanted. He certainly believes it. Further investigation of the location of the subversion confirms Verigas' story, at least as much as possible." Talarius nodded his head to the side, acknowledging what Barabus told him.

"Further, we have a brother who has had Visions."

"Visions?"

"Yes, the Visions came about a month before this incident. Visions of major plots by the Lords of the Abyss, and by human wizards."

"Confirmation for something then."

"Yes. As near as the brother could pinpoint, the Asltanian side of the activity would take place on this continent." Barabus gestured to the floor.

"So, you think then that the Princes are up to something? They haven't dared anything in over a thousand years."

"I don't know. I don't know if any princes are involved. It may just be something at the Archaedemon level. Some plot to overthrow the current establishment there. There, except for the involvement of human wizards. Apparently, there is also a power play going on here in Astlan. Perhaps some wizards are aligned with the demons, or possibly opposed.” Barabus shook his head in frustration at their lack of concrete intelligence.

"We do know," Barabus continued, "that a book is involved."

"A book? What's in it?"

"A very old book. We do not however, know what's in it. However, we do know that several demons have been destroyed for it and more than a few wizards over the course of the years."

"Interesting. And you're sure that this Archaedemon has come this way?"

Barabus leaned against the table, crossing his arms and looking down at the floor. "We don't know about the Archaedemon. It apparently left its pets in Gizzor Del for some reason. It will apparently meet them in Freehold. What we do know, is that Verigas' wizards and one of the demons arrived in Hoggensforth yesterday. We interviewed the captain of the ship that brought them."

"You've intercepted them?"

"Not yet, we believe they're taking the road for Freehold. They aren't that far ahead, and we waited for your arrival before pursuing."

"Why are they traveling in this manner, can we assume the wizards are not very powerful?"

"I don't know why they're traveling this way. At least one of the wizards, apparently the lead one, is extremely powerful. Certainly world class. Although, even there, we have discrepancies."

"Discrepancies?'

"Yes the captain claims the one in charge is a Lord Edwyrd." Talarius shrugged his head; the name was unknown to him. "However, Verigas claims that the one named Edwyrd, at least in Gizzor Del, was claiming to be the cousin of the youngest member of the party. Said member either being an incredibly young wizard or a drug-clouded future human sacrifice."

Talarius shook his head in puzzlement. Barabus continued, "So, Verigas says that this Edwyrd showed up after the Archaedemon disappeared. From all he could gather, this young man, Edwyrd, was a complete innocent. This however does not at all jibe with what the crew told us."

"Really?"

"According to the crew, they were attacked by pirates, and, while for a short time, this Edwyrd allowed the other wizards to battle the pirate ship. Eventually they were overcome by an extremely powerful group of wizards on the pirate ship. At this point Edwyrd took a hand and single-handedly blew the entire pirate ship to dust and slew several very powerful wizards in the same blow."

"This doesn't add up." Talarius said, puzzled. "Why would a pirate ship have powerful wizards?"

"I know, I asked myself the same question. The only thing I can come up with is that they weren't pirates."

"Who were they then?"

"The opposing wizards, perhaps." Barabus suggested. "Trying to intercept the Archaedemon’s minions?"

"You said another demon came with the ship, why didn't it fight the pirates?"

"Apparently it came later, after the battle. It went away some place in Gizzor Del and then came back. Verigas confirms that a demon of this description left immediately upon arriving in Gizzor Del. That, however, also adds to the Edwyrd mystery."

"Yes?"

"Apparently, when the demon came back, the other wizards tried to deal with it, not incredibly successfully; the crew didn't hear what was said. Then this Lord Edwyrd showed up on deck, and convinced the demon to do its bidding. Further it was Lord Edwyrd that assured the crew that the demon would not harm them, that it was under his control."

"Obviously, this Lord Edwyrd fellow is not what he pretended to be to Verigas."

"Not at all what he appeared. My guess is that he is actually the Archaedemon's chief mortal agent. Naturally, such a demon would want the best possible human ally."

"There is," Talarius said frowning seriously, "another possibility." Talarius was very grim at this point.

"What?"

"Given the timing of the departure and arrival of the Archaedemon and this Edwyrd, this 'Lord Edwyrd' could be the Archaedemon in disguise." Talarius was looking as fierce and grim as Barabus had ever seen him.

Barabus was stunned by the possibility. He'd never thought of such a thing being possible. "Is that possible? Can Archaedemons do that?"

"I don't know." Talarius began to pace. "I won't put it past them. We haven't had an Archaedemon on this plane in nearly a thousand years."

"Holy Tiernon, if one could do it, others could do it, could already have done it." Barabus was suddenly chilled to the bone.

Talarius was nodding his head. "Certainly. The most dangerous evil is that which you cannot detect until it is too late. Sometimes, evil doesn't look like evil." Barabus almost thought he detected a small hesitation from the knight, as if remembering something. "We know that short of the demon princes themselves, the Archaedemons are the most sublime and terrible forces of evil in the world. If eternal evil can attain the guise of mortal man, then surely an Archaedemon could do it."

"These demons could be all over the place and we'd never know it!" Barabus exclaimed.

"I think not. It must not be easy for the servants of evil to do this. If they had so easily infiltrated our midst on such a scale previously, we'd have already lost the battle."

"But if they can do this, why haven't they done it before?"

"The gods. What ultimately keeps the powers of the Abyss in check anyway? The gods. Our Lord Tiernon in particular."

"But," Barabus argued, "If the gods can stop the demons, why aren't they doing so now?"

Talarius smiled, a smile quite genuine, yet one that Barabus found incredibly chilling when combined with the knight's next words. "What makes you think they aren't? Why do you think we're here?"





Chapter 61


Trisfelt gently cracked the reins on the ponies to get them to move a little more swiftly over some rough terrain. As the wagon bounced along, he glanced back at his charges. The three of them were playing a game with their fingers. Shears, vellum and rock it looked like. Things were at last on a slightly even keel again.

For a while, things had been rather hectic. Their sudden departure from the wagon train had left the kids frightened out of their wits and crying. The slight nausea that often came with abrupt teleportation didn't help matters. He'd taken them to the place he'd known best, after the school, his own home town. His brother and wife still had a cottage there.

He and his three students had imposed themselves for a few days while the children got rested and calmed down. Trisfelt admitted that the rest had done him good as well. The rest had given the children a chance to return their lives to some sense of normalcy. It had also given Trisfelt the opportunity to enchant a small hand mirror so he could contact Lenamare.

After contacting Lenamare and getting some information on the state of affairs, he and Lenamare had been able to work out a plan to get the children to Freehold. Trisfelt had felt just too uncomfortable with his memories of Freehold to risk taking the children on what was essentially a blind jump. If it had just been himself, he wouldn't have minded. For one thing, jumping by oneself was a lot easier and safer than taking a group of people.

Thus it was they'd found themselves on the road to Freehold. Trisfelt had purchased a new wagon and supplies for the four of them and they'd set off. Last night they'd spent the night in Hoggensforth. Today, they were on the road to Yorkton, which would eventually lead them to Freehold. As they'd left town this morning, Trisfelt had noticed a fairly sizable encampment of armed men. Not quite as large as Exador's army, but this group appeared to be all cavalry. A very large cavalry, by most standards, Trisfelt thought. He hadn't recognized the insignia on the surcoats at first, but eventually he'd been able to dig something up from his memory.

If he was not mistaken, these individuals were the elite soldiers of the god Tiernon. They called themselves the Rod of Tiernon, hence the rod over the starburst of Tiernon. Actually, the Rod weren't particularly common on this continent anymore. At least not for the last few hundred years. Trisfelt, having just escaped one small war, was extremely nervous about what these fellows were up to. He hadn't stopped to ask though.

A short while ago, they'd stopped and had some lunch, the children, as children do, wanting to know how much longer would it be. Trisfelt smiled, remembering his own childhood. He also worried because while these children, for the moment, could be children, his fourth charge, Rupert, had been left behind. He really feared for the child's safety. Lenamare had informed him that while Jehenna, the heartless bitch, Trisfelt cursed, had made it to Freehold, no one else from the caravan had yet arrived. Jenn and Rupert had still been alive when Jehenna had last seen them, and they were assumed still alive, but they hadn't been found yet. The bitch had abandoned them to a greater demon!

Trisfelt worried. Jenn was a good girl, and would be a fine wizard someday; surely she'd take care of Rupert, if she could. That was what he was worried about, he didn't have much more confidence in Jenn being OK then he did of Rupert. Jenn had been his favorite student; they seemed to share a similar sense of humor, and fondness, or lack thereof, for the headmasters. Unfortunately there wasn't much he could do. As a Thaumaturgist, making one end of a Telemirror was about as much sorcery as he could manage. Finding lost people was out of the question.

Suddenly there came the sound of a large number of horses behind him on the road. Trisfelt looked behind him to find the Rod of Tiernon rapidly approaching in a cloud of dust. He pulled the wagon to the side to let the soldiers pass. The long column, four abreast, quickly reached his position and continued in smart order. As the column moved on, Trisfelt glanced up in surprise to see a rider, wearing an incredible amount of armor, flying overhead on a winged horse.

Trisfelt shook his head to try to clear it. The knight, for there was no mistaking the man's calling, was more than a little bit awe-inspiring. The children had stopped their game to watch the soldiers and were gazing upward with open-mouthed stares at the flying knight. Flying horses were extremely rare; Trisfelt had never even seen one with his own eyes before. He found it amazing such a creature could even fly, given the aerodynamics of horses. Further, not only did this one fly, it flew with a man in full plate armor on its back. As if that weren't enough, the steed was wearing full battle armor and regalia as well.

Talk about legends coming to life! This fellow was straight out of some storybook. Trisfelt was a highly experienced wizard; even so, this fellow impressed the Abyss out of him. As he shook his head in wonder, the knight flew overhead, looking down at the wagon and waving congenially to the children. Awed that such a glorious presence would deign to notice them, the children waved shyly back. Trisfelt had to stop himself from waving as well.

As the knight flew on, and the army rode past, Trisfelt followed both with his eyes. Suddenly he was brought up short by the snorting of a horse nearby. He turned his head to see a young soldier, dressed in a very clean and bright uniform nodding respectfully towards him. "Excuse me sir?" The young man asked politely.

Trisfelt was again taken by surprise. At the moment, Trisfelt looked nothing like the Master Wizard he was, yet still the soldier was being courteous and respectful. This seemed extremely strange for soldiers, at least the ones that Trisfelt was familiar with. "Yes, Rod member?" Trisfelt answered.

The soldier smiled more brightly at Trisfelt's recognition of the correct term. "Not many on this continent recognize the Rod of Tiernon; I'm pleased to see we haven't been completely forgotten." He nodded politely to the children. "I'm sorry to bother you, but my sergeant has requested that I ask you a few questions. If you don't mind."

"No, I’d be happy to oblige." Trisfelt didn't mind, especially as the soldier was being so nice about it. Very strange, really. Were these fellows so polite to everyone?

"Have you by any chance seen any unusual looking travelers along this road?"

"Unusual? You mean aside from the gentleman on the flying horse?"

The soldier smiled again, "Sir Talarius, Knight Rampant. Certainly our greatest knight and perhaps, Tiernon willing, the greatest knight in all of Astlan. He is most impressive, isn't he?" The children nodded in fascination. "I find myself gawking at him all the time," the young soldier said to the children.

"So nothing else?" the soldier asked.

"No," Trisfelt shook his head, trying to remember. "Maybe if you'd describe what you're looking for?"

The young soldier looked at the children for a moment, indecisive, then got off his horse. Tying its reins lightly to a wheel, he then walked a ways ahead of the wagon and gestured for Trisfelt to join him. Trisfelt, puzzled, complied.

"Sorry," the incredibly polite soldier said, "but I didn't want to alarm the children. I shouldn't be telling you, but you look like a learned individual."

Trisfelt nodded, "I have some knowledge of things mystical."

The soldier nodded. "Well, specifically, we are looking for a party of wizards."

"Wizards?"

"Wizards and demons actually." The soldier nodded in confirmation. "We are following a party of wizards with demons along the road. That's what I mean by unusual."

"No. I have seen no such thing. What have they done?"

The soldier shook his head, "Not so much what they've done, what they're doing."

"Which is?" Trisfelt was beginning to feel alarmed; he glanced back at the children worriedly.

"Well, I shouldn't tell you this. But," the young soldier frowned, "I have several brothers and sisters their age." He pointed to the wagon. "Where are you headed to?'

"Freehold." Trisfelt answered truthfully.

"Don't." The soldier said, suddenly nervous.

"What do you mean don't? What's wrong with Freehold?" Trisfelt was suddenly very concerned.

The soldier looked around to see if anyone was listening. "You are a wizard, yes?"

"A thaumaturge," Trisfelt admitted, while not dressed formally, his clothes did give him away, and there seemed no point in denying the obvious.

The soldier nodded, "We are following the minions of an Archaedemon."

"A what!" Trisfelt said loudly. Shocked was more than how he felt. "A fifth order demon?" He quickly did a small Lie detection spell.

The soldier just nodded seriously. "It seems one has broken through from the Abyss and is headed towards Freehold. It has several other demons and wizard allies, or slaves, with it. We think it is going to raise a horde there."

Trisfelt was stunned. This was unimaginable. "I...I...find this hard to believe, why would an archdemon be doing that?"

The soldier shrugged, "I don't know. I'm just a corporal; they don't tell me everything. But our people have had both Visions and physical sightings of the Archaedemon." Trisfelt was turning pale. They'd had physical sightings of an archdemon? That would certainly more than explain the presence of the Rod on the continent. One of the things that the Knights of Tiernon were famous for was hunting beings of evil: undead, dragons, demons. Trisfelt rubbed his forehead. The soldier looked on sympathetically. "I'm only telling you this because I don't want to see the children harmed, and because you are a wizard and so will understand. I don't think it's too good an idea to spread this around at the moment, it would certainly cause panic." Trisfelt could only agree.

"Thank you for telling me." Whatever the case, his spell told him that the soldier was telling the truth as he knew it. The soldier nodded seriously and walked back to his horse. As he waved bye to the children, riding back to join the now departed Rod, Trisfelt climbed slowly into the driver's seat. He'd have to contact Lenamare on this.

~

"A what?" Jehenna shouted. Lenamare made hushing noises at her. He'd caught her in a side passageway, on her way to take her evening bath. They'd stepped into an unused alcove; fortunately, at this time in the evening, the entire hallway was relatively untrafficked.

"You heard me. An archdemon." Lenamare was staring intently into her eyes.

"This can't be right." Jehenna was as close to nervous as she ever let anyone see. She rubbed her forehead a couple of times. "How sure is Trisfelt?" She asked, angrily.

"He says he's convinced that the soldier believed it to be the truth. At the very least, even if there is no archdemon entourage on its way, we'll soon have to put up with the Rod of Tiernon."

"I can't believe this," Jehenna said. Her voice cold with anger. "Sure, we speculated that the archdemons might get involved. Eventually they'd have to, but it doesn't seem possible that they are already on to us. If one is on his way here..."

"It means that things are really getting bad, and we will have to devote everything to finding the book before it gets here. We've also got to adjust our plans." Lenamare looked around. "However, here is neither the place nor the time." He whispered. "Let's preserve appearance, take your bath, gather your thoughts. We'll pull an all-night planning session."

~

"An archdemon?" Exador looked down at the small imp that had brought him the news. It had certainly paid to have these things placed in all the public corridors. If only he could get away with putting them in private quarters. Unfortunately they would be too easy to detect, and too much a breach of etiquette. "But, they didn't say which one?" The small imp shook its head, trembling in fear.

"Damn," Exador cursed to himself. "Just what I need. Well, at least Lenamare's now confirmed what I already know. He doesn't have the book." He ignored the imp. He looked to the large water powered clock in the corner. He tried to figure out where his 'allies' would be at this hour.

Exador vanished from the room.

Exador reappeared in a long marble corridor. Looking around, he saw no one. Quickly he hurried down the long corridor, sparing not a glance for the large windows to the right and left. Red light shown brightly through the windows, daytime, as usual when he arrived. Down the corridor and up a flight of stairs. The second door on the left, if he remembered correctly, which he should, the last time he'd been there was only week ago.

As he barged into the room, Ramses hurriedly stood up from the piano he'd been playing. "Where's Bess?" Exador demanded.

"How should I know? I assume she's at her home." He glared at Exador. "Do you make it a habit of barging in unannounced to everybody's home?"

Exador ignored Ramses' outburst. "Get her. We've got problems. More players." Ramses stared at Exador for a moment, finally catching the import of what he said. Ramses walked over to a nearby mirror. Hurriedly he waved his hand in front of it a few times. Bess appeared in the mirror.

"Yessssss..." she purred, somewhat annoyed by the sudden call.

"Exador's here. He says we've got unexpected players in the game." Bess' eyes widened slightly, then narrowed, catlike. Suddenly she was no longer in the mirror, but rather in the room with them. She looked directly at Exador.

"Who?"

"I don't know." Exador said, pacing. "What I do know, is that the Rod of Tiernon is marching on Freehold." Both of his allies shook their heads in surprise. They were more than familiar with the Rod.

"Talarius?" Bess asked. A slow purr coming from her throat.

"Probably, I didn't get the whole message, but at least one knight on a flying horse."

"Who else would it be?" Ramses asked rhetorically.

"Further," Exador continued, "they are marching on Freehold because they believe some archdemon and his entourage is going to Freehold. Apparently, planning some sort of assault."

"But you don't know which archdemon?" Ramses asked. Exador shook his head negatively, in agreement.

"Then," Bess purred, "we can't be sure it's not just rumor. You know how the Rod always overreacts to demonic threats."

Exador bent his head in concession. "However, Lenamare and Jehenna are planning strategies for both contingencies; I suggest we do the same." Ramses grimaced, unable to disagree with logic. Bess stroked her chin, thinking, Exador guessed, about getting her paws on Talarius.

~

Maelen settled down beside the fire. He decided that maybe he was getting to old for the adventuring life. He would be ninety-two next quarter month, certainly time to start thinking about retiring. Slimemold! Most people his age were thinking about dying. He wasn't quite ready to start thinking if that for a couple decades yet, but a gentler life-style might not be uncalled for. Traveling with wizards, demons and fellow animages who pretended to be something other than they were, was just asking too much. Ah well, he thought, that is the price of his vision.

Thinking of his vision, Maelen decided he'd better perform his nightly chore. For the last few decades, any time he camped in the wilderness, before settling down for the night, he'd scan the terrain for any possibly hostile activity. Maelen relaxed into a near trance state and opened his senses to the world. Nothing in the immediate ground vicinity. Up he projected his viewpoint, raising his viewpoint a few hundred feet off the ground, he looked in all directions.

Curious, there seem to be an abnormal amount of light a few miles back along the trail. Extending his senses this way wouldn't allow him to see what was going on there, his Sight would. Strange, actually, he didn't recall anything in that region when they passed through it. Maelen stared into the fire, remembering the area in his mind's eye.

~

Damien put down the most recent message he'd just received via winged courier from Hoggensforth. He stared thoughtfully out at the night sky. "The Rod of Tiernon sailed into Hoggensforth last night." Antefalken's strumming ceased.

"This morning, an individual on a winged horse was seen to land in the Rod's encampment. Shortly thereafter, they broke camp and departed. Headed for Yorkton." Damien told his bard.

"Unless I miss my guess." Antefalken replied thoughtfully, "Yorkton lies on the road between Hoggensforth and here. Correct?"

"Correct."

"Now," Antefalken continued, "unless I miss my guess, Yorkton is not a particularly interesting place." Damien simply nodded and turned to look at Antefalken. His back to the cool night air coming in through the window, he crossed his arms on his chest. "Thus they're most likely coming here."

Damien twisted his head in acknowledgement. "The question," Damien remarked, "is why?"

Antefalken shrugged, "Why do they march anywhere. There's an evil that needs dispatching. Or at least what they think is an evil. And if Talarius is with them, then they think there's a pretty bad evil needing to be dispatched."

"But what's here that's more evil than usual, by Rod standards?" Damien asked, more to himself than to the bard.

"Lenamare and Exador are two principal thoughts that come to mind." Antefalken mentioned. Damien waved his hand. "I've never met Exador, but I'm not particularly fond of Lenamare."

"Two of kind, you haven't missed much." Damien told the demon. "I don't think either is quite evil enough to raise the Rod. On their own. On the other hand, if as I suspect, there is more to this feud between them than meets the eye...maybe that's what's got the Rod out sniffing the trail of evil.

"We need more information." Damien paced a few steps, and then sat down in a canvas chair. He put his feet up on a small table strewn with papers.

"If they knew that Lenamare was tossing a greater demon around the playing field, that might raise their interest." Antefalken suggested.

"Perhaps, but there have been other instantiations of greater demons that the Rod didn't deal with so quickly. Prolonged use, yes, that got their attention. But to draw out both the Rod and Talarius? Usually, either one is more than enough."

"Unless..." Antefalken got to thinking again.

"Yes?"

"Well, you know how I thought this Tom fellow might be more than he seemed? What if he is? What if he's really an extremely old greater demon slumming? Or an archdemon?" Antefalken clicked his fingernails on the frame of his harp.

"Yes, but Lenamare brought him into play. Do you think Lenamare would try and use an archdemon? Or even one of the truly powerful greater demons? He's got an ego, but he's not stupid. You don't control archdemons. You get roasted by them."

"True, but the archdemon, or whatever this Tom is, could be using Lenamare. Or it could be a game. An elaborate hoax, perhaps they're really allies?"

"Allies? Lenamare and any demon? I'd seriously doubt that. He's always got to be in charge, as, I suspect, do most archdemons. No, that's simply too unstable a relationship." Antefalken just shrugged. "Still no luck in locating Tom?"

"No," the small demon shook his head. "I've gone back a couple times but to no avail. In fact it doesn't appear he's been back since before my first visit."

"It would be nice if you could at least talk to him. Find out if he really is what he's supposed to be, or something more." Antefalken shrugged, there wasn't much he could do, he'd try, but if he couldn't locate the guy that was the limit.

~

Maelen looked up from his trance. He looked around the fire at the others. Gastropé was doing some wood carving; Jenn was examining some book. Edwyrd and Rupert were talking about something. For some reason, after Rupert's rather near-death experience, it seemed to Maelen that the two were much closer. He himself didn't have much to go on, since he didn't know them for long before that, but judging other's reactions and the whole situation het got him that feeling.

Tizzy was wandering around the edges of the clearing, periodically eviscerating plants and insects. Maelen shook his head. "By any chance," he apparently startled the others, "have you folks had any run-ins with the followers of Tiernon?"

Jenn and Gastropé looked puzzled, Edwyrd and Rupert rather blank. "Who's Tiernon?" Edwyrd asked.

"A god. I'm specifically thinking of any of his priests or knights." Jenn suddenly looked worried when he said the word priest. She looked to Gastropé.

"Who did the priest we tied up worship?"

"I don't recall." Gastropé said honestly. "One deity’s pretty much the same as any other."

"You know," Edwyrd spoke up, "I think that may be the god he kept calling on. It was certainly Tier something. He told me he was the high priest for his god in Gizzor Del." Maelen frowned, and then quickly described Verigas, the high priest of Tiernon. "Yes, that sounds like the guy."

"Why, if I might ask, did you have him tied up?" asked Maelen. He was really going to have to think about retiring. Soon.

"Well," Jenn answered, "it seems that when we arrived in Gizzor Del, we kind of interrupted his spell casting. He rather went crazy, and so we tied him up so he wouldn't cause problems."

"How exactly did you interrupt his spell casting? And why did this cause him to go crazy?" Maelen inquired politely. Jenn gave him an abridged version of the story. "Maybe you should tell me more." Maelen suggested after hearing this. Jenn, as quickly as she could, gave him the run down on Exador and Lenamare, the fourth order demon rescuing them and taking them through the Abyss to Gizzor Del.

Maelen had to shake his head. "So let me get this straight. Lenamare sends a fourth order demon out to play messenger boy. While it’s gone this Exador fellow lays siege to your school. Your headmaster sets up some fancy pentacles, the demon returns, nearly breaks the wards, forcing Lenamare to temporarily lower them. In the process, one of the ward setters is killed by Exador's people, making the barrier unstable. You flee the castle through secret escape tunnels, while Lenamare stays behind to single handedly take out Exador's entire army.

"You were riding through the mountains when a group of Exador's men, including him," Maelen points to Gastropé, "ambushes you and kills most of your party. This Jehenna person summons a fourth order demon on the spur of the moment, gets it wrong but the demon comes of its own free will anyway. The demon slays all the enemy except him," again he pointed to Gastropé. "It then for some unknown reason agrees to escort you to Freehold." Maelen was sounding more and more skeptical about this.

"Along the way you're ambushed by Exador’s demons. They cart you off to Exador's camp, where Exador is not. You are tossed into a tent with him." He nods to Gastropé again. "In the meantime, this young fellow," nodding to Rupert, "plots with a demon to free you." Maelen licked his lips before continuing.

"He and the demon fly back to the school; the demon returns to the Abyss; Rupert allows himself to be caught. Upon being placed in the tent with you, this nine-year-old boy summons a greater demon. The demon burns down the tent and half the camp, meanwhile dragging the three of you off to the Abyss, where Rupert meets him." Maelen points to Tizzy, who by this point had come over to listen to the story. "All of you decide to leave the Abyss, with the help of the greater demon. In the process of doing so you use a channel opened by a priest doing things forbidden by his religion and scare the crap out of him. Upon immediate arrival, this demon,” he pointed to Tizzy, “departs immediately and the fourth order mysteriously disappears in the middle of the night to go to some sort of demon convention." Maelen simply shook his head.

"In the morning after, Rupert goes a wandering and randomly runs into his cousin, an entire continent away from home." Jenn looked a little puzzled by this even. Maelen points to Edwyrd, "Said cousin is more than happy to join forces with a group playing games with demons and tying up respected members of the community. You all jump on a ship, where I have the pleasure of meeting you all," Maelen smiles facetiously. "And I know the rest from there." Maelen sighed, "Is that everything? Have I summed it all up?"

"Pretty much." Rupert said matter-of-factly, as if there was absolutely nothing strange about the story. "Why do you ask?"

Maelen sighed again and rubbed his eyes. "Well...it seems that Verigas was more scared than you thought. The Rod of Tiernon is now following us or someone so close in description to us as to make little difference."

"The what?" Gastropé asked.

"The Rod of Tiernon. Tiernon's elite cadre of holy soldiers and knights. They're principally used to battle evil, destroy the wicked, send the damned off to their infernal torments, that sort of thing. They're about five miles behind us on this road. From what I was able to pick up, they're searching for a party of wizards and demons on their way to Freehold. Led by some individual calling himself, Lord Edwyrd."

All the rest did a double take at Maelen's words. They all looked to Edwyrd, who looked as confused as anyone did. "Lord Edwyrd? Unless I got a promotion, they must be after someone else."

Maelen smiled grimly. "And how many parties of wizards and demons recently came across the sea from Gizzor Del, on their way to Freehold, with someone name Edwyrd in them do you think there are?"

"But I've never called myself that; you've been in this group almost as long as I." Edwyrd complained.

Again Maelen smiled again, still grim. "I don't care what they call you or I or any of us. The point is, we have some of the best-trained religious fanatics in the world five miles down the road, all looking for us. I suggest it is time for a plan."

~

"What we need," Archimage Tureledor stated, "is a plan."

"What we need," councilor Davron retorted, "is to know why the Rod of Tiernon is marching up the path to our door."

"Given their normal reticence to discuss anything with the Council," Councilor Trevin D'Vils stated, "all we can do is formulate a plan. Since they're not likely to bother informing us why they're attacking." She looked around trying to get people to agree with her.

"We don't know that they're attacking us," protested Sier Barvon. "Do we? All we know is that they're coming this way."

Damien simply shook his head. He'd called this late night council session to warn his fellow council members of the imminent presence of the Rod. As he should have known, getting them to agree on the situation let alone what to do about it was proving difficult. He couldn’t even get all twelve of the currently appointed thirteen member council to show up.

Lenamare and Jehenna had declined to attend as had Exador and Randolf, the Archimage of Turelane. Apparently the two factions had no desire to be in the same room and civil to each other. Zilquar was away somewhere and had not been reachable at his school.

Alexandros Mien shook his head, the old Archimage from Garander spoke up. "Look, we have to assume they're coming here, we don't know why, but there is no place else they could be going. The question is why? Why are they coming? We haven't had a major disagreement with them in over six hundred years."

"I suspect," Trevin stated, "it has something to do with Lenamare and Exador's spat. They're the ones we should be asking."

"And how?" Lord Archimage Gandros, chair of the Council of Wizards spoke up for the first time, "do you propose we ask them? They haven't been exactly cooperative in resolving their own dispute which they brought before us. You expect them to be any more forthcoming on this?"

"Since they're here and it would be their necks on the line as well, I'm sure they'd be willing to cooperate." Sier Barvon tried to point out. Damien just snorted, knowing Exador and Lenamare.

"What about the inquisition?" Several councilors paused in their thinking to look at Trevin as she brought this up. "Given that the Rod is coming, is this a good time to be sending our members out on fact finding missions?"

Tureledor answered, "It probably would be best if we were all present to present a united front."

"Since when in the last six decades, have we presented a united front?" Davron asked. Tureledor simply glared at the man.

"United in fact, or united in appearance, Trevin has a point." Gandros stated. "I think, Damien, we may want to postpone your tour until we understand the situation better."

Damien nodded, he wasn't so sure. He felt that perhaps his tour could shed some light on what was up. Especially since he was positive that it had something to do with the dueling wizards. This point in time was not, however, the time to disagree. There was already enough disagreement around the table.

"I think," Damien said for the first time since answering questions on the advent of the Rod, "reticence or not on the part of the Rod, we should at least arrange a messenger to find out what they're up to. If it is Lenamare or Exador they want, then at least we'll know. If it is us, they'll probably simply capture the messenger so he or she can't return to warn us. Knowing the Rod, it is highly unlikely they'd simply kill the messenger out of hand. Unless we sent a demon." Several council members muttered about this, but none could really come up with a good objection other than complaints from the less optimistic ones.

After a bit more fruitless discussion they adjourned. As they were standing up, Alexandros looked to Gandros and asked, “We can assume you shall be informing our brother Council as to the situation.

Trevin D’Vils snarked, “Oh, do you think they’ll notice an invading army?”

Damien smiled at her, laughing at the inside joke; “I fear Lord Felgraf has already noticed. It was he who alerted us to the Rod marching through his city.”





The Council States

Home of the Council of Wizardry, the Council States is a federation of city states dedicated to the preservation of knowledge, the responsible use of wizardry, and free trade.

While the implication is that the Council states are governed by a “Council” there are actually two councils that provide the necessary inter-state regulation, adjudication and other federal functions.

The Council of Magistrates is made up of representatives elected by the ruling body of each of the member states. The Council of Magistrates is responsible for ensuring free trade and the upholding of economic treaties between the member states. It works with the Council of Wizardry to provide joint defense of the collective states.

The Council of Wizardry is made up of the preeminent wizards of the land as selected by the Council Roster. The Council Roster is an organization consisting of all duly recognized wizards in Norelon (and in much of Eton). Membership is incumbent upon presentation of credentials, abiding by the Code of Wizardry and payment of dues. The Council is foremost authority on wizardry in the land and is empowered to take action against members and non-members who violate the Code of Wizardry. Further, because many of the members are also ruling lords the Council of Wizardry carries considerable political weight, in and of itself, beyond that of ruling committees.

Government of the Council States is handled by applicable committees made up jointly and equally from members and/or appointees of both Councils. The Ruling Committees are each responsible for their designated area of authority and these bodies make applicable laws and rulings for their sphere of influence. Individuals requesting an appeal of the decisions of the committees may petition the independent Committee on Appeal. If their arguments are found to be of merit, the appeal may be forwarded on to the two Councils.

Committees are typically formed of 13 members (with the exception of Arms and Justice which are 27 members each), the chair of each council appoints one member to each committee and six other members of each council get one appointee each. Which committees a councilor appoints to is determined by seniority and the relative importance of the committee. In theory a council member can appoint him or herself to a committee, but this is almost never done due to time constraints, workload, and appearances.

The 5 most influential Committees are the following:

Committee on Trade: Handles trade disputes between merchants and each other as well as merchants and member states.

Committee on Arms: Controls the militia of the Council States. Includes the Subcommittee on Domestic Safety which ensures the safety of the roads and highways and the Subcommittee on Defense which oversees military operations at the direction of the two Councils. This is actually a 27 member committee, with a chair and half of the remaining 26 on one subcommittee or the other.

Committee on Justice: The judiciary arm of the Councils, the Committee on Justice provides criminal and civil justice through its two subcommittees on civil and criminal justice. The civil justice committee works on the individual level and often coordinates with the Committee on Trade for merchant-consumer justice. Further, member states have magisterial domain within their own jurisdiction on all matters not directly in violation of Council Law. Like the Committee on Arms, the Committee on Justice is actually a 27 member committee, with a chair and half the remaining 26 on once subcommittee or the other.

Committee on Foreign Relations: Handles ambassadorial and foreign relations.

Committee on Appeal: Handles the appellate process for committee decisions and laws.

Other committees include:

Committee on Religion: Traditionally made up of appointees from the clerical ranks of the major religions.

Committee on the Arts: Provides patronage for the arts.

Committee on Racial Relations: Arbitrates and protects the rights of various races, in particular those sentient races outside the body politic.



The Council of Wizardry

The Council of Wizardry is made up of the thirteen preeminent wizards of Astlan as selected by the Council Roster. This high honor is not bestowed lightly. Membership upon the council is for a term of 5 years and may be renewed at the mandate of the Roster.

In addition to the joint committees of the two councils, the Council of Wizardry and the Council Roster have the following internal committees to deal directly with affairs of Wizardry:

Committee on Research

Committee on Demonology (supersedes the Committee on Conjury)

Committee on Sorcery

Committee on Enchantment

Committee on Pyromancy

Committee on Thaumaturgy

Committee on Runic Lore

Committee on Necromancy: This committee, unlike the others specialization committees is concerned with restricting, regulating and as necessary, eliminating necromancy.

Committee on Academic Affairs

Committee of the Library and Patents





Members of the Council of Wizardry, PV 440, Demoni



Name

Year Elected

Comments



Lord Gandros

PV 421

Chairman of the Council



Alexandros Mien

PV 411

Archimage of Garander, Elder member of the Council



Randolf II

PV 421

Archimage of Turelane



Zilquar

PV 421

Founder of the Zilquar School of Wizardry.



Lenamare

PV 426

Founder of Lenamare's School of Wizardry



Exador

PV 426

Archimage Exador is Mage of Turelane the Archimage of Turelane's Chancellor Arcane



Sier Barvon

PV 431

Archimage of Yorkton



Tureledor

PV 431

Archimage of Tureledor



Davron

PV 431

Archimage of Markforton



Trevin D'Vils

PV 436

Enchantress of the Grove



Damien

PV 436

Council Inquisitor



Jehenna

PV 436

Master Sorceress of Lenamare's School of Wizardry



Open

N/A

Seat currently vacant since the death of Tier Bastion in the month of Nilis.



Note: Archimage is as much a political/hereditary title as an indication of experience and profession. An Archimage is a Master Wizard with either a political position or hereditary estate.

The Council of Magistrates

The Council of Magistrates is made up of one representative from each of the member states. The selection process of the representatives varies from state to state. It may be an elected, hereditary, or appointed position depending on that state's government. The traditional term of office is five years, however this is completely subjective to the desires of the particular member state being represented.

Committee on Alchemy

Committee on Apprenticeship

Committee on Agriculture

Committee on Construction

Committee on Forestry

Committee on Jewelry

Committee on Shipbuilding

Committee on Smithing

Committee on Transportation

Committee on Usury

Committee on Water





Members of the Council of Magistrates, PV 440, Demoni



Name

Initial Year

Comments



Lord Bastion

PV 433

Chairman of the Council (Brother of the late Tier Bastion on the Council of Wizardry)



Elder Tomath

PV 411

Representative of For Mori



Sister Drusena

PV 418

Representative of Belen Dorn



Lord Phelgrath

PV 424

Representative of Mori An



Baron Vlades

PV 426

Representative of Dryas



Master Felgraf

PV 426

Representative of Hoggensforth



Lord Perington

PV 429

Representative of Nisfelt



Lord Tomas

PV 430

Representative of Dorn



Master Wright Trendelforth

PV 430

Representative of Horn



Sir Forkorth

PV 431

Representative of Markforton



Sir Sartris

PV 434

Representative of Tris



Burgomaster Falron

PV 435

Representative of Yorkton



Sir Nestrith

PV 436

Representative of For An



Master Forn

PV 436

Representative of Del An



Constable Smithford

PV 436

Representative of Kaln



Master Beltan

PV 438

Representative of Bel An



Sir Weblendon

PV 439

Representative of Viz An





Chapter 62


"We're doomed!" Gastropé exclaimed. "Doomed, there is no way we're going to get through this alive."

"Don't be so optimistic," snapped Jenn sarcastically. "We've been through worse; we're not going to let a little more adversity stop us."

Edwyrd wasn't so sure about that. They'd spent the last hour discussing their options and trying to come up with a plan. They had yet to formulate one. Things did not look good. According to Maelen these Rod people were major witch hunters, or at least demon and other assorted evil hunters. It seemed they had a rather black and white view of the world. Their solution to the problem of evil was simple: eliminate it. Slay it first and ask questions later.

It used to make pretty good sense back in Harding, Edwyrd reflected, everyone in fantasy novels and games always strove to abolish evil wherever they found it. Tom had even thought it a pretty good policy at the time. Unfortunately, he never planned on being the evil needing eliminating. If, as seemed pretty clear to Maelen, the Rod was after them due to their actions in Gizzor Del, which undeniably involved demonic activity, and if, as Maelen maintained was the Rod's view, demonic activity was undeniably evil, then they, as conspirators with evil, were undeniably evil as well, and therefore undeniably must die. With a grim grin, Edwyrd decided the logic was undeniable.

Maelen assured them in no uncertain terms, that if the Rod did catch them, and if identified, there would be only one outcome. Given that Maelen had recognized Verigas among the Rod, identification seemed highly probable, if they were captured. Assuming they accepted what Maelen told them, and they had no reason not to, there was no choice in the matter. They could not afford to be caught.

This choice, Edwyrd thought to himself, while simple, was not so easy to implement. The Rod was mounted and assuming nothing changed between now and then, the Rod would overtake them in the morning before they could even reach Yorkton. It had been suggested they just go perpendicular to the road and avoid the Rod. Unfortunately, as Maelen pointed out, if they wanted to get to Freehold, which was in a large mountain valley, they'd have to take the pass that Yorkton was the base of. From Hoggensforth, there was no other way to Freehold that wouldn't take an additional month of travel. They didn't have the money to buy supplies for a month.

Jenn had pointed out that they could just go off the road for a day or so, then follow the Rod to Freehold. Maelen, ever the voice of cold water, had pointed out that if the Rod reached Freehold, and couldn't find them, they'd double back down the road to Hoggensforth. Further, being incredibly thorough, they'd probably place checkpoints on the path behind them anyway, prepared for just such an occurrence. Maelen's cold logic was becoming rather annoying Edwyrd thought; the man dashed all their hopes as fast as they could come up with them. Despite this, he was more than happy they'd brought the animage. He didn't know what would have happened without the man.

Edwyrd looked around at his comrades, all sitting quietly lost in rather despondent thoughts. Actually, Edwyrd wasn't quite as depressed as the three humans. He knew, that if worse came to worst, he'd just change back into a demon, as could Rupert. Given that, they could just grab the humans and fly extremely fast. However, that was not his preferred option. He'd gone to all the work of creating the Edwyrd persona, and he hated to just abandon it so quickly. Oh, certainly, he'd love to abandon it and change back into himself, what he didn't want, was to destroy the illusion that was Edwyrd in the eyes of the others.

Over the last day of traveling, he'd had a chance to actually talk with both Gastropé and Jenn, talk in a more relaxed manner than ever before. He'd learned a lot about them. As he got to know them, and their pasts, he realized they weren't the nutso wizards he'd wanted to believe they were. They were just normal people, like himself. Or rather like he'd been and Edwyrd pretended to be. When they weren't on the defensive against him, thinking he was a demon, they were actually pretty nice people. He hated to have to destroy the start of a friendship by suddenly revealing himself to be the demon again. As he'd realized when he thought Rupert dead, he needed friends.

Thus while he wanted very much to turn back into himself, he didn't want to have to do it where Jenn or Gastropé or Maelen, for that matter, could see him. It was really a rather strange situation to be in, he supposed. Therefore, they'd have to come up with some other option.

"We're out of ideas. There doesn't seem to be anything to do, but get caught, or not go to Freehold at all. If we don't go to Freehold, we starve." Jenn said tiredly.

"You know," Rupert suddenly spoke up. He'd been quite for most of the discussion. His few ideas had been shot down as much as anyone’s had. "There is--one other option to us."

"What?" Gastrope' asked, Maelen looked on, not convinced.

"Well, you're not going to like it." He stared right at Jenn.

She grimaced in frustration. "Rupert, spill it. If you have an idea just say it so Maelen can tear it apart." Maelen gave her a sour look.

"Well--we summon Tom." He carefully avoided looking at Edwyrd. Before anyone could object, as both Gastropé and Jenn were preparing to do, he went on. "We summon Tom and have him transport us all to the Abyss."

"NO!" Jenn shouted. "Absolutely not. I knew it, your hair wasn't the only thing curled by the lightning bolt. Your brain got fried too!"

"Now listen Jenn." Rupert went on insistently. "We traveled through the Abyss once safely, we can do it again."

"Do you have any concept of what you are saying, child?" Jenn asked intently. "We nearly lost our souls in that place. I have no idea why that demon let us go, but it did. I will not tempt fate a second time!"

Edwyrd shook his head. While it wasn't the worst idea they'd heard, there were certainly problems with it. "Rupert?" Edwyrd asked; the boy looked over to him. "Didn't you say this Tom fellow," he paused, hoping Rupert would take the hint, "had to be elsewhere? If he's busy doing something else, I doubt he could be in two places at once. I know I couldn't." Rupert frowned at this, apparently he hadn't thought of that. For Tom to appear, Edwyrd would need to disappear, they'd never explain that one.

"Besides," Gastropé entered the discussion, "even if he wasn't busy. Last time we ended up in Gizzor Del. If he can't control where he opens his gates, we could end up farther away than ever."

"No! Not if Tizzy flies ahead to Freehold and summons Tom from there! If Tizzy were to do that, be our inside man so to speak, we could do it!" Rupert exclaimed, this one he'd thought of.

"Tizzy?" Jenn asked incredulously. "You're going to trust that crackpot?"

"Hey! My pot's no more cracked than any other four thousand year old vase that's been through the mill a few times!" Tizzy, who spoke for the first time, stated with mock indignity. "Further, I'm as trustworthy as the tides!" He crossed a couple arms on his chest and pretended to pout.

Jenn shook her head. "No."

"Well," Gastropé said thoughtfully. "I don't trust that big demon, at all. However, the basic concept is sound. If only we didn't have to rely on any demons."

Jenn looked at him as if he'd lost his mind. "Are you as crazy as Tizzy? How else would we get there if not via demon? Besides, last time we nearly died of the heat! If you hadn't come up with that variant of the cool cantrip, we'd have been roasted." Jenn paused for a moment, tilted her head as if remembering something she'd forgotten. "Just exactly how did you come up with that, anyway?" She asked suspiciously.

Gastropé bent his head, licking his lips somewhat nervously. He didn't say anything for a moment as Jenn glared at him, demanding an answer. He looked at the others from under his brows, then said softly, almost casually, "Well, I'd been there before."

"Oh." Jenn said, her brow furrowed. "What exactly do you mean, you'd been there before? How did you get there? And what were you doing there?" She said suspiciously.

Gastropé coughed then looked back and forth between Rupert and Jenn. Edwyrd was quite curious about this one. "On the way," Gastrope' began, "to Lenamare's castle. We took a detour through the Abyss."

"You took," Jenn shook her head slightly, "a detour through the Abyss?" She just shook her head. "Who takes a detour through the Abyss when marching on a castle with an army?"

"Exador," Gastropé said as if that explained everything. "And I suppose technically it wasn't a detour since it was faster than marching over land. That's how he was able to get the army there so fast.

"You see, he used this spell called Abyssal Switch. It relocates a part of Astlan with a different part of the Abyss. The area isn't that big, but you can switch an area big enough to move a few hundred people or so at a time. He switched an area with soldiers to the Abyss, had us wizards put cool spells on the soldiers and then moved them off the switched land, and then he switched it back. He then did the spell in reverse, switching the part of the Abyss the soldiers were on with a new location in Astlan. It took a while, because we had to move several groups, but we were able to cover a great distance a lot faster." Gastropé shrugged: it hadn't been his doing; he'd just followed orders.

Maelen rubbed his chin. "Hmm, rather impressive actually," the animage murmured.

Jenn appeared at a loss for words. She didn't seem to know what to say. She just shook her head. Edwyrd was also impressed, it was certainly an impressive trick this Exador had performed. No wonder the man was so good at pissing off Lenamare.

Rupert spoke up, almost craftily this time. No one but Edwyrd seemed to notice his cunning smile, "So, Gastropé, if we could get to the Abyss without needing the greater demon, you'd go along with it?"

Gastropé shrugged, "I suppose, we'd have to go in someplace cool, for the Abyss anyway. In the main regions, the trick with the cool spell wouldn't be sufficient. However, we don't have a way to go there other than Tom. I certainly can't do an Abyssal Switch, not by a long shot. Further, we would also still have the problem of knowing the spot to exit to. In other words, Gizzor Del all over."

Rupert nodded. "Well--Tizzy?" The demon smiled at Rupert. "Can we trust you to fly to Freehold and be a focal point? Do a summons sort of thing." Rupert looked into Tizzy's eyes.

The octopod shrugged, "Of course. I always do well by my friends, like you and Tom." Tizzy said pointedly.

Jenn was just shaking her head. "It doesn't matter whether we can trust him," she pointed at Tizzy. "I will not go with that fourth order demon again, even if we could summon him. I'll burn at the stake first."

"It won't come to that," Rupert assured her. "At least I don't think it should." He turned his attention to Edwyrd. Edwyrd was beginning to get an idea of what the boy wanted. "Lord Edwyrd," Rupert smiled, "as the Rod calls you," Edwyrd nodded, "You're our resident awe-inspiring animage. No offense, Maelen." The healer just nodded, staring at the boy to see what he was getting at. "Do you think you, Edwyrd, could open up a small gate to the Abyss? One we could all get through. Then if Tizzy was to provide a focal point, could you pull us out again?'

Jenn was just shaking her head, knowing it was impossible. Edwyrd didn't know however, certainly with Tizzy's assistance he could do it as Tom. He'd already done it once. The only question was whether he could do it and maintain his Edwyrd form. He thought for a moment.

"Rupert, give it up. Edwyrd can't do that." Jenn said. "No one can."

"Actually," Maelen spoke up, "that's not entirely true." He was gazing most speculatively at Edwyrd as he said this. "A truly skilled Spatiomaster or Astramaster could." He was clearly trying to discern the limits of Edwyrd's abilities and talents. "I already can tell that our friend Edwyrd knows some astramastery."

Edwyrd glanced out of the side of his eye at the healer-seer. He wasn't sure exactly what the man meant, or what he was up to. He didn't know anything about astramastery or spatiomastery or whatever it was called. All he knew were his demonic powers, and not even most of them. He finally spoke up.

"Well, if I knew where to go that would be cool enough, something I can presumably get from Rupert," he was making this up as he went. Bluffing, sort of. While he was sure he could really do it, he had to make it look as if he were doing it as an animage. That made it tricky because he still wasn't sure how an animage would do this stuff. "Plus if I can arrange some sort of link with Tizzy," meaning get Tizzy to summon him in Freehold, "I might just be able to do it." Maelen nodded as if what Edwyrd had just said made sense. Edwyrd was glad it made sense to someone.

Jenn shook again. "No. It's too dangerous. Can't do it. Not worth the risk."

"Jenn," Rupert said tiredly, "it won't involve the big demon." He grimaced at his stretching of the truth. "So, you have nothing to worry about. My cousin is very competent. He brought me back, and he helped you guys destroy the pirates." Maelen glanced at the boy as if to correct him on the pirates, clearly, Maelen knew what really happened, but the seer just shook his head slightly and let it pass. Jenn was still shaking her head.

"Jenn," Gastropé intervened. "You know I don't like demons any better than you, but if Rupert and Edwyrd think this will work, I'm willing to try. Having been through the Abyss more than once and lived, I'm willing to try again." Jenn still shook her head unconvinced.

"I think," Maelen told Jenn. "That our friend Edwyrd here can do it. I've seen what he's done so far, and if he is as good at other areas of Animagic as he is at pyromastery and healing, then we have nothing to fear. If he says he can do it, I believe him." Edwyrd wasn't sure whether to thank the old man for the vote of confidence or ask him why he was so confident.

"You are all crazy. The Rod is certainly better than the Abyss. As I said, if it comes down between burning at the stake or my soul burning in the Abyss, I'll take the stake."

"Are you willing to let the rest of us burn at the stake too, Jenn?" Rupert asked. "Because we need to do this together, if you burn we all burn. I know I'm not too fond of the idea of guaranteed death at the hands of the Rod." Jenn looked at him sourly. She just sat there for some time; no one said anything.

"You really don't play fair, do you child?" Jenn asked Rupert, she smiled sadly as she said it. "You little demon you," she shook her head as she said it, indicating it was a joke. Edwyrd was just glad she didn't know the truth of it.

That decided, Edwyrd took a little more authority on himself, "Tizzy," the octopodal demon looked at him. "How long will it take you to fly to Freehold?"

"How far is it?" Asked Tizzy. "Oh, and where is it?"

"Just follow this road through Yorkton up the pass into the mountains. The road leads directly there, it's the first large city after you exit the mountains. A little over four hundred miles." It was interesting, Edwyrd noted, that people in Astlan seemed to use miles as their base unit of distance. There didn't seem to be any logical reason why a completely different culture would use the same base unit of distance as his own. It was also rather strange everyone spoke English. It was also strange that he'd never noticed this before. It seemed too fortunate for simple coincidence. He looked over at Tizzy, needing to know the demon's answer in order to formulate a plan.

The little demon bent its head as if thinking. "Say, six hours. Six hours. Yep, that's about it," he looked maliciously at Jenn who was nodding, "give or take a day or three." Jenn looked up and glared at the demon. "OK, maybe six hours then. Give or take a half."

Actually, Edwyrd decided, listening closely, he wasn't sure it was English. It didn't quite sound like what he thought English should sound like; however, he couldn't seem to determine what was different. Was it all somehow translated in his brain? Part of the demonizing process? Did he just think he was speaking in English rather than Astlanian? Did his brain just substitute furlongs, kilometers or leagues or whatever with the word miles?

At the moment he guessed it was irrelevant. What was important was that they get out of the way of the Rod. First, he should take care of that and then he'd worry about whether they were actually speaking English. "Fine then," Edwyrd said as he stood up and walked over to Tizzy. "Let me establish a link to you." He put his hand on Tizzy's head and bent down to whisper in the demon's ear.

"When you get there just summon me by my full name, Thomas Edwyrd Perkinje, I'm sure you're familiar with what's needed?" Tizzy just snickered and nodded.

"The link is established; when you get there, just concentrate and I'll open a doorway for us." Edwyrd said, standing up and speaking so everyone could hear. Tizzy nodded to them all and suddenly lifted off into the air. Waving a hand in farewell the demon sped off to Freehold.

Edwyrd looked around at the others, "Well, we'd best be preparing ourselves. I think we should try to make the translation in about five hours. We want to be sure and be there when Tizzy calls.

"Rupert," Edwyrd said, "I'm going to need you to show me where to take us." He winked secretly at the boy.

The five hours passed quickly. Or so Edwyrd thought, he had no clock to judge the time by, but Maelen seemed to know. They rounded up everything they had, as if they were preparing to take to the road again. After a bit of disagreement, Gastropé got his way and they loaded the donkey to bring it through also. Jenn complained about her and Gastropé not being able to cool everyone and the donkey, but surprisingly it had been Maelen who'd overruled her. The seer claimed that as part of something he called 'Body Mastery' he wouldn't need a cool spell, and that he could probably extend himself to cover the donkey as well, if not the entire party. Given the idea, Edwyrd added that he could cover Rupert and himself, so Jenn and Gastropé need only worry about themselves.

Naturally, Edwyrd had no idea how to extend protection to either himself or Rupert. However, given that he intended to be returning to his own home, and that Rupert also being a demon wouldn't need any protection either, he felt it a fairly safe claim. In fact, last time, he'd forgotten completely about how hot the Abyss was. Apparently, this cool spell thing was what Jenn had been afraid of running out of power for last time. Also, he was pretty sure Jenn had never done the cool spell on Rupert either, the kid had made a beeline for the outside as soon as they'd arrived. He only hoped she didn't remember that fact.

As the time for departure arrived, Edwyrd had everyone gather around the fire. As they did so he began to concentrate on the fire. He melded his mind with the fire, just as he had done with the last gateway. He didn't go all the way and become flame, rather he held back, holding the Edwyrd form intact. He imagined the flame burning a hole in reality, charring a small opening between the veil between the Abyss and Astlan. It was a hole in the flame, a hole that opened up into his cave. Wider and wider, he imagined it, spreading his hands apart to force it wide enough. When he'd done so, he closed his eyes, concentrating all his will on making the hole real.

Whoosh! Went the fire before them. He heard Jenn take an indrawn breath, and knew he must have what he needed. Opening his eyes he beheld the hole in the flames, opening up to his cave. "Who's first?” he asked.

~

Rupert didn't need to be asked twice. He dove through the hole in the flame, hearing Jenn sigh his name in frustration. He didn't care though, he was going home again! Going back to where he belonged. He emerged into the dark cave; he willed his eyes to adjust even as he had the first time. Tom's cave was just as they'd left it.

Not that there was much to change. The place was just a tad bit on the barren side. He suspected, however, that it was really just a stopping point of Tom's. Hunting cabin sort of thing. He'd probably brought them there the first time because it was up in the mountains and thus cooler so Jenn's and Gastropé's spells could work.

As Rupert was looking around, Gastropé stepped through the hole. The young wizard groped blindly in the dark for a second and then produced a small ball of Were Light. Gastrope' had put his cooling spell on before entering, but even so Rupert could see him sweating. Maybe he should think of sweating, too?

Following Gastropé through the hole was Maelen leading the donkey. Apparently, the healer had put the animal into some sort of trance to get it to walk through fire. The donkey stared straight ahead, oblivious to its surroundings. Jenn had to step sideways to get around the donkey who was temporarily blocking her way. She was muttering to herself, convinced that she'd let them talk her into something really stupid. As she hurried out of the way, Edwyrd stepped through.

As Edwyrd stepped through, he turned to face the hole and concentrated on it. As Rupert watched, he saw the light in the clearing fade as Edwyrd quenched the fire in the fire pit. The hole growing ever smaller as he did so. At last he shook his head as if exiting a trance, and smiled, "There, that should do it, and I've put the fire out so we won't be responsible for any forest fires. Smokey would be proud." Rupert wondered who Smokey was. Some demon with a fear of fire? It seemed unlikely.

Jenn had been staring around, tapping her foot. "Smart, real smart."

"What?" Edwyrd asked her.

"You've brought us to the same place the big demon did."

"So?" Edwyrd asked, clearly puzzled.

"So? What if it shows up? I doubt it's going to be too thrilled with uninvited house guests." Jenn said as if speaking to a small child.

"Uhm." Edwyrd was at a bit of a loss here. "Well, it's the only place Rupert knew." He looked apologetically at Rupert for laying the blame on him.

"You could have asked Gastropé. He's had the grand tour." Gastropé looked rather embarrassed.

Edwyrd simply said, "You could have suggested that." That caused Jenn to stop what she'd been about to say. Edwyrd was right and even though she wasn't in a good mood, she had to admit it, Rupert thought.

"Hmm, well, what do we do if it comes by?"

"Say, sorry to bother you, but do you have a cup of sugar?" Edwyrd suggested.

Jenn smiled grimly and shook her head. "I don't think so. You've never dealt with this demon. I suspect he'd simply bite your head off and then after he'd digested your brains, might think to ask."

This time it was Edwyrd who shook his head. "Why do you hate this demon so much? From what I've heard, all he's done is try to help you."

Jenn looked at him skeptically. "You have all this incredible power, and yet you know so little about demons?"

"Apparently," Edwyrd replied sarcastically.

"Demons are evil. E--V--I--L in all capital letters. Anyone stupid enough to trust one deserves to have their soul eaten."

"Do you really think demons eat souls?" Edwyrd asked incredulously.

"It doesn't really matter, does it? As everyone knows, demons have only one goal. Destruction. The destruction of all humankind, destruction of life, destruction of all Astlan. Destruction for the sake of destruction."

"How do you know that? Did the demons tell you this?" Edwyrd asked.

"Hah! Like you could trust anything a demon told you. I can't believe that you're either this naive or that you can think to defend them." Jenn paced back and forth a couple times. "It is taught to every child entering wizardry, as well as all children everywhere to a lesser degree, that demons are the agents of destruction. They rebelled against the gods at creation and have since done nothing but try and undo that creation."

Edwyrd apparently came up with a different tact, "if demons are so evil, such agents of destruction, the why do wizards use them? Wouldn't that make those who use them evil as well? People who summon or bind demons would thus be evil, people like Lenamare--or you?"

Jenn shouted indignantly, "I do not summon or bind demons!"

"Oh? Didn't you participate in summoning and binding Tom with Lenamare?"

Jenn sputtered, it took her a moment to come up with a response to that. "That was just a learning exercise. Part of a class, I had to attend. Lenamare demanded all his students attend!"

"So you're not evil, because you just did what you were told?"

"Look! I'm not evil, and yes I had no choice in summoning that demon; believe me, I'd rather not have."

"So you had no choice? Lenamare forced you to do it? Sort of like how Lenamare forced the demon to go out and slay the demons, wizards and soldiers attacking the wards? Sort of like Jehenna ordering the demon to attack Gastropé's people? The demon was ordered to do those things. Therefore, was it responsible for those evil acts? Wasn't it just doing what it was told?"

Jenn was nearly screeching by this point. "That's ridiculous!"

"Oh, and did Lenamare or Jehenna give the demon a choice? You know how this stuff works better than I. Do these spells leave the demon any free will?"

Jenn shook her head. "No," she admitted angrily, "but that's beside the point. It enjoyed doing those things. It enjoys killing and destroying things."

"Really," Edwyrd asked calmly, "and how do you know? Did you ask it?"

"Ask it,” she was staring at Edwyrd as if he'd just chopped his own head off and was sitting on it. "Ask it? Are you totally daft? Ask a demon if it enjoys destruction? Of course not! Ask the very archetype of Evil if it enjoys being evil?"

"Then how do you know?" Edwyrd persisted.

"Know! What's this about know? Of course I know! It’s by definition. Demons are evil, they are anti-creation incarnate!"

"Ahh!" Edwyrd said softly, calmingly, "But Jenn? By whose definition? The demons'? The Rod's or some ancient wizards'? Are the demons given any more choice in defining themselves as good or evil than they're given a choice in any of their other actions dictated by wizards? Were they given any more choice in defining themselves than we were in the Rod's definition of us?"

Jenn simply snorted. She shook her head. "You just don't understand anything. You just don't understand demons."

"Maybe," Edwyrd admitted quietly, "or maybe I just don't understand wizards."

Jenn looked at him, still somewhat as if he were insane, but also as if she just couldn't understand him or where he was coming from. As if she just couldn't fathom what drove him to such strange thoughts.

“Oh, and who’s boss vaporized a few thousand soldiers in a split second outside his former school?” Edwyrd asked, “You’re telling me that a mass murderer like Lenamare is one of the ‘good guys’ and the demon that saved your life, twice, was a ‘bad guy’?”

Jenn looked at Edwyrd in shock, her jaw moving, apparently unable to make a response. “I’m betting that your mentor,” Edwyrd continued, “killed more people in one second than most demons kill in an eternity.” Jenn sputtered, harrumphed and turned her back on the discussion.

During the entire argument both Gastropé and Maelen had looked on in shock and surprise. Both totally bemused by the sudden vehemence on both sides. Rupert had all he could do to keep from cheering Edwyrd on, even as he wondered at Jenn's irrationality.

All his life he'd wanted to know the answers to those very same questions. He'd raged day in and day out against those who'd tried to impose such definitions on him. Here Tom, his father, was arguing the very same argument he'd so often dreamed of arguing with a wizard. Like father, like son, Rupert beamed.

~

Field Protectator Wylan surreptitiously looked on as the series of suspects succinctly and systematically removed themselves from the local vicinity of his jurisdiction. He shook his head in bemusement. This was most serious. As the last of the felonious peripatetics disappeared through the opening in the fire, said fire diminished in size until it was reduced to nothingness. Wylan stepped forth to survey the scene of the suspects' justice evasion operation. He sniffed the air around the fire, and examined in minute detail the fire pit itself. "On the encouraging side, they will not have to be charged with reckless forestall endangerment through the unauthorized use of pyromantic techniques." His assistant nodded in agreement. "On the negative side, we will have to add evasion of justice resulting in fugitive status to their already long list of criminal convictions." He looked to his fellow law officer to ensure that the man was writing this down.

Wylan had met up with Assistant Vice-Constable Pyromancer Fiernon a few hours ago. The two had made judicious haste to the site of the suspects' campsite. They had observed said suspects for over an hour before the suspects had suddenly taken action and marched through the fire, failing to emerge on the other side. "To what location do you believe these vile henchmen of hell have abstained?" asked Fiernon.

Wylan frowned. "Your choice of the word hell may not be completely without meaningful merit. While I am not currently as well versed as some of my fellows in such matters as pertinent to this investigation, it is my belief, judging from the smell of sulfur and brimstone in the air, added to their already admittedly illicit and ill-advised demonic alliances, that they have absconded to the Abyss."

"The Abyss?" Fiernon was startled. "What is the state of our current extradition treaty with the Abyss?"

Wylan shook his head. "Unfortunately, not particularly good. What organized government said region has is notably lacking in cohesion and is further noticeably reticent to make any such treaty so as to uphold the due process of law. Experience has further taught us that their pursuance of the matters of justice is more than even criminally sporadic. In short, even given the existence of said treaty, it is highly unlikely to be upheld on the part of the Abyssal rulers."

Fiernon nodded. "This is therefore indicative that extradition via extra planar extraction is advisable?" he asked.

"Advisable yes." Wylan stated. "Feasible no. Said government, such as it is, is notably objective to incursion by outside elements. Such actions on our part are often met with severe resistance on their part. Further given no truly cohesive organized government institution that we can deal with, and no embassy on our part, locating such individuals is also extremely difficult."

"Nefarious nihilists! For the moment, they seem out of our pursuance. How I would love nothing more than for the jaws of justice to mercilessly masticate the miserably malicious malefactoring miscreantic malcontents!" Fiernon pounded his fist into the palm of his left hand.

"While the exhaustive exhibition of elegant eloquence in your exhortative elocution is extremely, nay exquisitely exacting in the extreme, and excessively encouraging to me, thus ensuring of my express agreement, I must say, do not give up hope!" Wylan paced around the campsite, looking for details. "For, as is well documented, such maloriferous misanthropes as these, frankly mystifying malefactors of malevolent mendacity and mongers of maladictive misbehavior, always return to the scene of their putrescent, puerile and pitiable perpetrations. To wit, in this case, they will return to Astlan. Of this you may rest assured."

Pointing to the heavens above, Wylan concluded. "Therefore, have no futile feeling of fearful fretting, as Justice shall prevail and the rapscallious vagabonds of cantankerous courtly contempt shall pay most dearly for the scandalous, nay, scoundrel-like, misdeeds and misappropriations of constabulary life." Fiernon bowed his head, grateful for the alliterative, yet nearly allegorical, postulations of reassurance provided by one who was so obviously a truly masterful legal discourser of the first rank.

"You were, as I believe was so efficaciously effected tonight to be demonstrated, correct in your initial estimations as to these villaicious varlets threat to Oorstemoth. Not only do I concur with your judgment, I feel that I must request that a full lack of judicial restraint be utilized in the capture and subsequent prosecution and execution of these savagely seedy suspects of sin." Wylan complimented and assured Fiernon. "I shall even now begin the undertaking of such steps as to ensure the eventual demise and destruction of said parties."

~

Edwyrd was sitting on Tom's throne, rather overlarge for Edwyrd's body, reviewing his argument with Jenn. No one had said much afterwards, they simply moved off to corners and sat and waited. It didn't seem to take quite an hour before Tom felt the summons from Tizzy.

This time it was similar to Jehenna's last summons. Much stronger than Rupert's, but without the demand that Lenamare had. As he felt the pull, Tom let his mind trace the mental path that the summons created. In a way, the gobbledygook words he'd used to describe what he was going to do, before they'd left were correct. It was a link, or mental thread, between Tizzy and himself. Only in this case the link was created by Tizzy doing the summoning.

Tom could 'feel' with his mind something like a string or path going to Tizzy and could thus get a view of where Tizzy was. Wherever that was, was dark. It seemed to be a large grassy field of some sort. He reached out and felt himself where Tizzy was. Simultaneously he felt himself in the cave. Using himself as the bridge along the link, he mentally dug a hole in the space between locations.

Each time he'd done this gateway, he'd done the visualization slightly differently, but each time it had worked. This time was no exception; he felt a hole in space opening around him. Apparently, the visualization wasn't as important as the intent and the knowledge of both ends. Widening the hole, he brought more of his consciousness to the cave. "OK, everyone! We have the gate. Time to go!"

Jenn sighed with relief, Gastropé giving her a reassuring smile, saying he'd known they'd be all right. Maelen simply stood up and dusted himself off, picking up the donkey's reins. Maelen looked at the dark hole in space near the throne, shaking his head he lead the donkey towards it and then through it. Still controlled, the donkey caused no problems.

Next came Gastropé who stepped through as soon as the donkey's tail had completely crossed the threshold of the gateway. Jenn straightened her clothes and moved towards the gateway, looking around the room. "Rupert? Where's Rupert?"

Tom looked around the cave. The boy wasn't in it. Apparently, he'd left the cave, no one had noticed. "I don't know, he must have wandered out."

"Curse that child!" Jenn said, shaking her head in frustration. "Rupert!" she yelled. "Come on! it's time to go!" They waited for a response but none came. "Where the Abyss is he?" worry showing through Jenn's voice.

Tom! Tom heard Tizzy's voice in his head. That was strange; it was like telepathy, he guessed. How was that happening? Was it this link he had? Hurry up, the gateway is spilling light into the surrounding area; someone is bound to see it soon. What's the matter, what are you taking so long for? Trying to make yourself another kid? Tom just grimaced at the little demon.

"Jenn, we can't keep this link much longer!" Tom said.

"Well I'm certainly not leaving him here!" Jenn cried almost hysterically.

"No, no!" Tom assured her thinking quickly, "but I'll stay and find him. You have to go through. I'll find him and then bring us both back."

"No, I'm not leaving without Rupert!" Jenn shouted.

Tom shook his head, "Jenn, you can't go out and find him; your spell won't hold up to the heat. Mine will. You go through; I can pull us both out the same way. You just have Tizzy repeat this summons in...I don't know...three hours or so, at dawn say."

Jenn looked at him for a moment, "No," she finally said. "I can't leave the boy in the Abyss."

"Jenn," Edwyrd pleaded. "Please, believe me. I can find him; he will be all right. I swear to you by all that I hold sacred that I'll find him and bring him through. You have my word that I won't leave the Abyss until I find him."

Jenn bit her fingernails. Edwyrd knew she didn't want to leave the boy, he hoped she realized that there was no choice. "You swear to Maera? On your heart, upon your soul of souls?"

"I swear to Maera, fervently and devotedly. May I be doomed to spend the rest of eternity here in the Abyss if I lie, or if I fail." Rather a hollow promise Edwyrd realized. For one thing, he had no idea who Maera was, and for the other, he was already doomed to the Abyss for all eternity. Jenn just frowned uncertainly, but her brow was already lined with sweat from the heat. She had to know there was no way she could handle the outside temperatures, needed to find Rupert.

"RUPERT! COME HERE!" She yelled one last time with all her might. They waited several more moments but no Rupert came. Now Edwyrd was getting concerned. Biting her lower lip, Jenn stepped closer to the gateway. "Please find him, Edwyrd, not just for my sake, but for his own?"

"I will, Jenn; I swear it. Don't worry, I will ensure his safety." Jenn gave Edwyrd's hand a quick squeeze then backed through the gateway, looking longingly up the passageway from the cave. Edwyrd watched her go through, feeling her fear.

As soon as she was through, he called to Tizzy, Tizzy, summon me again at dawn; I've got to find out where Rupert wandered off to.

Probably the courts, Tizzy replied, every kid wants to see those. See ya later! With that last thought, Edwyrd allowed the hole in space to fill itself in with reality. Rupert, that kid was more trouble, Edwyrd thought to himself.

With the departure of the wizards, the Were Light was also gone. The cave was quite dark. It had certainly not been that way before. Since he was going to be here for a while, there was no reason to limit himself in his search. He might as well be comfortable and have all of his abilities available to him. Quickly, Edwyrd stripped off his clothes and put them on the table. With that done, he let himself relax completely.

Even as he did so the room began to lighten. Within moments, not only had his viewpoint shifted upwards by five or six feet, his eyesight was able to see everything in the room as well as if it were day. Marching determinedly, he went up the passageway to the cave's exit.

As he reached the small ledge that marked the cave's mouth at the top of the mountain, he found a pile of human clothes. It didn't take much looking to realize they were Rupert's and it didn't take much to guess what the kid had done. Kids, Tom sighed to himself. He scanned the red sky above, looking for any flying silhouettes. He didn't see any. He then turned his gaze downward toward the valley.

He had to stare for a while, but eventually he found an unusual spot on the valley floor below. It was only a few hundred feet horizontally from him, but about a couple thousand vertical. His cave was on a very steep mountain. He swooped down off his perch towards the speck below. As he came upon the spot, he shook his head.

A small winged, burgundy humanoid was laying on the ground. It waved at him as he approached. Actually, it was sort of tilted over backwards. It's lower legs, below the knee were stuck in the ground, his upper body bent over and resting on the ground, almost like sitting. Tom knew the position. "Legs hurt?" he asked Rupert.

Rupert smiled slightly and nodded strongly. "Like crazy. I'm also stuck."

"Flying is not as easy as it looks, is it?" Tom said with the air of a learned expert. He had to remind himself that it had only been a couple weeks ago that he'd been in the same position. "Here." He reached out his hands so Rupert could grab them. As the boy did so, Tom pulled straight upward, lifting the boy and his legs out of the hole. He met a slight resistance and Rupert groaned, and then popped free of the dirt.

"Oh...." Rupert moaned as Tom set him back down on the ground gently, before landing himself. He looked down into the boy’s eyes. "You know, of course, that Jenn went into hysterics when she found you missing?"

"I'm sorry." Rupert said sincerely. "I just went out for a look again, and--well, I couldn't help myself. I had to try." He bowed his head. Tom sighed, he understood.

"Well, they've gone back to Astlan," he pulled the boy forward, "we'll follow in a few hours when Tizzy summons me again. I'm just glad you're all right." He gave Rupert a hug. Once again, proportion was balanced between them, and Rupert's horns only came up to Tom's ribcage. He hugged the boy tightly, patting him between the wings. Rupert smiled fondly upward at him. "OK, boy. No son of mine is going to go around putting holes in my front lawn. We'll have to teach you what to do with those wings, aside from cooling yourself!" Tom shook his head and smiled as Rupert grinned back. Rupert's smile didn't look anything but what it was now, in no way was it frightening. Interesting, Tom thought.

Like most young kids, Rupert was a fast learner. Within a half hour, Tom had Rupert soaring over the valley with him. Showing him some of the finer points he himself had mastered just recently. After one extremely high dive, in which they nearly scraped the bottom of the valley, they pulled up to near the same height as the top of the mountain. There they rested for a moment, just hovering in the air.

"Wow!" Rupert exclaimed. "This is so excellent. I can't believe how much fun it is." Tom had to smile, flying was fun. It was even more fun when you had someone to enjoy it with. It was also fun to watch the boy's enthusiasm.

"Ah-hem," a voice said behind and below them. Tom started slightly. He looked down and over to the voice. About twenty feet away, standing in a respectful pose, was another demon. This was not a demon Tom had seen before. Instantly he was on guard.

The demon was actually quite small. Perhaps a little bigger than human Rupert, but thinner. Almost like one of the smaller Sidhe he'd seen in Hoggensforth. However, this demon had cat-like eyes, a small beard and mustache and rather small bat-wings. He was also dressed. The little demon was wearing some sort of leather vest and pants. How very strange.

"Yes?" Tom asked, "Can I help you."

"Sorry to interrupt. However, I've been trying to meet you for some time now, with little success."

"Really? And who might you be?" Tom asked, Rupert looking on.

"Antefalken's the name. Barding's the game." The small demon smiled with a slight bow, "Actually, I at least think you're who I've been trying to meet. You are," he glanced between Rupert and Tom, "the demon called Tom?"

Tom nodded, "That's me? I might ask how you know me, not to be rude, but paranoia does not seem completely out of the question at the moment."

"Certainly true! Especially with all the individuals involved in the situation, right now. However, let me assure you, I mean you no harm. I'm a friend of Boggy's and he told me all about you."

"Boggy? I haven't seen him in a while either. Not since he parted ways with his master."

"And parted his master," Antefalken added, "at least as I heard it from him." Tom just nodded.

"So then? Now I know why you know me. Mind if I ask why you want to find me?" Tom hated to sound so suspicious, but he was a little leery anymore of strange demons.

"My understanding is that you work for Lenamare?"

"Work, may not be the correct term. However we do seem to have a one-way binding contract that seems to benefit him more than me." Antefalken smiled at Tom’s joke.

"Ah then I heard right. You see, I am involved, indirectly, with resolving a dispute between Lenamare and Exador and was trying to gather independent evidence to help in the ruling."

"Like an independent counsel? Investigator?"

Antefalken nodded, "Precisely, in fact I work for a member of the Wizard's Council in Freehold."

"Really? Lenamare and Exador are there to fight their battle in court then?"

"Yes."

"I'd suggest your court put up concrete shielding in that case."

Antefalken looked alarmed. "Why? Are they planning something?"

"No," Tom shook his head, "nothing like that. It's just that whenever those two get together, lots of violent and explosive things occur."

"Like the explosion that took out the school?"

"Yeah, like that. Seems to have been a nuclear blast of some sort. Severe radiation and all. Not exactly a safe place to be these days. However, Exador's people seem to want to stick around. For their sake, I hope Exador understands what he's dealing with."

"Why?" Antefalken asked. "Is there some delayed effect spell in progress?"

"No, not a spell really. It's just that when you set off a nuclear blast, you release a lot of radiation, gamma rays and such. This does a lot of damage to people immediately, but it also makes things nearby radioactive. If you stay around them too long, you get sick and can die from it. It also makes people sterile."

"Hmm," Antefalken rubbed his chin. "I wasn't aware of this."

"Yeah, well if Exador's not doing something to protect them, he should evacuate from the area. When I was last there, they were sitting in the middle of the crater on a peninsula. Not a good idea."

"That was certainly a nasty spell that Lenamare got off."

"Lenamare seems to like overkill from what I can see." Tom stated, "Doing anything small is not his idea of doing something."

"From your tone of voice, I take you don't care for the man?" Antefalken asked.

Tom just grimaced at the demon as if he were crazy. "To use the popular expression, he's my accursed master. By definition, I hate him. Besides that even, I don't particularly care for his attitude." Tom laughed internally at his use of ‘by definition’ thinking of his argument with Jenn.

Antefalken nodded, "So you think Exador's in the right then?"

Tom shook his head. "I didn't say that at all. I've never actually met the man, but as far as I can tell he's at least as crazy and probably a lot more unpleasant than Lenamare. After all, he drug an army through the Abyss to make a sneak attack on Lenamare. Further he rules his army through fear and intimidation." Tom said, thinking of what Gastropé had said about Exador. "He's got all the makings of a classic fantasy villain. Lenamare's just an asshole, with a really snotty bitch."

"Drug an army through the Abyss?" Antefalken was taken aback. "How did he do that?"

Tom shrugged, he didn't want to sound ignorant, all he knew was what Gastropé had told them, so he spoke with more authority than he really felt. "Abyssal Switch spell; it interchanges Astlanian real-estate for Abyss land, and anything on that real-estate. Do a couple cycles, get everyone here, cycle them back in reverse to someplace else in Astlan. Highway through Hell rather than Highway to Hell." He tried to make it sound common place and simple.

Antefalken just shook his head. "The question is why? Why would he go to so much trouble?"

Tom shrugged, "I don't know. I still haven't figured out why wizards can't tell the difference between people from outer planes and demons. Given that I'm in that boat, how would I even begin to understand how wizards view each other."

"OK, you have a point there." He looked at Rupert again. "You know, you two look mighty similar." Tom smiled, Rupert spoke up.

"He's my father." Tom tried not to grimace. He'd been going along with the boy's fantasy but didn't want to get too many people wrapped up in it. The more people that started to believe this, the more work he'd have to straighten things out later.

Antefalken raised his eyebrows. "Father. But I thought Boggy told me that..." he was looking at Tom. Tom shook his head.

"Boggy sometimes is confused on some things but not others. Things aren't always as they may appear." Tom hoped that the demon would get the hint that he didn't want to discuss it at the moment, and hopefully the demon would understand that it was because Rupert was around. He felt Rupert looking at him, clearly not understanding.

"Hmm," Antefalken said. "Well, anyway. I shouldn't keep you. Father and son at play," he smiled. “I've got to get back to the courts. If you happen to get in town, look me up."

Tom nodded, "Will do. Nice to meet you." Tom had no idea where these courts were. Tizzy kept mentioning them too, as did Rupert. Sounded like somewhere out of a Zelazny novel. Antefalken nodded and waved as he flew off.

Rupert and Tom watched him fly off. When he was out of sight, Rupert asked him, "What did you mean by things aren't always as they seem?" Tom wasn't sure how to answer this one, without a full confession at this time. They had such a good time together so far, he hated to ruin it now.

"Well, first off. Boggy is Tizzy's partner. Thus I think you understand what I mean by telling him not to trust Boggy on everything he hears. But most importantly, until you know someone, especially a demon, it really isn't a good idea to reveal too much information to them. If they're really working for someone else, even if under duress by some wizard, they might be able to use that information against you. Thus the more I can keep him off balance the better. I think, Antefalken is on the up and up, but if he isn't, I'd hate to see him try to use you or harm you to get at me." While technically all true, that really wasn't the whole story, but he just seemed to keep digging himself into a deeper and deeper hole.

Rupert looked down at his hooves. "Oh. I'm sorry, I shouldn't have said anything." He sounded pretty down about it.

Tom shook his head, he hadn't meant to shift the defensive to Rupert. "Don't be. I'm not sorry you said anything." He grabbed the kid for another hug, this one in midair. "Those are just good rules to live by in general. They don't always apply, and I'm sure you didn't hurt anything. I suspect this Antefalken's legit. He did know Boggy, and Boggy trusted him enough to tell him about me. So don't you worry."

Rupert looked up at him. "You sure?"

"Positive."





Chapter 63


The hole in reality had opened onto a grassy plain. This was not, Gastropé thought, what he would have pictured Freehold to look like. It did not, however, take him long to realize that the demon had not deceived them. To the not too distant north was a large number of lights. These lights appeared to be coming from a very large city. It was hard to make out, but the city appeared to have a wall around it, and the lights were from a few large structures that were higher than the walls. It must be most impressive in the daylight Gastropé decided.

He turned around as Jenn eventually came through the hole. The hole itself was a ring of fire in midair which gave off a not inconsiderable amount of light. In this light, Jenn appeared extremely hesitant about being there. "What's the matter Jenn?" Gastropé asked.

"Rupert. He wasn't in the cave. He'd wandered off and we couldn't find him to bring him through." Gastropé cursed softly to himself. That was all they needed.

"What are we going to do?" he asked the group.

"Edwyrd said he'd stay and search for him. I wanted too, but he insisted I wouldn't be able to go outside, but that he could. I hope I did the right thing by agreeing." Jenn said, almost to tears.

"You did, child," Maelen came and put an arm around her. "The heat of the Abyss would be too much for any cantrip. However, what Edwyrd and Rupert were using would be strong enough."

"You’re sure?" she asked looking up into his eyes.

"Very sure. Edwyrd is a first class animage and young Rupert is not completely unskilled." Maelen assured her. "They're using the same discipline I did. Works like a charm." He smiled reassuringly at Jenn.

"Edwyrd definitely is a good animage then?" Jenn's mind seemed to be wandering; she was obviously distracted with fear for Rupert. "But wait! Rupert's not an animage! He's a novitiate wizard! He wouldn't know any animage stuff."

Maelen blinked in the dark, surprise showing in his voice. "You're sure? I wouldn't have guessed that. I read him when I met him. His aura was similar to Edwyrd's. Edwyrd's is unmistakably that of an animage, and while Rupert's is not clearly that of an animage, it was similar enough in other ways to Edwyrd’s that I assumed he was a student of Edwyrd's. Despite what they'd claimed. I suppose he could have been a novitiate wizard. It's really hard to tell when a person is just starting to control mana, how they do it." He scratched his head.

"I'm very certain. He was at Lenamare's school. We mentioned that in our story. I even taught him many of his lessons." Jenn said.

Maelen shrugged, "Fine, I could certainly have been confused by other parts of their auras. They definitely have something in common. I'm just not sure what then." Gastropé noticed Tizzy hopping up and down on his four feet as if he were bursting with some secret he couldn't tell. His cheeks were bulging around his pipe that had somehow reappeared in his mouth with smoke puffing out of it. Gastropé just shook his head at the crazy demon.

Gastropé broke in at this point. "Anyway, it doesn't matter. Remember how Edwyrd said he'd maintain Rupert's protection in the Abyss? Rupert therefore has the same protection as Edwyrd."

"Even better!" Maelen exclaimed to Jenn. "In order to protect Rupert, Edwyrd has to have a link to the boy. That link will allow him to trace the boy's whereabouts with no problem."

At this point Jenn noticed the hopping demon. She glared at him and snapped, "What is it?"

"Can't tell." The demon blurted as he pulled his pipe from his mouth releasing a huge cloud of smoke, which quickly engulfed them. Maelen wrinkled his nose, sniffed a few times and got a thoughtful look on his face.

"What do you mean you can't tell?" Jenn demanded, waving her hand to get rid of the funny smelling smoke.

"I mean I can't tell."

"Demon," Jenn warned, "don't try my patience. What can't you tell?"

"Nothing, forget it. I can't tell."

"Tizzy." This time Maelen was looking the demon straight in the eyes. "If you know something that will affect the boy, you'd better tell us."

"Can't. They wouldn't like me telling you."

"Who wouldn't like you telling us?" Gastropé asked.

"Edwyrd and Rupert." Tizzy hopped in a circle around them.

"Are you telling me you know what's so similar about their auras?" Maelen demanded. Tizzy just smiled and nodded.

"Then tell us!" Jenn shouted.

"Nope. Shouldn't have said anything. Sorry, forget it." The demon kept prancing.

"Demon," Gastropé said in his most persuasive voice. "If you want us to keep liking you, you'll tell us."

That stopped Tizzy in his tracks. He looked quizzically at Gastropé. "You telling me you like me?"

"Yes he is, Tizzy," Maelen said, picking up on Gastrope's idea. "We do. You’re really one of the nicest demons we've ever met. You’re good company, fun to be with."

"Really?" Tizzy asked, trying to decide if they were teasing him.

"Certainly." Gastropé said. "Further, if it hadn't been for you flying all the way here, we'd have never escaped from the Rod. You've really helped us. So why wouldn't we like you?" Jenn was staring back and forth between the two men as if she thought they'd both completely gone off a mental cliff together.

Tizzy smiled and looked down at the ground. "Well, that is true. I didn't have to do that."

"No you didn't, and we really appreciate your doing so." Maelen told Tizzy.

"Would you say you're my friends?" Tizzy asked.

"We'd like to be." Gastropé said carefully, "but friends don't keep important secrets from each other. Especially if not telling those secrets could hurt other friends."

Tizzy shrugged slightly, "I've never had no friends except Boggy and Tom, and Antefalken, oh and Rupert of course."

"We'd like to think of you as our friends." Maelen said very seriously.

"Well," Tizzy admitted, "I suppose I could tell you the big thing."

"Please Tizzy, it's very important." Gastrope' said.

"Well, OK then!" Tizzy said brightly, "but if you’re my friends and I do this for you, you've got to promise to help me someday if I need it!"

"Certainly." Gastropé assured the demon. "You have my word on it."

"Mine too." Maelen said. Tizzy looked at Jenn, twisting his head to see what her answer would be. Maelen nudged her in the back.

"Ugghhh. You people. If that's how it's got to be...then you have mine as well, demon." Jenn finally said.

"Good!" Tizzy shouted, dancing again. "Edwyrd..." Tizzy drawled.

"Yes?" Gastropé urged.

"Is Rupert's father!" Tizzy announced loudly.

"What!" Jenn screeched. "All that nonsense for that garbage!" She sounded mad. "How do you expect us to believe that! Edwyrd is Rupert's cousin. There is no way Edwyrd could be old enough to be Rupert's father. You're crazy, demon!"

Gastropé felt almost the same way. Maelen on the other hand was looking thoughtful, stroking his chin. Tizzy just looked at Jenn, smiling, not caring what she believed. "Hold off, Jenn." Maelen admonished her. "It may not be impossible. I'd really been wondering how anyone so young could be as well trained and skilled as Edwyrd. Now it makes more sense. "

"How can it make more sense?" Jenn demanded, incredulously.

"Well, simple. He's a lot older than he looks." Maelen stated as if were the most natural thing in the world.

"Well obviously! That explains it!" Jenn said sarcastically, "nobody looks that much younger!"

"Really Jenn? It's not that hard for a powerful wizard or animage to slow the aging process, or even reverse it. How old do you think I am?" Maelen asked.

Jenn just shook her head. "I don't know! Sixty, sixty five."

"I started healing people over seventy-five years ago. When I was only a little younger than you."

Gastropé and Jenn both looked at him in surprise. "You're saying you are like ninety?" Gastrope' asked. He couldn't believe that.

"Ninety-two next quarter month to be exact." Maelen declared. "So you see, it's not impossible that Edwyrd could be in his thirties or forties, or even older. He's just good enough that either he doesn't age, or he can make himself younger. It would certainly not be inconsistent with the other things I've seen him do. Worse come to worst, he's just shape changed himself younger."

"I guess," Gastropé admitted, "that you could be right. After all, I know of a lot of wizards that are over a hundred. Human ones. Elves or dwarves would certainly be that old.”

Jenn looked rather defeated. "Yeah, I just find it hard to believe. You just don't think of people that powerful, tramping around in the woods being hunted by religious fanatics. That's for us little people to do. People like that are the Lenamares, or Jehennas. Always in charge, always in control, running things from a comfortable position."

"Well, whatever the case, they'll have some explaining to do when they get back." Gastropé stated. "By the way, how are they getting back?"

"Tizzy is supposed to reopen the link at dawn." Jenn told him. She looked up at the night sky. "I'd guess that will be in about three hours."

"Well, since we aren't going to get into the city before dawn anyway, we might as well camp here and try to get some rest for those hours." Maelen suggested.

~

The morning sun shone brightly down into the private garden in which Damien was eating his breakfast. He broke an orange in two absently as he listened to Antefalken recount his encounter with the demon Tom. As he was preparing to pop a slice in his mouth, Antefalken finished. "So," Damien said holding the orange slice before his mouth, "your opinion is that this Tom is neutral? Not in either camp?" He bit down on the orange slice.

"Yes. I truth read him the entire time and didn't really catch him in anything. Some of the stuff towards the end was suspicious but not any outright lie. I'd have to say that as fourth order demons go, he's a pretty decent fellow. " Damien finished off another couple orange slices.

"On the other hand," Antefalken continued, "the existence of a demon son pretty much precludes him being new. He didn't come in from the outer depths just recently. Not if he has a son."

"Well," Damien said with a smile, "you are the expert on demonic children." Antefalken smirked at him. "I'll trust you on that one."

"Well, it stands to reason. He would have had to sire the child since the time he was first captured. The probability of a father and son demon captured from the outer regions simultaneously is just too remote to conceive of. Thus, he's been around for several years. I have no idea how old the child was, with demons age is very hard to tell. Even physical size can be deceiving." Antefalken bit into an apple.

"What's your guess?"

"I really don't know," Antefalken said as he swallowed his mouthful of apple. "Given that the kid looks identical except for size, and rather acted like a young boy, I'd have to judge by appearances and what I know of similar circumstances. First, the kid is probably no more than a decade, maybe two old. Second the kid is either pure bred demon, or if a half breed, then Tom is extremely powerful. Most demonic children split somewhere between the power of their parents. Thus, a fourth order demon and a human will usually produce second or third order children. Occasionally a completely normal human child or one with nonphysical demonic attributes will appear. Only extremely rarely would you get another fourth order.

“If Tom had mated with another fourth, his son would, of course be a fourth; however pure bred demons are extremely rare and always intentional. Very few demoness want to have a baby; and both parties have to supply animus. With half-breeds, the mother can supply the majority of the animus.” Antefalken continued.

"Appearance is also a puzzle, normally demonic children resemble their children about as much as human children. For the child to be a virtual clone...well, also if we go by appearances and this child grows up to be nearly identical in looks and power...In that case this Tom must be extremely powerful. Of course this all depends on whether Tom has any nonstandard demonic abilities, and whether the child will also."

"Non-standard demonic abilities?" Damien asked.

"Well, not really nonstandard. No more than being a wizard, priest or any other mana wielder is nonstandard for humans. Essentially, I mean if the demon has any conscious mana wielding abilities. Many demons have certain talents, if you will. Lightning bolts, shoot fire from their eyes, etc., in general however, these are limited and one trick options. As you are aware, most of the truly powerful demons have conscious control of mana. Similar to a wizard or other human."

"All the archdemons are essentially wizards, aren't they? I mean they study magic like any human mage." Damien asked.

"Wizards, priests, druids, animage you name it. Anything a human can do in terms of mana wielding, some demons can too. Not as many demons as humans, elves or dwarves or such, but some few are. The strongest ones are almost always mana wielders. Everything fifth order and above does something, and most of the more powerful fourth orders as well. Remember, this ordering thing is all a made up classification scheme anyway. Demons run in a continuum of power." Antefalken sipped on a glass of wine that had been on a small table beside him. As usual, he was perched on the back of a chair.

Damien knew most of this. He just liked to periodically have it confirmed by someone on the inside. The demonic children, though, he knew little about.

"Actually," Antefalken continued after a moment, "about any profession you see in Astlan, and some you don't, are done by some demon or the other. When you're immortal, you tend to pick up hobbies, and you become very good at them."

"So, to get back to the matter at hand. What do you think about this Tom, his power? How much of what he seems is he?"

"Again hard to say. If I guessed by his friendly nature, I'd guess Lenamare's claims to be correct. He's a new fourth order demon. If I guessed by the kid...overall and assuming the kid is going to grow to be a fourth order...then most likely this Tom is really an archdemon. A fourth having a fourth order child is not totally out of the question, it does happen. A fourth having a fourth order child that is nearly identical stretches the imagination. For an archdemon such a thing is certainly possible. In this event, the lowest case scenario is a fourth so close to being a fifth that it doesn't matter."

“This assumes a pure bred. What about as a half-breed?” Damien asked, not sure he wanted to hear the answer.

“I’m not aware of any half-breed greater than a three.” Antefalken said. “That would be about as powerful as archdemon would likely produce.” Antefalken made a sucking noise on his teeth. “I don’t want to think what it would mean to have a fourth order half-breed.”

“Particularly if it’s running around anywhere near us.” Damien observed. Antefalken simply nodded.

Damien shook his head, not sure what to think. "And naturally," Damien looked back at the demon, "if he really is a powerful archdemon...or...more...then he could make himself appear to be a new fourth order demon with no problem." Damien frowned at this one. He really didn't like where this line of thought was going.

After eating a muffin, Damien asked, "What about this story about Exador and the Abyssal Switch?"

"Tom seemed to know all about it. Acted as if such things were common knowledge. I'm not aware of such a thing." Antefalken told him.

Damien nodded. "I am, though. I've seen it mentioned in some really old texts. If Exador really did this, then he's upped the power ante in this game. It's at least as hard or harder spell than Lenamare's little explosion. I find him doing it hard to believe. It's one of those spells of legend. You know, supposed to exist but no one knows of anyone doing it. Used to be used, supposedly, for switching a piece of land into the Abyss and leaving it until the occupants were dead. So casual and frequent, yet well thought out, use by Exador for transporting so many men...well that indicates a lot more powerful a mage than Exador pretends to be."

"None of what I learned from Tom seemed exactly comforting." Antefalken commented.

"Nor the fact that your friend Tom knew so much about the Abyssal Switch spell. That would indicate he is a very powerful spell user." Damien stated as he poured himself some hot tea.

"Really sounds like your friend Lenamare has bitten off more than he can chew. On all fronts." Antefalken commented with a grin.

"Not my friend." Damien corrected his bard.





Chapter 64


"My book!" Lenamare exclaimed grabbing the book right out of Jenn's hand. Almost the first question out of the man's mouth when he'd seen them was, "Where's my book, girl?" Not, "Hi, glad to see your still alive," but rather "where's my book?" Edwyrd had to admit, he didn't like the way the man treated humans any better than he liked the way the man treated demons.

The summoning at dawn had proven no problem. They'd come through on schedule with no problem. Jenn had sobbed with joy and hugged Rupert, before yelling at him for running off. After they'd gotten such amenities out of the way, they'd proceeded across the plane to the city gates.

They'd gotten there just as the gates were opening. The guards had questioned them about their business in the city fairly carefully. Actually, Maelen had told them the guards wouldn't have cared at all except that they were bringing a demon in. Tizzy had presented something of a problem.

The demon had had no desire to wait outside, and couldn't just fly over the walls due to some sort of wards on them. Thus he'd been forced to accompany the party. They'd decided they'd pass him off as Gastropé's slave. Gastropé had donned a cloak, and Tizzy carried the tail of it above the ground. The guards, naturally, were leery of the demon, but seemed to have no major objections. As long as Gastropé signed in with his full name and promised to report his and his demon's whereabouts to the city constable each day.

After that they'd marched down the main street of the city and up to the Council's Palace in the center. It was actually a remarkable place. It was, to all intents and purposes, a large fortress composed of nearly a hundred towers of various shapes and sizes. There were several large cathedral-like buildings between towers, as well as just long buildings connecting the whole thing into a single edifice. It was certainly the largest building Edwyrd had seen in Astlan. Also given the sheer area it encompassed on the ground, it would probably count as the largest building he personally had ever been in.

They'd walked in and up to a central information desk. Jenn had asked the elf, Edwyrd was certain the being could be nothing else, where they might find Lenamare. Surprisingly enough, the elf didn't even have to look that up. He knew immediately where Lenamare's quarters were. Thus wasting no time they'd followed the elf's directions and soon found themselves knocking on Lenamare's door.

Edwyrd had wondered about such lax security. The front desks in all large buildings he was familiar with required ID’s to get into. Although he supposed one would have to be pretty sure of oneself to walk up and knock on Lenamare’s door.

The wizard had opened it himself. He'd taken one look at Jenn and shouted, "Jehenna!" The woman had come up to the door behind Lenamare. Lenamare stepped out of the way, indicating they should enter. They did and Lenamare quickly shut the door behind them. It was at that point, he'd demanded, "Where's my book, girl?"

Jenn, apparently as shocked as the rest of them by the greeting, had simply reached into her robe and pulled the book out. She tried to hand it to Lenamare. He grabbed it out of her hand, saying, "My book!" Jehenna also was staring intently at the book. For a few moments both of them ignored the rest of their guests as they hungrily examined the book to verify its existence.

Jehenna sighed and looked at Jenn. "Girl. I am so happy to see this book safe back in our possession, that I am willing to overlook the fact that you caused the whole problem in the first place."

"Me?" Jenn asked shocked.

"Certainly you," Jehenna said unemotionally, "if you hadn't switched your adolescent scribblings with this book, we'd have never lost it. You don't know how Lenamare and I have worried and fretted over this book." Jenn just opened and shut her mouth a couple of times, speechless.

"You’re damn lucky to get this book back to us, Jenn." Lenamare said. "More people than you can imagine would be more than willing to kill you for it."

"Kill me for it?" Jenn asked in a small voice, nearly dazed out of her mind by the reception.

"Certainly, Exador to name only one." Jehenna stated.

"Exador?" Jenn said weakly.

"Not to mention, I don't know how you avoided the archdemon."

"Archdemon?" Jenn looked about ready to faint. Both Edwyrd and Gastropé propped her up with their hands.

"Certainly." Jehenna stated matter-of-factly, "Trisfelt has reported to us most reliably, that as we speak there is an archdemon advancing on Freehold with its horde."

"Intent on this book, I guarantee you." Lenamare stated. "You don't know how lucky you are to get it to us where we can keep it safe."

"If either had caught you, this book would have been forfeit. Your life as well, of course." Jehenna told her. Edwyrd had to swallow; he could imagine what was running through Jenn's mind. Exador's people had caught her. It was only blind luck Rupert had grabbed the book back. Further given Jenn's opinions on demons she couldn't like the idea of an archdemon hunting for the book.

Edwyrd wasn't sure what an archdemon was, but he'd heard himself referred to as a greater demon, an archdemon must be like a fifth order demon or so. He really wouldn't have wanted to meet one of those on the road. That would have been unpleasant to say the least. Much worse than the Rod. He wondered where the archdemon was and what it would do when it got to Freehold.

Lenamare and Jehenna both seemed to notice the rest of the party at the same time. They looked at Rupert, who they recognized. The rest of the party they didn't know and were frowning over. "Who are your friends, girl?" Jehenna asked. She was staring at Tizzy most intently.

"Uhm," Jenn could hardly think she was so stunned, so Edwyrd spoke up.

"I'm Edwyrd, Rupert's cousin." He stuck out his hand. Both Lenamare and Jehenna just stared at him coldly, making no move to take it. Needing to do something with it, he pointed to the others. "This is Maelen a Seer and Healer," Maelen nodded coldly. Edwyrd pointed to Gastropé, "This is the wizard Gastropé who we encountered and was of great assistance in returning. And that's his demon." He pointed last to Tizzy. He didn't want to give Lenamare any indication of Tizzy's name, full or not.

The two simply stared at them for a moment. "Seer and Healer, hmm?" Jehenna said turning her attention to Maelen. Maelen stared her straight in the eyes. Neither blinked. Finally, Lenamare intervened as it began to look like it would go on forever.

"Yes, well. We can always use another lightning bolt in the fray that's coming," he nodded to Gastropé. "And healers are always welcome in a battle." He stepped so as to block the stares between Jehenna and Maelen. Maelen nodded to him. "Rupert is one of ours of course. Do you do anything useful?" He asked Edwyrd.

Edwyrd had really had it with this asshole. He nearly turned to flame right then and there and gave the guy a bear hug, but he restrained himself, somehow. He frowned at Lenamare and said very sternly, "I am not without my own...talents." While Lenamare might be a super-powerful wizard, and Edwyrd a sixteen year old boy, Tom was a greater demon who'd gone head to head with Lenamare before and made the man sweat. He wasn't going to be intimidated at this point.

Whatever Lenamare saw or heard was apparently sufficient for he shrugged and said, "Very well, I'm sure we'll find uses for your...talents. I'll arrange rooms for you. I suppose at the same time I should see about some for Trisfelt and his students. They'll be arriving sometime in the next few days."

Perhaps an hour later, Lenamare had gotten them rooms. Nothing quite so fancy as Lenamare's own, of course. However, still much nicer than what they'd had on the ship. As on the ship after the battle, it was once again two to a room. Rupert and Edwyrd took one, Gastropé and Maelen another. Jenn got one of her own. Tizzy got shoved in with Gastropé and Maelen, since he was theoretically Gastropé’s demon. The rooms were in a part of the palace that was about fifteen minutes’ walk from Lenamare's quarters. Edwyrd did not object too much to the close proximity, he figured it could have been worse; it could have been a lot closer.

As they left Lenamare with a steward to show them the way, Lenamare told them that he'd expect them for dinner in the evening and would send someone for them. After they were out of sight, Jenn had remarked "How generous of him to allow us to dine with him. Maybe then he'll bother to ask how Rupert and I managed to survive being abandoned by his girlfriend." She just shook her head. Edwyrd felt about the same way.

The steward showed them to their rooms and gave them directions to the closest cafeteria where they could charge food to their rooms and Lenamare’s account. Jenn smiled at that, obviously planning for a feast.

After they settled into their rooms, deciding to get some long deserved rest. Rupert jumped in his bed, smiling at Edwyrd. "Thanks again for the flying lesson, Father. I really enjoyed them." Rupert seemed a bit tired, and ready to close his eyes at any moment.

"Me too." Edwyrd smiled back. He, of course, was not the least bit tired. He leaned back in his bed anyway. He didn't have much else to do. Actually, he could think about strategies, he supposed. If an archdemon was coming, guess who'd get shoved into battle. Not to mention the Rod. They'd still probably have to deal with them. At least for the moment they were in a slightly safer position.

Edwyrd supposed he should practice some of his demonic abilities. For one thing, he should practice them in his true form, and in his Edwyrd form too. For all out battle, he'd have to revert to his true form, but for little things it would be good to know his limits. Actually, it would be good to know his true form limits as well.

The room was just big enough that he could change back, but he wasn't too thrilled. There didn't seem to be a lock on the door and if someone walked in it could be awkward to say the least. He looked over to Rupert, who'd fallen fast asleep. Having been up all night had been hard on his companions. He'd really have to break Rupert of this sleeping habit though. Or maybe he should figure out some way of developing one. He smiled to himself, looking around the room for some candles to practice lighting.

About an hour and a half after they'd settled in a knock came at Edwyrd's door. Edwyrd got up and went over to the door, mentally extinguishing the four candles he'd lit. He opened the heavy oak door to find a young man on the other side wearing some sort of uniform.

"Good day," said the young man.

"Good day," Edwyrd returned.

"Sir, my lord Councilor Damien has sent me to convey his wishes that you and your party might join him for lunch today, if it would be convenient for you."

"I don't believe I know Councilor Damien." Edwyrd said puzzled. He certainly didn't know anyone other than Lenamare and Jehenna in Freehold.

"Certainly, I'm sure. However, Councilor Damien does know of your party and is most desirous of meeting you all. I believe he simply wishes to conduct a short informal interview over lunch. Simply to help him in his investigation over the complaints raised by the wizards Exador and Lenamare. I've already taken the liberty of speaking with the young lady, she had no objection."

"OK then, I suppose." Edwyrd shrugged. "At what time and where should we meet him?"

The young man smiled, "I will return in about three hours to show you the way." Edwyrd nodded and the young man told him, "Until then." The servant then moved on towards Gastropé and Maelen's room. He wondered if Tizzy was also invited.

"Who was that?" Rupert asked groggily from his bed as Edwyrd shut the door and returned to his own. The morning sun outlining the window on his pillow as he adjusted it to keep the light out of his eyes.

"Our lunch invitation, I guess." Edwyrd said.

~

"Welcome! Be seated." The wizard named Damien told them as they were shown into a garden dining room, open to the sky above. They'd introduced themselves in the other room. The council member really didn't look like what Edwyrd had expect a member of a wizard's council to look like. For one thing, he was younger than Lenamare. Damien only appeared to be in his early to mid-thirties and had long dark blond hair and a short beard and mustache of the same color. His clothing was also not the traditional wizard's robes, but rather a nice set of brown leather riding pants and a large billowy shirt with gold embroidery that matched his hair coloring.

In all, Edwyrd decided, he looked more like one of the three musketeers than a wizard. While the wizard wore no sword, he did have a rather long dagger at his hip. Damien was gesturing at the six chairs around a glass top table set in an iron frame. Almost like standard patio furniture at home, Edwyrd thought. The five travelers took the seats indicated.

Tizzy it seemed, according to a slightly worried Gastropé, had decided to go out exploring the fortress and the city. Edwyrd could only hope that the demon would be discrete and not get into too much trouble. He suspected the city guards were not going to appreciate a lone wandering demon in the city.

"Thank you so much for joining me on such short notice." Damien told them as he took the sixth seat after his guests had been seated. "I know you're all tired from your journey, and would probably prefer to just rest quietly rather than get wrapped up in council affairs so quickly. Unfortunately, I felt that the sooner I had the opportunity to speak with you, before important details might be forgotten, the better.

"You see," Damien continued spreading his hands out over the table, "I am the council member charged with investigating the claims being made by Lenamare and Exador. If I am to be able to get a complete idea of the situation, then I need to talk with all parties involved, as soon after the incident as possible."

"So," Jenn asked, "you're in charge of making the ruling as to who is in the wrong or right?"

"No," Damien shook his head, "I am simply in charge of finding out all the facts of the situation and presenting them to the council. Obviously, Lenamare and Exador both have stories, but they do contain several contradictions. Thus someone must determine where fiction ends, and reality begins."

"Exador has been here? Explaining his side?" Gastropé asked worriedly.

Damien looked over to him and smiled. "Yes, in fact, he is still here." Gastropé turned one of his more subtle shades of pale white. "However, since Freehold is neutral ground, the palace in particular, neither Lenamare nor Exador are free to continue their struggles here." Damien assured Gastropé. "At least not directly or overtly, they can still plan and scheme and direct things elsewhere, of course." Damien added with a sad frown.

At this point servants had arrived and begun pouring water and wine into glasses already set on the table. Others brought out plates of some form of vegetable salad. Edwyrd supposed it was the local version of a tossed salad. Damien seemed to note that Gastropé was not appearing to relax despite his assurances. "You are worried about Exador continuing his war on Lenamare?"

"No," Gastropé said nervously, "uhm, actually, you see, I am a former employee of Exador's and we didn't part on such good terms. In fact, he's out to remove me from the painting all together."

"Really?" Damien asked intrigued. "Did you part some time ago? Before the current situation began?"

"No, actually, afterwards. It must have been just before Exador arrived here." Gastrope' told him.

"Ahh, and now you work for Lenamare. I can see why Exador would want you out of the way. Did you by any chance work for Lenamare at the same time you were working for Exador?"

Gastropé appeared shocked. "No! No, nothing like that! Although our falling out was over the handling of the whole situation." Gastropé hedged. "And really, I'm not so much working for Lenamare as I'm with Jenn and the others here." Damien just nodded his head.

"Perhaps what would be best, is if you told me your version of what happened. First up until the siege, then the siege and then what happened afterward." Jenn nodded as she took a bite of the salad. The others were doing likewise. Edwyrd reluctantly ate his.

It had been so long, it felt a little strange. He'd tried eating again on the road from Hoggensforth. He'd eaten an apple. Everything had seemed to work fine. Just as he'd remembered it. The apple seemed to pass through in the normal manner. Thus he guessed anything would. Rupert certainly had no trouble.

Jenn began to tell the story leading up to the attack. She avoided, however, any mention of Tom at this point. Damien interrupted a few times with questions, but then urged her to continue. When she got to the point where Exador's army arrived, the main course, some form of venison, Edwyrd guessed, Damien had Jenn break and began quizzing Gastropé.

Gastropé's story went back a bit further then Jenn's, essentially a month earlier. Mainly it consisted of the standard things needed to get an army ready to move. When he got to the part about Abyssal Switching, Damien hardly blinked an eye. Edwyrd thought this was a little strange that the wizard was so familiar with the spell, but maybe it wasn't that uncommon. After Gastropé reached the point of arrival at Lenamare's castle, Damien did go back and ask a few questions about the movement through the Abyss. More it seemed, to verify the fact that it had been done and that Gastropé had been there, rather than to question the fact.

At this point Jenn and Gastropé took turns describing the siege of the castle, each giving their own perspective. Damien seemed particularly interested in Tom's attack on the wards. Edwyrd just sat there silent and uncomfortable during this part. When Jenn described it as just spiteful action on the part of the demon, Edwyrd almost said something to defend himself. He held his words though. There was nothing he could say that wouldn't give him away.

Damien also probed quite a bit at Lenamare's escape plans and his explosive spell. Unfortunately, Jenn could only tell him what she knew. When Jenn got to the part about the ambush, Damien looked at Gastropé with a raised eyebrow. The young wizard just shrugged, embarrassed.

"So why," Damien asked Jenn, "do you think the demon stayed around?"

"I'm not sure. It may have been some former instruction of Lenamare's or its own evil machinations."

"He stayed," Rupert interjected, "because we, or I, asked him too. We needed protection from Exador's people, so I asked him to stay and he did."

"Really?" Damien turned his attention to Rupert. "You just asked it like you would some soldier or something?"

Rupert shrugged, uncomfortable now. "Yes, essentially." Jenn was shaking her head.

"Yes, he asked, but that only gave the demon a pretext. It obviously had hidden plans of its own. I'm pretty sure it wanted the book. It might even be in league with that archdemon Lenamare was talking about." Damien sat up as Jenn said this.

"Book? Archdemon? I think you haven't mentioned this before." Jenn looked embarrassed. She'd said too much, now there wasn't much she could do but go on. She explained the mix-up with her diary and Jehenna's book and how they'd finally brought it back to Lenamare and Jehenna.

"OK, that's the book. I don't know what it is, but what archdemon?"

"You mean you don't know?" Gastrope' asked, surprised.

"No, this is the first time I've heard archdemon mentioned does that come later in your story?" Damien asked.

"No," Jenn said, "It's what Lenamare told us this morning. He told us an archdemon was after the book, in addition to Exador. I would have thought you knew. He said the archdemon and his horde were on their way to Freehold now to claim the book."

Damien smiled sickly, rubbing his head. "No. Curse them. If that’s true, then no one has bothered to tell us. Although it would explain why the Rod is marching on us." The five travelers looked uncomfortably around at each other. It didn't seem to be a good point to bring up the real reason the Rod was marching toward Freehold at this point.

"We'll have to investigate this and prepare accordingly. I'll also have to ask Lenamare and Exador both, a few more questions. Did Lenamare happen to mention which archdemon?" Jenn just shook her head. "Very well, continue with your story." Damien told her as the servants began replacing the now empty dinner plates with desert bowls. Ice cream, it appeared to Edwyrd.

Jenn continued from there. Detailing her capture and subsequent rescue by Rupert and the demon. She passed rather quickly over their trip through the Abyss, and essentially neglected to mention Verigas at all. She simply told the wizard that the demon's gateway was a bit off and that they'd ended up in Gizzor Del.

Edwyrd was relieved when Damien didn't ask about the coincidence of just finding Rupert's cousin there by happenstance. He did appear curious about where Tom went, but no one could provide him with any answers. Jenn told the story of the pirates from her perspective, and neither Edwyrd nor Maelen contradicted her interpretation of events. After she'd passed out, it was mainly the story that Edwyrd had told her. When asked by Damien about these events, Edwyrd basically reiterated the same story. Maelen simply looking at him in his usual inscrutable fashion. Jenn simply stated that from Hoggensforth they'd made their way directly to Freehold.

"You didn't encounter the Rod along the way?" Damien asked.

"No," Gastropé told him, semi-truthfully. "They must have been behind us the entire time."

"You made remarkable progress then." Damien said thoughtfully, apparently trying to add up days.

"Well we were in a hurry to get to Freehold. We knew that Lenamare would be wanting his book back, even if we didn't know what was in it." Edwyrd told Damien.

Damien just nodded thoughtfully. "This other demon, the little one, it is still waiting with you for the return of the big demon?" Damien asked.

"Yes," Jenn said sourly. "Whenever that is. Apparently it claims it can't get back to the Abyss on its own."

Damien looked puzzled over this. "But demons can always return to the Abyss on their own, if they aren't constrained from doing so." While they can't make their way here without help, return is never a problem."

Jenn looked surprised. Mainly surprised she hadn't thought of this. Edwyrd hadn't thought of it because it was a non-issue to him. He'd assumed Tizzy had wanted to stay around and would just leave when he felt like it. It really didn't seem fair for Edwyrd to insist on him returning. It was, after all, a free world. Free for those without masters, Edwyrd corrected himself.

"You're right!" Jenn told Damien, looking around at the others. "Why didn't we think of this?" Gastropé just shrugged, Maelen shrugged, apparently feeling like Edwyrd, that it wasn't his business what the demon did. "It must be acting as an agent for the big demon!"

"Don't you think you're being just a little over-paranoid here?" Edwyrd asked her. "Must everything have an ulterior motive?" He was getting tired of being blamed for being more devious and evil than he was.

Before Jenn could angrily retort, Damien spoke up on her behalf. 'We don't know for sure what the little demon is doing. While it may just be hanging around for its own enjoyment, we can't be sure. We have to at least consider all possibilities. Mortal politics can be complicated, demonic politics are often even more so. If there is an archdemon after this book, this Tom demon could be working for that demon...or...nevermind that." Damien had obviously been going to say more but changed his mind. Now, Edwyrd was getting paranoid, and he was the point of the paranoid discussion.

Eventually, Damien ushered his guests out with a servant to lead them back to their rooms. He had continued to question them for about another hour after desert. He finally decided he had as much information as he was going to get from them.

"What do you think?" Antefalken asked as he shut the door. The bard had been hiding in a nearby room listening to the entire conversation with his demonic hearing.

"I don't know," Damien answered as he moved to sit on a couch. "Their story of traveling through the Abyss to get to Gizzor Del certainly coincides with what you smelled in Tom's cave. Most of the rest sounds more or less like what either Exador or Lenamare have said, without so much frosting."

"The trip from Gizzor Del seemed a bit strange." Antefalken commented.

"Yes, they weren't telling us everything. They certainly arrived amazingly fast. However, since that's where the Rod is and presumably the archdemon, maybe they'd become hesitant. I know they hadn't meant to give away the part about the archdemon. They'd just assumed I'd known."

"Yes. That's an interesting piece." Antefalken flew up to the back of a nearby chair to take his usual position. "I wasn't aware of any archdemon's definitely involved. However it fits in well with what we're starting to learn of this Tom."

"Even on the time part of it. It may just be the way they learned of it, but I'm reasonably certain the involvement of this archdemon is pretty recent. It could coincide with the disappearance of Tom in Gizzor Del. He could have gone to report to his superior, or if he is the archdemon himself, to muster his forces."

"Well, since it was only last night I talked to Tom, we at least have some idea of what he's doing. He's training and dealing with at least one other demon in the Abyss right now. I don't know of any armies mustering though. I'd have thought to hear something in the Courts."

"Things aren't getting any clearer. That is certain. What about this book? Any ideas what book an archdemon and two powerful conjurers would want?" Antefalken just shook his head, as puzzled as Damien.

Damien shifted on the couch. "At any point did you get a good luck at our guests?"

Antefalken shrugged, "somewhat."

"Anything?"

"Well," Antefalken mused for a moment, "Jenn and Gastropé seem to be what they claim. Edwyrd and Maelen are both big time players though. Maelen is probably what he modestly says he is a Seer and a Healer. Probably pretty good at both. Edwyrd didn't claim to be anything. I would guess however, from looking at his aura and listening to him, he's a world class player. What part he plays, I don't know. The little kid is also probably what he says; kids are hard to read. Whatever the case, he's got an awful big aura for what they claim. He could just be a prodigy of some sort. Further, his aura is in the same range as Edwyrd's. Edwyrd's shares a few similarities to Maelen. Knowing what Maelen does, I'd have to guess that Edwyrd is in a similar line of work. At least in terms of how he handles mana."

"An animage then?" Damien asked. While Maelen had claimed to be a Seer and Healer, usually only Animages were both. The man hadn't said he was an Animage though.

"I guess, I haven't read the auras of that many Animages." Antefalken said. "Rupert on the other hand had similarities to different parts of Edwyrd's aura, and other things that I've taken to indicate a wizard in the past."

Damien just shook his head, not knowing what to make of the information. "The problem, as you know,” Antefalken continued, “is that while demonic sight is a little bit better than wizard sight, it still isn't very exact. I'd suspect that a Seer like Maelen could be a lot more precise. That's part of what Seers do for a living after all."

"The question," Damien said, "is where do we go from here in our little jigsaw puzzle. We now have more of the pieces, but none of them seem to fit."

"I suppose, you'll want to tell your buddies on the highly-esteemed Council of Wizards, that in addition to having two warring wizards and a marching Rod on their hands, they've also got an archdemon coming for dinner?" Antefalken suggested with a smile.

"Don't," Damien groaned, "remind me. This is not going to be pleasant. I fear I'll be trapped all afternoon and evening."





Animages and Animagic

Curriculum Proficiebat: College of Wizardry

University of the Council States

Maelen’s Note: This information, which I have uncovered in the Council’s Private Library here in Freehold (apparently the doors are not locked, ahem). Seems to have been pirated from documents from an Animagic School. It is too similar to some of own introductory texts and we should, at some point look into how this information was attained.



Animages are individuals who use their minds to manipulate their own personal animus. Using their animus, they can manipulate mana, and hence the elements and the physical world around them. For all practical purposes, animages are individuals who simply need concentrate in the proper manner to achieve magic or spell-like effects. Consequently, the manipulations of animages are far more basic and simplistic than clerics or wizards, yet also much more flexible. Using their power in a building-block manner, animages can achieve almost any effect imaginable. The cost and difficulty, however, is often higher than that for wizards or clerics to do the same thing.

People actually calling themselves animages are actually relatively rare. This does not, however, imply that there are not very many animages. While there are probably both more clerics and wizards than animages, animages are not as uncommon as the general populace believes. The reason is not exactly that animages are in hiding, although in some regions this is the case. The real reason is that animages often specialize in particular disciplines and the most common of these specializations have names associated with them that many people mistake as a profession.

This confusion is not helped by the fact that certain animage specialization groups have even set up schools, as if they were a separate profession. In fact, it is these schools that really cause confusion. While it is not that uncommon to find a school devoted to a particular specialization, a pure animage school, which goes by such a name is almost completely unheard of. Most animages, outside a few select specializations, are either taught on a one-to-one basis by a single master, or in a few rare cases, semi-self-taught. The various specializations as well as the learning structure of animages are discussed in the Animage School section.

Part of the low profile of animages is due to the fact that with the possible exception of the hermetic druids, the animage is probably the least understood of all professions. The majority of other mana-wielding professions hold animages at some level of suspicion. This suspicion is usually transmitted down to the laymen as well. The reason for this is that most other mana wielders do not understand exactly what animages do or how they manipulate mana. Among the non-magical population, the Animage’s position is looked upon suspiciously due to trepidation and fear. The trepidation and fear comes from the stereotype that all animages are mind readers and telepaths. This is not actually true.

With the exception of hermetic druids, other mana wielders are, by and large, spell casters. In other words, they use rituals, pronouncements, incantations, etc. as well-defined vehicles of mana transport. Animages, on the other hand, do nothing of the sort. What animages do is to manipulate mana using their own personal animus. In other words, they bypass the traditional frameworks and achieve spell-like effects solely by force of concentration and will.

Actually, this is a slight over simplification. In actual point of fact, an animage cannot simply will something to happen; rather he or she must manipulate his or her animus in such a way as to cause mana to behave in the desired manner. While it may look very easy and straightforward, it is, in fact, a much more difficult, albeit more direct, method of using mana. Learning to manipulate animus, and hence mana, is something that takes many years of intense study, practice, and literal 'soul searching.' Hence, an animage's ability to achieve desired spell-like effects is measured in terms of skill-like abilities. These animage skills are referred to as Disciplines.



Animagic Disciplines



Animagic Disciplines



1

Aeromastery

Aeromastery is the discipline of manipulating the element of Air. Thus, aeromastery involves the manipulation of the air and gases. Winds, vacuum, breathing, gases and clouds all lie within its realm. Great masters of the air can summon huge winds and tornadoes, and combined with Aquamastery and Electromastery great storms can be summoned. Aeromasters can also affect the local atmosphere to disperse or induce poison gases and to create vacuums. Aeromastery combined with body mastery can allow an individual to become lighter than air and to rise above the clouds in flight



2

Animastery

Animastery is the direct manipulation of animus. This discipline allows the user directly to manipulate animus in much the same way one might manipulate an element.



3

Aquamastery

Aquamastery is the discipline of controlling liquids. All liquids can be controlled, in a manner similar to that of gases in Aeromastery



4

Astramastery

Astramastery is actually a slightly misleading term. On first examination, it might appear to solely be the study of the Astral Plane, but in reality, it is a whole lot more. Actually, astramastery is a catch-all category for skills relating to out-of-body travel. As such, it often incorporates tidbits from other disciplines. This is seen in the prerequisites for some of the effects.

It should also be noted that Astral and out-of-body travel for animages is much more primitive yet more flexible than for most other professions. Animages project their spirits from their bodies (forming a silver cord in the process) and then must form a 'spirit' or Anima Body to hold their animus together. At this point, they move around freely just as any out-of-body individual within the Planes of Man. If they wish to then travel to the Astral Plane they must create an Astral Tunnel.



5

Body Mastery

Body Mastery is the study and understanding of how to control and assist the functions of one's own body. Originally, this discipline was used for manipulating the practitioner's own body, but knowledge of one's own body can be extremely useful when working with others', especially for healing. Thus, this discipline can also be used on others at higher skill levels. For use on others, Link Mastery is usually required.



6

Cell Mastery

Cell Mastery is the study of living cells. It is also the study of flesh and the body. Cell Mastery can be used to study and examine the cell structure and the interrelations of cells within the body. If Link Mastery is known and a link established to a target, any of these effects can be used on the target of the link.



7

Clairomastery

Clairomastery is the study of extending one's senses beyond the normal. In its simplest form, it allows for extended mundane senses. At high skill levels, the clairomaster can see into other realms and places, and used with Prescience Mastery and Temporamastery it can be used to see through the very veils of time.



8

Electromastery

Electromastery is a specialized study of the element of Fire. Electricity is actually an aspect of Fire, but its use has been studied intently and has actually become a separate discipline from pyromastery.



9

Geomastery

Geomastery is the study of the manipulation of the Element of Earth. In addition to soil, minerals, and other things of the earth, gravity is also under the jurisdiction of Geomastery.



10

Kinetomastery

Kinetomastery is the study of motion at a distance. It is the study of all things involving movement, including that which is usually called telekinesis or psychokinesis.



11

Link Mastery

Link Mastery is the study of animus and mana links. Link Mastery is fundamental to many animage disciplines, as it is that which allows an animage to contact another being for healing, mind reading or any number of other activities. While the specific effects of Link Mastery are not spectacular, they are critical in the function of most major animage disciplines.

In the case of living beings, these links are animus or mana cords between the individuals. In the case of objects, small amounts of animus or mana are attached to the object (see Object Mastery) and a link is then formed. Animage mana links are identical to the links used by wizards in bindings and object links. Animus links are usually the sorts of links used by clerics, such as in the Wedding Ceremony. The silver cord seen by out-of-body travelers is an example of a very strong animus link.



12

Mana Mastery

Mana Mastery is similar to Animastery in that it is the study of the manipulation of true mana. This discipline deals with the channeling and controlling of mana in its raw form.



13

Multimastery

Multimastery is a discipline unlike all the others. For very experienced animages, it is perhaps the most useful discipline there is, opening a whole new realm of possibilities. For less experienced animages, however, it can be of limited use in the game of survival.

Multimastery is the science of combing multiple disciplines into a single effect. The use of Multimastery allows a practitioner to produce a single effect that draws on parts of multiple disciplines that the user already knows. The limits of Multimastery are few, the possibilities limited only by the animage's cleverness and imagination, and willpower.



14

Object Mastery

Object Mastery is the science of attaching mana and animus to inanimate objects. It is actually a rather tricky discipline since inanimate objects have no animus and usually little mana. In general, this task is made easier if the objects to undergo the effects of this discipline are of the finest construction possible.



15

Prescience Mastery

Prescience Mastery is the study of the unknown. It is an outgrowth of Clairomastery focusing on seeing into other places and events unknown to the user.



16

Pyromastery

Pyromastery is the study of the element of Fire in its aspects of fire, light, and heat.



17

Spatiomastery

Spatiomastery is the study of space and the various dimensions. In its simplest form, it allows the user to have a very good sense of direction. At higher levels the user can literally slip through space in ways beyond those of normal translational motion by creating folds in the fabric of reality.



18

Summastery

Summastery is the discipline of summoning creatures or beings from afar. It usually requires some form of Link



19

Telemastery

Perhaps the most well-known and feared of all disciplines by outsiders, Telemastery is the science of the mind. It is the discipline that allows skilled animages to read the very minds of other individuals.



20

Temporamastery

Temporamastery is the manipulation of time and an individual's perception of time. Actually, since time itself is extremely hard to manipulate, it is often the perception that is easier to affect. It is also a hard discipline to learn, as very few masters still exist. Only the Time Warriors were ever true masters and they seem to have all died. Thus, learning this skill can be difficult.



21

This discipline does not exist. Despite rumors, there is no 21stdiscipline, and if it did exist it would most likely be illegal wherever you are reading this. So don't worry about it.

This discipline does not exist. There is no such discipline. The rumors are completely unfounded and made up by students in their dorms. Such a discipline is simply not physically possible for the mind of an animage to perform. Even if it did exist, it is currently illegal in almost every country known. Such a discipline would also be a gross violation of the Animage Code of Ethics.

If such a discipline existed, which it doesn't, it would be almost impossible to learn. No individual could learn it on his or her own. For another animage to teach such a discipline is generally considered a capital crime in many countries. Since this discipline doesn't exist, finding an instructor is next to impossible, even illegally, since, obviously, no one knows it.

Theoretically speaking of course, if such a discipline could be learned (which it cannot, since it doesn't actually exist) it would require an extreme proficiency in Telemastery and Link Master for this discipline to make any sense.



Animage Schools

Learning Animagic

Animagic, actually a very old term predating modern wizardry, is what a few animages still like to call their craft. It is an extremely demanding craft, much more fundamental than 'prepackaged' wizardry, more scientific than the grunts, wails, and drug-induced hallucinations of the druids, and much more immediate than the ritualized clerical rigmarole.

How does the aspiring student of this day learn Animagic in this time when animages are in disrepute? This is a difficult question. Like wizardry and religion, Animagic can't be picked up simply on the side, at least not easily. Someone must teach it to the novice. Now, fortunately, almost anyone with the required knowledge, cleverness, strength of will, and fortitude can pick up some Animagic from a willing tutor. However, true mastery requires intense discipline and long study (and talent).

If the novice wishes to specialize in one of the standard sub professions, such as Healing, Seeing, Summoning, Elementalism or Mentalism, then he or she need only seek out the infrequent, but certainly present, schools in such and pass the entrance requirements to learn. If one prefers a more liberal approach and a broader background, then one must seek out a local master or a wandering animage who would be willing to pass on knowledge. In fact, for true liberality, one would probably need to seek out several such masters.

Can Animagic be picked up on one's own? Not from scratch, no. The basics, at least, must be taught by someone. Eventually, however, many animages may teach themselves in disciplines they already know.

Schools

The most common of all animage schools are the Healer's Guilds. Anyone with the aptitude and the proper attitude can generally gain admittance, although this may vary from school to school. However, it is critical to note that it is extremely seldom that any individual that is less than completely ethical accepted, and most schools have rigorous testing methodologies to assure this. The reason is simple, those who can heal with their mind, can also harm. Further, the discipline of Cell Mastery is generally a closely guarded secret of the Healer's Guilds. Thus, the only practical way to learn this discipline is by studying at a Healer's School, which limits knowledge of this discipline to screened individuals.

Perhaps the next most commonly found animage is the Seer. While there are some seer schools, often times a local seer can teach as much as a big school. Whether a student will be accepted by the school or an individual seer depends completely on what the seer or school 'Sees' in the student and his or her own personal attitudes.



Elementalist schools are sometimes hard to locate, as Elementalists are often overshadowed in their community by the elemental wizards. However, animage Elementalists have the advantage of working with all the elements and not just one.

Summoners are also a difficult lot to track down. This is largely because the wizardly engineering discipline of Conjury is much safer at high level than animage summoning, even if a bit less versatile. Often times, Summoners work on small-scale efforts, due to the very real danger in powerful summonings. Of course, if you want someone to break a binding or a link, Summoners are generally your only recourse.

Mentalists and their schools go by many different names and will either stick out like a sore thumb in any community or will be noticeably absent. Common names are School of Mental Science, Temple of the Mind, School of Psychology, Psychiatric Clinic, etc., etc. The novice entering these schools had best be prepared to have his or her soul examined down to the core. If the school decides to accept a student, it will only be after thorough mental examination of all motives. Unfortunately, one cannot report that all schools only accept the purist of motives.





Chapter 65


“This is disturbing.” Sir Talarius stated standing over a recently used fire pit.

“What is?” Barabus asked the knight.

“This was not a normal fire.”

Barabus crouched down near the ring of stones, swiped one of the charred logs in the pit with his index finger and sniffed the char residue. “It seems rather mundane to me.”

“Looks, but is not.” Talarius stated in his typically emphatic manner. “There is another stench in the air, barely detectable, that of sulfur and brimstone. Talarius wiped his own ungloved right hand on a small towel at his belt. “There is also a strong mana residue in the vicinity.”

Barabus shook his head. Talarius was riding point, scouting the way forward for the Rod. Barabus and the Rod had found him halted and dismounted examining what appeared to be the campsite of other travelers.

“And what do you infer?” Barabus asked. He could detect nothing himself, but the Knight was generally infallible in such declarations.

“A gateway.” Talarius surveyed the former campsite. “Note there are no pentacles, no pentagrams, no runes.” He swept his hand around the small clearing. “Simply a fire pit. Something, some fiend, opened a portal to the Abyss here.” Talarius moved about the clearing, peering intently for more clues.

“An exit? But why?” Barabus asked. “Did they detect us following them and try to escape back to the Abyss? That doesn’t make sense.”

“It doesn’t. For several reasons.” Talarius stated without even looking up. “First, why would demons make a camp? Suddenly realize we were following them and then flee back to the Abyss after all the trouble and commotion they made getting here.” He shook his head.

“As to the camp, they had humans with them: wizards and or sacrifices, perhaps the humans needed to rest and the demons took time to survey the area and discovered us.” Barabus reasoned.

“A fair point on the wizards with the demons; however I doubt they’d flee after getting here. No, I am thinking they brought in reinforcements.”

“Reinforcements?” Barabus echoed.

“Yes…” Talarius had stopped near the far edge of the clearing with his back to Barabus, slowly moving his head around, perhaps sniffing? Barabus couldn’t tell. “Hmm…” He paused and turned with a troubled look upon his face.

“Yes, they had to of course know that Verigas would alert us. What they most likely did not count on was the speed with which the Rod was able to respond. Early this morning they realized that we would be upon them sooner than expected, and so called for reinforcements.” Talarius was twisting his head around.

“Is there something else?” Barabus was puzzled by the knight’s current behavior.

“Yes, there has been deception here.”

“Deception?” Barabus asked puzzled.

“Yes, I can sense that some form of truth hiding, cloaking or deceptive magic of a fairly high order in this area. It’s very faint, but for me to still be able to sense it, it couldn’t be more than a few hours old.”

“But it’s over there, not near the firepit?” Barabus asked.

“Correct.”

“Do you think it’s tied to the demons?” Barabus asked the knight.

Talarius shook his head in puzzlement, “Demons are masters of lies and deceptive truths, as well as illusions, but they generally don’t use cloaking spells. They revel in the fright they cause others.” He walked back over to Barabus.

“True,” Talarius continued, “There are wizards that will employ cloaked sprites and imps to spy for them; however that doesn’t make much sense here.” Talarius put his gloves back on. “In the forest, at night, all alone, why would a wizard waste magic cloaking a lower level demon in their own camp?”

Barabus thought for a bit as the two remained silent. “Could they have cloaked the sprites at this location, which is what you are detecting and then sent them back to spy on us?”

The knight looked startled for a moment and then gave Barabus a tight-lipped grin of approval. “You are good, Arch-Vicar; you have a talent for ferretting out the wiles of darkness, as I’ve long believed. It’s why I always enjoy serving with you. We think alike!”

Barabus simply nodded at the compliment. Despite the fact that it was not a comparison he could agree with. “I will have the chaplains scry the entire Rod and the trail before, after and alongside. If there are invisible demons spying on us, we shall find them.”

“And I shall eliminate them.” Talarius nodded in agreement.





Chapter 66


"Are you sure that," Exador looked pointedly at Ramses' clothing, "is such a good idea?" The two were walking down the hall from Exador's quarters, towards those he had prepared for his ally.

Ramses looked at him. "As I recall, it was your idea that I should get more actively involved. Should actually be present in Freehold in the event someone else tries to get the book?"

"Yes," Exador said patiently, "but do you have to wear that attire?" Ramses had changed from his previous pharaoh-ware to a completely different uniform. He'd also readjusted his height to just under seven feet, and shifted his pigmentation to a more Caucasian golden tan. His current uniform was composed of black leather straps wrapped tightly around his legs, arms, chest and midsection.

The straps were finely spaced as to appear to be a single unified garment. A gold belt held a short dark purple sash over the groin area, which was encased in black leather briefs that melded into the straps. Protruding black shoulder pads or guards that, remarkably, did not interfere with movement jutted from his shoulders.

The pads also stretched down to provide black metal armor to the chest region. Gold belts, crossing over his heart with a large purple gem buckle with straps going under ribcage and up the back, appeared to hold the pads in place. From experience, Exador knew they were strapped on much more securely in other locations. A black leather bandanna wrapped Ramses forehead, pulling his hair out of the way. Slung across his back were two large katanas, crossed at opposing angles for quick overhead draws by either hand.

"I always wear this attire when I am in Astlan." Ramses stated succinctly.

"But what if someone recognizes it?" Exador asked, exasperated.

"No one has worn the uniform of a Time Warrior on this plane for a thousand years. I doubt very seriously if you'll find any fashion consultants who’ll recognize it."

"Well, if some curious old scholar happens to recognize it from a painting or worse yet, recognize you. There will be a rather loud outcry."

"Well then," Ramses stated, smiling viciously, "I will just have to deal with those who object."

~

Dinner with Lenamare was about as pleasant as Edwyrd had expected. Lenamare had led them into a small dining room upon their arrival. The room had been furnished relatively well, and the food was certainly on par with which had been served at lunch. The conversation, however, left something to be desired. For the first part of the meal, neither Lenamare nor Jehenna said anything more than the perfunctory words necessary to conduct a dinner. Halfway through the main course, Lenamare changed that and Edwyrd wished the man had not bothered.

"So, Jenn, I trust you had a relatively uneventful trip after parting ways with Jehenna." Lenamare stated rather than asked.

"Well, I'm not sure I'd call it uneventful, but we made it."

"Yes, and since you had the book, we are glad you did." Jehenna told her. "One question that remains, however, is: what exactly did you do with the demon?" The other party members looked directly at Jenn, wondering what the official line would be with the two wizards.

"Well, it slew the ambushers, then it escorted us part way. After we acquired such company as to be able to ensure safe travel on our own, we had no need of it, so it left."

"It left?" Lenamare asked. He didn't sound incredibly convinced.

"So you are saying that you used the ring to coerce it into helping you, and then you dismissed it?" Jehenna prompted.

"Not exactly." Jenn said, looking back and forth between the two.

"Not exactly? What exactly is not exactly? Do you have my ring or not?" Jehenna asked. "If so, I'd like it back." Lenamare simply nodded.

"Well, no, I don't have the ring. The demon destroyed it." Jenn admitted softly.

"The demon what!" Lenamare asked raising his voice.

Jehenna reached across the table, lightly touching Jenn's hand. "What do you mean: destroyed it?"

"Well, when I tried to use the ring to command it, the demon pried the ring from my finger and crushed it between its own fingers." Jenn demonstrated with her thumb and index finger. Jehenna and Lenamare both looked stunned, simultaneously leaning back in their chairs.

"Well, I told you it didn't feel right." Jehenna reminded Lenamare, looking at him. Lenamare was sitting at the head of the table, Jehenna to his left and Jenn to his right.

"Even so," Lenamare stated, "how could it do that? That would only be possible if we got the binding on the ring completely wrong, or the demon was really a lot more powerful than we thought. I can't believe either." Jehenna was shaking her head in agreement.

"I don't understand it either, I am sure I spelled the name correctly on the ring. Tomasedwardperkinje just like it sounds." Edwyrd wasn't sure how she was spelling it, but her pronunciation wasn't quite right, she said it strangely as if it were one word, and his first name wasn't spelled just like it sounded. Jehenna looked at Jenn, "So why didn't it crush you next?"

"I...I'm not really sure, I've been trying to figure that one out." Jenn stammered. Obviously, the girl was a bit intimidated by these two. If Edwyrd didn’t already consider the two wizards to be a couple of egomaniac assholes, he might have been tempted to feel the same way.

"Do you expect us to believe that? Demons don't just NOT destroy things for no reason. It must have had an ulterior motive." Jehenna said. Gastropé looked Edwyrd in the eye, reminding him of the conversation with Damien this afternoon.

"So then you say--it guarded you part-way on your trip?" Lenamare asked. "Why did it do that, and then why did it leave you?"

"Because we asked it to." Rupert spoke up. Edwyrd decided the kid had to be brave to be willing to enter this battle.

"You what?" Jehenna glared at Rupert in annoyance.

"We spoke to him and asked him to come with us. Since it was a reasonable request, he did so." Lenamare and Jehenna both were looking at Rupert as if he were a dog who had suddenly started to speak English.

"Child, you have no clue as to what you're babbling about. Demons do not work that way, and someday you'll learn that. At least if you ever want to be a live wizard, you'll learn that." Jehenna told Rupert, turning her attention back to Jenn.

"You said it left you after a point?" Lenamare asked. "Why did it do that?"

"Again, I'm not sure..."

"You're not sure? How can you not be sure? You were running around with it. Didn't it say something? Give you any clues as to its plans." Jehenna demanded.

At this point Maelen spoke up. He hadn't said a word all through dinner. "May I ask," the two wizards turned their cold stares on him, "how you expect a young wizard of Jenn's years and experience, to determine the motives of a greater demon, when you yourselves are unable to do so? These creatures are not exactly the most openhanded beings in the planes of existence. Surely if individuals of such obvious learning and knowledge, as yourselves, have difficulties, a young girl such as Jenn would have even more. I think asking her such questions is rather pointless. Don't you?"

If possible, the stares of the two wizards got even chillier. Maelen didn't so much as blink, he simply stared Lenamare in the eyes until he got a response. Lenamare coughed. "You are, probably, correct. Jehenna and I have spent many a night trying to understand the machinations of this fourth order demon. While we have had many insights, I must admit they have not been easily achieved, or for that matter, terribly useful." Jehenna frowned at this point. "This nightmare of the Abyss is obviously up to something more than it first appeared. What that is, is unclear. Almost certainly, however, it revolves around the book. Of that there can be no question."

"Why no question?" Edwyrd asked, meeting Lenamare's stare head on. "What exactly is in that book that a greater demon 'obviously' wants and that an archdemon would march on Freehold for? And for that matter, that Exador would waste the majority of his army on to have?"

"That," Jehenna said with a trace more than her usual coldness, "is none of your business. Leave that to your betters."

Edwyrd was mad now. Not that it particularly took much from either of these two beings to make him mad, but if their grilling Jenn hadn't, this had. Thus, he was a little more forceful and blunt than he would have been under calmer circumstance. "I have yet," he said equally coldly, "to see proof that you are my betters. Until such is shown, I would suggest you keep such derogatory comments to yourself. Where I come from, a certain amount of respect is given to people whom you've only recently met. Not to mention one's assistants and employees. I treat others that way, and I expect you to as well."

Everyone at the table was staring at Edwyrd as if he'd just stood up and pissed in the wine bottle. Gastropé and Jenn were looking on in open-mouthed shock. Maelen was startled but not upset. Rupert was grinning. Lenamare and Jehenna looked incredibly affronted by his nerve.

"Young man. Do you have any idea to whom you are speaking?" Lenamare asked.

"I'm speaking to a couple of wizards who lost the battle for this stupid book on their home territory. Who are, once again, going to have to fight the same battle with the same opponent on a different field, with the Rod of Tiernon and an archdemon's horde on the battlefield as well.

“Not to mention the Council of Wizards, who I am sure would be interested in the book. All trying to grab what these two wizards have already lost once." He exaggerated about the Rod, he knew they weren't after the book, but Lenamare and Jehenna didn't have to know that. "Two wizards who are going to need all the help they can get, and who had best realize it soon, before they are deserted by every possible ally."

Rupert was squirming madly in his seat, trying bravely not to start cheering. Jenn was staring completely aghast, and Gastropé was shaking his head. Maelen was simply grinning a small tight grin. Jehenna looked as if he'd slapped her. Lenamare was blinking. "You have, a hell of a lot of nerve, young man. More so than is obvious by your appearance. Since you think," Lenamare smiled condescendingly, "you know who you are dealing with, may I ask who we are dealing with?"

Edwyrd smiled a grim smile. "I would have thought you'd ask that sooner. However, better late than never I suppose. I am Edwyrd. I am" Edwyrd paused recalling the term Maelen had used for him, "a pyromaster as well as the practitioner of several other disciplines." He was making this up by the seat of his pants. One thing Tom had learned growing up in New York was, if you're going to bluff, don't do it halfway and make the bluff worth doing. Actually it wasn't all bluff, he'd faced Lenamare before, taken the man's measure. He was almost ready for a rematch.

"You mean pyromancer, don't you, boy?" Lenamare corrected, Jehenna covered her mouth with one hand, apparently thinking hard about something. It seemed she knew what he was talking about.

"No," Edwyrd said gently, but forcefully, "I mean pyromaster. As in, I am an animage. I am not a wizard. There is a difference. I do by force of will and by my knowledge of that which I command, what you must do through carefully contrived spells." He was looking out the corner of his eye at Maelen on this one. It was a leap of faith that this was correct, but that was what it seemed animages did. Maelen simply nodded his head slightly in approval. “Unlike you, I don’t need props.” The wizards at the table all looked horribly shocked. Maelen just chuckled softly.

"I think," Jehenna broke in, "that for now we should simply accept Edwyrd's word. He will have ample opportunity to prove himself in the weeks ahead. In the meantime, as we are allies, as our young animage here is wont to point out, we should be civil to each other. I am willing to do that." That seemed about the closest thing to an apology, as he'd get from her.

"Allow me to rephrase my earlier statement," Jehenna continued smoothly, Lenamare looking on grumpily. "What I should have said was: it would be best that the number of individuals knowing the contents of the book be kept to a minimum. The more people that know, the more likely the information is to escape and the more players on the field we will have." Edwyrd refrained from saying that keeping the book a secret hadn't exactly kept the field empty. "Now, let's have dessert."

The remainder of the meal continued in the same manner as the start of the meal, in silence. That was fine with Edwyrd. Less chance of himself blowing up and trying to incinerate Lenamare and Jehenna on the spot. Not that he felt he had an overwhelming chance of success, but it would certainly be fun to try; after all, he didn’t see any pentacles in the dining room.

As they walked back to their rooms that evening, Jenn finally spoke up. "You do enjoy a good argument, don't you, Edwyrd?" Edwyrd just smiled and shrugged. "First me last night, and now those two. Obviously, I can't agree with your weird attitude about demons, but I do have to admire you for bearding those dragons in their layer."

"Well, I just thought somebody needed to put them in their place." Edwyrd explained.

"Well, I think for the moment, you did," commented Maelen. "I certainly enjoyed it. I'm not completely sure it was wise, but what you said about allies is true and neither of those two impress me as being stupid. While they may seethe at your temerity, I suspect they'll also decide you were right and put up with it."





Chapter 67


Sir Talarius rode through the cool night breeze. The heat of the daytime sun now left behind. The Rod’s calvary was camped back at the top of the pass. At their current fast pace, they should be able to reach Freehold at sunset the coming evening. Talarius was pleased with their progress; as always the men of the Rod excelled above all others. They were certainly one of the fastest and most mobile military units he'd had the pleasure of serving with. They were also exceptional warriors, down to the last man.

They had had the small delay to locate any invisible demons, but none had been found. The Arch-Vicar had moved priests to the outer edges and instructed them to continue scanning for cloaked and invisible beings around the Rod.

The Arch-Vicar General had concurred with him on the need for more extended reconnaissance. It was for this reason that he was even now approaching the outer walls of Freehold on the back of War Arrow. The city let off a great deal of light into the night's sky. Obviously a prosperous town, with hope not yet overrun by evil. Along the way Talarius had scanned the road for signs of the Archaedemon's forces, invisible or otherwise, but had seen none.

Aiding him in this process was the Holy Mirror of Erastimus. Talarius examined it even now as he approached the city. To the common eye it appeared little more than a fair-sized hand mirror with an incredibly large diamond set on the back of its finely wrought silver frame. However, to one blessed with knowledge of its use, it was far more. By holding the mirror between one's self and an object or person, the mirror would show the image of that object. Overlaid upon that person or object would be a color coded indication of demonic influence. If only such a mirror existed for other types of evil, the evil in the hearts of men, for example.

In this particular instance, Talarius would fly over the city, viewing parts of the city through the mirror. Any demons would show up on the mirror as points of colored light. Even if they were shielded by walls or roofs. Further, the color of the light representing the demon would be indicative of its power. The colors were those of the primary spectrum: red, orange, yellow, green, blue, indigo and violet. Thus there were seven levels to indicate demonic power. Of course, there were only six orders of demons, unless one counted the Concordenax, which hardly seemed reasonable, thus the color-coding scheme would be a little more finally tuned than the nomenclature commonly used to describe demons. Actually, Talarius reflected, it was certainly finer, because in the past, the colors he'd seen had formed a continuum indicating the overall power of the demon. Thus, a powerful first order might appear as orange red.

Talarius had seen the lower half of the spectrum quite often. He'd never seen violet or indigo and only once, blue. He prayed to Tiernon he never did see any of the higher colors. That would surely be a test he'd fail. Overall, though, Talarius found the mirror to be indispensable in the war on evil. He only wished there were some way to incorporate the mirror's powers into his visor so he could always spy demonic influence. It was simply not considered polite to walk up to a stranger looking at them through an apparently opaque mirror. It was also not safe, to walk up to an opponent in battle doing such.

He brought War Arrow into a circular flight pattern around the city. He remained at a fairly high distance above the ground. He wanted, first of all, to be able to sweep good sized portions of the city in a single pass, and secondly, to be above any ground attacks that might be launched by nervous guards or drunken wizards. He instructed War Arrow to go in an inward spiral at normal horse walking speed. It would take a while, but the thorough scan could prove worthwhile. He'd finish up with a surveillance of the wizards’ palace. He suspected that most likely an Archaedemon would be in the city somewhere, or near its outside perimeter. He doubted it would feel safe inside a palace full of wizards who would certainly detect it.

There appeared to be no demons outside the city walls. Inside was somewhat different. As he passed over the city, he noted several red and orange lights indicating low level demons. Not a horde certainly, but far more than the one or two demon's one might expect in a city this size. Talarius, however was not alarmed. Given that Freehold was a city full of wizards, such activity was to be expected, even if it was blatant folly on the part of the wizards.

Unfortunately those fool wizards could never leave well enough alone. Always thinking they could overcome the will of the demons, control them and use their powers for non-evil purposes. All too often Talarius had seen good wizards slain by a mistake or corrupted by the very beings they thought to enslave. While they might believe they had control of the demon, in reality, the demon had subverted them, causing them to do ever-increasing evil, all the while believing such acts were their own idea. Talarius shook his head, wishing others could see what he saw so plainly. Perhaps it was his experience in being deceived that led to his clarity.

Overall, Talarius counted fifteen demons of first or second order in the city. Anywhere else this would have been alarming. As it was, Talarius shook his head. He wondered where the Archaedemon was. Surely, it wouldn't be in the Council Palace. Nonetheless, it was time to pass over the palace. What the Holy Mirror of Erastimus revealed nearly unseated him.

Talarius had to circle the Palace of Evil several times before he could believe what he was seeing. How could it have gone so far? Had the entire Council of Wizards been taken over already? Through the mirror, the entire palace was lit with red spots. They must be virtually lining the corridors with first order demons! There were literally hundreds of them! While there were large areas, he presumed private chambers, free of the red; the spider work dot pattern of red lights seemed to indicate that there were demons spread throughout the halls.

That however, was the least of his worries. Intermixed in the red were several orange and even yellow lights. There were probably another fifteen or twenty orange lights in the building and maybe five or six yellow. To top this off, there was a definite bright green light moving through the castle even as he watched. This was unthinkable; he'd never seen so much activity in one place. However, all these lights paled before the final fact that made Talarius sick to his stomach, he felt his bowels rumbling.

It was hard to tell because of the close proximity of all of them, two especially, but there really could be no question. There was one light blue light with a slight turquoise tinge and two rather dark blues. There might be more, but there were at least three. Three Archaedemons! In one place! At one time! Talarius prayed. He prayed deeply and sincerely. He prayed that this test might not fall upon his shoulders. A challenge of one Archaedemon he'd foolishly looked forward to. But three at once! Talarius had never known fear, at least not of anything physical or tangible, and he didn't believe that was what he felt now. Trepidation might be the word. Whatever it was, Talarius did not enjoy it.

~

"You're sure?" Barabus asked Talarius. The knight had awakened the general as soon as he'd returned. At first, Barabus had been annoyed, thinking the report could wait until dawn. When he'd put on his robe and had Talarius shown in, he'd intended to reprimand the man. However, one look at the pale, drawn face of the knight, and the words had died on his lips. He'd sat down preparing for the worst. What the knight proceeded to tell him certainly qualified on that score. He couldn't believe it. Except that Talarius would never lie about anything, much less this.

"Absolutely," was all the man standing in armor, helmet under arm said. Barabus gestured for Talarius to sit. The man did, for once, actually seeming to need to sit. Barabus looked at the floor; Talarius simply stared at Barabus.

"Well," Barabus said weakly, "it's not quite the end of the world. You saw no indigo or violet."

"Not tonight." Barabus glanced up at the knight, who was completely serious.

"Three Archaedemons in the very stronghold of wizardry. There is no way such beings could be undetected. They must have overthrown the Council of Wizards, or at least corrupted and subsumed them. This is unquestionably bad. We outnumber the demons still, even so, given demonic ability that outnumbering only seems to even the playing field. Add to that the three Archaedemons and who knows what else and we are overpowered. Even you can't defeat three Archaedemons."

"Not in concert, separately, Tiernon willing, I can. If they act together, we have an uphill battle on our hands."

"I need to speak to Iskerus, this will have to go directly to the Portant. There is no other choice. We will have to have reinforcements if we are to prevail. We will also need them here as fast as possible."

"How fast can you get them here?" Talarius asked.

"I'm going to ask the Portant for all of the Rod stationed on Eton. I will also urge that we create a Runic Gateway to bring them through as fast as possible."

"Every member on the continent, that's one-half of the entire Rod. Will it be enough?"

"I only pray. Given such short notice though, abandoning our other interests elsewhere to bring more would only bring ruin on our head. If we had time for proper withdrawal and reorganization, then we could probably spare three-fourths of our forces. I will of course, request a Holy Synod to help battle the demons' magical influences. I'm not sure what else I can do."

Talarius nodded his head. "I will also call on Sirs Gadius, Etrias and Soral. They've had some demon fighting experience. They can, I am sure, be of assistance."

“Does Etrias know of his brother’s fate?” Barabus asked.

“Given the short time since I submitted my report; I doubt Etrias has been informed of Etrian’s failure.” Talarius stated.

“Will it compromise his ability?” Barabus asked.

Sir Talarius closed his eyes and took a deep breath; “I pray it shall not.”

~

"You can oathfully state that the testimony you have given is accurate to the best of your ability to determine?" Wylan asked young Raspunon. The young soldier nodded solemnly before Wylan and Fiernon.

Raspunon swore, "On my Honor as a Loyal Citizen of Oorstemoth, I do solemnly swear that my report is accurate to the best of my knowledge and ability." Raspunon wore the uniform of a Rod member. He had arrived at Wylan's camp shortly before dawn with the information he had dutifully obtained as an inside surveillance agent among the Rod.

"Very well, you are dismissed. Return to your assignment." Wylan told him. The young constabulary officer departed as dutifully instructed. When he was out of earshot, Wylan looked to Fiernon. "Such testimony as thus given is coincident with the nefarious behavior of our feral fugitives."

"Perhaps we now have evidence of why they illegally transported themselves over jurisdictional lines." Fiernon agreed.

"While the primary evidence is incomplete and thus far circumstantial, it would appear that the insidious individuals who have so blatantly and callously shown disrespect for the laws of sovereign Oorstemoth are also in league with a large body of Abyssal representatives currently seeking to subvert, pervert, and overthrow another sovereign government."

"With, I fear, potential illicit and highly illegal ramifications for the safety and defense of Oorstemoth." Fiernon added.

"Observant as always, Fiernon. Yes, while willful and malicious subversion of a foreign power in and of itself is not an implicitly illegal activity, overthrowing said government and posing serious or severe threat to the security of the Oorstemothian borders most certainly is. And it seems fairly self-evident that a Council States government that is nothing more than a pawn of the Abyss must be construed as a serious threat to Oorstemoth."

"Thus at this point we may add Willful and Malign Machinations to Endanger Oorstemoth to the list of capital offenses already accrued by our impudently irresponsible ill-intentioned quarry? Plus Willful Intent to Engender Future Illicit Intrigues, including but not limited to, Treasonous National Criminal Trespass by Foreign Power with the Intent to Overthrow the Oorstemothian Government?” Fiernon asked, writing in his notebook as fast as he could.

"Certainly, at the very least, there may also be more serious and severe subliminally surreptitious schemes afoot as well." Wylan stated.

"More serious than the overthrow of the legally appointed judicial government of Oorstemoth?" Fiernon asked incredulously.

"We shall have to consider this evidence most carefully. It could include the Intent and/or Attempt to Dominate and/or Eradicate the World by a Power Not Oorstemoth." Wylan looked at his assistant somberly. These were essentially the most heinous and noxious crimes imaginable that they were currently contemplating the perpetration of by demonic entities. "In the meantime," he continued, "I will be alerting the military arm of the constabulary. I believe this would be the prudent and in fact legally requisite action at this juncture." Fiernon simply nodded, too aghast at the enormity of the situation to say more.





Chapter 68


Edwyrd found the palace to be a welcome change from the outdoors, the Abyss and the cramped crew quarters. Their room was decently sized, not huge, but good-sized, and there was an incredible amount of space in the palace. Since he didn’t sleep, once Rupert was asleep he’d headed out to do some exploring. He eventually found a suitable unused store room down deep in the palace bowels and shut the door behind him.

He was very paranoid of anyone seeing him so; particularly with all the wizards around so the first thing he did was to try and concentrate on shifting just his eyes so he could look for auras in the room. He wanted to make sure there were not magic scrying spells or whatever spying on him. He didn’t know how to detect this, but demon vision certainly saw more than normal vision, so he tried simply shifting his eyes. It was surprisingly tricky, but he eventually got it to work, sort of.

The room appeared very mundane, just like it did to normal sight. It was a good sized room, most likely used for winter provisions. The ceiling was about 15 feet high, which is why he chose it. He needed room to relax and be himself.

Further, beyond just relaxation, he could actually practice the flaming body trick and other ‘pyromaster’ tricks. If he was going to go around claiming to be an Animage, he needed to figure out some tricks or ‘spells’ or whatever magic it was animages did, so he’d at least seem plausible. That seemed like as good a way to spend his nights as any other.

~

Gastropé and Edwyrd surveyed the city laid out below them. The two were standing on the top of one of the palace's many towers. They’d started to get antsy after a few days of just hanging around Lenamare’s wing of the palace. After lunch, the two had decided to explore the palace a bit, having little else to do. Maelen had gone into the city to look up some friends or associates of his; Edwyrd wasn't sure which. Jenn was busy having a reunion with friends of hers from the school. Apparently, just before lunch, a group of students who had taken an alternative and longer route from the school had arrived.

They had just sat down for lunch when a girl with frizzy hair had run in and given Jenn a big hug. The girl had been followed in short order by two young men of roughly the same age and a couple of younger teenagers along with some of Lenamare's soldiers. Jenn had introduced the girl as Alvea and the older students as Willis and Bromagni. The teenagers were Trensom and Ystern. Jenn didn't know the names of the four guards, but they'd introduced themselves, Krispin, Briem, Zed and Aria. The last had slightly puzzled Edwyrd, but eventually he'd decided Aria was a woman, although it had been extremely hard to tell. She looked nastier than her male counterparts did.

During lunch Alvea had told her tale. By comparison, their journey had been long and uneventful. No ambushes, no demons and only a couple wild boar charges. After lunch, Jenn had gone with the new arrivals to help them settle in. Maelen had excused himself earlier and Rupert decided to go back to the room and read. Gastropé had suggested they go exploring and having nothing better to do, Edwyrd agreed.

As Edwyrd had found the first night the palace was extremely large. They'd wandered down multiple corridors managing to lose themselves completely at several points. The two had passed through several large chambers intended apparently as either audience halls or ballrooms. Eventually they'd found the staircase that wound its way to the top of one of the flat roofed towers. They now stood at one of the stone crenulations looking over the city.

It was at moments like this that Edwyrd felt the full impact of having been suddenly transported to a medieval realm. Except for the palace, almost no buildings were over four stories tall. Most had thatched roofs, although a large number also had red or orange tiles. The streets seemed to wind in labyrinthine mazes, many suddenly ending in a courtyard or just a dead end. Others would go along and then jog at funny angles as some building reared up in its path.

One part of town, on the far side of the palace seemed to have buildings that nearly overgrew the streets, cutting them off from the light of day. Edwyrd guessed this was due to the upper stories projecting over the streets so the owners could throw trash and sewage out into the middle of the street. He liked to imagine that that part of town was the city's Maze or Warren or whatever the locals liked to call their local thieves' quarters. Maybe it was silly, making such assumptions, but then who would call a twelve-foot tall greater demon disguising himself as a teenage boy in a fantasy world silly for having such thoughts.

He had to stop and correct himself. He seemed to have forgotten the crucial point. He actually was a teenager, trapped in the form of a greater demon, who was then re-disguising himself as himself in a fantasy world. He shook his head. If he thought about it too much he was going to end up going in circles. He was continuing to have self-identity problems, unsure as to whether that self was the demon or the kid from Harding. He wasn't sure he liked the way his mental processes were running lately.

"Yello!" Tizzy shouted at them from behind. Gastropé jumped but Edwyrd had heard the demon's wings buzzing in advance of his arrival. "How goes your sojourn into Lenamare land?"

Gastropé and Edwyrd both turned around to face the demon. "Fine," Gastropé said, "Lenamare is slightly more congenial than Exador, but only slightly. At least he's not trying to mutate me." Edwyrd gave the wizard a sideways glance. Mutate him?

"It's going about like I expected." Edwyrd commented.

"Hmm, that well?" Tizzy smiled. "I've had fun. Mainly in the city though. Palace is too much of a hassle to really try and bother folks."

"Too many wizards make you nervous?" Gastrope' asked.

"No. Too many damn demons. If I'd wanted so many demons I'd have gone to the Courts of Chaos."

"What?" Gastropé and Edwyrd asked together. "What do you mean, too many demons?" Edwyrd asked.

"It's a real pain to scare someone as a demon when they're already up to their necks in demons." Tizzy went on oblivious to his companions.

"What exactly are you talking about?" Gastrope' demanded.

"’Course, stupid wizards just ignore them. Maybe they just don't care anymore. Out of sight, out of mind, ignore the lower class help, you know, that sort of thing. After all, they must be some sort of servants for these council people. Why you have invisible demon servants is a might weird. But then so are wizards in my book." Edwyrd grabbed Tizzy by his front left shoulder.

"Tizzy," Edwyrd said, trying to catch the demon's attention. "What demons are you talking about?"

Tizzy just looked at him as if he couldn't figure out why Edwyrd would even ask such a question. "Why all those invisible demons standing around in the hallways. Must be one in every corridor of the building."

"Big demons?" Gastrope' asked nervously.

"Nah, little guys, smaller than me. Little Ones, you know sprites, imps and shadows mainly. Course shadows don't need to be invisible being shadows, but the imps and sprites, they're invisible. Still seems like a waste of energy to turn all your servants invisible. I mean, I know these snooty wizards don't like to have to dirty their own hands, or acknowledge any help they get...but to actually make your servants invisible. Mighty egotistical if you ask me."

"Is such a thing common practice?" Edwyrd asked Gastropé. The wizard just shook his head, puzzled.

"No, it's much too dangerous. No wizard or group of wizards would want to try and control that many demons at a time for so little a cause. It would be crazy. A few demon servants you can keep your eyes on are no problem for a wizard, especially if they are just imps or shadows. But in every corridor? Especially ones with people walking down them? No, it would be insane, eventually one of them would work its way around its instructions and start rampaging around the castle."

Tizzy was just staring at the wizard. Tizzy blinked and looked at Edwyrd. "You know, this kid's brain really isn't full of mud. I guess I owe you one." Edwyrd had no idea what the demon was talking about. "He's a bit stereotypical. Actually, I'd have to say he's being something of a bigot really." Tizzy tilted his head. "However, bigot or not, he's got a point. Given enough time, one of them would start causing problems. Take a lot of work to keep that many demons in line. I counted about two hundred or so, before I stopped counting."

"Two hundred demons?" Edwyrd said, unbelieving. Tizzy made a motion indicating a lot more than that. He'd really have to start trying to make improvements to Edwyrd's eyes so he could see things like he could in his true form. He couldn't believe he'd missed them all.

"Yeah, and that's just the little ones." Tizzy said. "Didn't mention those bigger ones."

"Bigger ones? How much bigger ones?" Edwyrd asked suspiciously.

~

Rupert wandered down the dark corridor. He had told everyone that he was going back to his room to read, and he had been. He'd just had a better idea while en route to his room. He'd gotten to thinking about what a big fortress this place was. From everything he'd read, such places usually had dungeons to torture prisoners in and store treasure and other valuable things. He'd wondered if this fortress had a dungeon.

As he came across a stairwell leading down, he'd decided to find out. Thus a spur of the moment excursion had turned into three hours of wandering deeper and deeper into the bowls of the palace. It was rather exciting really. He simply took every downward bound stairwell or stairs that he could find. Occasionally he'd hit a dead end and have to go back up and then down some other set, but eventually he'd gotten quite deep.

He could tell he was quite deep because the walls had gotten quite cool to touch and he didn't encounter any more windows. He also didn't see much in the way of people. In fact he hadn't seen anyone in the last half hour or so. The other thing was that the halls were lit by torches, and these had become scarcer as he went. In fact it had gotten quite dark between torches.

So that he didn't trip over anything, Rupert allowed his eyes to shift slightly. Like he had in the Abyss, this let him see fine in the dark. Actually, having done this, he noted that periodically there were other light spots, besides the torches that he hadn't seen before. Some were floating in the hallway and some seemed to come through cracks under various doors. Really rather strange actually.

The other thing he'd noted as he paid closer attention was that some of these glowing spots that floated, also moved around almost as if intelligent. That rather spooked him. He didn't know what those spots were. Ghosts maybe? He had to chide himself. Here he was, a demon, getting spooked by ghosts. It was just that he really still thought of himself as a human more than a demon. It hadn't been that long ago that he'd finally even admitted it to himself. And even less time since his first trip to the Abyss.

He was just about to turn around and go back, deciding there was nothing interesting in this region, when a softly glowing door that he noticed out of the corner of his eye caught his attention. He turned around to look again at the door, but found only blank stonewall. That was strange. He'd been sure there'd been a door there a moment ago. He went to the wall and peered more closely. Wall all right, why had it looked like a glowing door?

Rupert allowed his eyes to shift even more, he then stared at the spot on the wall as if trying to see through the stone. Slowly a door began to appear, superimposed on top of the stone. The harder he looked, almost squinting, the more he could see it. After staring intently for several moments, it seemed to solidify and the appearance of stone behind it vanished altogether. There was definitely a door there, and it did glow. What was going on here? Some sort of illusion? Rupert wondered.

He examined the door with his hands. Yes, now that he could see it, he could feel it too, there really was a door here. It was, not surprisingly, locked when Rupert tried it. That was a pain. All that trouble and he couldn't even get through it. Rupert thought for a moment. There was a very simple spell for unlocking locks that weren't magical. Given that the door had been hidden though, it was probably magically locked as well. He shrugged, the worst he could do was fail.

"Ek fen, bien lok. Fret net zien lok. Dok den ber abien." Rupert said twisting his fingers in the requisite gesture. He heard a clicking noise from the keyhole! It wasn't magically locked. Apparently, whoever hid the door must have believed the illusion and relative seclusion to be sufficient.

Rupert opened the door carefully and peered in. It was a small room. The room was about fifteen feet on a side with a door on the opposite wall. The only furniture was a table with a small glowing ball sitting on it off to the left. The room was otherwise empty. Rupert slipped into the room.

He stepped towards the door on the opposite wall. As he did so, a glowing light appeared about two feet from him. Actually, looking carefully, the light was only visible to his special sight. Normally it wouldn't have been visible. Suddenly there was a four foot high demon standing in the room where the light had been. This demon was visible to any sight.

The demon was red all over. He had completely human legs except that they ended in hooves. Actually, aside from the hooves, a horse's tail, the traditional bat-like wings and ivory horns, the demon looked nothing so much as a fat, red, short human. He was also completely bald, but his ears were normal. He had rather chubby cheeks to go with his large paunch. Oh, he also had, Rupert noted, some rather nasty looking fingernails. The demon was wearing a small red loincloth.

The demon smiled evilly at Rupert. The demon had wickedly pointed fangs also. Short, but wicked looking. Actually, Rupert was only guessing that the smile was rather wicked looking. He supposed that it was at least supposed to be wicked looking, but Tom was much better at it. Rupert wondered if he should act terrified. He supposed that would be the appropriate human response, but frankly, even Tizzy was scarier looking than this fellow.

"Where do you think you're going, little boy?" The demon chuckled, again in what Rupert guessed to be a suitably terrifying form. Maybe it would look better if he played along a little bit.

He supposed he should at least be polite to one of his fellow demons. He really didn't know demon etiquette. That was one of the problems with a human upbringing, he supposed. If he'd grown up in the Abyss, with Tom, he'd probably know better how to handle the situation. "Well, I saw this doorway here," he pointed to the one he'd came through. "It was rather curious, being invisible and all, and since it wasn't particularly locked. I decided to check it out." Rupert told the demon truthfully.

The demon stopped smiling, apparently, annoyed Rupert wasn't a quivering mass of gelatin. "It wasn't well-locked because I'm here to guard it." The demon concentrated what Rupert guessed to be a stern/evil stare at him.

"Oh." Rupert said matter-of-factly. "That would make sense. Why are you guarding it? Is there anything interesting behind that door?" He pointed to the other door.

"Wouldn't you like to know, kiddie?" The demon snarled nastily.

"Yes, actually, if it's not too much of a bother."

The demon blinked. "Well kid, I've got orders to let no one pass. That includes you. I don't like to have to kill kids...but I don't see that I have an alternative." The demon shrugged, flexing its claws.

Rupert frowned. "Isn't that a bit drastic? I was just curious. I thought the council was supposed to be full of good guys? Killing an innocent little kid for his curiosity seems a little harsh and out of character."

The demon smiled, apparently more evilly, it was certainly showing more teeth. "I don't work for the council. My master is a bit more powerful than those pathetic windbags. He's ordered me to kill anyone entering without his approval. You entered. You weren't approved. You gotta die."

"Are you sure? No escape clause or anything?" Rupert quizzed the demon. It was really looking annoyed.

"Given that you are just a kid, I could probably get away with letting you go. However, since you saw the door, you are obviously some snot-nosed wizard brat. If I let you'll go, you'll only grow up to be a wizard and enslave more demons. Thus if I kill you now, I'll save some demon a lot of misery. Thus you might say it's personal." The demon smiled.

"I really don't think..." Rupert began, but was unable to finish. The demon had reached forward and swatted him with his claws. "Aaaggghhh." Rupert cried. He went spinning across the room to the corner from the force of the blow. His chest stung severely. He looked down to see red, bloody tracks running across his chest where the demon had clawed him. He crouched on the floor where he'd been flung.

He looked to the door he'd entered. It seemed to be invisible again, this time from this side. He looked back to the demon. The demon was smiling extremely wickedly at him this time. There could be no mistake. The demon was about to play hardball. Rupert didn't think the demon intended to let him live.

Well then, he too could play hardball. "You shouldn't have done that," he told the demon sternly.

"Why?" The demon taunted. "Going to run crying to mommy and daddy. They can't help you now kid. You're meat."

Rupert stood up, lightly touching his still stinging chest wound. "You wouldn't like my daddy, demon." Rupert glared evilly back at the demon. Unfortunately, his human glare wasn't as intimidating as the demon's. The little demon just laughed. Rupert just shrugged. He let himself go.

The wound in his chest stopped stinging. His boots and pants suddenly constricted him, as did the cuffs of his sleeves. They didn't for long though, it took only a moment before his clothes tore. The demon stopped laughing.

Rupert now looked down at the little demon, he was easily two feet taller than the other demon. Rupert just fanned his wings slowly, now he smiled in earnest. "Bwah-hah-hah-hah" Rupert chuckled evilly. The little demon gulped. Rupert glared into the demon's eyes.

"You might consider giving a person the benefit of the doubt in the future, munchkin." Rupert said. He swiped the little demon across the chest in the same way he'd been swiped. Unfortunately, for the little demon, Rupert's claws were a lot sharper and longer, and Rupert was a lot stronger. The little demon went plop into the far wall, goo oozing from its chest cavity as it tried to suck in air to speak.

"Heh, heh." The demon gasped. "Just playing with you, sir. Hadn't realized exactly who you were, m'lord. No, no, certainly if I'd known, wouldn't have been so harsh. Even so I wouldn't have killed you. Certainly not. Just wanted to scare you a little." The demon tried to grin ingratiatingly. Rupert just stared at him.

"The question," Rupert stated, "is do I rend you limb from limb, physically. Or do I rend you cell by cell, magically." Rupert certainly couldn't do the latter, and he really didn't want to do the former; however the demon had really made him mad. He deserved to suffer a little fear. If Rupert had been a human, he'd be dead by now, he was sure.

"Limb by limb if you please." The demon begged. "I'll be forever regenerating the cell by cell thing. Please." The demon almost seemed to whine. "Please lord, if I have to regenerate cell by cell, my master will really be angry with me. He doesn't like his people slacking off, taking his time to regenerate from their own stupidity as he'd say. Just rend me limb from limb, I promise I won't bother you anymore. Please?" Rupert just continued to glare. He was taken by surprise. The little fellow acted as if it were standard procedure in this circumstance. He was actually begging for one method over the other. "Please? Limb by limb?" The demon begged.

Rupert shrugged. He'd never rendered anyone limb from limb before. He wasn't sure how it was supposed to be done, but he could use his imagination. Rupert waded in. It was all rather messy he'd decided afterward. The demon had wailed in pain most annoyingly. Rupert had been afraid someone would hear, so he stuffed a hoof he'd torn off earlier in the demon's mouth to shut him up as he went about the job. Eventually he had the demon down to pieces no smaller than the demon's hand. Except for the head. He held that in one hand, looking at it and trying to decide what he could do with it. Not knowing how to tear that apart he decided to just stomped on it. As he set the head on the ground, the demon's eyes looked up at him in fearful expectation. Having no body and thus no lungs, it couldn't speak, Rupert was just as glad. Amazing to still be conscious after all of that, Rupert thought.

The demon's head exploded under his hooves. Much like a melon dropped off a tall building, or smashed beneath a very large rock dropped off a building. As the last of the demon bits splattered to the ground, all the bits began to fade. Rupert looked around in surprised. All the gore, all the goo, all simply vanished from the walls where it had splattered. The blood and junk also seemed to fade and vanish from his hands. That was certainly convenient, Rupert decided. Actually he supposed that he should have been shocked by what he'd just done, but actually, it had been kind of fun.

Unfortunately, Rupert frowned to himself twenty minutes later; the whole thing had been for nothing. The inner door had been magically locked, and he couldn't get through it. He'd gone through the whole thing for nothing. Well not completely, it had been kind of fun to be himself for a change. It was also nice to be able to see what he could do. He also now knew how to rend someone limb from limb, he'd also come up with a few ideas for improvement the next time he got to do it. At last he'd gotten to be a demon for real. That was good.

What was not so good, Rupert reflected about half an hour later, was the price he was even now having to pay. Unfortunately, he'd shredded his clothes in the change. Now he had to sneak around the castle naked, with only the few scraps of cloth he'd salvaged to cover himself. Not that they stayed in one piece even, he had to hold the stuff in place. For about the twentieth time in the last half hour he wished for an invisibility spell.

Invisibility spells were just out of his reach though. Actually, a long way out of his reach, but nevertheless, it would still have been convenient for times like these. He ducked around another corridor to avoid some more people. He wasn't sure this part was worth the fun he'd had earlier. Eventually however, he did manage to make it back to his room. Only a handful of servants scattered throughout the palace had seen him.

~

Exador cursed. Someone had set off a Ward of Warning in his workplace under the palace. He'd gone to investigate, found the first door to have been unlocked, Yrbling to be missing, but the inner door still secure. This was not good. Someone had found this work room. He'd put his most potent illusion on the damned door, but someone had still seen it. They had not managed to break in though. They did seem to have taken out his second order guard.

Admittedly, a rather weak second order, but it should have been sufficient for anything normal. If nothing else, it should have summoned him if it had been something it couldn't handle. He'd have to find out what had happened. No one was supposed to know about this area. Now someone did, even if they hadn't gone inside.

"Yrbling Hrastada Norendle, I summon thee from the depths of the Abyss. Come and show thy lowly face before thy true master!" Exador shouted extemporaneously. He'd shut the door to the corridor, so no one should hear him, even if someone was down in this part of the palace. "Yrbling Hrastada Norendle, get your lard belly into this room before I vaporize you off the face of the Abyss!" Exador commanded.

A small mist formed in the center of the room. "Sire," a voice whimpered from the mist. “I need assistance; I am too weak to form a new body so soon." Exador shook his head. At least the cretin had gone out fighting. He'd give it that much. He waved his hands in the required gestures, mumbling the spell needed to provide the energy for the demon to form. He hated having to resort to such crude means; unfortunately, sometimes it was the only way. People like Lenamare should have to do this to get their demons, not him.

At last the cringing Yrbling cowered before him. Looking a little anemic Exador thought. "What happened, Yrbling? Make it quick or you're gone for good." Exador commanded.

"Sire, I beg you, I didn't stand a chance." Yrbling begged.

"Spit it out, before I rip it out of you."

"Lord and master, please," Yrbling bubbled, "The room was discovered by another demon. A powerful one. He bested me in combat."

Exador stared down at his demon, rubbing his chin thoughtfully. "Another demon? Describe him."

"Tall, huge bat wings, bald head, and snout. Incredibly big muscles. Huge scaley goat legs, black hooves. Spade tipped whipcord tail. Huge ebony claws and horns." Yrbling cringed.

Exador looked thoughtful, Yrbling staring at his master's feet didn't notice. "Tall, you mean he was very large?"

"Extremely, sire, much much larger than I. There was little I could do before its might."

"You imply that it was powerful?" Exador was looking off into space, calculating, hardly paying attention to his whimpering vassal.

"Incredibly so, sire."

"Hmm, on the traditional scale, how would you rate this demon?"

Yrbling bit its lip, indecisive for a moment. "Fourth, sire, certainly as far as I could judge." Exador looked down at it. He might have doubted the demon, such little weasels as Yrbling would say anything to save their wings; this, however, convinced him. No, Yrbling could not have made this up. The description, physically, power, everything. Yrbling hadn't even tried to lie about the demon's rank. Obviously, Lenamare's fourth order demon had been poking its nose around. Probably checking to make sure Exador didn't have the book.

Except for the fact that the book had been with the girl, and the demon with the girl. Thus why would the demon be looking for the book in Exador's lab? If only he knew where the damn girl and that soon to be worse than dead Gastropé had vanished to. Then he'd have the book. The demon must have lost the girl and the book. Or maybe it hadn't realized the girl had the book? Did the demon want the book for himself or its master? If for his master then surely he would have returned the girl to Lenamare. Then Lenamare would have the book and he wouldn't need the demon to look for the book.

Therefore, Exador surmised, the demon must be acting as its own operative, looking for the book. He could certainly understand that. The question thus remained, where was that damned girl and the book? He was tapping his foot impatiently as he thought. Suddenly he noticed Yrbling babbling something at his feet. He frowned.

"Yrbling. Get your wings back to the Abyss and fully regenerate. You're no good to me in this state you moron. When you've got yourself back together, contact me through the usual channels. I'll have a new assignment for you. I think I need someone bigger down here from now on." Exador turned and left the room, the door opening and closing behind him.

Yrbling stared after his departing master. He was not sure whether to believe his good luck, or worry that it was part of a more elaborate punishment on Exador's part. Either way, for the moment he was still alive. That was enough.





Chapter 69


Edwyrd cursed to himself. Tizzy had been right, there were demons all over. He was able to get a lot more practice in changing just his eyes today in order to search for demons. It took a great deal of concentration but like holding the Edwyrd form itself, practice made it easier. They'd retraced the corridors and exactly as Tizzy had told them, there were glowing lights visible only to his demon sight. Concentrating on the spots of light for a few moments allowed him to make out the outlines of demons. All of various shapes and sizes, but none very big. A few of the glowing lights actually had no outline or form; these however were also visible to his Edwyrd sight as dark shadowy spots in corners. Tizzy informed him that these were shadows, amorphous bodiless demons.

They'd gone through several dozen corridors, he and Gastropé counting well over a hundred demons in about two hours. Gastropé could apparently do something so that he could see invisible objects also. However, it seemed to take Gastrope' about as much effort as it did Edwyrd to do so. They'd gone to dinner and peered around the dining hall cautiously, making sure they were far away from the ever present demons. Even so, they had to sit in the very center of the dining room to avoid the demons in the room.

"So what do we do?" Edwyrd asked Gastropé. Gastropé just shrugged, frowning, as he sipped more stew from his spoon. Edwyrd pretended to eat. He was worried that with all these demons around, one would spot him for what he was and tell whomever they worked for.

"I don't know." Gastropé told Edwyrd looking helplessly at his dinner companion. "Tizzy pointed out the second and thirds also. Those really make me nervous." Certain areas in the lower regions seemed to have more powerful demons as well as the little ones everywhere. There weren't many, they'd only encountered about four threes and a dozen or so twos. Nonetheless, Edwyrd was pretty sure that if the general populous knew there would be panic. "I suspect we should tell someone."

"Who?" Edwyrd asked him.

"I don't know. Maelen certainly, but that won't do anything to get rid of them. We could tell Lenamare, but I really don't trust him."

"You either, huh?" Edwyrd said.

"Yeah, I guess that leaves Damien." Gastrope' shrugged, unsure if it was a good idea. Edwyrd wasn't sure either. They didn't know this Damien, but he was a council member that wasn’t Lenamare, Exador or Jehenna. The only other council members they knew of. The only problem would be if the demons were Damien's. He might not appreciate having them noticed.

"Well," Edwyrd began, "he is the closest thing we know to a local authority that we even remotely trust. This does seem like one of those things the people in charge should be aware of." Gastropé just nodded.

The question it seemed was to be taken out of their hands. They had gone to see the wizard Damien, but no one had answered their knock. "Apparently not in. I guess we'll have to think of something else," Gastropé stated. They headed back to their quarters, somewhat relieved to have the need of acting taken out of their hands.

Several minutes later as they were crossing the main foyer of the palace to get to the other side where their quarters were; the question was put back in their hands. Even as they reached the middle of the large courtroom, Damien came striding through the front doors of the palace. The golden haired wizard was looking rather grim. "Well?" Edwyrd looked at Gastropé. Gastropé just gestured for Edwyrd to precede him to the wizard.

"Damien." Edwyrd called as they approached the wizard. For a moment, the wizard appeared lost in thought, but then he noted the two young men approaching him. He nodded to them grimly as they approached him. "Councilor, may we have a word with you?" Edwyrd asked.

Damien sighed, "I'm a little preoccupied at the moment; could it wait until tomorrow?"

Edwyrd thought for a moment, "I suspect it would be better if you knew sooner than later."

"Knew? Knew what?" Damien looked wearily and suspiciously at Edwyrd.

"I think we better go someplace private." Edwyrd told him, "and secure from prying ears." Damien just raised his eyebrows and motioned the two to follow him back to his quarters.

Damien ushered them into his main room after unlocking the door with a wave of his hand. "Be seated," he told them as he closed the door behind them. Edwyrd looked around then went to sit on a couch nearby, Gastropé' took a chair to his left. Damien hung his cloak on a large cloak rack then moved to a small bar. "Can I offer you anything to drink?" He asked as he poured himself some golden liquid. Edwyrd thanked him, but refused, Gastropé likewise.

"So," Damien said sitting down on the divan opposite Edwyrd, "what do I need to know that can't wait until morning?"

Edwyrd cleared his throat and looked to Gastropé. Gastropé simply nodded at him to speak. "I'm unfamiliar with Freehold, perhaps it's just standard practice, but in the event you were unaware, we thought it best to inform you." Edwyrd paused; Damien just looked at him to continue. "Well, there seems, in my opinion to be a rather high number of demons wandering around the palace. Perhaps you're aware of this and it is no cause for alarm, but..."

Damien started and shook his head, looking as if he'd been splashed by cold water. "What precisely do you mean by a large number?"

Gastropé answered this time. "Several hundred at the very least, one in every corridor and public room we've been in." Damien rubbed his forehead resting his elbow on his knee and his head in his hand.

"You're sure?" Damien asked.

"No question, we both have observed them, as has our...demon." Edwyrd told him.

"Well," Damien looked up, smiling rather grimly. "You're the second group of people to inform me of this today." He sighed and put down his drink. "I went out to negotiate with the Rod, which is now camped outside the gates of the city. Their leaders insisted that they couldn't trust us to negotiate with them when we'd obviously been overrun by demons. When I asked what they meant, they told me much the same thing." Damien shook his head in consternation.

"I haven't noticed them, but then I haven't thought to look for them." Damien said. He looked around the room, as if searching for demons.

"There are none in here, I checked as we entered." Gastropé told him. "At least none that we can detect." Edwyrd nodded his agreement. Damien nodded.

"Antefalken!" Damien called. Edwyrd nearly jumped when he heard the demon's name called. He didn't know what Damien meant by the shout. His question was shortly answered however as the little demon strolled into the room from an open doorway adjacent to the garden windows.

"Gentlemen," Damien said, "allow me to introduce my bard, Antefalken." He waved an introductory hand to the little demon. Antefalken bowed slightly in acknowledgement. Edwyrd would have started sweating if he knew how. Surely, the little demon would recognize him?

"Greetings, sirs." Antefalken said as he hopped up onto the back of a chair to Edwyrd's right. Damien looked to his demon.

"Can you confirm this?" Damien asked.

"Well, I generally don't go about the palace much, and when I do, I don't usually make the effort to scan. At least not recently. However, I will certainly go check. As I'm sure you will also." Damien just nodded, obviously worried.

"So this is not standard practice for the council?" Edwyrd asked.

Damien shook his head. "No. Certainly not. We have some big egos on the council but no one has ever been quite that--irrational--to date."

Antefalken just looked at Damien for a few moments. "The real question, assuming they are there," he looked to Gastropé and Edwyrd, "is who's are they?"

"Well..." Damien said, "if you believe the Rod, they belong to a group of archdemons who've taken over the city." Edwyrd and Gastropé shook their heads and just looked at each other in puzzlement.

"What?" Antefalken said.

"Well, according to Sir Talarius," he looked Antefalken squarely in the eyes, "there are at least three archdemons in the palace, along with one or more fourth order demons."

"You've got to be kidding." Antefalken stated.

Gastropé coughed, "Archdemons? Are they serious?" Edwyrd felt the same way. They knew why the Rod was here, and it had nothing to do with archdemons. At least he didn't think it did.

"They are deadly serious. Moreover, from what I know of Sir Talarius' and his reputation, he does not lie about such things. They, at least, believe this." Damien told them.

"You have a point. I've never met Talarius, but I've heard stories from demons who've been beaten by him. He has also permanently slain more than a few demons. He's the epitome of the goody two shoes mentality. " Antefalken agreed. "Unfortunately, if you also believe what I've heard, he's generally not wrong on such matters."

Damien put his head in both hands. "I had that suspicion."

Gastropé didn't seem to be breathing well, the young wizard was his favorite shade of pale, Edwyrd noted. "Well," Gastropé said weakly, "this would certainly confirm what Lenamare was saying about archdemons."

"And then some," Antefalken added. "Shall we go for a stroll?" Antefalken looked to Damien, who just nodded and stood up slowly.

~

Maelen entered the large foyer of the palace. He'd spent the each of the last few days renewing his contacts in the city. Today, at the local Seer's School, he taken the time to contact Johen and bring him up to date on the current affairs. Johen had concurred on almost all points Maelen raised. He'd also confirmed that the sorcerer, Elrose was one of Lenamare’s masters and thus the two assumed he should be coming to Freehold along with the rest of the school. Given the current situation, Johen had also suggested arranging for some support. Maelen had told him that it wouldn't be necessary for now, but Johen should begin preparations.

Deciding that he was going to be here for a while, he felt it best to get a lay of the land, Maelen took a stroll around the palace. For this pass, he wouldn't try seeing anything, just familiarize himself with the palace. He'd wandered for about half an hour in an upper corridor when two voices arguing took him by surprise. Almost out of habit, he stepped into the shadows in a nearby corner and allowed himself to blend in to the shadow itself. He wasn't sure what prompted him to do so, it just felt right. If there was something he'd learned about prescience in the many years he'd been dealing with it: if something felt right, do it.

It didn't take long for him to see what had prompted him to do so. Two large men were coming down the corridor in heated debate. They were arguing in some language Maelen didn't immediately recognize, but given time he could figure out. As he got a good look at the two men, deciphering the language became less important.

He didn't actually recognize either. One man, the one on the right appeared to be something of a wizard. He was wearing something like long red robes, yet with a breastplate and other armor over the robes, the robes split for horseback riding. The man had grey hair and a beard, streaked with white. He was certainly a commanding presence, standing just over six feet tall. However, he paled in comparison to his companion.

His companion was nearly a giant, almost a foot taller than the robed man. His almost shoulder length black hair was swept back over his ears and held in place by a leather strap. He was obviously a warrior of some form, of apparently incredible strength. He appeared to be in his mid to early thirties. None of this mattered however; none of this was what took Maelen's breath.

What caused his heart to crawl up his throat was the uniform the man was wearing. A black outfit made of leather straps. Trimmed in purple and gold, with a short light purple silk cloak hanging from black metal shoulder pads. Maelen had never actually seen this uniform before. Not with his eyes. Nonetheless, like any good animage student of history, he knew the uniform.

There had only been one group of people to wear that uniform in all of history. While very few would recognize the uniform; legends still persisted to frighten children. Most children in Astlan still quaked at the stories of the Anilords and their feared storm troops, the Time Warriors. Between the use of the Time Warriors and the dreaded Mind Reavers, the Anilords had conquered and ruled most of the world, two thousand years ago.

Until this moment, Maelen, like all of his compatriots, was convinced all traces of the Anilords had been destroyed. Wiped clean after the great Battle of Enfiel. Suppressed and mythologized by the victors. How could one have survived? More precisely, how could the tradition have continued, since obviously no one could have lived that long, not even a Time Warrior. Could a secret band of Time Warriors still exist?

Lost in his thoughts, Maelen allowed the two to pass almost out of sight in the other direction. He'd completely forgotten to try and translate what they were saying. He'd been taken more completely by surprise than he had been in two decades. He tried vainly to catch one last bit of their conversation. He could just barely make out a few more words as they faded in the distance. He still hadn't translated them, but he swore his ears were playing tricks on him. One of the few words he thought he had heard, was Ramses.

Apparently, the sight of the man in the Time Warrior uniform had so completely distracted him that his mind was filling in words to the conversation that couldn't be there. There was absolutely no way he could have heard the name Ramses. No way in the Abyss. Ramses, Commander General of the Time Warriors, the Anilord who supposedly trained and led the Time Warriors, had perished unequivocally at Enfiel. The records were quite clear on that. Sir Astemon had slain him in single combat. They'd burned his body. No, if he had heard it, it must have been as a historical reference to something else. Perhaps some way of inspiring fear in others.

They had certainly instilled fear in Maelen. He would definitely re-contact Johen tonight: get that backup prepared. He knew it had to be some sort of masquerade though. Maelen knew there was no possible way that he'd actually seen a Time Warrior, and even less of a chance that it had actually been Ramses the Damned.

~

Rupert stared out at the night sky above the city from his bedroom window. He'd gotten back and got dressed, then had proceeded to relive the afternoon's fight several times in his imagination. He'd been waiting for the others to come by for dinner. Eventually Jenn, Alvea and their friends had knocked on the door. They were all going out into town and were checking if anyone wanted to go with them.

Rupert really didn't feel like going around the town with a group of kids five to six years older than himself, unless Edwyrd was going to be there. Edwyrd and Gastropé still hadn't shown up though. So Rupert told Jenn that he'd just wait for Gastropé and Edwyrd to return and eat with them. Jenn didn't seem too upset by the idea. Rupert suspected she was about as happy about not having a little kid tag along as Rupert was happy not to have to go. The teenagers left and Rupert tried to read in the remaining light of late afternoon.

An hour or so later, there was still no sign of Edwyrd or Gastropé so Rupert wandered down to the cafeteria to get himself some food. Strangely, he really wasn't hungry after all the excitement he'd had, but he felt he should eat anyway to keep his strength up, and besides, it was something to do. After eating, he returned to the room to still find no sign of Gastropé or his father. Rupert smiled at the word, it was so--thrilling--to be able to say that word, father.

Rupert wasn't too concerned as he stared out into the starlit sky. He knew that his father could handle any problems they might have encountered, so they must just be doing grown-up things, whatever those were. Rupert inhaled the night air; it was so magnificent, the night sky. Rupert figured it would be really exciting to be soaring on the night winds above the city. Thinking back to this afternoon and how free and powerful he'd felt in his true form, Rupert smiled imagining being that way again and soaring above the city.

Not only would it be exciting, it would certainly beat being bored to death in the room. He saw no sign of Edwyrd or Gastropé returning soon, so he didn't have much else to do other than sleep. Rupert was anything but tired, however. As he looked down over the city, a sly thought began to creep into Rupert's mind. He knew it wasn't probably the best idea. He knew he really shouldn't, but it would be a lot of fun. Being himself was kind of like an addiction; the more he let his true, demon-self free, the more he wanted it to be free.

While human Rupert could crawl out the window, he doubted demon Rupert would fit. Rupert decided he'd just do it. He turned away from the window and extinguished the candles in the room. Quickly he stripped off his clothes so he wouldn't have to get another set. Standing naked in the moonlight that was just starting to come through the open window as the first moon, Uropia, rose above the horizon; Rupert flexed his muscles in anticipation. Quickly he climbed up and out the window. He perched carefully on the outside of the windowsill. He looked around to make sure no one watching him, allowing his eyes to go demonic so he could see in the dark. Assured that no one was watching, he relaxed.

Once again the change came over him, swiftly and with only a mild tingling sensation. Taking one's clothes off in advance was really a good idea, Rupert decided as he flexed his wings. He wobbled a bit, catching his balance as his toes and the ball of his feet had turned into hooves, but by that point his wings had been able to help.

Without further thought, Rupert turned and dove down and out over the city, his wings spreading to catch the wind as Tom had shown him. This was the life, thought Rupert as he swooped over the city like a giant bird of prey. As he reached about twenty feet above the courtyard near the palace, Rupert began to climb. He climbed high up into the sky. While he reveled in being himself and flying, he did not particularly like the idea of scaring the life out of the town’s people. Well, to be honest with himself, Rupert actually did want to scare the townspeople a bit. However, he figured it would end up causing more problems than the momentary fun would be worth.

Rupert circled the city, peering down at the goings on. Unlike most of the towns Rupert had ever been in. Freehold didn't seem to go to sleep right after dark. There were several large torch lit streets as well as several major boulevards with some form of magical globe lighting. On the lighted streets, people milled and streamed, going from tavern to tavern, or to some shops that were still open. With his demon sight, Rupert could also see that there were people on the dark, unlit streets. These weren't so many, and those that there were, tended to move more cautiously, or stealthily.

Rupert circled the city from high above for about half an hour before he decided to venture further. In his circling near the outer walls, Rupert had noticed campfires on the plain around the city. He was pretty sure they hadn't been there when they'd entered the city. Rupert cruised over and above the campfires. Even in the dark, from several hundred feet up, Rupert had no trouble identifying the uniforms of the soldiers in the camp. He didn't recognize the uniforms of course, but there could be little doubt this was the Rod of Tiernon.

Given that these soldiers were out hunting Rupert and his friends, it probably wouldn't be a good idea to be flying above them. On the other hand, Rupert thought, what could they do to him? He wasn't little Rupert any more. He was a powerful...some order...demon. He didn't know where he ranked in the demonic hierarchy. He knew everyone said Tom was fourth, so since his mother was human did that make Rupert the average of the two? Zero plus fourth, second? Rupert didn't know. He really wasn't sure what exactly determined who was a greater demon and who was an imp or whatever. Obviously, it was power, but how did one rank one's self. Rupert frowned, that was a good question. It was pretty clear however that he'd been a lot stronger than the little guy he'd rendered today.

He'd have to ask his father. He would know, actually, Tizzy probably would too. He'd ask whichever one he saw next. It was pretty obvious though, that if Tom was fourth, Rupert had to be less, and if the guy this afternoon was first, then Rupert was more powerful than that. Maybe second order was right, or third. Rupert glanced down at the ground he was flying over. He'd unconsciously moved to hover over the best-lighted part of the camp. It appeared that people were digging or something. He'd also been so busy thinking about what order demon he was that he'd failed to note that he'd been spotted.

Apparently, it had just happened, because people were just starting to point up into the sky at him. Probably time for a hasty retreat Rupert decided. While they couldn't hurt him, he didn't want to give them any more reason to hate demons. As he was taking a last look before leaving, Rupert noticed a big guy in what appeared to be glow-in-the-dark armor leaving a tent. His armor was literally glowing of its own accord. Glowing to normal sight and not just demon sight.

Rupert was transfixed. He'd always heard of knights in magical armor, but he'd never seen one before. As he watched the man pointed his arm up at the sky in Rupert's direction. Too late, Rupert realized the man was casting a spell at him. Rupert braced himself for impact; he wasn't going to have time to get out of the way. Suddenly a brilliant beam of light lanced out of the man's mailed hand, striking Rupert full in the chest. Rupert screamed in pain as he blacked out from the impact of the beam of light.





Chapter 70


Edwyrd shut the door to the room he shared with Rupert softly. He didn't want to wake the boy; he simply wanted to check on him before heading down to his practice room. He'd been a lot later than he'd planned. It wasn't until he and Gastropé had turned down the corridor to their rooms that he'd realized they'd even forgot to pick up Rupert for dinner. He cursed himself, they'd gotten so wrapped up in the demon problem, he'd forgotten about his favorite little demon.

It was now quite late. Gastropé, Damien, Antefalken and he had gone for what was ostensibly a short walking tour of the palace. Damien and Antefalken had used the opportunity to confirm what they'd been told. When they'd gotten back to Damien's quarters, the wizard had looked more concerned than ever. He and Antefalken were both at a loss for where the demons had come from and for how long they'd been there.

They'd spent several hours in discussion trying to figure out what the demons were doing. Or more precisely since it was fairly obvious what they were doing, who they were doing it for. They'd considered all possibilities, Lenamare, Exador, other council members and the even more frightening possibility of some unknown group of archdemons. Edwyrd had sat rather uncomfortably as the other three tossed around the idea that the demon Tom might be involved.

He'd been almost positive that Antefalken would recognize him. Tizzy had never had any problem; however, if Antefalken did, he gave no sign. Also from the tone of the conversation, Antefalken did not sidestep when discussing Tom in a way that might indicate he knew the demon was there in the room with him. The other three had tossed around ideas that Tom was involved with the little demons on behalf of Lenamare, or on his own or on behalf of the higher order demons.

As was becoming more and more of the case lately, Edwyrd found himself amazed at the level of paranoid speculation these wizards engaged in. As wizards go, he thought Damien seemed very reasonable and enlightened towards demons, especially seeing his non-master-slave relationship with Antefalken; nonetheless, even Damien seemed paranoid about demonic machinations. For that matter, Antefalken, who was a demon himself, was just as paranoid. Edwyrd had begun to wonder if being the only non-paranoid person in a world full of paranoids should tell him something.

Edwyrd shook his head and glanced around the room to make sure there were no unexpected demons in his room. As he did so, his eyes swept across Rupert's bed to find it empty. Edwyrd was startled. Where could the boy be?

Quickly, Edwyrd went down the hall to Jenn's room. He tried the same thing with his hearing that he did with his sight, trying to listen into Jenn's room to see if Rupert were there. All he heard was the soft sound of gentle breathing, telling him that Jenn was asleep and alone in the room. Next he went to Gastropé's room and knocked quietly on the door. He had no fear of waking Gastropé since they'd just parted a few minutes ago.

"Is Rupert in there?" Edwyrd asked as Gastropé opened the door.

Gastrope' looked puzzled. "No, just Maelen, who's in some sort of trance." He gestured over to the older man. Maelen was sitting on his bed in the lotus position. He was so still and breathing so softly, that even Edwyrd's demonic hearing had a bit of trouble determining if the seer was alive. "Isn't he in your room?"

"No, I don't know where he went. I'm a little concerned." While he was sure that Rupert was capable of taking care of almost anything, he still worried. Rupert was after all, just a kid, demon or not.

"Did you check with Jenn? Maybe he's with some of those students who came in today." Gastrope' suggested.

"She's asleep. You're probably right." Edwyrd said. That could certainly be a possibility. "I'm sure he's fine. I was just a little worried."

Gastropé nodded, concerned.

"Good night." Edwyrd said as he went back to his own room.

Edwyrd went in and stared at Rupert's bed, wondering where the boy could be. Edwyrd noted that the boy's clothes were folded neatly on his bed. That was strange. Actually, they weren't the same set that Rupert had worn in the morning. Why did he have this other set laid out? If they'd been the clothes the boy had been wearing, Edwyrd would have suspected the boy of stripping and demonizing. Edwyrd looked out the window, searching the night sky for flying demons. He didn't see any.

~

Rupert came to as he crashed through tree limbs while falling to the ground. Eventually he came to rest at the base of a large tree. Apparently, that beam of light had knocked him back quite a ways, into the small grove of trees he'd seen not too far from the Rod's campsite. He ached all over. That light blast had really hurt. Probably as much as the lightning bolt.

Fortunately, he'd been in demon form this time, which was a lot sturdier, and he'd braced himself for it. Nonetheless, he felt like he'd been burned. Actually, it felt like an extremely severe case of sunburn. Not pleasant at all. Rupert shook his head to clear it. As he did, he heard what sounded like an advancing patrol of soldiers. He could also see torchlight advancing through the forest. Dodging up into the sky from underneath the heavy canopy of trees would make too much noise and probably get him shot down again. These guys were just too close. Not knowing what else to do, Rupert changed back into human form.

He did so with only moments to spare, as a patrol of soldiers carrying torches arrived at his location. It was a group of about ten young men, all in the standard Rod uniform and light, summertime, cloaks. "What the mighty?" Asked one of the men carrying a sword rather than a torch. "It's a naked boy!" Rupert decided it was time for a repeat of the lost waif routine he'd used on Exador's people. He started sobbing. He crouched into a fetal ball on the ground. "You men," the man who'd spoken before continued, "fan out and keep searching. Ethen and I will talk to this lad.

"Boy, what are you doing here? This is not a safe place. And why are you naked?" The soldier carefully bent down over Rupert. Concerned, but wary. Rupert just sobbed some more. "There, there, we're friends, we won't hurt you, but we have to know what you're doing here." He lightly patted Rupert on his back. Rupert didn't have to fake a wince, even his human skin was a bit raw from the light beam. "Sssh, it will be all right now, stop crying. We won't hurt you."

"Help," Rupert whimpered.

"Help? Do you need help? What do you need help with?"

"Protect...protect me...please." Rupert sobbed and stammered. He knew these guys had to be searching for a downed demon. He'd play on that. Hopefully it would get him out of this.

"We'll protect you. But you've got to let us know what's the matter, and why you're here." Ethen who was holding the torch stepped a little closer as the leader continued to squat near Rupert.

"D.d.d.emon. " Rupert stuttered.

"Demon. You've seen the demon, boy? Where is it? We're looking for it. Did it come down by here?"

"D.d.d.emon grabbed me. Carried me through the air. Hit by light. I.i.it screamed, then dropped me. Hurt." Rupert whimpered. The leader looked up at Ethen, then down at Rupert again.

"Did you see where the demon went?" Rupert shook his head negatively and just whimpered. The leader sighed. "Ethen," he looked at the other soldier. "Take this lad," he looked down to Rupert again, "what's your name boy?"

"Snnnfff. Wupert." Rupert snuffled.

"Err, Rupert" the leader continued to Ethen, "to Sir Talarius. I'm sure he'd like to question the boy. I've got to find this demon." He turned his attention back to Rupert. "Now child, I want you to go with Ethen here. He'll take you some place safe. No demon will get you, this I promise, on Tiernon's Rod." He took off his cloak and draped it over Rupert. Ethen put his hand on Rupert's arm to help him up.

Ethen led Rupert back to the Rod's campsite. As they entered the campsite, Rupert noted that the entire perimeter of the camp had sentries stationed every hundred feet or so. These fellows certainly didn't take chances. Apparently they took security a little more seriously than Exador's people.

The two wound their way through tents and past several campfires; Rupert estimated there must be several hundred men here. Eventually they came to the well-lit region from which the individual had shot Rupert down. Off to his left, Rupert saw a large hill, it was where the light was centered. It appeared that excavation was in progress.

It really wasn't clear to Rupert, exactly what the soldiers were doing. It looked like they'd dug away one side of the hill, giving the hill a vertical incline on one side. On the flat wall they had dug on the hill, they appeared to be constructing something that looked like a large doorway in the side of the mountain. A very large doorway, more like a gate to a castle. It was certainly going to be big enough for mounted soldiers to ride through.

The doorway, or gate, was being constructed from stones, seemingly laid in some sort of pattern. The majority of the manual work was being done by soldiers wearing slightly different uniforms. Supervising the work was a group of men in white robes. Rupert guessed these robed men were priests. Suddenly he got a sick feeling in his stomach. He hoped that priest from Gizzor Del wasn't with them. That man would recognize Rupert on the spot. Dodging up through the trees might not have been a bad idea.

Ethen led Rupert to a man in full armor. While the armor didn't actually glow, it did seem to reflect an awful lot of torch light. The man was big, and with so much armor, Rupert doubted he could move very fast. Ethen called out, "Sir Talarius!" The big man turned and quickly strode over to them. The grace and fluidity of his movements completely reversing Rupert's opinions.

One didn't have to be a scholar to figure that this guy was a knight. A very impressive knight, exactly like in the stories Rupert had been told as a child. Perhaps the stories he had been told about demons had been biased and overblown; apparently, however, the stories of knights in shining armor were only too true. A strange sort of fierce calm seemed to almost radiate from the knight as he came up to Ethen and Rupert.

He looked down at the shivering Rupert and smiled a kindly, gentle smile. Rupert's heart almost came up in his throat. The man seemed so sincere, so warm in his concern. "What have we here, Ethen, a lost young lad perhaps?" The knight asked softly. He reached down to gently lift Rupert's chin and gaze into his eyes. It took all Rupert's will not to break down and confess. Confess what, he wasn't sure. Confess he was a demon spawn? It didn't seem like a wise idea; yet even so, he felt he could trust the man with even his greatest secrets.

"We found him wandering in the forest sir, naked." Ethen reported.

"Naked?" The man's voice remained calm and gentle, but it did cause him to raise an eyebrow.

"Yes sir. He was shivering and," Ethen glanced down sympathetically to Rupert, obviously hating to embarrass Rupert, "uhm, sobbing." The young soldier was being nice about it, but Rupert would just have preferred the man to be direct and honest it would make his story so much more believable. "His name is Rupert. He says that he had been kidnapped by a demon, who was hauling him off somewhere. It was the demon you just shot down. When the demon was hurt, he dropped the boy into the trees."

"Hmm," Talarius mused, looking Rupert over intently. "Is this true lad?" Talarius asked, seeming to be genuinely concerned.

"Y.y.yes lord." Rupert stuttered.

"Not lord, lad. Just Talarius. I'm a knight of Tiernon, not a lord." The knight corrected gently with a forgiving smile. "Now why did the demon grab you and why were you naked?" The knight crouched down in his heavy armor to look Rupert head on. His hand resting gently, comfortingly on Rupert's shoulders.

"Uhm, I.I.I don't know." Rupert snuffled some more. "I live on a farm." Rupert ran the back of his wrist across his nose, as if to wipe it. "I woke up thirsty and there was no water. I went out to the well to fetch some. As I was filling it, this...this..." Rupert shuddered in what he thought was an appropriate manner. "This demon grabbed my robe. It dragged me a long ways. Finally the robe ripped off me."

Rupert began to hyperventilate a little, for dramatic effect. Trying not to overdo it. He gulped. "I ran, ran as fast as I could back to mum and dah. I screamed for help. They couldn't help me. They...they weren't fast enough. The demon came back. He grabbed me with his claws." Rupert closed his eyes, shivering again, pretending to remember the horrible moment. He'd thought this story up as they'd wandered through the camp. He hadn't had long; he hoped it would hold up.

"It carried me. We flew a long ways, over that city." He pointed back to Freehold. "Then we were over your lights. The demon, it circled for a little bit. Then...then some glowing man on the ground shot the demon! It screamed. Right in my ear. The next thing, the next thing I know is that I was falling through trees. Then these men found me." He tugged on Ethen's cloak.

He hugged himself, and looked the knight right in the eyes, trying to be as sincere as he'd ever been about anything. "Please, please, Sir Talarius. Please don't let the nasty demon get me. I'm afraid. So afraid." Rupert shivered some more and then bent his head, as if in shame and fright, staring at the ground.

The knight said nothing for some time. Rupert hoped he hadn't overdone it. The knight's hand on his shoulder hadn't moved or changed. Then suddenly, it was patting him. "There lad. While I certainly didn't see the demon carrying anyone." Rupert froze. He hadn't thought of that. If the man could see well enough to shoot him, he surely could have seen anything he might have carried. Rupert mentally cursed himself. The whole story was worthless. What an idiot he was! Why hadn't he thought of that angle?

Talarius continued, unaware of Rupert's internal recriminations, "It was dark and my view wasn't that good. I certainly could have missed seeing you. After the demon moved out of the moonlight, all I could see was a dark spot in the sky. Certainly, I wouldn't have done any pronouncement that would have injured you if I'd realized you were there with the demon. I'm sorry for that lad. Truly, but the important thing is," Talarius strengthened his grip on Rupert's shoulder, "that we got it to release you, albeit unknowingly.

"You are safe with us. In due time, we will return you to your family. However, for tonight, I think you need rest. In the morning, I'd appreciate it if you could repeat your story for the Arch-Vicar General and a few other good men. We will need all the help we can get in ferreting out the vile minions of deceit. Fear not though, I Talarius will personally see to it that the demons are all slain and routed. They will not have their wicked way with good people like yourself anymore. This is my word." With the last words, he lifted Rupert's chin again and smiled kindly. Rupert would have been relieved, felt protected, if only the man wasn't talking about slaying him.

~

As Ethen led the boy off to a tent for a good night's rest, Talarius turned his eyes back to the construction of the Runic Gateway. He cursed himself for unknowingly endangering the child. He shouldn't have aimed at a target that wasn't fully resolved. While the Light of Heaven wouldn't hurt anything but creatures of evil, if he had killed the demon, the fall could certainly have killed the child. Of course, this presumed the child was telling the truth. The only doubts he had were from not having seen the child being carried, and the curious behavior of such a demon. Why it would be kidnapping the child. Human sacrifice perhaps? Talarius wouldn't put it past a demon. Further, why would it fly directly over the Rod's campsite?

The boy had seemed sincere. Actually, rather coherent for a child in that state, admirable. Talarius had known many an older man to be completely insane with fear from lesser experiences with demons. Unfortunately, he'd had no way to determine if the child was telling the truth short of his own instincts and experience. Barabus or Verigas could easily have done so; however, they were busy. Both priests were busy constructing the gateway. That had paramount importance.

This incident tonight only further served to increase Talarius' determination to get reinforcements. They were certainly going to need them. Talarius rubbed his chin. He'd have Barabus or one of the other priests listen to the boy's story tomorrow. All the priests would be tired after the night's work, but they needed to know all they could learn. The priests could verify the boy's story, and perhaps Talarius could probe for more information when the child had had time to rest. Perhaps Verigas could help him with it.





Chapter 71


Lord Protectator Wing Arms Master Heron of Treage surveyed his Command from the command deck of his flagship, the OSS Keeper of Law. He used the telescoping glass to survey the progress upon the decks of the other ships as the preparations for getting underway were being made on each and every vessel in his command. Twenty-one of Oorstemoth's finest resting now in their berths outside of Keeper's City, he was proud of each one. He only wished he'd had more to spare. Unfortunately, these craft were in extremely high demand, and short of abandoning other critical interests of Oorstemoth, he could spare no more.

His command was just now finishing the loading of men and supplies as the sun finally peeked above the horizon. Just in time for the dawn launch. Protocol dictated that the Leave Taking occur with the sun's first full light. It had been a tight call, getting fully mobilized on such short notice. Wylan's messages had reached Keeper's City in good time and made their way up the bureaucratic layers until the Council of Justice saw them, and called on Heron to interpret and respond. It had actually taken Heron more than a few passes over Wylan's missive to fully understand all the ramifications and legal import of the message. Unfortunately, in Heron's opinion, both Wylan and his assistant Fiernon seemed caught up in the recent court trend of hyper-verbalization. Heron just shook his head, the younger generation, he sometimes feared that their dedication to legalistic flowery language might sometime override or cloud their vision of the Justice. Heron preferred the short and direct. Lately, however, his style seemed to be falling out of fashion. As it was it had taken him a couple of hours to come up with a legally binding set of charges from Wylan's report. Perhaps if he'd been there first hand it would have been easier.

Seeing that the ready flags were now raised on all vessels, Heron adjusted the Amulet of Amplification upon his breast and raised his Warrant of Commission and Letter of Command. Formally, he held it before him with both hands, the right above, the left below to hold the scroll in the prescribed manner of execution. He received the nod of readiness from his second.

"Hear all, here-to-fore present and accounted for! For the High Crimes of Piracy, Destruction of Governmental Property, Murder of Constabulary Officers, Flight of the Due Process of Law into Extraterritorial Lands; for the Cardinal Crimes of Illicit Demonic Association, Alliance with Enemy Powers and Conspiracy to Escape Justice by Demonic Methods; for the Treasonous Crimes of Conspiracy with Foreign Powers to Threaten Oorstemothian Sovereignty, for Subversion of Foreign Nations in Manners Inconsistent with Oorstemothian Sovereignty, for Conspiracy for World Domination by Powers Not Oorstemothian and for Crimes of High Import Yet To Be Determined and Specified, is this Warrant of Forcible Extradition and Necessary Eradication issued upon one Edwyrd the Animage, lately of Gizzor Del, Maelen the Seer, known to be of the Free City of Seren, the Wizard Gastropé late of the Command of the Mage Exador, Jenn Rean, Journeyman of the Lenamare’s Academy of Wizardry, Rupert, Novitiate, also of the Lenamare’s Academy of Wizardry; and upon all personages seeking to aid or abet these individuals in criminalistic actions counterproductive to the cause of Justice. This Warrant is further comprehensive over previously issued, longstanding Warrant 31234556 regarding the Judicial Prosecution of one Asmeth the Pirate and the villainous crew of Asmeth's vessel, as well as Inquisitorial Warrant I1432179 regarding the theft of Oorstemothian Artifacts by Individuals Suspected of Collusion with the Wizard Lenamare.

"In pursuit of this Warrant and observant of the Due Process of Law, do I Heron of Treage, Wing Arms Master of the Oorstemothian Fleet, Lord Protectator of Oorstemoth and the Council of Justice, Duly Recognized Agent of High Justice, hereby assume from this date forth, the High and Sole Command of the One-Thousand Four-Hundred and Thirteenth Sky Fleet of Oorstemoth. Said Command and Commission is to last until such time as the Warrant of Forcible Extradition and Necessary Eradication is considered fulfilled and duly executed by the Council of Justice. This do I swear and affirm on this the 25th day of Asim, in the One Thousand-Six Hundred and Thirty-First year of Oorstemothian Sovereignty, before the duly recognized witnesses of said Command, the One Thousand-Four Hundred and Thirteenth Sky Fleet. So let the Law be Enacted, so let Justice be Done before the Honorable High Lord of Oorstemoth and Justice." Heron bowed his head for a moment of respect and observation of import, as did the members of his Command. He drew his sword, raising it above his head, staring into the newly risen sun.

"Fleet Ho!" Called his second. "All stations ready! Prepare for lift off. Unfurl the sails." As word was given to the fleet via his second's amulet, the glorious golden sails of Oorstemoth began to unfurl from the masts of each vessel in the fleet. All in perfectly timed unison, on each ship, three sails per mast, three masts per ship. The banners of Oorstemoth riding proudly atop the center mast of each ship. Heron balanced himself on his experienced legs as the ship rocked in its berth.

His crew, nay, his entire fleet operated as a well-oiled machine. He had no fear on this cause. As one, the twenty-one Sky Ships of Oorstemoth rose stately and majestically into the air above the Plain of Justice. Heron turned to look over his own ship. The crew moving in precise, never wasted motions brought the great airship into the morning sky.

At two hundred feet, Heron nodded to his second, who waved his arm, giving the order for the ships to proceed forward over the city. Tethers were released allowing the ships to move forward. The ships continued to climb, naturally, needing the altitude to clear the Seven Towers of Law, five hundred feet tall each. As the ships began to move forward in formation, the Beloved Anthem of Oorstemoth swelled as if from the very bosoms of the ships. In reality, it was the combined voices of all the sailors singing the hymn together as one voice of many parts.

As his flagship crossed over the Gate of Peace on the Boulevard of Right, Heron could see the cheering citizens of the city. Up early to see the Leave Taking. Crowds lined the boulevard, cheering and singing the anthem themselves. Heron was proud of his people, proud of his men and women, proud of the support from the populace. Even on such extremely short notice, the citizens had come forth to bid the fleet Law's Speed. As tears threatened to flow from his eyes, Heron had to reprimand himself for being an old fashioned sentimentalist. These ancient traditions always threatened to choke him, ever since he was a small lad on the boulevard below watching his first Leave-taking, the 1371st Fleet. Twenty years ago, when he'd led his first fleet, the 1400th, he'd thought the moment could never be recaptured. He'd since learned that every Leave Taking under his command would leave him with the same feelings.

Heron squinted at the sunlight reflecting off the Towers of Law ahead. They were now approaching rapidly. The ships would cross over the top of the Towers, still following the boulevard and then exit over the Gate of War. At that point they would change course slightly, heading north over the sea, and continue to gain altitude in order to sail over the mountains north of Hoggensforth. They wouldn't have to climb too fast. It would be a while before they even reached Hoggensforth. In all, Heron calculated they should be able traverse the nearly twelve hundred miles and arrive in Freehold at about sunset tomorrow. He would have to rely on Wylan and Fiernon to ensure the suspects didn't flee again, or if they did, to track them.

~

Rupert sat in the tent, worrying about what to do. He was in a nice tent, he'd had a nice cot to sleep on, and been given new clothes. Clothes of a Rod member, but clothes nonetheless. A little bit ago, a soldier had come in and delivered him some food for breakfast. The soldier had also courteously inquired if he could get Rupert anything. At the time there was nothing else Rupert needed. There had been water for washing and a separate curtained off area with a chamber pot. A very nice tent overall. Rupert really had to contrast the way the Rod treated prisoners with the way Exador's people treated prisoners. For comfort, he'd take the Rod any day.

Everyone had gone out of their way to be polite, kind and understanding. Certainly a strange way to treat prisoners. Of course, he wasn't exactly sure he was a prisoner. There didn't seem to be a guard outside of his tent, on the other hand, with so many attentive soldiers all over the place, it didn't seem necessary. The soldier who'd brought breakfast had asked if Rupert would mind if Talarius and a priest were to interview him a bit later in the morning. Rupert had been nervous about that, wondering belatedly if a priest could detect lies. Rupert didn't see much choice but to agree to the interview. The young man had been polite about the whole thing though. The Rod were really nice guys. If only, Rupert mused, they weren't a bunch of genocidal maniacs dedicated to slaying his people.

~

"You say you haven't seen Rupert since yesterday?" Maelen asked Edwyrd over breakfast. Edwyrd had just raised his concern to the seer as they sat down to eat. This morning it was Gastropé, Edwyrd and Maelen eating breakfast. Jenn and her friends had been commandeered early by Lenamare for some task. Edwyrd was thankful for that. He didn't relish having to tell Jenn that Rupert was missing.

Maelen bit into a piece of melon he was eating. He seemed to be thinking for a moment. "I don't know, I can try and search the palace for him, but it will take a while to cover the whole place."

"Would you?" Edwyrd asked.

"Certainly, I'd have to do it anyway, given what I've seen around here."

"Given what you've seen! We forgot to tell you about what we've seen!" Gastropé stated. Gastropé looked around the dining room to make sure no invisible demons were near and proceeded to relate the previous day's events to Maelen. He spoke softly and quickly, trying to avoid any demons noticing them from a distance and getting closer. Maelen raised his eyebrows several times. At first he seemed skeptical, but when Gastropé got to the part where Damien had seen them as well, he became more convinced. When they mentioned what the Rod had told Damien, Maelen got positively pale. "This will certainly require investigation." Maelen said as Gastropé finished.

~

"I was beginning to think they'd never leave." Antefalken told Damien as the last of the council filed out of Damien's quarters. Damien had sent all of the councilors, with the exception of Lenamare, Jehenna, Exador and Randolf, who were suspect, and Zilquar who was still unaccounted for, a sudden and urgent request to join him for breakfast. Each one thought they were individually invited to some urgent private meeting. When they'd all arrived, surprised to see each other, Damien had explained why he'd invited them. Damien hadn't wanted to hold a normal session because of the possibility of alerting the demons. When he'd explained about the demons' presence, there had naturally been the expected uproar. After about half an hour, he'd managed to convince them to at least believe him until they had a chance to verify for themselves that the palace was infested.

That had been the easy part, what followed was three hours of typical discussion about where the demons came from and what they were doing. Damien had also felt obliged to point out what the Rod had said about archdemons. He had not been disappointed by the shock in the others' faces.

Even without this shock, they were still at a loss as to what to do. They could try and eliminate all the demons, but this would certainly notify the master of the demons. That could bring retaliatory action. More precisely, if they didn't get rid of the root of the problem first, they'd run the risk of a blood bath in the palace. For one thing, they'd also have to move very fast to eliminate the demons, before any could go on a rampage, even if they did take out the master first.

The problem, of course, had been the fact that no one knew who owned the demons. What was somewhat clear, was that the demons had something to do with Lenamare and Exador's fight. Probably the book, Damien had thought, but he did not mention this to the others. One suggestion that had been popular for a while was to have a full inquisition with Lenamare and Exador and get the whole issue on the table. Then Trevin D'Vils had brought up the possibility that either Exador or Lenamare could be in league with the archdemons, or under the control of the archdemons, which Damien himself feared but had been unwilling to voice.

That had made the room quiet for a moment. If either of the two wizards was linked to all the demons, or to archdemons, forcing the issue in a council session might not be the best idea. Damien, actually, thought it might not be a bad idea, no one else seemed to agree. As was often the case on anything important, the council ended up deciding nothing. Damien wasn't surprised, he'd come to expect it, he just hoped they could come to some agreement before it was too late. However, he had done his job, he'd notified every one of the problem. Now people could wring their hands over it and not do anything more than if they hadn't known.

Damien just shook his head, looking at his bard, he gestured for Antefalken to follow him as he left the room to climb the stairs to his tower study. At least the councilors were gone. At the top of the stairs was an ironwood door. Damien muttered the requisite key words over the handle, then opened the door to admit himself and Antefalken to the tower room.

Damien looked to the piles of messages still waiting on his desk. Shaking his head, he went to open a window and look out upon the city. Antefalken took up his normal perch. "Do you plan to go ahead and do something without them?"

Damien snorted, "If I had any idea of what to do without them, I would. Unfortunately, I seem to be just as up in the air as everyone else. I hate being a spectator in my own home as unknown combatants wage war in my kitchen." Both were quiet for a while as Damien gazed out the window. "Do you suppose this Tom fellow is behind it all? After all he is certainly linked to Lenamare, and Lenamare is linked to the whole problem. These could be his demons, or perhaps his demons at Lenamare's call."

"I really just don't know." Antefalken shrugged. "No one really knows who this Tom is in the Abyss. I've checked a couple other leads. I've only talked with him the one time."

"Any word on archdemons playing big chess games?" Damien asked.

"I can go dig some more now that we are fairly sure we have three involved. I can at least look for threesomes that seem to be up to no good. Otherwise, just the stuff I heard the first time. The rumored plans for an overthrow of the demon princes by a cabal of archdemons. Standard stuff, doesn't mean much." Antefalken shrugged.

"Standard stuff, huh?" Damien asked, apparently preoccupied with something outside the window.

"Standard stuff, just talk. It's not like anyone has that kind of power. None of the archdemons comes even close. If they did they'd have long since been destroyed or assimilated." Antefalken said.

"Well, I know that I certainly wouldn't feel like trying to deal with a demon prince."

"Not without a really big bag of magic tricks, a true name and a hell of a lot of luck." Antefalken agreed.

Damien chuckled. "An incredibly big bag. The luck would mainly be in getting the right name. I doubt even the demon princes remember their own true names anymore. Getting the right one would be the trick. I doubt there's that much luck in the world to go around."

Damien frowned slightly as he peered out the window. "You know, I'm not sure, but there appears to be a lot more soldiers in the Rod's encampment than there were last night when I left them."

~

"Tolerable, it will do." Lenamare approved as he looked over Jenn's shoulder. "Next time try to be a little cleaner in your cuts though." Lenamare stood up and looked at his other assistants. Jenn was carving symbols into small amber spheres. Each student was busy preparing another component for Lenamare's next major effort.

He had to admit to himself, that having students around was occasionally useful. It kept him and Jehenna from having to do a lot of tedious work. Assuming, of course, that the students did it correctly. It was for this that Lenamare still had to supervise them closely; nonetheless, it was still faster this way. As he was stepping over to Bromagni, Jehenna entered the room through the door on the east wall.

"Well?" she asked.

"Everything is going well. With good timing and organization, we should be able to proceed tomorrow evening with the spell." Lenamare told her.

Jehenna nodded. "Good. It will be about time. Assuming it works."

Lenamare twisted his mouth in a slight frown. "It had better work. We haven't got much more time. I did some counting. There are more Rod members today then last night. Where they came from isn't clear, but their numbers seem to be growing."

"Growing?" Jehenna asked.

"Growing. That means that they feel that the situation is escalating and they need more manpower." Lenamare failed to notice Jenn's frown of apprehension, or at least ignored it.

"You think the archdemon is preparing to move?" Jehenna asked.

"Possibly. Whatever the case, we can't keep an archdemon and Exador in the dark forever about the book's location. We have to open it. Use the information."

"Use it wisely. We don't want to rush and get ourselves killed in the process."

"Naturally. Nothing shall be done without a plan and a direct purpose."

~

Hortwell surveyed the countryside below him, over the edge of the rug. Very nice actually. Zilquar's invisibility spell was interesting. It made the two of them, as well as Zargoffelstan flying above the carpet and their flying carpet invisible to the outside world, yet the two of them could see each other and the carpet underneath them. The two wizards had decided to go try a little stealthy reconnaissance. They were flying both invisible and close to the tree level. Exador still had wizards with his army. They did not want to risk being shot down.

As they came over the last rise and in sight of the crater, Hortwell’s mouth dropped in surprise. Apparently, they had had no need for invisibility. There was nothing there. Obviously no castle, but no army either. The little peninsula that had contained the remnants of Exador's army was empty. No tents, no soldiers, no sign of the army. Where had they gone?

Zilquar and Hortwell exchanged glances. This was not good. From the sketchy reports they'd received via normal scouts, the army had been there last night. They were gone now. Hortwell scanned the campsite with his wizard's sight. Nothing. No magic, no spells, nothing, the army was really gone, not invisible. Where had they gone? Zilquar directed the carpet in a low level path around the castle site.

As far as either wizards could tell, there was no appearance of a large migration of horses or men from the site. One would have expected some large path of tracks. But there was none. Just the normal tracks that one would expect around a camp that had been there for a couple weeks. Hortwell was puzzled. He would certainly have to report this to Lenamare.

Lenamare would not be pleased. Hortwell also supposed they'd best prepare to move out themselves. He was pretty certain Lenamare would want them with him in Freehold. Especially if a battle was coming. Once again, Hortwell just shook his head in bemusement.

~

"Any sign of him?" Edwyrd asked Maelen as the man seemed to wake from his trance.

"Not yet. I've searched the upper levels of the castle and am working my way downward. I've certainly encountered a lot of demons though. You were right on that account. I don't like the looks of this. Too many demons and Rupert missing, plus other things."

"Other things?" Edwyrd asked.

"Yes. Other, disturbing things." Maelen frowned.

"What other things?" Edwyrd asked. Maelen looked around as if to make sure no one was within listening distance. There was no one. He and Edwyrd were in Edwyrd's room. Gastropé had gone off with Tizzy some place. Hunting more demons, apparently.

"I really shouldn't say. I don't want to cause any unwanted and possibly unfounded concern."

"You don't want to cause any possibly unfounded concern? We are trapped in a demon infested palace with two warring wizards, surrounded by the Rod of Tiernon that wants to hang us, Rupert is lost and missing somewhere in the midst of this, and you don't want to cause anymore unfounded concern? Don't worry."

"Well, last night I wandered across a gentleman in a disturbing uniform. I hope it is just someone trying to pull some sort of hoax, especially given the name I heard mentioned with this uniform."

"You found someone in a disturbing uniform? Personally, at this moment, I find the Rod's uniforms disturbing. What exactly did you see?" Edwyrd was impatient. He was getting very concerned for Rupert's safety and he didn't feel like beating around the bush.

Maelen frowned again, very grim this time. "The uniform was that of a Time Warrior." Edwyrd just looked at him straight in the eye, waiting for him to continue. "The name that I overheard with the person in the uniform was Ramses. As in Ramses the Damned."

Edwyrd blinked. This really didn't make much sense. "You mean like the Mummy?"

"The mummy?" Now it was Maelen's turn to be confused. "Well, yes he was noted for use of mummies to destroy his enemies. But really he was known as the Anilord in charge of the Time Warriors."

Edwyrd had no idea what Maelen was talking about. The only Ramses he knew about had been a pharaoh in ancient Egypt. Supposedly cursed with immortality and entombed as a mummy in the desert. "Ramses the Immortal? Cursed to wander the face of the globe, undying, for eternity? Is this the Ramses you mean?"

Maelen was quiet, staring at Edwyrd for a moment. Edwyrd wondered if he'd said something really stupid, something that everyone knew about, but him. Finally Maelen blinked. "You obviously know something about this gentleman that I do not. Given that, if this really were Ramses the Damned, he'd be well over a thousand years old; calling him an immortal would certainly not be out of the question."

Edwyrd shrugged. "All I know is that, Ramses II, known variously as Ramses the Great, Ramses the Immortal, and Ramses the Damned was a pharaoh in Egypt three thousand years ago. Supposedly he was cursed for some reason, and doomed to wander the world for all eternity." Edwyrd didn't add that all of this had happened in a different world. If it was Ramses, he was wandering the wrong world.

"Egypt? I've never heard of such a place. I am fairly familiar with history and I recall no such land." Maelen looked puzzled. Edwyrd just shrugged, it had been stupid to bring it up, but he'd opened his mouth without thinking. He'd just carried it through. Actually, it was really pointless at this point for finding Rupert. While Ramses had been a real person, he knew the whole mummy thing was just the stuff of grade B movies. It was highly doubtful that a human from Earth would be wandering around Astlan, three thousand years later.

Tom paused at that one. It wasn't completely impossible. He was from Earth, and as had been pointed out to him on multiple occasions, demons were immortal. It would not be inconceivable that he, Tom, would be wandering Astlan three thousand years in the future. Suddenly he got a real shiver down his spine. He'd never really taken that immortality thing much beyond casual face value. The thought, however, that he, Tom, might actually still be alive in three thousand years sent goose bumps running all over Edwyrd's body. The meaning of the word immortal hadn't really sunk in until that moment. Someone a couple hundred years old was easy enough to imagine, but three thousand? It almost seemed unimaginable.

Maelen had seen somebody claiming to be Ramses the Damned though. Whatever the case, Egypt's Ramses or not, Maelen said the man should be over a thousand years old. It didn't seem likely that humans lived that long on Astlan. True, Maelen was very spritely for his age, but he wasn't the inconceivably old of a true immortal.

A true immortal, thousands of years old, would need to be a demon, or an incredibly powerful wizard or something. If a demon, then surely such a demon would have gotten good enough to be a big shot. Especially if he really had already been a major power in Astlan, or in Egypt. If a demon then he would probably be an archdemon. If one believed what Lenamare said, an archdemon was on his way, possibly already here. Believing the Rod meant there were several unaccounted for archdemons already in the palace.

Edwyrd didn't like the way his thoughts were going at all. He had to let them out though. Maelen seemed about the most trustworthy person he could find for such information. "Maelen," Edwyrd said slowly. Maelen looked up at him, curious by the sudden change in tone of voice.

"What if," Edwyrd paused for a second, getting his thoughts in order. "What if Ramses the Damned is literally that?"

"What do you mean?" Maelen asked shaking his head.

"I mean, what if he really is damned, so to speak. What if he's a demon? More specifically what if he's one of the archdemons that are supposed to be hanging around here? Wouldn't that explain how he could be over a thousand years old?"

Maelen said nothing. He just stared at Edwyrd. He stared for a very long time. Eventually, Edwyrd shrugged. "It makes some sense if you think of it, doesn't it?"

Maelen still said nothing for a moment. Then he bowed his head. "It makes very, very, good sense. I'm just trying to figure out why it's not plausible. It can't be. I hope it's not. I really don't want to contemplate that this fellow really is Ramses the Damned, Ramses the Anilord, the Time Warrior. I don't want to think that that historical monster could actually be an archdemon. It makes so much sense that I don't even want to conceive of it."

Maelen shook his head. He continued, "If, if this man really is Ramses the Damned and is an archdemon, then things are bad. I know it looked that way before, but I just didn't comprehend exactly how bad.

"We know that something is definitely up. The problem is: we don't know what." Maelen raised his hands above his head. "We have to know what is in that damn book of Lenamare's. The whole thing must revolve around that. I curse now that we gave it back to him. That's what Exador wants, that's what Lenamare says the archdemons want. The question is: what the Abyss is in the damn book?!" Maelen was looking extremely frustrated. Edwyrd hadn't seen the man this upset before. "We are sitting on the bull's eye of something much more explosive than that little incident at Lenamare's school. I'd really like to know who is shooting what arrows before we all get killed."

~

Rupert was eating lunch. It was a very good lunch for that matter. Nothing fancy, but incredibly tasty trail rations for soldiers who appeared to be about to lay siege to a city. Rupert had gone out earlier for a small stroll. No one had stopped him, but one of the soldiers had followed him at a discreet but obvious distance. So far, the Rod hadn't impeded traffic flow in and out of the city. At least not directly. It appeared that several merchants and individuals would see the Rod near the city and decide that entering the city would not be such a good idea, and skirted around it.

One other thing that Rupert noted was that there seemed to be an awful lot of new arrivals. He couldn't see where they were coming from, but the Rod's encampment seemed to be growing. New tents were being erected on the edges of the previous encampment. Actually, if he wasn't mistaken the numbers were increasing fairly rapidly.

As Rupert put down his fork and wiped his mouth, the tent flap pulled aside partially. Sir Talarius stuck his head in. "Good day, lad. May we have a word with you?" the knight asked, polite as were all the Rod.

Rupert nodded shyly. The knight smiled and opened the flap further and stepped in. Sir Talarius was still dressed in the same manner as the night before. In the daylight however, Rupert could see that the knight's armor had both a goldish and a silverish tint to it at the same time. It almost seemed to scintillate those two colors. Obviously, it was made out of some nonstandard material.

As the knight stepped completely in, he held the flap for his compatriot. This individual was wearing the white robes of a priest. As the man straightened up, Rupert's stomach fell through the cot he was sitting on. The priest looked up after dusting his robe slightly. As he saw Rupert sitting on the cot, his eyes got extremely wide. He raised one finger and pointed at the boy. "You!"

Rupert grinned, a wide, but rather embarrassed and definitely fake, smile. He weakly waved his right hand at the priest. "Hi. Long time no see." Time seemed to freeze in place. No one said anything. Verigas just continued to point in shocked surprise; Rupert just sat there, grinning sickly. Talarius darted his eyes from one to the other, not understanding what was going on.

"You two know each other?" Talarius asked. Rupert said nothing.

Verigas gasped air for a moment then shouted. "It's him! It's a Minion of Evil! A Scion of the Concordenax!"

Talarius blinked in surprise, looking at Rupert. "What? He's just a little boy. What are you babbling about?" Talarius looked at the priest.

"It's one of the Archaedemon's party! One of the puppet wizardlings that came in its entourage." Now it was Rupert's turn to blink. Archdemon’s party? What was the man talking about? Couldn't the priest tell the difference between an archdemon and a greater demon? Well, actually, Rupert couldn't either, he'd never seen an archdemon, and he only knew Tom was a greater demon because Lenamare and Jenn said so. "Slay it! Slay it before it wreaks more havoc upon the world."

Rupert cowered back on the cot. Not that he was in the least bit terrified of the priest, but he felt it was probably the proper thing to do under the circumstances. Talarius had his hand on the priest's shoulders, trying to calm the screaming priest down. "Relax, relax, it can't be that bad. He's just a boy."

"No! No! He is a creature of the Abyss! A very pawn of the potentates of hell!"

"Stop it man!" Talarius urged. "He's not hurting anyone here." By this point another priest had entered the room. This one was older than Verigas and wearing armor as well as a robe.

"What's going on here?" the man asked.

"Verigas here insists that this lad we found last night is one of the Archaedemon's wizardlings, Arch-Vicar General." Talarius looked briefly over his shoulder at the newcomer.

"Really?" The man called Arch-Vicar General examined Rupert as if he were some sort of curious art object. "Verigas did report that there was a little boy with the archdemon. Rupert, I believe was the name Verigas reported." Rupert cursed to himself. Verigas glared at the knight in vindication, calming down slightly at the same time.

Talarius turned and stared pointedly at Rupert. Rupert decided it was time to sit up and be in a little better position to take action if need be. "So, Rupert, what have you to say for yourself? You've admitted to being with a demon last night. Verigas identifies you; in fact gave us your name in advance of your arrival. I suggest you explain." While not exactly menacing, the knight no longer looked particularly friendly.

"Please sir...I have no idea what the priest is talking about." Rupert tried to be completely sincere this time.

"He's lying." The Arch-Vicar General stated without batting an eye. "Very convincing sincerity, but a lie nonetheless, I can see it in his aura." Talarius glanced at the Arch-Vicar General, then at Rupert.

"Look son, I don't know how you got involved in all of this. But if you tell us the truth, you won't be hurt." Talarius looked seriously down at Rupert.

"Hurt!" Verigas cried. "He's a total puppet! He's probably not even a little kid! He's got to be killed. Even if he is what he appears, he's probably so steeped in evil as to be irretrievably damned!"

Talarius glared at the priest. "No living mortal is irretrievably damned, priest. I will ask you not to forget that."

Verigas ignored the reproof in the knight's voice. "You can't trust him. He's probably a possessed spy of the archaedemon’s!"

Talarius closed his eyes for a moment. "There is one way to determine that. If I prove that this is not the case, will you be quiet and let me question the boy?" Verigas nodded. Talarius walked over to a small chest in the tent. Rupert and the Arch-Vicar General watched his every move. Rupert was getting just a shade nervous, he was probably going to have to change and make a run for it. The knight pulled a key from his belt and without taking his eyes from Rupert, unlocked the chest. Apparently it was the knight's quarters in which he'd stayed.

From the chest, Talarius pulled out what appeared to be a jeweled hand mirror. Without looking at it, he walked back over to Verigas. "Now, gazing at the boy through this mirror will reveal any demonic influences." He held the mirror up so Verigas and the Arch-Vicar General could also see as he moved the mirror between himself and Rupert.

As the mirror came between Rupert and the knight, Rupert noticed a greenish light seeming to come from the other side of the mirror, illuminating the knight's face and those of the priests. Rupert watched in fascination as the knight's face went from calm to shock, to pure incredulity. He raised his eyes from the mirror to stare directly at Rupert.

Rupert didn't need to be told what the knight saw in order to know he'd been revealed as a demon. Damn, he thought. No sense in staying here. Even as the knight's eyes turned from surprise to grim determination, Rupert was changing. His clothes bulging and ripping as he gained mass. Rupert didn't waste time to complete the change, he scrambled up and backwards to the rear of the tent. Intending to tear his way out of the tent. His wings began to beat, trying to free themselves from his clothes. As of yet they were still not fully formed for him to fly.

Almost faster than his eyes could travel, which was incredibly fast, given his incredibly quick demonic reflexes, Rupert watched the knight's sword fly free of its sheath. So fast that it was only a blur as the knight lunged forward, faster than any man in that much armor should ever be. Rupert lunged out of the way. Rupert hadn't even had time to complete his transformation. It was useless, even though he couldn't see it, Rupert felt the sword.

Rupert felt the sword strike his still mainly human neck with a single mighty blow. Golden light seemed to flash from the blade. Strangely enough, Rupert felt almost no pain, only shock as his world began to tilt at a strange angle. As if in some weird dream, he saw his half-demon half-human body folding in the middle, falling to the ground, as if to sit, headless. A jarring sensation came next and the world tilted crazily again as his head bounced off the cot. The last thing he saw was the priest Verigas cowering away as all within the tent were showered with blood from Rupert's decapitated body. Then all went black.





Chapter 72


Jehenna finished her inspection of Bromagni's work. She was currently taking her turn at supervising the work of the students. Lenamare had gone off to deal with other matters. She shook her head; these students had to be monitored continuously lest they make a mistake. How nice it would be to have somewhat more competent help. One did with what one had, though. She walked over to the table in the corner to inspect her calculations.

She was pouring over them for the third time when the workroom door opened and in walked Lenamare and Hortwell. Jehenna blinked in surprise. "I thought you were with Zilquar?" She inquired of the newly arrived mage.

"I was, but it looks like a contingency plan has to go into effect now." Hortwell answered her.

"It seems," Lenamare informed her, "that Exador's army has completely disappeared." Jehenna simply raised an eyebrow.

"No trace. No tracks of leaving, no magical paraphernalia to indicate magical departure." Hortwell told her. "Thus I teleported directly to Freehold so we could implement Lenamare's contingency plan."

"Contingency plan?" Jehenna inquired.

"I will give you one guess as to where that madman's army went." Lenamare told her. She simply pointed to the floor, Lenamare nodded. "Precisely, thus we need our army here as well."

"That will take a few days to arrange, even with flying carpets." Jehenna noted.

Lenamare simply shook his head. "Not at all. You see, Master Hortwell here," he put a hand on the man's shoulder, "has been making good use of his time. He constructed a wall where Zilquar's army is camped."

"A wall?" Jehenna was at a loss on this one.

"A wall with a gate." Hortwell told her.

Comprehension dawned in Jehenna's eyes. "A Runic Gateway?"

"Precisely!" Lenamare beamed. "Once again, good planning and foresight pays off in having a highly qualified Rune Wizard standing by in the right location." He nodded to Hortwell. "Now all we need to do is find a suitable door in the palace somewhere, and soon we can bring Zilquar's entire army into Freehold. All in one night!" Hortwell was nodding. "Will you need some assistance? A student or two?"

"One should do." Hortwell looked over the students currently available. "Jenn, if you don't mind?" Hortwell asked Jenn.

"Good choice, she's not particularly useful here." Jehenna stated. Jenn just glared at her, and was ignored.



"Master Hortwell?" Jenn asked as she stood up. "Do I understand that you're going to open a Runic Gateway between here and the school to transport everyone through?"

"That's what we just said girl," Lenamare snapped impatiently.

"Well, I was just wondering why we didn't do that in the first place? Why did we have to all split up and go over land? Couldn't we have just done this?"

Lenamare snorted. "Once again, you show the fault of not considering all the facts. During the siege, we would have had to take the wards over to completely physical in order to open the gateway. Further, it would have taken quite some time to file everyone through the gate. Time Exador wouldn't have allowed us."

"But as it is, you had to take the wards to completely magical. Isn't that the same?"

Lenamare was just shaking his head. "No, you see, we had walls to protect us from the physical assault of troops while the wards were in full magical mode. Further, due to the ingenious layout of the escape tunnels, the time needed to have the wards completely magical was a lot less than the reverse case with a gateway. And finally," Lenamare concluded, "it would have been much easier for Exador to intercept and meddle with any magical method of departure, than a physical one. If he'd cut the gateway while someone was traversing it...the poor soul would be literally ripped to shreds. Do you think I would want to take that sort of chance with any of my people?"

Jenn just shrugged her head, unable to respond, as Lenamare intended whenever he lectured. Willis, however, leaned over and whispered to Alvea, "Nice speech. If you ask me though, I'd just say the guy didn't think of it at the time." Alvea giggled. Jehenna, unable to hear the whisper, simply glared in her direction.

"Now, if we are finished with our lesson for the day?" Lenamare inquired of Jenn, who simply nodded, "Then let us go find a suitable doorway for the gate." With that, he ushered Jenn and Hortwell out the door.

~

It was just past the middle of the afternoon when Damien pounded on Edwyrd's door. Edwyrd opened the door, curious to see who would be knocking so strongly. "Good afternoon." Damien said

"Good afternoon." Edwyrd answered.

"Would you gather your friends and come with me? We need to talk. Some place I know is secure." He looked at Edwyrd.

"Well, Jenn is off with Lenamare and Tizzy is out roaming the city. Maelen's on the roof of one of the towers, searching for Rupert. Rupert is missing, so that just leaves Gastropé and me."

"Fine. Rupert is missing, is he?"

"Yes? Have you seen him?" Edwyrd asked anxiously, Gastropé came up to the doorway behind Edwyrd.

"No, but I know some people who think they have. That is why we need to talk. Please come with me, we'll go to my quarters."

Edwyrd glanced at Gastropé who shrugged. The two left the room, following Damien, concerned about Rupert. As Gastropé shut the door behind them, Damien told them, "For obvious reasons, I think we should wait until my quarters before we discuss anything." Both young men agreed.

Damien ushered them into his main room, securely locking the door behind him. "Now, we need to talk." He gestured for them to sit. "Antefalken, you get out here too." A few moments later, Antefalken appeared, curious. He hopped up to his normal perch on the back of a chair. Gastropé and Edwyrd were already sitting on the long couch. Damien sat in the stuffed chair.

"So? Which of our crises is this about? You said someone knows where Rupert is?" Gastropé asked, Edwyrd nodding in agreement. Both looked expectantly at the wizard.

"We need to talk, because things are getting really serious at this point. The castle is infested with demons; two major wizards are preparing to battle it out; there is an ever growing army outside the walls of the city, and there are apparently archdemons wandering around as well." Damien just looked at the two.

Edwyrd nodded, grimacing. "Maelen and I think we might know who one of the archdemons is." Damien did a double take. This was obviously not the line of conversation he intended to pursue.

"You do? Who? And how do you know?" Antefalken demanded excitedly, stretching forward on his seat back.

Edwyrd nodded to him. "Ramses the Damned."

Damien coughed suddenly, shaking his head. Gastropé looked clueless as to what Edwyrd meant, and Antefalken suddenly seemed lost in thought. "Ramses the Damned? As in the Anilord?" Edwyrd nodded. "I wasn't aware that he was listed among the lords of the Abyss?" He looked quickly to Antefalken.

Antefalken shrugged. "It could be no one knows the names of all the demons in the Abyss. While, relatively speaking there aren't that many archdemons, those that there are go by a lot of different names. Especially the old ones, they change names every few hundred years. Keeps it harder for someone to figure out their true name." He seemed to be trying to recall something. "I do believe, however, that there is an archdemon named Ramses. I'm trying to recall if there's ever been any mention of a connection between the two Ramses. I can't recall any. The demon one has an estate some distance outside of the Courts that has a lot of nonstandard demonic servants. That's the only reason I remember him. Nothing in the Anilord motif though. However, he would certainly be old enough. As far as I know, all the archdemons are over a thousand, or more."

"Fine for now. We will pursue this; I will also want to find out how you came up with this." He looked directly at Edwyrd. Edwyrd nodded. "However, what I meant was, that I'm beginning to get the suspicion that you people haven't told me everything you know."

Gastropé looked puzzled. Edwyrd did his best to look puzzled; there were a lot of things he wasn't telling people these days. "What do you mean?" Gastropé asked.

"I mean, we are allies. We are in a really bad situation. If this palace, this city and any of the people in it, including yourselves and your friends, are going to survive, we have to work together. We can't afford any secrets."

Edwyrd nodded. Gastropé shrugged, "We agree, what do you think we haven't told you?"

Damien looked back and forth between the two. Antefalken also seemed puzzled by Damien's comments. "Simply this: A little bit ago, I went to talk again to the Rod; I came directly to your room from there. Having verified that the Rod was telling the truth about all the demons in the palace, and for lack of any decision by the council or any other plan, I decided to go and try and negotiate some more with the Rod. I wanted to try and convince them we'd known nothing about the demons until last night."

Edwyrd and Gastropé both nodded, it seemed like something, at least. "Unfortunately, my reception this time was even less enthusiastic than the first time." He looked significantly at everyone in the room. "Upon my arrival and being presented to Talarius and the Arch-Vicar General, I was ordered to stand put while the two men inspected me through a hand mirror."

"A hand mirror?" Antefalken asked.

"A hand mirror. Apparently it is capable of detecting demonic influences." Antefalken made a gesture with his face, impressed apparently. "It seems they are now in a hyper-paranoid state. They now suspect that anyone coming near them could be a demon or a demon's agent. They weren't particularly clear on that point. However, what seems clear is that they now know that some demons can shape change."

Edwyrd started getting a sick feeling in his stomach. "How would they have gotten that idea?" Antefalken asked Damien.

Gastropé interrupted. "Can they?" He was starting to look a bit paranoid himself. Damien ignored him, answering Antefalken instead.

"I'm coming to that. Apparently, they claim to have captured a spy. A demonic one." Edwyrd was really getting nervous now. "It happened last night. One of their sentries spotted a demon hovering over the camp, spying on their actions. Talarius apparently shot it out of the sky somehow."

Gastropé was looking completely lost. "When soldiers went to hunt it down, all they found was a naked boy, approximately nine or ten years old." Edwyrd had to hold himself from groaning out loud. "The young boy apparently told Talarius that he'd been captured by a demon, and only released when the demon was wounded."

Gastropé started putting a few of the pieces together apparently, for he spoke up. "You mentioned Rupert earlier? Are you saying that Rupert was kidnapped by a demon?" Gastropé looked almost in shock. Edwyrd knew the man's feelings about demons, he was also sure Gastropé was thinking about the fact that the Rod was after Rupert, along with the rest of them. "Gods above." He rubbed his temple.

"Not. Exactly." Damien replied. Edwyrd's stomach went through the floor; he dreaded what must be coming. "It seems the next morning, Talarius brought a priest to verify the truth of the boy's story. It seems the boy and the priest recognized each other."

"Shit." Gastrope' said. "The priest from Gizzor Del." Damien just looked at him meaningfully. Gastropé coughed slightly and said apologetically, "I guess we did kind of gloss over that part."

"Why don't you explain it now? Since it seems appropriate at this point." Damien said.

Gastropé smiled sickly, Edwyrd wanted to find out what had happened to Rupert, but he figured this was going to be the only way. "Well," Gastropé said hesitantly, "I'm not up on all the details, Jenn or Rupert could probably tell you better." Damien continued to stare. "It seems that in order to leave the Abyss, the demon needed a link or something. Needed someone to summon him. I'm not sure what he did, but apparently he intercepted another conjuring. An individual summoning another demon. He sort of appropriated the summons I guess. I'm not really sure if that's possible?"

"Extremely rare, but it can happen." Antefalken assured him. "One of the risks of demon conjuring." Antefalken smiled evilly. Gastropé gulped.

"Anyway, it turned out to be this priest Verigas, in Gizzor Del. He sort of went hysterical. Can't say I blame him. Anyway, the demon forced open a rift and let us all step out. Including the demon traveling with us now." Damien was shaking his head, obviously imagining the situation. "Needless to say, the big demon alone was enough to send the man off the deep end. The rest of us didn't seem to help. We were all looking rather disreputable at this point."

Gastropé shrugged. "To make a long story short, we tied him up. He'd seen us all, but we didn't plan on ever seeing him again. After all, he'd been doing something taboo for his religion. We just left him. We arranged it so that he'd be able to get free after we'd left the city. Apparently his conscience got the better of him, and he went to his superiors and they unleashed the Rod on us."

"He sent the Rod after you?" Antefalken asked incredulously.

Gastropé smiled rather embarrassed. "It seems he kind of thought we were the first wave in a demonic invasion force." Damien was rubbing his head with both hands.

"So that explains why the Rod is here?" Damien asked.

"Well, we thought so at first." Edwyrd spoke up at this point. "However, it's apparently escalated beyond that. They apparently found out about the archdemon after the book, and that sort of added fuel to their fire. I'm pretty sure finding hundreds of demons and some archdemons in the palace didn't do much to relieve them." Damien simply groaned.

"But what about Rupert? You say the priest identified him? Or someone?" Edwyrd asked.

Damien nodded, reorienting himself. "According to Talarius, Verigas identified him as Rupert, one of the Minions of Evil. From your story, that sounds exactly like what happened."

"So the Rod has him?" Gastrope' asked Damien. "I know they probably think he's evil, but they wouldn't hurt a little kid would they?"

Damien just looked at him for a moment. "Actually, Talarius apparently did try and calm Verigas, and if it had succeeded, they probably wouldn't have harmed him."

"Wouldn't have harmed him? What exactly do you mean?" Edwyrd was literally sick to his stomach at this point.

"Simply this: In an effort to convince Verigas that Rupert was harmless, Talarius pulled out the mirror. Apparently to his surprise it revealed the boy to be a fourth order demon."

"What! That's ridiculous!" Gastropé shouted. Antefalken was thinking hard, it appeared. He was twisting his head and chewing his lower lip. "Rupert is as human as any of us!" Antefalken looked up at this, Gastropé paid him no heed.

"Perhaps." Damien said calmingly. "Except that, apparently, when he realized he was revealed, Rupert started to shape change into a demon." Gastropé was shaking his head in adamant denial. "Fearing an attack, and knowing how dangerous a fourth order demon would be. Talarius slew the demon or boy."

"Slew it?" Antefalken asked in disbelief. Edwyrd put his head in hands. Gastropé just stared in shock at Damien, finally silenced.

"Slew it. The Arch-Vicar General and Verigas were both there. Both priests swear by their god in front of the entire Rod that what Talarius slew was a partially shape changed demon. As if further proof were needed, the body and all its blood faded as if it had never been. Leaving only the clothes torn by the demon's transformation." Edwyrd breathed a sigh of relief. If Rupert had faded, then maybe he'd been sent to the Abyss like a real demon. It hadn't happened on the ship, and Rupert had no real connection to the Abyss, but maybe. All he could do was hope.

"Now the priests know that demons can shape change. They don't know how many or which ones, but they know some can. They know that anyone that comes up to them could be a demon. They are highly nervous, to say the least. They are also convinced that Rupert was sent there to spy on them, and probably to sabotage or corrupt their mission."

"This is preposterous!" Gastropé shouted again, getting up to pace dramatically. "If it was a demon, and if demons can shape change, then it couldn't have been Rupert. It must have been some demon posing as Rupert! Jenn and Lenamare have both known the boy for years. There is no way he could have fooled them." Damien shrugged; Antefalken didn't look convinced.

"For magic's sake! You Edwyrd! You're his cousin!" They all looked at Edwyrd. "You should know..." Gastropé looked puzzled for a moment, remembering something. "More than that! Tizzy told us that you're the boy's father!" It was Edwyrd's turn to do a double take. He looked at Gastropé in shock.

"Tizzy?" Antefalken spoke up. "Is that the demon traveling with you? Why didn't anyone tell me? He and I are old friends! The mealy little cockroach didn't even stop by to say hi!" Antefalken shook his head. It was then the import of Gastropé's words seemed to sink in. "His father?" He looked very intently at Edwyrd. Obviously, he was thinking back to his meeting with Tom. Edwyrd just shook his head in his hands. Damien was staring directly at Edwyrd.

All of the people in the room were staring at him. They wanted answers. The ball was in his court. What was he going to say? Too much had already been revealed. Lies, he hated all the lies he was involved in. Maybe it was time to end some of them. He just didn't know if he could trust these people.

Unfortunately, enough had been said that if he wasn't honest now, none of them would trust him. If this Talarius was after them, and he could slay Rupert, a fourth order it appeared, with no problem, then Tom himself might need help. That didn't even bring into account the archdemons. No, he was going to need allies if he was going to get himself and those he'd promised to protect out of harm's way. He sighed.

"For one thing, Gastropé," he said slowly, looking up to the wizard, "you should know to take everything Tizzy says with a grain of salt." Gastropé just looked at him, waiting for him to defend Rupert's humanity. The man was in for a bad surprise. "As for being my son, that's a long story, which can wait to another time." He might be willing to undo some lies, but that was one he wanted to straighten out with Rupert first. He didn't want to mess with it and have word get to Rupert before he could talk to the boy himself.

Edwyrd stood at this point, all eyes following him. He guessed that Antefalken had an idea of what was coming, but he could tell that neither Damien nor Gastropé did. "What I'm about to reveal to you, must remain a secret. It must not leave this room. I can't risk you revealing this to anyone without my express permission. Do you understand?" He looked at Gastrope' intently.

Gastropé shrugged. "Certainly, you have my word. But why all the secrecy?"

He turned to Damien. "You want us to be allies, wizard? You want no secrets? Then you've got to swear to keep this secret amongst us. I, in turn will swear that I mean you no harm, and want to work with you. I also promise that keeping the secret won't harm you or your city? Fair enough?"

Damien was really puzzled now, but he said. "Your statement seems fair enough. I swear it then, so long as it doesn't compromise any previous oaths."

"I hope it won't, however," he turned to Antefalken, "as I suspect our demonic friend here can guess I am prepared to enforce all these oaths, my own included." He looked at the demon.

"You have mine, then, as long as you're on our side." Antefalken said.

Edwyrd smiled, "I'm on Rupert's side, and Jenn's, and his and Maelen's I guess." He pointed to Gastropé. Gastropé was completely out of the loop; at this point he was very puzzled.

"What is all this crazy secrecy about, Edwyrd? Just tell us." Gastropé complained impatiently.

"Very well." He looked at Gastrope', "Talarius was right. He slew no imposter. Rupert is a demon."

"What!" Gastrope' said again. "This is ridiculous! How could he be a demon and you know it but none of us?" Gastropé was waving his hands above his head.

"I can know it very well. After all, you brought out the part about us being related." Gastropé just looked at him, uncomprehending, not wanting to comprehend. Damien simply coughed behind him. "Gastropé, you are a good man, and I do like you, but you're going to have to be a little more open minded on this demon question."

"What are you talking about?" Gastropé wanted to know.

Edwyrd just smiled, somewhat sadly. "'Demon, attend! I am the Wizard Gastropé, and I shall be thy master. Cease this destruction at once, I command thee.'" Edwyrd said imitating Gastropé.

Gastropé just shook his head, "How could you know that? You weren't even..." Finally, like a lead brick, it sank in. Gastropé sank to the couch, his eyes wide, his face draining of all color.

Edwyrd just shook his head. "Gastropé, you've really got to stop doing that. All that blood rushing from your head can't be good for your brain." He smiled as he said it, hoping the young wizard wouldn't pass out again.

"So...what you're saying is that you are the big demon? Tom?" Gastropé murmured.

"That's what I'm saying." Tom said matter-of-factly. He glanced at Damien who was shaking his head, as if finally putting pieces of a puzzle together.

"But...but...you don't look like a demon. You don't act like one either!" Gastropé was looking more lively as his protest gathered steam. "I mean, while we haven't known each other that long, you're a pretty nice guy. You act just like everyone else, you help out. You don't go around doing demonic things. You're just like a normal human! Demons aren't like that at all!"

Tom shook his head sadly. "You're right. I am just like a normal human. It also happens that everyone on this planet insists on calling me a demon, and forcing me to live by their rules. You people haven't given me much choice in the matter."

Gastropé was just shaking his head. "But demons are frightening, ugly, wicked and evil. They are the corruption of all that is good. The destruction of life and the personification of all that is wrong in the world."

"No, Gastropé," Tom shook his head once more. "We demons are but the mirrors of your fears. Our forms and our actions are the products of wizards' twisted nightmares and imaginations. The greatest evils are not to be found in the Abyss, but rather within the hearts of men and women."

Antefalken tilted his head, mumbling quietly to himself, smiling, "You haven't met many demon princes have you?"

"Look there. In your fellow humans, if you would see true evil. For it is at the bidding of these individuals that demons act. It is their minds and beliefs that give demons form and power." Edwyrd noted Antefalken squirming on his seat, wanting to interject some objections, Edwyrd glared at him though. He was making a point to the wizard and he didn't need it undermined by a complicated reality.

"Are you saying that all demons are good and wizards bad?" Gastropé said, starting to bristle as the shock wore off.

"No. I'm not. There are some very good wizards. I think Jenn is good, Damien seems to be, and I think you are too. There are also evil wizards, like Exador," Gastropé frowned, hating to have to agree. "Lenamare doesn't strike me as a particularly nice fellow either. There are also evil demons. Possibly the archdemons we have to face here. Ramses the Damned perhaps. However, there are also good demons. Rupert is one. You yourself called him an innocent little kid. He is. He is just a child. A demon child, but still a child. He is exactly what he appears. The Rupert you know is the real Rupert. Do you seriously think he is evil?"

Gastropé shrugged uncertain. Edwyrd continued, "I don't want to blow my own horn, but I don't think of myself as evil. Have I done anything to harm you? Or anyone that wasn't attacking us? Have I done anything more than a normal human might do? One with the same powers and abilities?" He hoped he wasn't pushing it too far on this one.

Gastropé frowned. "I seem to recall you nearly killing me in the mountain pass."

Tom snorted softly. "And I seem to recall you being part of an ambush on Jenn and Rupert and a bunch of other children and students."

"I didn't actually kill anyone, though!" Gastropé protested, "Besides, I was working for Exador then; I didn't have a choice!"

"You're right. You were working for Exador, and you didn't have a lot of choices. Although to be honest, I seem to recall you mentioning that your ability to kill anyone in the pass was rather hampered by Jenn."

"Well, yes, but that was then, this is now. She and I are on the same side now. And you did kill a lot of people!"

"Yes, and you and I are on the same side now. And I didn't have a lot of choice. I am, after all, on retainer, so to speak, to Lenamare and Jehenna. I was ordered to kill the attackers; you know how stringent a demon's orders can be. Further, if I hadn't killed them, what do you think they might have done to Jenn or Rupert?" Gastropé shrugged uncomfortably.

"Finally, I did kill those who attacked the wagon train. You didn't attack them, and I didn't kill you. In that instance, since you were technically an attacker, I certainly could have interpreted my orders to kill you, too. In fact, that would be the logical interpretation. I chose not to, however. I let you go. Even though, you'd clearly stated your intention to try and enslave me and do me harm."

Gastropé looked quite uncomfortable at this. "Well, it's not like I could have hurt you. You ignored my strongest wards!"

"True, but when you started, did you know you couldn't harm me? Wasn't it your intention to control me?" Tom asked.

Gastropé shrugged, not having an easy answer. "Look, I don't want to argue with you." Tom said, "I would like to be your friend. I am the demon that you encountered during the ambush, the one that could have killed you, but let you get away. I am also the demon, who with the assistance of another demon, Rupert, helped you escape a rather unpleasant fate at the hands of Exador. I am also the human being you've known as Edwyrd for the past few weeks. I am all of these things. What you see is what you get."

Gastropé sat with his head in his hands. "I don't know. Maybe you're right. I just have to think about this. I don't like it at all."

"Think about it then. I know it will take some getting used to the idea." Hopefully, the journeyman wizard would come to the right decision. He turned his attention back to Damien and Antefalken.

Damien smiled at him. "Well, I guess you've answered the question about where Lenamare's big demon went to. You also raised some good points that I want to think about. Is there anything else I should know?"

Edwyrd laughed. "Anything else you should know? I know some things that would really turn your world upside down, wizard. However, given the circumstances, I think that experience can wait until we've dealt with the problems at hand."

"So, that explains why you suspect Ramses the Damned. It's not certain, but it's better than anything else we have to go on." Damien said to Edwyrd.

Edwyrd proceeded to detail Maelen's experience and the interpretation the two had made of it. They discussed Ramses and the likelihood of it being him for some time. Gastropé had been essentially silent throughout. Still trying to come to grips with the Edwyrd-Tom duality, it appeared. "We need a little more confirmation though. A little more to go on."

Damien turned to look at Antefalken. "You were going back to the Courts to see if you could dig up some more information anyway, perhaps you could fly by this Ramses estate? Note anything suspicious, like a demonic horde waiting to invade Astlan?" Antefalken smiled and nodded.

"You're going back to the Abyss soon?" Edwyrd asked Antefalken. The demon nodded. "How do you return here? To the same place?"

"Damien summons me after a fixed time interval. Why?" Antefalken asked.

"I need to find Rupert; hopefully he was transported to my cave. I have no guarantee of that though, no guarantee that he's even alive. If he's in my cave, I can just keep a gate open and pull him through. If I have to search for him though, I'll need an easy way back. Last time I came blind, I got stuck with the Rod. I'd prefer to have a surer way back. If Damien creates a link to you, and I'm with you, then I can use that link to bring Rupert and myself back."

Antefalken nodded, "Makes sense. Actually, while my visit to the Courts, I kind of need to handle on my own, if I'm flying near Ramses' place it might not be bad to have some protection. You could help be of assistance there. Just in case there is a demonic horde and they don't like my spying."

Edwyrd wasn't sure how much help he'd be against a demonic horde, but if there was trouble, the more demons the better Antefalken's chances. "That's fine with me then. When are you planning on leaving?"

"As soon as we're done here?" Antefalken suggested.

~

Rupert groaned. Groaning hurt, so he stopped. Actually, groaning shouldn’t hurt, Rupert thought semi-deliriously; he didn't have any lungs to groan with anymore. How was he groaning then? He opened his eyes. It was dark. He waited a few seconds as his eyes adjusted, bringing the perceived light level up to day-like strength. He was in a cave.

Rupert reached a hand up to rub at his throat. "Ouch!" he winced. His neck seemed a bit tender. That was, however, better than he remembered it. The last he remembered was his head bouncing off the cot. He blinked, carefully turning his head to view his surroundings.

Somehow or the other, he appeared to have wound up in Tom's cave. He had no idea how, but he wasn't complaining. He was very happy to be alive. He rubbed his head, catching his claws on his horns. Apparently, he was in his demonic form. That made sense; he'd ended up that way last time after he'd nearly died.

Well, now he had an inkling of how that little demon he'd dismembered yesterday must have felt afterwards. At least only Rupert's head had been chopped off this time. That little fellow had a lot worse to overcome. Rupert felt tired. Not sleepy, but rather a restless sort of exhaustion. He had no idea how long he'd been out. How long it had been since his head had been chopped off.

He hoped no one was overly worried about him. Actually, maybe he did hope they worried. He had no way of letting them know where he was. He wasn't at all sure how he'd get back. Eventually, Tom would return to his cave, but that could take a long time. A real long time if Tom didn't figure out what happened to him. That wasn't good. He'd probably get real hungry in the meantime. Not that he was hungry now, but...it could be a long time.

Rupert sat up slowly, being careful not to move his neck too much. He explored it gently, apparently his head was fairly firmly attached, just a big tender scar ring around his neck. Actually, if his whole body had regenerated here in the Abyss, after being destroyed in Astlan, then why was his neck like this? This regeneration thing really wasn't too clear. He climbed to his feet and went over to sit in Tom's chair.

The chair was a bit big for him, but the hole in the back was just right for his tail. It was also a lot better than crouching on the floor. Rupert still hadn't had enough time in this form to figure out the most comfortable positions, but it was looking like he'd have time now.

Rupert just sort of relaxed in the chair for some time, resting. He didn't feel like sleeping, but he was tired. After quite some time, however, he began to get restless. Eventually he got up to pace the room. When this got boring, he tried moving his head around to see if his neck was any better. A few twinges here and there, but overall, serviceable.

This might be a good time to practice flying, Rupert decided. He'd certainly have enough time to get good. Maybe he could get good enough to dodge those light beams. Having nothing better to do, Rupert proceeded up the mouth of the tunnel. Time to stretch his wings.

~

"So, that's everything for now?" Edwyrd asked the others. The others nodded. Damien stood. Gastropé was also nodding. He seemed more sure of himself now; while they'd talked, he'd had more time to get used to the idea of Edwyrd being a demon. Tom hoped he'd gotten enough used to it to not freak out when he changed.

"Ready to go?" Antefalken asked.

"I think so." Edwyrd told him.

"You want me to summon you in the morning then? Usual time?" Damien asked Antefalken. Antefalken looked to Edwyrd.

"Hopefully that will be enough time for me to find Rupert and to get the rest done. If needed, we can split up while you do things in the Courts. We can then join up to investigate Ramses' place. If I still haven't found Rupert, we can make other arrangements." Antefalken nodded at Edwyrd's suggestion.

"So, time to go then?" Damien asked them.

Edwyrd smiled at Gastropé who was looking at him. "Care to come along?" he asked, grinning.

"Uh, thanks, but I've been there enough in the last month or so." Gastropé grinned back, rather uncomfortably though.

"It ain't exactly Pismo Beach." Edwyrd said, referencing some line from a childhood memory. The others just looked at him curiously. "Never mind." He looked to Damien.

"Mind if I just leave my clothes here, since I'd guess we'll leave from here and arrive here again?" He asked the wizard.

Damien gestured with his hand, "Fine with me."

"Clothes?" Gastropé asked.

"I kind of get tired of having to buy new ones all the time, so I take off my old ones before changing." Edwyrd told him.

"Kind of a pain, I guess?" Gastropé said, trying to be casual.

"Only when I rip them." Edwyrd said with a smile. He'd do this quickly so as not to give Gastropé time to think. He decided to try something he'd thought practiced in the storeroom.

Edwyrd grasped the flame in his mind. He carefully adjusted it so as not to burn anything and then assumed the form of fire. Before Gastropé could even blink, Edwyrd's entire body was made of flame. His robe and clothes fell through the insubstantial fire to the ground. He was careful not burn them as they fell. As he stepped away from them, he let his form change.

The Edwyrd-shaped flame suddenly grew to touch the ceiling. As suddenly as the flame had appeared, it was gone. In its place stood Tom, the demon. All in all, it had taken about five to ten seconds. Definitely faster than the old way, and a very fast undressing.

Gastropé was staring in open mouth surprise. Tom hoped not having time to contemplate things would make it easier for the wizard. Damien just shook his head in surprise. Antefalken was just smiling, obviously somewhat impressed by the demonstration. Tom reached down and carefully picked up his clothes. He gingerly began to fold them.

As he did so, he commented on it, as casually as he could, trying to put Gastropé at ease. "You never think, but it's the simple tasks, like folding your clothes without shredding them, that are a real pain when you let your nails grow too long." He waved his hand slowly and minutely to punctuate his point. He was staring at Gastropé the entire time. He was also smiling, although with his mouth closed so as not to show any fangs.

Gastropé, looking his typically pale self in Tom's presence, smiled weakly. Obviously trying to relax under the circumstances. Tom looked to Antefalken. "How about my cave first?" Antefalken simply nodded.

"Fine with me," the bard told Tom.

Placing his clothes on a small table, Edwyrd visualized his cave and a thin wall in the air between him and it. Having done so, he proceeded to produce a flame at the thinnest point. The flame ate away at the membranous layer. Eating a circle in the air. To observers it appeared that Tom had produced a ball of fire that had spread into a ring shape. The flaming ring looked like a window into Tom's cave.

As it got wider, Tom sighed in frustration. He didn't see any Rupert on the other side. He'd hoped this would be easy. He hoped the boy was still alive, even if it wasn't going to be easy. "After you," he gestured to Antefalken. Antefalken stepped through the ring. Tom nodded to the two wizards and followed. The ring contracted behind him and closed off the hole between worlds.





Chapter 73


Gastropé breathed a sigh of relief as the hole closed behind the demons. Tom was gone. He'd tried to maintain his calm as best he could, but it had been difficult. It had been really hard to accept what Edwyrd had told him and do so in a way that he could rationalize intellectually. When Edwyrd had suddenly became Tom though, that had brought the whole thing home. That had made it real, not just a theoretical exercise.

"Had you any idea?" Gastropé asked Damien.

"What? That Edwyrd and the demon Tom were the same person?" Gastropé nodded. "No, actually I didn't. I hadn't heard enough of your adventure to put it together. And this demons changing shape is new to me."

Gastropé shrugged at the implicit mild reprimand. "Well, I was there for most of it, and I didn't get it. It all makes sense now: how Edwyrd just showed up. That had seemed strange at the time. But who knew demons could shape change?” Gastropé looked at his hands.

"I don't know," Gastropé continued, "like I said, Edwyrd was just such a reasonable person; it's hard to imagine him and Tom as the same being."

"Well," Damien said, "just because he is a demon, doesn't mean he's a bad person." Gastropé looked at him rather askance. "Oh, I know that's the story. Mostly it seems to be true too. Most demons can't be trusted further than you can contain them. However, it has been my experience that some demons are reliable, and reasonable. Antefalken for one." Gastropé just looked at him, waiting for him to continue.

"Antefalken is my chief agent. In point of fact, my major confidant and assistant. I trust him with my life. He's certainly saved it a time or two." Damien sat back down. "The thing you have to judge is the individual demon, and their actions. Certainly, only a fool would trust one automatically, but ,after time, if it proves true to its word, both the spirit and the letter, you can generally trust them. At least as much as you can trust a human."

"I don't know." Gastrope' remained uncertain.

"The fact is, being immortal and spending a considerable part of that time being bound to wizards gives demons a very different perspective from us. Separately, both would make a difference; together one gets a very interesting combination. Then add in the fact that they are a completely different species." Damien told him.

"You talk like they were just a different race. Like elves or dwarves." Gastropé said.

"Well they are. A race from the Abyss. They certainly aren't human, although sometimes certain individuals can come so close that you might not know the difference. I am sure, growing up in the Abyss, or wherever exactly demons grow up, gives them a very different background."

"Do demons grow up? I mean I'd never really thought of demons having children before." Gastrope' said.

"I'm not really sure. Antefalken has never been too clear on that point. Most of our talk on demon children surrounds half-breeds, which do grow up. As for purebred demons? Some certainly do. Others it seems are formed somewhere off in the far regions of the Astral Plane. Some have even claimed to come from far distant parts of the planes of men. However, what 'normal' plane of existence other than the Abyss could produce demons is beyond me.

"If what Antefalken has learned is true, then Tom is a demon that comes from the far regions of the Astral Plane. Or so he claims. However, he can't be as recent to Astlan as Lenamare seems to believe, nor as Tom claims. If he was, how could he already have a son? You told us that Rupert was his son, and he didn't deny it."

"That's what Tizzy said. He also seems to know a lot about human ways and culture for someone who has never been to Astlan before." Gastropé said.

"Again true. To my knowledge, he hasn't told any of us directly about his past. All we know is second hand from Antefalken's contacts and what Lenamare's people have said. Thus he hasn't lied to us about it, really hasn't said anything."

"Do you think we can trust him?" Gastropé asked, uncertain.

"From what I've been told he hasn't done anything to harm any of those that he considers on his side. Specifically I mean Jenn, Maelen, Rupert and you. In fact, it sounds like he's gone to a great deal of trouble to aid you. For one thing, if this Tizzy is his colleague, well then, without them, we still wouldn't know of the demon infestation."

"True. If they were in league with the others, I doubt they'd tell us about the demons." Gastropé admitted. Damien nodded.

"Thus on face value, all he's been guilty of is withholding information. If that qualified an individual as automatically untrustworthy then we'd all be a really shiftless lot." Gastropé had to smile at this. "Since he is a demon that none of us knows well, he does bear watching. I do believe that we can trust him not to do anything out of hand in the short term. What his long term goals are is still very unclear and bears observing. He may be playing a very complicated game with us and the others. Even so, that still doesn't mean he's untrustworthy. If we can trust his word, or rather the spirit of his word, then he won't directly harm us or act against us."

"If we can trust his word." Gastropé restated the problem.

"Yes. As a group, demons tend to be very literal and take their own interpretation of their word very seriously. On average, this can lead to some problems in communication. On an individual basis, I'd have to say we can trust Tom's word about as much as any mortal we'd recently met under similar circumstances. At least, until he does something to disprove it, or indicate that his interpretation is different from ours. From what I've seen and heard, he's done just the opposite."

"True." Gastropé admitted. "But you admitted it could be part of some even bigger plot."

"It might be; it might not be. What is clear is that both Lenamare and Exador are involved in bigger plots than they'll let us in on. We know this. Both of them are human. Are you going to tell me that you trust either of them more than you'd trust Tom?" Gastropé shrugged slightly. Damien certainly had a point on that.

~

"Do you think he trusts us?" Bess asked Ramses' back. She lazily stretched her paws outward towards the back of the man who was climbing out of her bed. Ramses shrugged slightly as he began to don his elaborate black leather costume. He always insisted on dressing manually, at least with this costume.

He looked over his shoulder at her, smiling and arching one eyebrow. "Does it matter?" Bess stretched again, arching her back slightly, as she lay on her side, half covered by the silk sheets. "He hasn't got too much choice. He's been out of Court politics so long now, he needs an inside."

Bess smiled, her pointed cat's teeth seeming to glisten in the soft red light coming through the windows. "Just like we need an inside into Astlan politics. For now."

Ramses nodded his head in agreement, fastening the shoulder pads in place. "For now. Eventually his usefulness will end."

"I'm sure he's thinking the same. I suppose we should be prepared for his eventual backstabbing." Bess said, idly drawing circles on the bed with her claws.

"I suppose, I don't consider him too much a threat. His forces here aren't particularly impressive. His Astlanian forces aren't that much anymore either, for that matter." Ramses strapped the gold belts over his shoulders.

Bess reclined on her sheets, stretching one leg into the air above her. Arching it just enough to be seductive, all with her characteristic feline grace. Ramses just raised an eyebrow at her. "You think I put all this on, just to take it off again?"

Bess grinned wickedly, flexing her claws, "I could help you remove it. It could be, most entertaining." Ramses smiled back.

"I'm sure it would. Your talents along those lines far outstrip anyone I've ever met. Unfortunately, I have a meeting with our ally in Freehold. He tends to get miffed if people are late."

"Well then," Bess replied, mock pouting, "better run. Hate to miff the great Exador."

~

Antefalken hovered in the air off to one side. He hated to intrude on family reunions. He'd been slightly concerned they'd have a bit of a search for the boy, but fortunately that hadn't proven to be the case. They'd taken the tunnel to the mouth of the cave and surveyed the valley below. Within moments, Tom had spotted a large bird flying high overhead. Naturally, since there were no birds in the Abyss, it had to be a demon. Antefalken couldn't quite resolve the demon, but Tom had no trouble in identifying his son.

Up like an arrow he'd shot, on a direct intercept course for the boy. Antefalken had moved at a more sedate pace to gain altitude. He wanted to lag behind to give the two some time alone. Obviously, it was the boy's first death. Such deaths were always a slightly worrisome time for parents. Or, it was for parents who actually bothered to care about their children.

Antefalken tried to care about his various offspring. Unfortunately, over the years he had produced so many, that after the first generation or two, he tended to lose track. Especially among the more human ones. He hadn't much in the way of truly demonic offspring. A few children with cat like eyes or some other demonic oddity. A number with some real bardic ability and a couple fine wizards.

Otherwise the children seemed to take more after their mortal mothers. Antefalken twisted his head, watching the two demons above. It might be nice to have a demon child for a change. However, it seemed unlikely that he'd ever produce one with mortals. He'd need to bed a demon wench for that. Not too many of those he was interested in. Except, of course, for Lilith, but she was just a fling. Having a child with her was not even a question. She’d had children, as everyone knew, and then that rather unpleasant breakup with Adam and…well everyone knew where that led.

Still, it would be nice, Antefalken mused watching the reunion. He shook his head. Here he was thinking about family things when the whole world seemed to be going to pieces, or at least Astlan. Unfortunately, trouble in Astlan invariably seemed to mean trouble in the Abyss, eventually. In this case, it was probably even simultaneous.

Eventually, the reunion ended and the two demons flew down to join him. Once again, he had to marvel at how identical the two were, except for size. Almost definitely some funny genetic stuff going on. Either that or a highly inbred family. However, the boy didn't seem addlepated.

"So, ready for the Courts?" Antefalken asked.

"The Courts of Chaos? Are we really going there?" Rupert looked anxiously from Antefalken to his father. Tom apparently hadn't filled the boy in on everything. The kid was certainly excited about the idea though.

"That's the next stop." Antefalken nodded. "We'll just fly south to the nearest boom tunnel and hop on over."

"Boom tunnel?" Rupert asked. Antefalken tisked, weren't parents teaching their children anything these days?

"Boom tunnel. It is similar to a Runic Gateway in the Abyss except that they are always on and most everyone can adjust them to different locations. Or at least to the other boom tunnel gateways that they know of." Antefalken told Rupert.

"Why do they call it a boom tunnel then?" Rupert asked.

"You'll see when we try it." Antefalken just smiled and winked at Tom who smiled back.



Woohhhmmm....Woohhhmmm throbbed the archway standing in the middle of the small valley. Antefalken landed a short distance in front of it; Tom and Rupert landed next to him. Through the ground, Antefalken could feel the characteristic throbbing of the boom tunnel. Antefalken smiled at Rupert and then proceeded to the archway.

The archway was a free standing arch made of black marble, approximately twelve feet high and six feet across. Looking through the archway, one saw only an undulating field of various shades of red, instead of the other side. The colors undulated in time to the throbbing sensation. Antefalken walked up beside the arch.

On the left hand side was a small silver plate, about the size of one of Tom's hands. Antefalken reached up and placed his palm upon it. After a moment of concentration he removed his hand and looked at the others. "Ready?" He asked. The pitch of the throbbing had changed just slightly, a human probably wouldn't have detected it, but demons had no problem.

"Sure!" Rupert exclaimed enthusiastically. "This will take us to the Courts?"

"Well, just a short distance outside the city limit. No boom tunnels or gateways are allowed in the city itself. Unless created by one of the higher powers themselves." Antefalken smiled at the two and said, "OK, let's go, follow me." With that, he stepped through the tunnel.

Woooohhhhmmmmmm...BOOM! went the tunnel as he stepped through. As usual, he momentarily lost his sense of balance as the boom tunnel shook him to his core. Otherwise, he stepped out from the tunnel just fine.

Quickly he scanned the surroundings of the exit. No one around to cause problems. Good enough. As he turned back to the arch, Rupert wobbled out, a bit unsteady on his feet and holding his hands to his ears. "Ugh. I see why you call it a boom tunnel." Antefalken smiled.

Tom stepped out, also slightly unsteady from the experience. Antefalken was happy to see that even the truly powerful were not immune to the tunnels. "The Courts of Chaos, Rupert..." he spread his hand in the direction of the city.

Rupert's jaw dropped. Antefalken smiled. He knew what an impressive sight the glass, steel and concrete of the city was. Especially the view from here. This view had been especially tailored for maximal effect on arriving visitors. Nowhere in Astlan did one find sixty story buildings, only the Abyss could produce such magnificence.

As he'd expected, Tom wasn't overly impressed. Or, at least he didn't seem to be. He was studying it some detail. Unless Boggy's story was correct, which Antefalken rather doubted, Tom must have seen the city many times before. "It reminds me," Tom said slowly, "of a rather twisted and stunted version of the Manhattan skyline. Is that supposed to be the Freedom Tower?" He pointed to the Enslavement Services building. "The Empire State building?" He pointed out the Evil State building. Interesting, he knew similar names, but not the correct ones. Was he really a novice? Or had he just not been here in so long that the names had changed?

The buildings did change fairly rapidly, the names not quite so fast. The names had been the same for at least the last three hundred years. "Trump Tower?" Tom asked incredulously. Well, at least he got that one right, thought Antefalken, shuddering at the thought of its namesake Archdemon.

"Almost." Antefalken said. "Let's head on in. I'm going to need to go to the Notorious Dame Cathedral." Tom looked at him cock-eyed. "That I probably should do on my own. I can take you to a bar where we can meet later. In the meantime you guys can just wander around."

"Great!" Rupert exclaimed. Tom looked intrigued, but a little more dubious.

~

Tom was relatively sure he could find the bar again. Its name had certainly been memorable, 'The Ripe Young Maiden's Surprise,' he wasn't sure what the surprise was, and he wasn't sure he wanted to find out. Unfortunately, the bar didn't seem to be in the best part of town. Actually, from what Tom had seen on the way in, there didn't seem to be a best part of town.

From a distance the city had looked rather impressive and shiny, a miniature New York, almost. The closer he got the less the resemblance held. While he'd never been out of the U.S., he'd almost have to guess that if one were to mix Paris and Manhattan together, tossing in the odd bit of London and Istanbul, one might get the Courts of Chaos. It wouldn't hurt if one also projected them into some sort of neogothic future. The whole place was a rather chaotic jumble of science-fantasy and cyberpunk. The sort of place where the ideas of a lot of really bad authors came together, or drunk game designers.

He had just avoided stepping in the waste from something that looked like gryphons pulling a coach, when he'd nearly been ran over by a De Lorean. Every nook and cranny in the buildings seemed to hide some shady-looking character. He didn't know what these characters were doing, and, if they were anything like those at home, he knew he didn't want to know.

The reddish twilight seeping over the towers didn't seem to help the atmosphere much. Or maybe it did, depending on what ambience one was trying to achieve. Garbage collection seemed to be about on par with New York though; he stepped over several bags that may have contained formerly living beings. As a demon walked by with a green Mohawk, he decided maybe the place wasn't that different from home.

Overall, though, the general seediness of the locals, the curious mix of medieval and hi-tech, the apparent crime rate, what appeared to be a demon slave market, the rather over-obvious places of ill repute, everything he'd seen, made him decide that despite a lot of amazing similarities, this place sort of made New York look like Des Moines. Sure, his home town had some areas just as bad, or maybe in parts worse than some of what he saw here, but the whole City wasn't a cesspool; the same couldn't be said about the Courts. There didn't seem to be any good neighborhoods, any ritzy zones. New York, at least, had a lot of very glamorous places. This place just looked nasty all over.

To be honest, not having much to fear for himself, given size comparisons between himself and the local demons, he might come to enjoy the place. It did seem to be the adventurer's paradise, if said adventurer happened to be named Arnold. The only problem was Rupert.

Not that the place intimidated Rupert. Far from it, the kid was gawking like a tourist. Which, Tom supposed, he was. Unfortunately, such behavior was exactly the sort of thing to get one in trouble. Tourists wanted to see everything, and they were always very obvious about it. Survival, on the other hand, demanded that one notice everything and see nothing. More importantly, even if you see something, don't look like you're seeing it. Rupert, being from small villages or maybe a farm even-- Tom realized he didn't actually know where Rupert was from-- had obviously never learned this lesson.

Thus, it was that Tom found himself continually trying to distract Rupert from staring all over the place. Given all the ears around, he didn't want to come out and say, 'Don't gawk," because that would have required enough explanation that everyone would have known they were tourists. Thus, he tried covertly to keep Rupert from staring straight up with his mouth open and drooling. Small chat here and there, trying to point out more harmless distractions than the demons around them.

Actually, maybe he was being paranoid, Tom decided. After all, almost everyone had given them a wide berth, at least those not in vehicles. Tom had to admit, that if he looked like an overgrown version of Rupert, then they would have to present a rather fearsome spectacle. Nonetheless, looking tough would only take you so far.

Even as he contemplated this, he noted Rupert had disappeared. Quickly looking around, he found that Rupert had veered off, attracted by some sleazy-looking purple demon in a trench coat. If the man tried to sell Rupert a watch.... Tom hurried over to retrieve the boy.

The purple demon glared in annoyance at Tom, but said nothing as he dragged Rupert away. Rupert protested the entire way back to their previous path. "But Tom, he was going to sell me a genuine Vestal Virgin!"

"You can't trust street dealers," Tom snapped. "You don't know what you're getting. If she's here, I doubt she's the real thing."

"But Tom...I've never had a Vestal Virgin!" Rupert complained.

Tom stopped and looked down at the boy, frowning. "Do you even know what to do with a Vestal Virgin? Assuming she doesn't have any nasty diseases?"

Rupert looked down shyly at the ground, tracing circles with his hooves. "No," he admitted, "but you could teach me!" He looked up hopefully at Tom. Tom just groaned, shaking his head. He hurried on, ushering Rupert. He wasn't even sure what a demon would do with one. Rape it? Eat it? Sacrifice it? All of the above?

This town was really not the place for small children. Even if the child was a demon. Maybe if he got Rupert something to eat it would distract him. Actually, that was a bit weird, they'd seen plenty of bars, inns and restaurants, as well as food carts in the city. If demons didn't need to eat, then why the thriving business? Thinking of business, Tom suddenly realized the difficulty in distracting Rupert with food. He had no money! He also had no idea of what demons used for money in the Abyss.

~

"Mmmm..." Antefalken moaned as he rolled over. Lilith seemed to be almost purring in contentment. It had been pretty good this time. Surprisingly, she'd seemed happy with only seven times in the last half-hour. Either she was getting older; he was getting better, or she was having some incredibly interesting business meetings. He doubted the first; he hoped the second, but he suspected the latter. Actually, he'd been quite lucky, apparently his knock on the door had caught her just as she was returning from some meeting.

He got up from her bed and wandered over to the bar in front of the drapes blocking out the red abyssal light. He poured both of them a couple large snifters of brandy. "So?" Lilith inquired lazily as he poured the drinks. "Anything new on your little puzzle?"

"A bit actually," he smiled as returned to the bed with the drinks in hand. "I've made the acquaintance of Lenamare's fourth order. And the Rod has surrounded Freehold trying to route a demon horde."

"A demon horde?" Lilith arched one eyebrow as she propped herself up on her right arm. Her long black hair cascading down her shoulder to the silk pillow.

"Yes, a demon horde." Antefalken handed her the snifter. "Freehold seems to be up to its turrets in invisible lesser demons. We don't know who they belong to, but some of my allies are suspecting Ramses."

"Ramses?" Lilith sniffed, but not at her brandy. "I don't care for the man."

Antefalken smiled. "As I recall you swore eternal vengeance on him after that incident in Oorstemoth?"

"Oh, that was a thousand years ago, you don't think I'd still carry a grudge after that long do you?" She smiled coyly at him.

Antefalken just looked at her for a moment. "A sweet and innocent creature like you? No, not at all." Antefalken said with a smile, amused sarcasm running heavy in his voice.

Lilith shrugged and smiled. "Well, maybe just the teensiest." She took a long sip of the brandy, their eyes locked on each other's. "So," she changed the subject, "what did you find out about this big demon of Lenamare's?"

"Conflicting information." Antefalken said.

"Conflicting information?"

"Yes, after leaving you last time I ran into Boggy at a bar here in the Courts. He knew the demon."

Lilith shook her head, slightly puzzled. "Should I know this Boggy?"

Antefalken smiled. "He's Tizzy's partner," he reminded her.

"Tisdale!" she sat up in bed and took a bigger swig of brandy. "That little pest. Damn. I keep meaning to talk to 'Smody about having him eternally euthanized." Antefalken winced at Lilith's casual use of her pet name for her sometime lover. It seemed almost too close to blasphemy to refer to one of the Triumvirate as ''Smody.' "Unfortunately," she continued in consternation. Of course, being Lilith did had its prerogatives. "I never seem to remember to bring it up when I'm around him." Antefalken was just as glad; he rather liked Tizzy, even if none of the upper echelon could stand the demon. Lilith remained quiet for a moment then gestured for Antefalken to continue.

"Well, Boggy claimed the demon was a newbie, but I've since met him."

"And?"

"Well, he is a bit strange, some things he knows, and some he doesn't. If he is a newbie, then he's a damn impressive newbie. Especially since he has a son."

"A son?" Lilith asked puzzled.

"Apparently, the kid looks identical to his 'father.' Tom, that's the newbie's name, is rather inexact on the whole issue, but Tizzy reports that they're father and son. Boggy claims however, that this Tom is a kid from one of the midtech Earths."

"Puzzling." Lilith said, interested, but obviously not too intrigued. "Well, you know better than to trust anything this Tizzy says. He's one of the most deceitful little pests I can think of. I still don’t know why his accursed master only kept him imprisoned for a few decades in the Cenobite trap. I’d have left him there for all eternity."

“That’s a rather cruel fate, even by your standards.” Antefalken pointed out; Lilith just shrugged.

Lilith took another sip of brandy and continued, "So, what do you and your illustrious Master Damien intend to do about this horde of demons and the Rod of Tiernon?"

Antefalken shrugged, "there isn't much we can do at the moment. Lenamare and Exador seem to have most of the cards. If Ramses is involved, then whomever he's allied with does also. I just don't know if it's Exador, Lenamare or someone else, or if he's really there. The Rod also insists there are at least two to three other archdemon's running around."

"Two to three others?" Lilith asked, apparently surprised.

"Yes, we haven't got a clue who they might be. That's one reason I wanted to talk to you. Do you know of any alliances Ramses' might be involved in at the moment?"

Lilith tilted her head for a moment, obviously trying to weigh what she would say. "Well I do monitor the man, every now and then." Antefalken just nodded, he knew she would, what with her reputation. "I can't think of any alliances with any other archdemons. As for humans, while he might be able to put up with this Lenamare for a while, you know there has been bad blood between Ramses and the various Wizards Exador since the Anilord days."

"That slightly predates my time, but yes, I do recall that Exador's ancestor at the time of the Anilords, Vicar-General Exador, did cause problems for the Anilords."

"To Ramses included, as did the Aniwizard Exador a few thousand years before that." Lilith added.

"The Aniwizard Exador?" Antefalken asked.

"Another distant ancestor of the current wizard," Lilith stated. "Gave Ramses a lot of trouble during his first attempt at Astlanian conquest. The point being, it is highly doubtful that Ramses would be aligned in anyway with an Exador. Lenamare or someone else, perhaps, but not Exador."

"But you don't know of someone else?" Antefalken asked.

"Sorry," she scratched lightly at Antefalken’s chest with the almost claw like fingernails of her right hand. "I do dislike the man, but I've tried to ignore him since I haven't been able to do much about him." She put the now empty snifter on the floor. "Why don't we discuss something more interesting now, something we don't need so many tiresome words for?" She arched her back pushing him back down into the silk sheets of her bed.

"Fine with me..." Antefalken smiled.

"I'm so gla.a.a.d..." Lilith purred, her blood red lips coming down to meet his.

~

"Boggy!" Tom exclaimed in surprise. He and Rupert had just returned to 'The Ripe Young Maiden's Surprise,' intending to wait for Antefalken. As they'd entered the western style swinging doorway, he noted his friend sitting at a booth over on the left.

Boggy looked up from what looked like a large cup of coffee and smiled. He waved for the two to join him. "Tom!" he said as the two walked up. "What a pleasant surprise." Tom was pleasantly surprised to find that the booth seemed almost designed for demons. The seat was a ways back from the table, and the rear of the seat had a large hole to accommodate tails. It was also high enough of the ground so, while a bit small for Tom, it was certainly much larger than human size. He slid in, Rupert followed. "What brings you here? And who's your doppelganger?" Boggy asked, he also made a motion for the waiter to come over. "Let me buy you some Denubian Choco-CoffeeTM."

"I'm waiting for a friend who had some business in town. This is Rupert." Tom didn't bother trying to explain the resemblance. He couldn't.

"Please to meet you." Boggy stuck out a hand to Rupert. Rupert took it, apparently excited to meet another demon.

"Boggy here is Tizzy's partner." Tom told Rupert.

"You've met Tizzy then?" Boggy asked Rupert. "Haven't seen the scoundrel in some time."

Rupert was nodding happily. "He ended up taking a little trip with us to Astlan, and hasn't been back since." Tom told Boggy.

"You didn't let him wander too far off and cause too much trouble did you?" Boggy asked slightly concerned.

"No, he's in good company in Freehold, behaving himself." Tom hoped.

"Not under duress?" Boggy asked.

"Not at all, in fact the first thing he did was to wander off to kill his accursed master and then returned right to us and been quite helpful."

"Helpful?" Boggy snorted, "are you sure we're talking about the same demon?" Tom just smiled and nodded.

As the waiter, a rather lizard like demon of more width than height brought them their drinks, Rupert started plying Boggy with questions. Many of them were one's he'd already asked Boggy, about what it was Boggy did and this and that, so he didn't listen too closely. Instead, he took the time to look around the place.

Actually, with the exception of the habitual red light that seemed more omnipresent in this part of the Abyss than near his cave, the place seemed to be a cross between a western saloon and perhaps a small town cafe. Booths lined the wall to the left of the door, while a long bar that was almost like a lunch counter with round stools in front of it, ran the length of the right hand wall. Scattered round tables filled the space in between. The doors had been the short swinging type found in western movies and two large windows flanking the doors gave a view out onto the street. At this time of night, or at least he guessed it was night, the place was moderately busy but not packed.

When the waiter had set down the hot steaming mugs, he noted that Boggy placed a couple triangular coins on the table for the waiter who took them without comment. Tom nodded thanks to Boggy, who simply smiled, neither wanting to interrupt Rupert's steady stream of questions.

Tom took a small sip of the coffee substance and nearly gagged. Boggy simply noted his reaction and smiled. Talk about a vile brew that only a cabbie would like, Tom thought. The stuff was a cross between hot chocolate, coffee and maybe vodka or some other hard liquor. Whatever it was, it had to be the most bitter thing he'd ever tasted in his life. Given the burning sensation he quickly felt in his stomach, he decided that it would be something Edwyrd wouldn't like, and in fact would probably kill him. On the other hand, it was about the only thing he'd tried as a demon, that didn't require receiving grievous injuries, that seemed to have much effect on his demon body.

An odd thought crossed his mind. If the ambient temperature of the Abyss was about the boiling point of water, then how was this coffee simply steaming? In his mouth it felt like coffee or hot chocolate, it was hot. So exactly how hot was this stuff?

He shook his head after the second swallow as he began to feel the effects of a massive caffeine rush. Whoa, Tom thought. Shaking his head a bit, he continued to look around the room. He shifted his eyes into demon sight. Suddenly curious how much magic was present in the room. Actually, except for a slight glow from the surroundings there didn't seem to be a whole lot. He could see auras of various colors and intensities surrounding the patrons, but not much on any objects.

One thing he noted on a few of the other customers were what looked something like black umbilical cords. These cords seemed to extend from somewhere near the center of their bodies and extend out through their auras. After that they seemed to just taper off and fade into the air around them. He looked at his companions searching for such a cord. Rupert didn't have one, nor did Boggy. No, on second thought, Tom thought he could detect a faint black line inside Boggy's aura, but it didn't extend out. Further, unlike the others, which faded at one end, Boggy's was all fuzzed out and seemed to just abruptly terminate. He looked down at himself and was suddenly surprised to see he had one of the cords.

His extended from his sternum out into the air in front of him and then faded off. That was really strange, thought Tom. He had no idea what it could be. He'd really never noticed it before. Of course, he'd never really looked at himself with demon sight before either. Now that he knew what to look for, it was quite obvious. In fact the more he concentrated on it, the more clear it became. Was it some product of the Choco-Coffee that caused him to see it? Where did it go?

Carefully, so as not to appear too weird to Boggy and Rupert, who were busy lost in some tale of Boggy's, Tom reached out and tried to touch the cord. It was rather amorphous but he could almost touch it if he really concentrated on touching it. Thinking back to the things he'd tried with the link he sort of made to Tizzy and to the time he traced the summons from the priest, Tom tried to concentrate on following the umbilical cord to its other end.

It was hard, harder than the previous thing's he'd tried along this line, but suddenly he got an unmistakable impression of a tower room. A tower room and a presence in that room. A presence he recognized immediately. It startled him and caused him to break his concentration, bringing him back to reality. It was Lenamare on the other end! The black cord was some sort of link to Lenamare. Tom was stunned by this revelation. Was this what bound him? He was so startled by the thought that he missed the casual question Boggy asked of him. Quickly he cleared his mind and tried to concentrate on what his friend was saying. He'd sort this out later.





Chapter 74


Jenn wobbled down the dimly lit stone corridor, wondering if she was going to drop before she reached her room. The last several hours had been quite taxing to say the least. It had taken a while to find a large, empty, out of the way room in the underground complex with an extra doorway suitable for the gateway, and large enough to house a small army.

After finding it, she had spent the next couple hours playing lackey to Hortwell in setting up the runic gateway, while Lenamare kibitzed in the background. Then bringing all of Zilquar's people through, getting them set up and supplied, posting guards to ensure privacy, working out details like food, water and toilets. She was just glad it was over, for now.

It was probably about dawn, as far as Jenn could tell, when she made it back to her room. The corridors were silent as all rational people were long since asleep. Amazing, Jenn mused, that one could hide and entire army in a dungeon and have no one else even know. Rather frightening actually.

That dungeon was large; there could easily be a couple other armies down there as well. If he hadn't been staying with the guys, Jenn would have checked on Rupert. However, she doubted they'd appreciate her sneaking into their room in the middle of the night to kiss Rupert good night. She'd see him in the morning, whenever she got up.

~

Master Trisfelt slowly sank back to the ground. He'd floated above the edge of the trees to try and get a better glimpse of the situation. He and the children had arrived at the edge of the forest surrounding Freehold, shortly after sunset. Unfortunately, they'd found the city completely surrounded by the Rod. Surrounded by a lot more soldiers than had passed them on the road, a couple orders of magnitude more. While the gates of the city were closed for the night anyway, it appeared to Trisfelt that even if they were open, getting in wouldn't be easy. The Rod seemed to be guarding the entrances to the city, completely besieging it. Whether they were letting people in or out was unclear.

He'd settled the children down, fed them and gotten them to sleep, and gotten a few hours of sleep on his own. All inside the minor protection wards he'd set up around them. When he'd awoke shortly before dawn he'd decided to try and review the situation again from the air, while staying relatively close to the warded children. The situation hadn't changed much. It was not at all clear they'd be able to enter the city.

~

Exador strode into the sitting room of his apartments, his mind sorting through the implications of what his demon spies in the castle had told him. Apparently, late yesterday evening, Lenamare had smuggled an army into the cellars of the castle. He wasn't sure what army had been smuggled in, but in all likelihood it belonged to Zilquar. Overall, it was an annoying turn of events that could easily shift the control of power from his own forces, both his demons and the remains of his army, also hiding in a remote corner of the vast underground labyrinth under the Council's fortress.

His musings were suddenly put on hold when he realized that one of his second order demons was kneeling respectfully on the floor by his sofa. "What do you want?" he asked the demon.

"Lord, I have word on the greater demon you wanted found."

"What word? You've found Lenamare's demon?" Exador asked impatiently.

"Lord, they were spotted in the Courts and followed, as you ordered," the demon answered, not looking up.

"They?"

"Yes sir," the demon looked up hesitantly. "It seems he was with two or three other demons."

"Do you know who the other three were?" Exador was not in the mood for question and answer, "and what they were doing?"

"One demon was the bard, Antefalken..."

"Damien's lackey." Exador stated under his breath.

"Another was Bogsworth," Exador shook his head not recognizing the name, "and the third was unknown but looked identical to the greater demon except about half the size."

"What? You mean of similar form? Type?" Exador asked impatiently for clarification.

"No, sir, identical as in pretty much an exact duplicate only smaller."

Exador frowned, what was this other demon? As a rule, demons, especially the more powerful ones were all unique. One just didn't get duplicates. Not unless, perhaps, Lenamare's demon had cloned itself. But that wouldn't make much sense. "So where are they now?"

"Uhm, we don't know sir." The little demon cringed.

"What do you mean you don't know? They were followed weren't they?"

"Certainly lord, it’s just that the big one opened a gate to Astlan and they stepped through, except for Bogsworth, who went back to the Courts. The trackers couldn't follow them through the gate of course."

"This Bogsworth went back to the Courts? Where did they go in the meantime, between when they were found in the Courts and Bogsworth returned to the Courts?"

"Uhm, to the estate of Lord Ramses sir." The demon looked hastily down at the floor again.

"Ramses? What the hell?" First Lenamare's demon teamed up with Damien's pet and then they both pay a visit on his own erstwhile ally? Was Lenamare playing bigger games than he appeared to be? But what would Ramses and Lenamare have in common? Exador knew Lenamare too well. The man would never willingly consort with anyone he knew was a demon except in the traditional Master-Slave sense, and there was no question that Ramses would never be anyone's slave.

"So what did they do at Ramses' place?" Exador asked.

"Uhm, nothing sir, they just went to the edge of the grounds and stood there staring for a little bit. Then they walked around it part way, but never entered. After that is when they opened the gate."

That made Exador feel better, perhaps Lenamare wasn't dealing with Ramses behind his back. However, was Lenamare on to him? Did Lenamare finally begin to suspect exactly whom he was dealing with? The man was not completely stupid, and given the book, he'd have to plan on archdemons getting involved at some point. The question was, did Lenamare know just who the archdemons were?

"Interesting isn't it?" Bess asked from an archway across the room. Exador looked up in surprise, not knowing she'd been there.

"What are you doing here?" Exador snapped.

"Why, Exy," Bess purred in mock hurt tones, "you invited me to breakfast." She straightened slightly before continuing, "to discuss our ally."

Exador frowned; he'd forgotten. He glared down at the messenger demon. The damn thing had to have known she was there. It should have known better. "Get out of here. I'll deal with you later," Exador snapped at the messenger demon. The smaller demon cowered and sobbed, realizing it had made a mistake and vanished in a puff of flame.

"So, since you obviously heard. What do you make of it? And what will we do about Ramses? The man is going to give us away before we're ready. Obviously, Lenamare and Damien have already caught on to him." Exador asked Bess, gesturing for her to proceed him onto the dining patio.

"Perhaps," Bess purred. "It's not clear to me that Lenamare's demons will go right to him with this news." She looked at him archly as she sat down at the table. "After all, wizards and demons don't always get along, especially slaves and masters. Or didn't you realize that?"

Exador sneered slightly at her as he sat down. "I won't even bother to answer the last, but nonetheless, we can't assume they won't. What I do know from the past is that Antefalken is rather loyal to Damien, master-slave or not. We can assume that Damien knows something. Whether this other demon goes to Lenamare is another question."

"So, they know that you are consorting with an archdemon." She stated, rather than asked.

Exador shrugged, "Perhaps. If they've figured out who Ramses is, then they probably also know that Ramses and 'the family Exador’," Bess shook her head slightly, "go back a long way. They also know that there was bad blood between Ramses and my 'ancestors.' Or so any history book will tell them."

"Bad blood? You drove him off the plane." Bess stated.

"Politics, my dear, nothing personal. It was simply expedient at the time. Besides, that was 3,000 years ago."

"After he invaded your land and his people had your son killed, permanently."

"Misunderstanding, we've long since resolved that. I've fathered a few more since then." Exador waved his left hand dismissingly as he raised his glass to take a sip of orange juice.

"And 1,000 years ago, when he was driven off a second time?"

"Pure coincidence that I was involved in the revolution on the opposing side. Nothing more, we never even met in battle."

"Fine," Bess shrugged, "I'm happy to know there is nothing personal this time around either. And that you want to stick it to him again over the book for purely expedient reasons."

"My dear," Exador said mildly, "you're the one who brought it up. You were perfectly correct we don't need a third leg. You and I are more than capable of ruling over the Abyss as King and Queen by ourselves."

~

Edwyrd shut the door on their room as Rupert went to take a nap. He stopped by Maelen and Gastropé’s room to see if they’d gone to breakfast yet. At least officially that was the reason; unofficially it was to see if Gastropé was in freak out mode.

Gastropé was out, but Maelen was in, sorting through a fairly good sized stack of books of various sizes. “Where did all the books come from?” Edwyrd asked.

Maelen smiled, “I’ve ransacked the Council’s general library. It’s for the use of the Council of Wizards; I seem to be able to get in no problem.” He grinned knowingly at Edwyrd who smiled back. “It’s all general stuff, nothing too confidential or top secret: say like Lenamare’s book. However, I wanted to get a general idea on what they know and don’t know about various things. I want to better understand their perspective, thinking and get a sense of their background thought process. This is pretty much a once in a lifetime opportunity, and I want to take advantage of it.”

Edwyrd chuckled. “If you can figure out what wizards are thinking, please let me know. I cannot figure them out no matter how hard I try.”

“Have you ever read any of their books or introductions to Wizardry?” Maelen asked. “They have an interesting view of reality. A bit different than we do.”

“Hmm,” Edwyrd replied. “I can honestly say that I have never read anything about Wizardry, at least not from a wizard’s perspective.”

“You could be in for a treat then. Do you need any bedtime reading?” Maelen asked.

Edwyrd’s eyes lit up, “Yes, actually I do. I have some problems with insomnia lately. It’s almost as if I was stressed about something.” Edwyrd smiled at the Seer.

Maelen chuckled, “Let me prepare you a stack of books that I think you’ll find useful. Feel free to come in and borrow them at your leisure.”

“Thanks!” Edwyrd replied.

~

Maelen completed the stack for Edwyrd and headed to the storeroom he’d located last night. The Sorcerer Elrose had contacted him via Johen and they’d synced a mirror of Elrose’s with a scrying bowl of Maelen’s and had had a good conversation. Elrose was outside the walls of the city with his refugee train. They were being blocked by the Rod’s army.

Elrose wanted to group teleport his people into the city and palace. Such a large group teleportation would be quite tricky on multiple levels. He’d need a large, unoccupied region and a very good ‘feeling’ for it, both visually and other senses. A teleport anchor was the term that was most commonly used. Elrose felt that a Seer, such as Maelen would be able to provide a better anchor than Lenamare, Jehenna or Hortwell.

Maelen had smiled at that. Elrose and he had never met in person, and yet Elrose still trusted him more than the three wizards with this delicate operation. Maelen found that a bit amusing. Jehenna, according to Jenn, was a Master Sorceress, and so should be able to provide a high quality anchor for the teleport; but clearly Elrose wasn’t that fond of her. Maelen couldn’t disagree with the assessment.





Chapter 75


Jenn finished the last chalk markings on the floor, the rose-colored light pouring through the tower window from the setting sun outside glinting off the bits of chalk dust still floating in the air. Jenn had slept most of the day through, and when she'd finally gotten up and went to get some food, she'd been promptly summoned to the workroom. Apparently, Lenamare and Jehenna were finally ready to make another attempt at opening the book.

She was still exhausted; she’d gotten at most a half hour for dinner before being summoned. She’d joined Gastropé who was eating with Maelen. She wished she could have said it had been good to catch up with them; unfortunately, that had not been the case.

As if the thought of multiple armies hiding in the basement wasn’t bad enough; apparently Tisdale had reported and Edwyrd, Gastropé and Maelen had all verified that the entire palace was infested with lower level invisible demons. They advised her to be circumspect when in public regions.

Seriously? Jenn just shook her head. She was getting sick and tired of demons. The entire world was literally going to hell. She wished she’d had more time to ask them the what and why of this, but admittedly they didn’t seem to have too many answers; so it would probably have just been gossiping. Still, some venting would have been nice.

At least she was going to be busy for the next few hours with the stupid book. That would take her mind off the demons. In particular, she was the lead student on this since the other students present and assisting had no real idea what it was they were trying to do.

Lenamare didn't think the other students needed to know what they were doing and he'd even gone so far as to order Jenn not to talk about it. She glanced over to where Lenamare was consulting with Zilquar, wondering once again what was in the book that Lenamare found so incredibly important. Some long lost spell?

Even as she was musing, horns began to sound from the walls of the city. Warning horns from the sound of it. Was the Rod trying to attack the city? So far they'd just sat outside patiently, not letting people in or out without very close scrutiny.

"What is it now?" Lenamare muttered impatiently as he and Zilquar moved to the west window, squinting into the sunset. "Shit."

"What is it?" Jehenna asked, getting up from the other side of the room where she'd been correcting some of Bromagni's work.

"What could possess those morons to show up now?" Lenamare asked himself, ignoring Jehenna for the moment. "I didn't expect them to come after me so soon after resolving the Exador affair. I figured their infernal bureaucracy would slow them down enough that I wouldn't have to deal with them yet."

"Oorstemoth?" Jehenna asked as she walked over to peer out the window. All the students were staring at the wizards expectantly. Lenamare simply nodded. Jenn got a sick feeling in the pit of her stomach. "Well, so they proved a little more resourceful in ignoring those false leads you planted."

"Apparently. Unless Exador managed to point the finger at me after he cleared himself of the charges." Lenamare turned slightly, shaking his head. "This is ridiculous though. An entire Sky Fleet? For one book removed from Oorstemoth without the proper permit. For Krylnar's sake, they haven't even got the first clue in the Abyss what the book is, let alone that it's important. Not even Exador would be so stupid or rash as to let them find that out, and none of those incompetents that retrieved it for me knew enough to tell them anything, even if they could have." Lenamare started pacing in the limited space he had. Jenn thought he seemed unusually distressed.

"Look on the bright side. As I hear it the Rod and Oorstemoth are not on good terms at the moment, maybe the two groups will fight amongst themselves and we won't have to deal with them." Jehenna suggested. Lenamare glanced at her briefly and gave a brief snort.

“Elrose,” Lenamare turned to the sorcerer and enchanter who had arrived this afternoon with his wagon train completely intact. “Trisfelt and his students are stuck outside of the army.” He reached into the pocket of his robe and pulled out his Telemirror. “His Telemirror is linked to mine, contact him and help him get the students inside the city. You’ll probably need to Teleport to them and then bring them back in to the city. Once he’s back, have him come see me as I’ll need his assistance.”

Elrose nodded and took the mirror. “I’ll take care of it now; I’m going to head to my quarters to make the contact so as not to disturb work here.”

Lenamare sighed. “I think it’s a bit late for that thanks to my friends outside; but worth the effort.”

~

"So, your friends from Oorstemoth have arrived I see." Ramses said to Exador as they stood staring out at the fleet of flying ships rapidly approaching the city walls, coming directly out of the sunset. "As always a rather inspiring sight." Ramses said as the golden sailed vessels became large enough in the distance that he could actually see figures moving about on the deck.

"I wouldn't exactly call them friends," Exador commented. "However, they are no longer trying to arrest me for stealing the book from one of their crumbled ruins."

"Rather clever of Lenamare to have let all his agents be captured and then have them magically enchanted to say your name every time they tried to confess his name to the authorities." Exador just scowled at his colleague. "It did slow you down a bit." Exador ignored Ramses.

"At least," Exador finally said, "I may be able to use this to our advantage. To put more pressure on Lenamare. Giving him all the more chances to slip up."

~

"More friends of yours, I take it?" Damien asked Edwyrd and Gastropé. The two just shrugged; neither had any idea what this was about. They were staring at the arriving ships from the city's west wall. They had all been in Damien's rooms discussing Ramses, when messengers had arrived to inform the Councilor that an Oorstemothian Sky Fleet was approaching the city, from out of the sunset.

Damien had immediately teleported them to the Telechamber in the nearest city wall. The Telechambers, Damien had explained as they stepped off the platform were special rooms in the guard towers reserved for council members and city officials to teleport into in case of emergencies. Thus, they were kept clear of people and objects to avoid people teleporting into something accidentally.

Several other Councilors had also arrived and were staring at the approaching ships. "Oh, this is all we need. The Rod at the gates, demons inside and now Oorstemothians above, and archdemons cavorting in the background. Does it get any better?" Councilor Davron asked.

"If you don't stop complaining, it just may." Trevin D'Vils snapped. "Well Damien, you are the resident expert on this mess." She turned to stare at Damien. "Do you have any idea of what they want?"

"Maybe. It could be several things. Perhaps they've found out about the demon infestation and decided it was a threat to their sovereignty. It's really hard to tell what might be irritating them on any given day. "

"Well I can count twenty-one ships," Davron remarked sourly. "It only took thirteen to sink the entire Mierken fleet of eighty normal sailing ships twenty years ago."

The ships had halted their approach and in unison had begun lowering large anchors towards the ground. From the lead ship a deep and commanding voice rang out, apparently magically amplified to carry over the distance. "This is Heron of Treage, Wing Arms Master of the Oorstemothian Fleet, Lord Protectator of Oorstemoth and the Council of Justice, Duly Recognized Agent of High Justice, and Commander of the One-Thousand Four-Hundred and Thirteenth Sky Fleet of Oorstemoth."

"Bermuthian bowl droppings, its Heron himself. This is really bad." Davron muttered loudly.

"I and my fleet present ourselves as the Legal Ambassadorial Representation of Oorstemoth, the duly appointed Commissar of the Hand of Justice and Judicial Committee of Oorstemothian Execution to the city of Freehold and the Councils of Wizardry and Magistrates as set forth in the Treaty of Harmonious Relations between Oorstemoth and The Council States of 1470.

“As such, in pursuit of a Legal and Binding Warrant of Forcible Extradition and Necessary Eradication 31234556 which demands that the following individuals: Edwyrd the Animage, lately of Gizzor Del; Maelen the Seer, known to be of the Free City of Seren; the Wizard Gastropé, late of the Command of the Mage Exador; Jenn Rean, Journeyman of Lenamare’s Academy of Wizardry; Rupert, Novitiate, also of Lenamare’s Academy of Wizardry and all persons seeking to aid aforementioned fugitives be turned over to this commission for the purposes of summary justice. Additionally if present we would demand that the wizard Lenamare present himself to our High Council of Inquiry as required by Oorstemothian Warrant of Inquiry I1432179.

At this point Gandros stepped forward and raised his staff in his right hand before responding. "And I am Gandros, Lord Archimage of the Council of Wizards, Sorcerer Supreme of Norelon, Proctor of Freehold and Bhurgermaster of the City of Freehold. We hear your words, Oorstemoth, and respect your presence. However, due to the large number of applicants seeking our attention on a variety of pressing matters," he gestured towards the Rod's main encampment, "we must respectfully request time to assess your request and determine whether we have in our custody such persons as you seek." Gandros' voice was also amplified to carry his words to the awaiting ships.

After a few moments pause, Heron replied in his booming authoritarian voice. "In recognition of Clause 32:21.56, subsection 42 paragraph 151, line 256, I Heron, duly appointed Oorstemothian Commissar of the Hand of Justice, admit that your request has legal if not necessarily judicial merit and is provided for under the terms of our treaty. Thus you are granted, in compliance with said clause, two days, a total of not more than 40 hours, in which to present any of the aforementioned fugitives currently existent within the environs of your legal domain. We will await such actions at our present location."

Gandros spoke up again. "We acknowledge your compliance with the terms the treaty, and thank you for your patience and understanding." He then turned to look at Damien, carefully avoiding looking at either Gastropé or Edwyrd. Speaking at a conversational level, he said, "Well, Councilor Damien, what do you propose that we do now? These are, after all, your friends they've come asking for."

~

"This is getting out of hand." Councilor Mien, the Archimage of Garandur stated as the members of the council seated themselves in their seats at the main table in the Council Chambers. "First the Rod, now the Oorstemothians. In my day, there weren't so many people foolish enough to lay siege to a town with over ten thousand wizards in it."

"Admittedly, that has always been a significant deterrent in the past." Trevin d'Vils agreed.

"Well, it isn't now! So what are we waiting for? Let's hand them over." Davron snapped in frustration.

"It's not quite so simple." Damien told him.

"Oh really?"

"No, after all, the Rod wants them too. What do you think they'll say when we give them over to the Oorstemothians instead? Also as I've already pointed out, they are already up to their ears in this Lenamare-Exador thing, which is Council business that is yet to be resolved."

"Then I guess we need to stop sitting on our butts and resolve this Exador-Lenamare thing so we can deal with the other matters." Trevin stated.

"What about the demons?" Sier asked.

"We get whoever put them there to get rid of them." Davron stated. "We are the Council of Wizards; we shouldn't have to put up with this kind of nonsense in our own city!"

"And what if it was the arch-demon? Are you going to be the one to order it to remove its forces?" Davron asked sourly.

"Hmmpph. We don't even know if and or what arch-demon is involved." Tureledor grumped.

"Actually, we may, or I may...." Damien said cautiously. He hated to bring this up but he didn't know anyway around it.

"Really?" Trevin asked, all the other councilors staring intently at Damien. "And how do you know this?"

"More importantly, who?" Davron added.

"Well, my new friends, whom the Rod and Oorstemothians want, discovered his presence. Like they did that of the lesser demons in the hall." Damien tried to add another point in favor of Edwyrd and friends. "It is looking like it may be Ramses the Damned."

"Ramses the Damned?" Davron questioned.

"You mean as in the Anilord?" Tureledor asked; Damien simply nodded.

Alexandros Mien added in a thoughtful tone, "Well there were rumors that the long line of Ramses’ were all the same person. That would certainly explain it, if he were a demon. He was certainly evil enough."

Trevin snapped, "Just because a wizard or an animage comes from a long line of people with the same name doesn't mean he or she is all the same person. Look at Exador. There's been an Exador for the gods know how many thousand years. Certainly you're not going to suggest Exador, our fellow Councilor, is a demon?"

"No, not at all." Damien said. "However an individual who was addressed in conversation as Ramses and met all the descriptions of Ramses the Damned was sighted walking in the halls of this building. So either: someone is impersonating Ramses the Damned, the line didn't die out like we believed, or it's the same person. If it's the same person, then he might very well be a demon."

"Or a really old Anilord. You know the sort of things those people were supposed to be able to do." Gandros pointed out, "further, Ramses the Damned was the leader of the Time Warriors. It's also possible that he figured out some way to physically escape forward in time or put himself in some sort of suspended animation."

"Wasn't he in fact slain by Exador's ancestor? The Arch-Vicar General Exador, then leader of the Rod?" Trevin asked. "Perhaps an interesting coincidence that he is seen again in the same place that the current Exador has shown up."

"Are you suggesting he's come back for revenge?" Davron asked.

"Perhaps he's aligned with Lenamare?" Sier interjected.

"Interesting, admittedly, but Lenamare doesn't strike me as the type to want such help." Alexandros stated.

"I doubt it, I think those people of Lenamare's that I've talked to would have known about Ramses before if he was with Lenamare. After all, it was they who spotted Ramses." Damien said.

"Very convenient." Davron replied. Damien looked at him slightly askance.

"Well it is certainly unlikely that he'd be aligned with Exador. Given the family history." Tureledor stated.

"So that leads us back to the independent operator theory, and the question of an arch-demon third party." Gandros summed up.

"So what do we do?" Trevin asked.

"Well for one thing, too many questionable people are entering and leaving this city. Too many powerful people. We should do now what we should have done sooner. Put a lock down on the gates and ward the city so no one can come in or out magically without sufficient effort that would alert us." Gandros stated.

"Won't that be seen as an act of war by those outside?" Sier asked timidly.

"Isn't laying siege to a city an act of war?" Trevin asked acerbically.

"You both have a point, but we'll do it in as nonthreatening manner as possible. I will send messengers that we are putting a containment field around the city so that we can ensure the parties in question don't flee the city unlawfully." Gandros said. "Any other objections?"

They all looked at each other but no one said anything. "Very well, Trevin, I'd like you and Alexandros to gather the relevant people necessary to do the magical side of the job as soon as possible." Trevin nodded at Gandros. "I will instruct the Lord Marshall myself."

"Uhhm," Sier hesitated, "once we do that, won't the demons be trapped inside with us? How will we get rid of them?"

"Good point." Damien agreed.

"Admittedly, however, I am more concerned with new parties coming in than those going out; despite what we shall tell the rest of the world. Nonetheless, Trevin, Alexandros, make the wards more unidirectional in terms of super naturals. Preventative for those coming in and only alerting for those going out non-physically. Once we get rid of the demons we can change things so no one gets in or out." Gandros stated.

"So then, how do we get rid of the demons?" Davron asked.

"I'm working on that. I think we will have to start eliminating them ourselves and just hope that we can do it fast enough to prevent bloodshed." Gandros told them.

"And how do you propose to do that?" Damien asked, interested.

"As I said, I'm still working on it. When I have it worked out, I'll let you know because I'll probably want your help, Damien."

~

"Good evening, Wing Arms Master." Admiral Heron spun in surprise at the voice behind him on the sterncastle deck. Standing on the deck was, apparently, the wizard Exador, whom he'd dealt with briefly on the Exador-Lenamare artifact investigation. "I am afraid I must beg your pardon for not asking prior approval to come aboard. However, the means of transport necessary for arriving here without alerting certain miscreants denied me the ability to do so. I am fully willing to pay any penalty deemed necessary for such an intrusion, after the current matters at hand are resolved."

Heron frowned; he was not at all pleased by such an action. It was a gross violation of protocol and law, even if for an understandable reason. However, if Exador truly was willing to pay the price for such an action later then he could tolerate it for the moment. He hoped he wouldn't regret it. "What brings you to my ship uninvited Exador, assuming for the moment I am willing to allow justice to be postponed on the matter of your approach."

Exador smiled grimly. "Out of my sense of duty and honor for the prosecution of justice, I thought it best to inform you that not only have I ascertained that Lenamare is in this city; the people mentioned in your warrant are also here and I am further aware that he truly does have the artifact he so perniciously stole from the sovereign lands of Oorstemoth."

"You are sure?"

"I have seen him with my own eyes, and seen the book in his hands. So help me on all I hold sacred. I doubt even the Council of Wizards is so fraudulent as to claim other than that Lenamare is present, even if they don't know of the book. However, I may also assure you as to the book's presence and further that it is the same individuals you seek that most recently delivered the book into Lenamare's hands."

Heron's eyes seemed to glow in the dark. "Are you telling me that the vile miscreants who sunk our Constabulary Vessel had the book with them at the time?"

"Indeed they did, and it was fear of exposure to this crime among many more that caused them to behave in the reprehensible manner in which they did."

"The heathen savages. How despicable of them. Their traitorous actions simply compound themselves." Heron was visibly annoyed, not that he hadn't almost expected something of the sort.

"Further, if one were to investigate a little farther, one would find that they are consorting with an entire horde of demons. With which they are holding the city to their sway. One need only ask the Rod members for confirmation of this."

"Really? Demon hordes in the city?" Heron was appalled; this was starting to get unbelievable. "So why are you still there, Exador? I would assume you'd wish to exit to some more pleasant surroundings."

"Admiral, these vile evil doers have vindictively and unjustifiably tarnished my good name and besmirched my honor through their false accusations, of which you are aware. Further, they are threatening the lives of a great number of innocent people within the city. Do you think I could leave, when such a gross violation of the law and common decency was at hand. I seek these people brought to the justice they so richly deserve. I have stayed to see that they get it. Now that you have arrived, I am certain that they will, and I wait to be of assistance to your lawful arrest of these perfidious individuals."

Heron stared at Exador for a moment, trying to decide how much he believed. "Very well, Lord Exador, your valor and steadfast devotion to justice will be noted. I am sure it will be in your favor on the inquisition over your illicit boarding practices. Are you or any of your people capable of watching this vessel from in the castle?"

"Certainly, admiral."

"Very well then, we will be in touch with you via mirrors, I trust your people understand the standard code?"

"I will assign someone who does."

"Very good. If you have no other information to impart, I will be in touch." Heron said, dismissing the wizard. Exador nodded somewhat stern fully and vanished.

~

Edwyrd sat in his bed listening to Rupert’s breath ease into slumber. Even if he did sleep, he probably wouldn’t have been able to, given all the insanity outside the gate and inside the gate. He could, of course, just duck out to the Abyss to escape; however, Gastrope had admitted to him that if he were in the Abyss, Lenamare could summon him again. As long as he was in Astlan, Lenamare would have to know where he was to bind him.

So, basically, as long as he stayed in Astlan and didn’t reveal himself to Lenamare, he was safe. If had to be in this stewpot, he wanted to be his own agent, not a slave to Lenamare with no real choice in his actions. He supposed he could pop back to the Abyss and then hunt for a wizard to let him back in to Astlan; however that didn’t work so well last time, and what about the others? He had promised to help them.

He propped himself up on a couple pillows and grabbed one of the smaller books Maelen had set aside for him. It was fairly dark in the room, just the soft glow from the lights of the city coming in through the open windows; however he could adjust his demon sight so as to easily read the book.

Interestingly enough, it was in cursive English. Or was it? He had to squint a couple times, but realized that it wasn’t actually normal cursive English; but he had no trouble understanding what it meant. He tried reading aloud, it was in the same language he was speaking: Astlanian apparently.





Chapter 76


Hortwell and Lenamare were going over a few additional calculations near the runic gateway when the light from the gate suddenly went out, leaving them with only the torch light in the dungeon room rather than the morning sunlight through the gateway. Simultaneously they looked to the now closed portal.

"It went out." Hortwell stated. "It isn't supposed to do that."

Lenamare was frowning. "Someone must have put up wards around either the palace or the city."

"Exador?" Hortwell asked.

"Possibly, but I doubt he'd be that brazen. It must be the council. Perhaps they are getting an inkling of the number of recent arrivals."

"Or fear more? Or are preparing for attack?" Hortwell added. "Is it bidirectional? Can it be unidirectional even? We couldn’t do that."

"I'm not sure. At the very least, it is incoming, that would make sense, and possibly outgoing or maybe just warning for outgoing. Assuming they’re what I built for them, they are considerably more versatile and tunable than what we had. When I downscaled for the keep, I had to give up a lot of functionality; and while I did make a lot of improvements, we simply didn’t have the staff to do something so customizable.” Lenamare replied.

“Unfortunately, there is no way I can tell without risking alerting whoever controls the wards. Either incoming or outgoing would shut off a Runic Gateway though. The question is how tight is it? I had really hoped to use this gateway as an escape route if things went bad. Any thoughts on reactivating it by punching through the wards in an emergency?"

"Good question. Also given the distance that will make it harder. It might be possible to do some retuning to a closer gateway, like the Rod's. Given their proximity, the power required would be much less, and hence we’d have more energy to break the wards. Of course the Rod is not exactly the best place to escape to." Hortwell told Lenamare.

"True, but at least they have nothing against me, and they are honest. The same can't exactly be said about the Oorstemothians."

"Well to be fair, the Oorstemothians are technically honest, too honest, in their own strange way." Hortwell said.

"Inconveniently honest. They want the book back, even if they don't know what it is. I don't relish facing them directly and having to refuse to return it. That's the sort of bloodshed that will cause them to be an annoyance for a good number of years afterward." Lenamare said sourly.

"Whatever," Lenamare said getting up from his stool. "I know you can't physically retune the gateway with the wards up, and without trying to break them. But if you could at least make the necessary calculations and preparations so we can do it if and when we may need to?" Hortwell nodded, and Lenamare smiled with an answering nod and left the room.

~

“Well, this is going to be inconvenient.” Jehenna harrumphed looking out the window.

“What?” Jenn asked, since she was the only other person in the room, she assumed Jehenna was talking to her. She was assisting Jehenna with grinding materials for yet another attempt at the book in the next day or so.

Jehenna glared at her, apparently for interrupting her not so internal monologue. “The council has set up wards around the entire city. Most likely to keep the Oorstemothians and Rod at bay. Since I’m not a part of the link, I can’t easily tell the settings; but the most common thing would be to lock out all magical and physical ingress to the city. Meaning, it will have cut off our Runic gateway.”

“Where are we going to dump the horse manure? And get more food for the horses?” Was Jenn’s first thought, thinking about the army and all the horses cooped up in the dungeon. Her second was that it was a good thing Trisfelt and the kids had gotten inside without a moment to spare yesterday. Although he hadn’t been at breakfast this morning, which was odd.

Jehenna shook her head in frustration at her. “Who cares?” Jehenna turned away from the window. “That’s the least of our worries.”

Jenn nodded, her eyes suddenly got wide as she realized the other implication. “So no one or thing can get in or out, right?”

“That’s what I just said.” Jehenna glared at her in exasperation.

“So we’re all trapped in here with the hundreds of invisible demons?” Jenn turned a Gatropian shade of pale.

Jehenna looked at her as if she were drunk. “What are you talking about?”

Her tone really annoyed Jenn. “I mean the hundreds of minor demons that line every single corridor of the palace, and which are all hidden by invisibility spells, of course. I assumed you and Master Lenamare were aware of them. The rest of us know about them, and the council is trying to figure out who they belong to.”

Jehenna was rock still staring at Jenn. “How do you know this?” She asked coldly.

Jenn glared back at her. “Even a thaumaturge like myself can see them if I look.” She hadn’t looked but she wanted to stick it to Jehenna. “We: Gastropé, Maelen, Edwyrd and I discovered them and reported them to the council.” She was exaggerating, she hadn’t found any, but she was sick of Jehenna’s know-it-all attitude.

“I thought you were a member of the council? Don’t they inform you of these things?” Jenn asked, as innocently as she could, without gloating, as she watched a series of very bizarre emotions twitch across the woman’s face.

Jenn decided it was a good thing that Jehenna couldn’t breathe fire or Jenn would probably be roasted alive. “Of course, I know about this. I simply find it amazing that a lowly student could be privy to council business!”

Jehenna turned and stormed out of the room. Jenn smiled brightly; this had to be the best conversation she’d ever had with that woman. So, maybe demon hordes are useful, Jenn thought to herself.

~

“So what, or who, are these Oorstemothians?” Edwyrd asked Maelen and Gastropé as they stood atop the outer wall, peering through the wards at the sky fleet. A very impressive fleet, Edwyrd had to admit.

Gastropé shrugged and looked to Maelen. The Seer cleared his throat. “Oorstemoth is a nation-state south-east of here. To come out of the sunset, they must have flown through a western pass, keeping low to the ground to avoid attention. Which would make sense.” Maelen shrugged.

“They are a very prosperous nation that supplies a lot of food to both Norelon and Eton. They are also a huge bureaucracy, and unlike most states have no intrinsic lords, just higher and higher levels of office.”

“They’re also a pain in the ass from what I’ve heard.” Gastropé interjected.

Maelen nodded in agreement. “That is one way of putting it.” The Seer chuckled. “They believe in law and order and procedure to a rather inconceivable extreme.”

“Sounds very sluggish and inefficient. Bureaucracies are a big problem.” Edwyrd noted.

“One would think; they are elsewhere.” Maelen shook his head. “However, they’ve been around for over a thousand years and they pretty much have a rule for everything and so can be ruthlessly efficient when need be.”

“So why are they pursuing us?” Edwyrd asked.

“You don’t know?” Maelen asked, surprised. They shook their heads. “We sunk one of their naval vessels that was trying to arrest Asmeth and his crew. That would have annoyed them a great deal.

“They consider such acts illegal, crimes that must be punished.” Maelen told them.

“Why did they want Asmeth?” Gastrope’ asked.

“And it seemed more like they were trying to sink Asmeth, rather than arrest him.”

“He is, or most likely was, a smuggler and apparently wanted in Oorstemoth. He hired your group to defend his ship from the Oorstemothians.”

“He said we were there to fight pirates.” Gastropé responded in shock.

“If one is a pirate, or in this case a smuggler, a country’s navy, from your perspective, are effectively pirates; I should suppose.” Maelen gave him a thin smile. “And I am sure he’d been tried in absentia and been found guilty; and of course, anyone assisting him would also be guilty.

“And the words summary justice and eradication were used in presenting their warrant, so I’m pretty sure we too have been tried in absentia; and found guilty and sentenced to death.

The two young men shook their heads, trying to understand. “How on earth did they find us so quickly?” Edwyrd asked. Gastropé was looking a new, more nuanced shade of pale, Edwyrd noted.

“They have spies everywhere. I am sure they were boarding Asmeth’s ship and arresting its crew even as we scurried out of town. They may also have spies among the Rod and in Freehold” Maelen explained.

“Isn’t spying sort of an illegal activity?” Gastrope’ asked, “These guys are all law and order you said.”

Maelen shook his head, “Perspective lad, perspective. Spying to preserve the law? For the greater good? Completely legal, if you write the law that way.” Maelen shook his head, “Yes, they are very due process oriented, but if you aren’t an Oorstemothian, then well, anything against foreign threats is fair game.”

~

After what seemed like an interminable period of time, Lord Gandros finally opened his door, allowing Lenamare to storm in, uninvited, Jehenna behind him. Gandros stepped back in surprise. “Master Lenamare, Mistress Jehenna what a surprise; I was just sitting down to lunch.”

Lenamare shook his head in annoyance and Gandros’ protestations. “I’m sorry, but I’ve recently become aware that there seems to have been a change in policy in the Palace and I wanted to discuss it with you.”

“A change in policy? Whatever are you talking about?” Gandros asked.

“All the invisible demons lining the halls? Spying on people?” Jehenna asked sharply.

“Ahh, those.” Gandros said, relaxing a bit and taking a seat in a large overstuff chair. He gestured to the other two to sit down. “I take it from your irritated tone, that they don’t belong to you?”

Lenamare did a double take and looked back to the Archimage as if he were insane. “Me, why would I have hundreds of demons running around the palace. Not even I am egotistical enough to think I could control that many.”

“Hmm,” Gandros nodded and stared off in thought for a bit. “Well, that does narrow the field.”

“Since they aren’t the council’s and you know about them, why weren’t we informed of them?” Jehenna asked. “As Council members, we should be apprised of such situations.”

Gandros arched an eyebrow and simply stared at her for a few moments. “As a Council member, you also have a right and might I say duty, to show up for Council meetings? Other than hearings pertaining to your own situation with Exador, you two, along with Exador, Randolf and Zilquar, have all been absent from recent meetings. One should hope you’d forgive us for not posting public notice about the palace.”

Lenamare made a harrumphing noise, unable to refute the chancellor. “So,” Lenamare said after a moment. “What is the plan to get rid of them?”

“We are still working on that; if you have any suggestions, we are open to them.” Gandros told him. Lenamare went silent and stared at the unused logs in the fireplace, apparently thinking.

Jehenna took the silence to ask Gandros, “How long have they been here?”

Gandros looked a bit sour; “Unfortunately, we don’t know for sure, one should hope not that long, given that no one noticed. Your associates, the ones with the two animages, found them and alerted Damien shortly after their arrival.”

“Hmm, most annoying they chose not to inform us as well.” Jehenna snorted, ignoring, of course, the fact that Jenn had informed her. Gandros shrugged.

“There is a way we could banish them from the city.” Lenamare stated suddenly after several more minutes of uncomfortable silence.

“Yes?” Gandros asked.

“It will require some work, but we could utilize the city wards along with some parasympathetic wards I would create to sort of suck all the demons out of the city, physically.”

“Interesting,” Gandros beamed suddenly excited. “and will it be strong enough to also compel the three archdemons that are wondering around the palace?”

“The what?” Lenamare and Jehenna asked in shocked unison.





Chapter 77


Edwyrd would have loved to have discussed some of what he’d read the night before with Maelen, but he didn’t know how to do that without exposing his charade as an Animage. The stuff he read had been fairly basic; he’d had to skip over some of the more technical things, but it was pretty weird.

But it had informed him of some really weird stuff; apparently there was a second moon that went north to south; hence the whole thing about second tide. He just hadn’t seen it because of the time of the month, or months or whatever. Their calendar was insanely complex; and they tied it out to astrology. Astrology? Everyone knew that was nonsense; but on the other hand; demons, wizards, elves and dwarves were also nonsense; so maybe there was something to astrology here.

The weirdest thing, though, was that the wizards thought of what they did as ‘science.’ Except that it was ‘magic’; they even called it magic; science and magic were two separate things. Everyone knew that. OK, sure, there was that saying that said ‘any sufficiently advanced technology appears to be magic to people of lower technology’ that got used a lot in movies. Now that might be well and good, but everything else he read was all mumbo jumbo about magic. Honest to god, magic.

He wasn’t sure why he was shocked though, he’d seen the magic work; he’d used the magic himself. Edwyrd supposed it was probably just the referring to wizardry as being a science that bothered him. He’d always been taught differently. Or had he? His biology teacher said that science wasn’t a thing, it was a process a methodology. That was why many science teachers talked about ‘the scientific method’ rather than ‘science’ as a thing. Could the scientific method be applied to Animus and Mana? Was that what the wizards were doing?

A lot of the intro material almost read like background info for some sort of roleplaying game, or video game. Of course, to be fair, he was a giant demon running around shooting blasts of fire and lightning bolts, so he supposed this was something like and overly immersive first person shooter.

He needed to stop that line of thought. However wacky, this was real life and real death for a lot of people. He really had killed people, viciously. He couldn’t let himself lose sight of that. He thought back to the soldier he’d popped. Edwyrd shuddered.

There was, however, some interesting stuff. Lots of stuff on links and bindings that helped him sort of get a hold of the astral cord and that link from him to Lenamare. He’d looked at it again. He didn’t want to follow it too far for fear of alerting Lenamare, but it seemed that it led into the abyss and presumably back out again to Lenamare. All very interesting; apparently, one could use these links for all sorts of things, including tracking people. It might be handy to put a link on Rupert so he could find him when he got whacked or disappeared.

~

Jenn sat and took a breather at a table in the cafeteria before she’d have to get up to get her dinner. It had been a long day. She’d pestered both Jehenna and Zilquar about the horses and they’d finally told her to deal with them. They were apparently both absorbed in some new project of Lenamare’s. Zilquar had informed his general that Jehenna would help him deal with the Council and Magistrates to do something about the horses.

Not knowing where else to go, she’d gone to Damien. He’d been a bit surprised, annoyed really, about discovering an army with a cavalry camped in his basement. They’d spent a good part of the day working with Damien, Guard Commander Bergon, along with both Zilquar’s Arms Master, and Captain Markoff from Lenamare’s school trying to integrate the basement army with the city’s own guard. They had to move and stable the horses, arrange for provisions and above-ground boarding for the army. In all, a lot more than she ever imagined doing. Seriously? She thought she’d signed up to be a thaumaturge, not a Combat Mage.

Alvea and Bromagni came in looking almost as worn as she was. The two plopped down at her table, Bromagni plopping his head on the table. “Long day?” Jenn asked.

“The longest.” Bromagni said without moving his head from the table.”

“Jehenna has us running all over the city gathering components. Some really expensive components.” Alvea told her.

“Extremely expensive components?” Jenn asked.

“Remember the stuff we used for the wards back at the school, like that, only much bigger. Apparently, they are working with the council to do something extremely complicated with the wards. Lenamare, Zilquar, Hortwell, Elrose, Jehenna, Gandros, half the council of wizards plus their best masters. Whatever it is, it’s going to be big.”

“We ended up buying over 10,000 crowns worth of materials from various apothecaries, alchemists and metallurgists. It’s one seriously big spell.” Bromagni finally looked up shaking his head. “Gandros, Lenamare, Hortwell, Jehenna, and Trevin were locked in planning all day, and Alexandros Mien was even coming and going for consultation. He’s the most experienced wizard on the council, and so old he has to float himself down the corridors.” Bromagni shook his head in awe of the Elder Archimage.

“I think he’s like 120 or something.” Alvea said shaking her head in agreement. Jenn nodded, everyone knew of his record. One of the brightest mages of the last few generations. No one had seen him do much, other than float around the palace in the last decade, but when he’d been active, he’d been a major force in the world.

“Where were you today?” Alvea suddenly asked. “Normally Jehenna has you stand by to be her whipping girl.”

Jenn grinned, “Someone had to do something about the horses and the army in the basement since we couldn’t get food for them, or remove their manure. I pestered Jehenna and Zilquar so much they put me in charge of bringing the army and the horses above ground. So I spent the day with Councilor Damien, Markoff, and Zilquar’s captain, and the city guard captain. It was an all-day ordeal.”

“So, the rumors are true then,” Bromagni smiled at her, Jenn tilted her head in puzzlement, “you have switched over to doing combat magic!” Jenn hit him on the arm.

~

Wing Arms Master Heron sighed and put his head down on his desk upon his hands. He was getting too old for this. Despite his best intellectual reasoning, and common sense, there were times when he wished diplomacy were illegal.

He’d spent the morning discussing the situation with Arch-Vicar General Barabus and Arch-Diocate Iskerus. This was truly a tricky situation. Apparently, the same malefactors he was charged with dealing with were subject to a prior set of charges from the Church of Tiernon and the Rod. This prior claim arising from actions inside Church property before the vile Asmeth had ever set sail. Abduction, imprisonment, illegal interrogation and mental, if not perhaps physical, torture of the Church’s highest representative in Gizzor Del. Defilement of church property, blasphemy and perversion of religious rites, fleeing Tiernon’s justice among other charges. Heron was not familiar with the exact laws of the Church, but, clearly, these would be capital crimes in any jurisdiction.

Therefore, now, they had to mediate their competing claims of justice and arrive at a mutually satisfactory arrangement. He really did not need this. However, if that were not enough, they informed him on good authority that the entire city of Freehold had been overrun by demons. Freehold had apparently had been invaded by half the Abyss!

Clearly, that complicated the issues. He had sent back to Keeper City a request for the various relevant treatise regarding such invasions. He had no idea of the appropriate legal response: did they have mutual aid agreements? Would the Sky Fleet be required to remove the demonic horde? How would they determine and restore a legitimate government?

This presented a lack of information and thus a completely unusual uncertainty that he was unaccustomed to; however, he could deal with that. A few hours after the Rod delegation had left; a delegation from Freehold arrived, led by the esteemed Alexandros Mien himself.

Alexandros was a man Heron had only met a few times prior, but he was certainly a walking legend even in Oorstemoth. His keen perceptions, understanding of legal principle and his ruthless negotiating style were much admired, and admittedly, feared, in Keeper’s City.

The Archimage had informed him that the Council was aware of the incursion, that the incursion had not in any way actually impeached the council (obviously something to be considered suspect) and that the council had determined a mechanism to purge the city of all demonic influence.

Now this all seemed a bit fanciful to Heron, but this was Alexandros Mien after all. The Archimage had assured him that the only way the Council could properly, honorably, and legally meet the terms of both the Rod and Oorstemoth was to purge the city of all possible malignant influences and judicial pervertors and preventers. This did admittedly make sense to Heron.

Unfortunately, it meant a delay in meeting the agreed-upon delivery of the requested miscreants until due process could occur in Freehold. Delays however, were not completely unexpected, given his meeting with the Rod. That was a resolution that would take some time as well.

The bigger problem however, as the Archimage informed him, is that the Council would be evicting all demons from the city, forcibly, tomorrow. Said forcible eviction from the city, ejecting all the demons onto the proverbial laps of the Rod and the Sky Fleet. They were about to be set upon by a displaced demonic horde.

Fortunately, most were lower level and relatively easy to dispatch with the Rod’s help. The bigger issue was that some of the demonic influences or suspects were likely to be released as well, and would need to be apprehended, interrogated, tried, convicted and eradicated before they could escape.

This, Heron reflected with a misruling grin, might be theoretically possibly to deal with; the problem, however, only got worse. Apparently, both the Rod and the Council had determined that there were at least—AT LEAST—three Archaedemons in the city. He’d been prepared for maybe one; and he’d thought that threat overblown—but three?

It was going to be a very long night. Heron pulled his head up as a knock came at his cabin door signally that the delegation from the Rod had returned to discuss and coordinate activities based on the new intelligence Alexandros had provided. A very long night, sighed Heron.

~

Edwyrd had the day mostly to himself. Rupert and Tizzy had set out to do some more palace exploring. Obviously, that was perfectly safe, what could wrong with a 10 or 12 your old demon egging on an unhinged multi-centenarian demon around a palace full of wizards and invisible enemy demons? Edwyrd didn’t want to think about it, but he didn’t have any better suggestions for them. He did warn both to not cause any trouble, specifically no murder, torture or evisceration of anyone, and if they ran into anything or one important, they should try and get a hold of Edwyrd before proceeding or revealing any information. It was about a ten minute list of instructions. Tizzy obviously tuned out within 30 seconds.

Maelen and Gastropé had gone to town to check out some bookstores. Edwyrd had enough to read from Maelen so sent them on their way. Jenn was running around with Damien messing with horses and soldiers and who knows what. So that left him to his own devices.

He spent a good part of the day in the main palace entry hall sitting on a stone bench along the side wall watching people go in and out. More precisely, he was examining them with full demon sight. He was trying to determine various levels of animus and mana in them and determine if they had any of those links attached to them.

Fortunately, most the people going in and out were wizards so they were almost all heavily mana oriented and many had links and tethers. He had a couple reference books with him to help him figure out what things were.

What was interesting is that there were all sorts of links to all sorts of things. All the wizards that had demons with them, and to be fair there were not that many, had links to their demons similar to the one he had to Lenamare. There were also links between individuals; some between men and women were very light and clear. He wasn’t sure what those were; but the couples that had them were very clearly couples; some of them behaving like stereotypical married couples.

The wizards also had links/tethers to various items they possessed. Not all items, typically amulets and staffs. Some amulets then seemed to have more links radiating off of them to ‘somewhere else’ fading into the background unless he tried hard to trace them. Which he could do, at least until they went through a wall or out of sight.

He spent quite a bit of time looking at mana and animus distributions. Whatever this animus was, it wasn’t quite so clear. He believed it was this golden stuff enmeshed inside the people and their auras. Most of a person’s aura was mana related in some manner; or so he thought, but it wasn’t really clear. Maelen could answer that; except he had no idea how to ask because that was stuff any Animage should already know.

One thing that was clear is that some people ‘glowed’ more than others. These may or may not have been people that were more powerful. In fact, he was thinking they might not be. People whom he could tell by their clothing, demeanor and entourage were higher ranking wizards seemed to keep their mana more tightly concentrated inside themselves.

He spent considerable time thinking about how one could make these links. He’d like to practice. It would be rather convenient to have a link to Rupert to know where he was and if he was in trouble. Edwyrd did have some concerns about the ethical nature of these links, but having one to Rupert, who was supposed to be his son, would seem like a reasonable thing. Maybe Rupert would let him practice on him tonight?

Edwyrd also studied his own body, as much as he could. He was glowing, a lot, and while huge, it was sort of like a big cloud all around him. He supposed, since more experienced people reigned in their mana, he probably should to. It would keep him from sticking out like a sore thumb.

Later in the afternoon, he headed back to his room to get to a quite space so he could practice concentrating his mana. He’d done some meditation for Tae-Kwon-Do, so he thought he’d try that and imagine sort of sucking his mana inside his Edwyrd body, sort of how he sucked the giant Tom body inside. It seemed to Edwyrd, that containing mana would have to be similar to containing a giant demon form that kept wanting to burst out of him like a car’s front-impact airbag.

He had rather lost track of time working on containing his mana, when Tizzy and Rupert returned to the room. “Hey Edwyrd, about ready for dinner?” Rupert asked.

“Sure.” Edwyrd only pretended to eat, but the company would be nice.

“Who we going to eat tonight?” Tizzy asked.

Edwyrd shook his head as Rupert grinned cheek to cheek. “No one, I think you do that just to try and get a response out of me.”

“Still seems to work, a bit.” Tizzy observed. “Should be a quite dinner what with all those wizards scurrying around.”

“Well we are under siege.” Edwyrd told him.

“Yeah, don’t know what they’re up to, but they got teams running around buying up all sorts of crazy stuff in town and heading off to the basement with it.” Tizzy told him.

“Well, good then. I really don’t want to have the Rod, or the Sky Fleet coming in here. So whatever it takes to keep them away, the better.”

“Yeah, don’t like the Rod. Very high and mighty. About the only thing they were ever good for was kicking Ramses off the plane. But even that only lasted a thousand years.”

Edwyrd perked up. “Ramses the Damned? The one Maelen and I have been talking about?” Tizzy shrugged. “A Time Warrior? Dresses in leather straps, wears two swords.”

Tizzy nodded, “Yep, same one. I disliked him then, he was a real pain. Good thing Exador had him killed, for a while at least.” Tizzy seemed to be getting bored and floated out into the hallway. “He built himself a nice place there in the Abyss after that. Funky looking demons and all.”

Edwyrd shook his head. Tizzy was a treasure trove of information, if only there was a way to get it out of him more consistently and on demand rather than as an odd after thought. At least now, Tizzy seemed to have confirmed that the Ramses running around here was the same one with the palace in the Abyss.

Rupert and Edwyrd headed to the cafeteria; Tizzy had drifted off somewhere, again. When they reached the cafeteria, Maelen and Gastropé were there, so after picking up their food, they sat down with them. They both confirmed that wizards from the palace were running all over town looking for various spell components, particularly rare elements and gems. Edwyrd told them of Tizzy’s confirmation of Ramses.

Maelen shook his head. “Do you ever get the feeling it would be a lot easier to just ask Tizzy first?”

They all laughed at that. “About 80% of what comes out of his mouth makes absolutely no sense; the other 20% is pure gold.” Gastropé shook his head. “The trick is…”

“Knowing which is which.” Maelen finished his sentence with a laugh.

~

“Rupert, you’re a wizard.” Edwyrd stated to Rupert later that evening in their room.

“A junior apprentice.” Rupert acknowledged.

“What do you know about links?”

“A bit. The basics I guess.” Rupert replied. “Jenn or Gastropé could tell you a lot more. Jenn’s a thaumaturge and Gastropé does conjuring. Both of those specialties do a lot with links.”

“Yeah, well I’m not about to ask Gastropé. He’d assume I was trying to break my link with Lenamare and kill everyone.” Rupert laughed as Edwyrd grinned. “And Jenn,” Edwyrd continued, “she’d ask more questions about why I wanted to know, then she’d actually answer.” Rupert grinned.

“I guess you’re right.” The boy admitted. “Well, there are all sorts of links, object links, familiar links, wizard links, binding links, and more I don’t know anything about.”

“Well, tell me about those.” Edwyrd asked.

“Well, I can’t really do many, other than maybe a simple object link if I get lucky. An object link is a link applied to an object. You use Magic Writing to engrave some special runes on an object so you can attach a link to it. From then on, you know where the object is, and can follow it, and maybe do more advanced stuff over that link. Again, this is just what I’ve been taught.”

“OK, what’s a familiar link then?” Edwyrd asked.

“It’s a link to a living creature, typically your familiar.” Rupert said.

“Familiar?”

“Yeah, like a black cat, a bird. Wizards use them, specially trained and prepared animals that the wizard links to and he or she, if skilled enough, can use that animal as a second set of eyes, or command it to do things. Typically spying, alerts, or scouting. Birds are very good for that.”

“Can a wizard do that to a person?” Edwyrd asked, somewhat concerned.

“No, humans have too much mana, too much intelligence and willpower. You’d have to really overpower them, and sending that much power through this type of link would break it.” Rupert explained.

The boy got a sudden thoughtful look on his face. “What is it?” Edwyrd asked.

“I suppose, well…I just got to thinking, the way a wizard uses a familiar sort of sounds like demonic possession.” Rupert shook his head. “Maybe that’s what demons do when they possess people?” He looked at Edwyrd curiously.

“Don’t ask me; I’ve never possessed anyone.” Edwyrd shook his head and smiled. “What was that last one you mentioned, a Wizard Link?”

“Yeah, I have no idea how that’s done. But it’s how wizards link up to each other to share mana and cast spells. For example, in demon conjuring or setting up these wards…” Rupert gestured at the glowing ward light outside the palace. “They all link up and share their mana and sort of cast the spell in unison; not sure if there is any telepathy going on or what, but they can share their power.”

“Hmm,” Edwyrd murmured. “That’s interesting.” It certainly explained how a bunch of wizards no single one powerful enough to capture or defeat a demon could combine together and capture and bind one.

“Do you mind if I practice putting a link on you tonight? I won’t try to possess you, I just want to experiment and learn how it’s done. Plus if I can make it stick I can find you next time you pick a fight with a knight in glowing armor.” Edwyrd smiled at the boy.

Rupert laughed. “Yeah, that would be convenient. I could have used some backup.”

Edwyrd and Rupert spent the next several hours practicing trying to make links. Rupert showed him an object link and Edwyrd tried to follow it. It took some doing, the Magic Writing thing the most confusing; but he could see the link was attached to the runes, not the object itself. The link basically had to be linked to either mana or animus apparently. That sort of agreed with what he’d read. Since the link was mana based, generally, it stuck best to animus, but could also stick to mana with some work.

Edwyrd didn’t know anything about wizardry; he’d had luck faking Animagic or maybe demon magic, so he thought he’d stick with that. He tried various things where he tried to hook a bit of the animus cloud around himself into Rupert’s mana and/or animus and then sort of spin it out in a thread.

It didn’t work particularly well; at least not at first, but he eventually got something to sort of work before Rupert pooped out and went to sleep. While Rupert was falling asleep, Edwyrd worked on trying to create threads out of his mana. Once the boy was asleep, he’d try attaching again. Rupert had agreed with that, and Edwyrd had a few more ideas to try.





Chapter 78


Damien answered the knocking on the door; Antefalken was heating his bath water; demons were really good water heaters, Damien reflected. He’d slept like a log after yesterday’s insanity. He hadn’t done that much physical work and labor in a decade; it had worn him out.

At the door was one of Gandros’ pages. “Are you ready?” The page asked surveying Damien in his dressing gown with puzzlement.

“Ready for what?” Damien asked.

The page blinked in surprise. “The purge.” The page answered.

“What is ‘the purge’?” Damien asked, waking up.

“The huge ritual the Council is doing this morning to evict all the demons. You were sent a missive from Gandros. The rest have been working all night getting ready and they sent me to get you when you still hadn’t shown up.”

Damien shook his head. “What rest? The entire council?”

The page shook his head, “No, just the critical ones for the wards and the spell.” Damien just looked at him waiting for more. “Uhm, Alexandros Mien, Gandros, Lenamare and Jehenna are taking the key positions; then the rest of Lenamare’s team, Gandros’ top rune wizards and conjurors; Zilquar, Sier Barvon and his top three wizards, Davron and the two main aides he had here along with Turelador and the ward team.”

Damien ran through his head at who was missing, “So no Exador, Randolf or Trevin?”

“Trevin was invited but declined due to health concerns on her part.”

“Ok, wait here.” Damien said as he rushed to his dressing room. He started changing into his ceremonial robes, bath be damned. “Antefalken…” he hissed at the demon.

Antefalken came out of the bath looking puzzled. Damien gestured him closer and bent down to whisper. “The Council is about to evict all the demons, forcibly. Find our friends and get yourselves out of town fast. I don’t know what they are going to do, but I doubt it will be pleasant given the fire power they’re unleashing.” He gestured for the small demon to get going as fast and stealthily as possible.

~

Edwyrd and Rupert were wandering back from breakfast, taking a scenic walk along an upper open air walkway when Antefalken finally found them. “There you are! I’ve been looking for you for the last hour. Where’s Tizzy?”

Edwyrd and Rupert stopped as the bard came up to them. “Hi, what’s up?” Rupert asked.

“Haven’t seen Tizzy yet this morning.” Edwyrd replied.

“We need to get out of town quickly.” Antefalken stated.

Edwyrd looked at him in puzzlement. “The Council, with Lenamare’s guidance along with Alexandros Mien is doing something to evict all the demons in the city. Forcibly.”

“What do you mean forcibly?” Rupert asked, concerned.

“I don’t know, myself, but I’m thinking sort of like a banishment spell, a repelling spell, you know like the reverse of a binding pentacle that keeps us in.” Antefalken replied.

“So like we’re all going to feel an overwhelming need to flee the city?” Edwyrd said, thinking about the compulsion he’d had to get inside the wards. “What about the wards?”

Antefalken shook his head, “I have no idea, presumably they’ll be tuned to let us out.”

Rupert was lost in thought. “Do you suppose any of them thought to open the windows?” The other two demons looked at him in puzzlement.

~

“Are you ready, Councilor Damien?” Lenamare asked.

“I believe so.” Damien said taking his place and staring at the notes that he’d been given.”

“It’s very short notice, I realize, but we couldn’t locate you that easily yesterday.” Gandros said.

“I was working to integrate Lenamare’s and Zilquar’s forces into the city guard and deal with getting them out of the dungeon.” Damien said.

“Yes, thanks, but this is truly important and we need your power and experience.” Lenamare said, rather tediously. “We are aligning these new parasympathetic pentacles and wards to the main city wards and then aligning them to create a demonic reverse vortex, that will basically suck all the demons, of whatever level, out of the city.”

Damien’s eyes were rapidly scanning the notes. “Insane, absolutely astonishing, I have to admit to being impressed Councilor.” Lenamare smiled coldly, a gleeful pride shining in his eyes. Jehenna grinned as well. “I would never have thought of something like this; and the scope, the sheer power we’ll be channeling…”

“Yes.” Lenamare agreed, positively beaming with the adoration. “Ready?” Damien nodded.

~

“A very nice tea, I must say.” Bess complimented Exador. The three allies were in Exador’s suite enjoying tea, toast and fresh fruit as the morning sun filtered in through the wards onto the balcony and through the wide-open French doors in the suite.

“Hmm. Decent.” Ramses said.

Exador nodded. “I had it imported from the southern hemisphere, very rare down there even.

Bess paused while sipping. “Do you feel an odd thrumming noise?” She asked suddenly.

The other two stopped and listened, there was definitely a thrumming noise, a low-level bass droning that was getting steadily louder, they could even feel slight vibrations in the table.

Ramses looked out the window. “The wards are getting weird.” They all looked out the open doors to the wards over the city walls. The wards were oscillating, as if the entire sphere was rotating, each slice starting to have a different color. Mostly shades of red, but also violet and green. More colors began to appear, as the rotation of the ward sphere seemed to increase.

“What in the Abyss is the council up to?” Exador asked.

“I’ve never seen wards do that before.” Ramses stated.

Bess swallowed hard. “I don’t know about you, but it’s starting to make me nervous.”

Exador and Ramses both did a double take and stared at her. Archdemons didn’t get nervous, and if they did, they didn’t say that. Suddenly there was the sound of glass crashing somewhere outside, but in the palace. A moment later another sound of glass shattering and then screams of anger, rage and frustration started.

Exador got a sick look on his face. “Ok, now I’m feeling nauseous and anxious myself.” Ramses nodded, he was looking a bit paler than usual.

“This is very strange.” Bess said. “It’s been about three thousand years or more, but if I didn’t know better, I’d think I was having a panic attack.”

Ramses growled through gritted teeth. “A panic attack is caused by a rush of neurotransmitters in the brain; it’s a chemical reaction. I seriously doubt your body has the chemicals necessary to induce a panic attack.” He was breathing heavily.

The screams and roars from around the palace were getting louder. There were a few more glass crashing noises. “What the fuck is going on?” Exador looked towards the wards. “Holy shit!”

They all turned to stare, there were demons flying through the air, from the palace towards the wards. As they hit the wards there was a flash of light and then the demons were on the other side of the wards.

“It’s a fucking banishment spell!” Exador raged.

“Fuck, they’re banishing demons from the city.” Ramses raged.

“How the hell are they doing this?” Bess grabbed her head, she was bent over trying not to puke. “It’s effecting us!” She was taking very deep breathes, they all were.

Exador grunted. “I can’t, I can’t fucking understand how this is possible. All my demons, they’re fleeing, every one of them.” He was clasping a large talisman on a jeweled necklace. There was an explosion from somewhere, the sounds of stone and mortar being blasted apart. Apparently, some demons were having trouble getting out. Screams from around the palace were getting louder as more demons were being thwarted from leaving.

“How is it affecting us, all of us, and all of them.” Ramses asked.

“No fu..uh..cking idea!” Exador raced to a closet door and yanked it open. He pulled out a large rug and gestured for them to help him unroll it. “Since, I am sure, none of us wants to shape change into a flying form and we need to maintain our appearances; I suggest we get on this frigging rug and get the hell out of here.”

“Amen…” Bess said tears of pain running down her cheeks as she helped the other two unroll the carpet.

“Fuck.” Ramses shouted. “I really, really don’t fucking like this feeling. You fucking wizards are a royal pain in the ass, Exador.”

Exador laughed, “Not me, my friend, this has got to be the work of one, and only one fucking cocksucker; and by all that’s unholy is he going to pay for it. Oh Lenamare, if you thought you had an enemy before…” Exador laughed over his own gasps of anxiety and pain. Exador barely had enough wits about him at this point to order the carpet up and out of the palace.

~

Glass was exploding around them; demonic screams were coming from all over the palace. “Well, I guess that explains what they are going to do.” Edwyrd said. Antefalken was pure white at this point and Rupert was also looking rather Gastropéish.

“Ahh fuck!” Rupert screamed and dove over the edge of the balcony changing form even as he did so. It was fast and it was furious and he damn near hit the ground before being able to take flight, but then he got up into the air and headed out.

“I’m with him!” Antefalken stated and took off.

Edwyrd shook his head. He felt it, he felt it bad. It wasn’t as bad, yet, as it had been when he’d needed to get into the castle. He hoped Tizzy would get out OK. Yes, it was definitely building. Edwyrd flashed to flame and then to his demon form and took off after the others. The feeling was definitely growing in intensity; he was feeling nauseous at this point.

He turned and flew backwards as best he could, watching as other demons, hundreds of them burst out of windows, a few through walls and headed to the wards and out of the city. There were demons going in every direction, from almost every direction. The vast majority were coming from the palace, but there were quite a few from other parts of the city as well. Were there over a thousand?

Tom headed through the wards. He wasn’t sure what he’d expected, but it wasn’t archers shooting down demons, or trying to. Where they failed, wizards were zapping demons with lightning bolts! It was like a demon massacre! Holy shit! The Sky Fleet and the Rod were acting in tandem to shoot demons down where they would then hack them to pieces on the ground!

This was fucking insane! Those demons hadn’t been doing anything but spying and now they were being butchered? True, they’d most likely just go back to the Abyss, but it would be very painful for them. The vast majority were type I and II demons.

Tom shook his head in dismay and looked for Antefalken and Rupert. He found Antefalken hovering high, dodging arrows, occasionally batting at one with his harp. “Hey.” Tom said as he approached.

“This really sucks.” Antefalken said sourly.

Tom nodded. “Tell me about it. It is starting to piss me off. Have you seen Rupert?”

“Not yet.”

Tom, or rather, Edwyrd had managed to get a link on to Rupert last night, fortunately. He could feel Rupert, alive on the other side. It was just a tad bit confusing, at the moment, to follow it; what with all the demons and arrows an lightning bolts.

Tom scanned trying to find Rupert visually. As he glanced back towards the city, he saw Tizzy come through the wards, sort of drifting aimlessly, staring around at all the commotion. “Tizzy!” Tom shouted.

Tizzy spotted him and flew over. “What’s going on, what’s with the party?” Tizzy asked.

“What do you mean?” Antefalken asked.

Tizzy shrugged, “I was just wandering around this morning and suddenly all these demons start screaming and heading for the wards, like there was some big party going on, and no one had told me.” He shook his head and lit his pipe, which was suddenly in one of hands.

The other two demons looked at him as if he were insane —which technically—he was, “Didn’t you feel the compulsion spell?” Tom asked.

“The anxiety, the fear?” Antefalken asked.

Tizzy blinked and thought for a moment. “Oh, that. I just thought that was a sour stomach. Ate some seriously noxious stuff last night. That and I’m pretty hung over. And, well, I’m just a little twitchy normally so…really didn’t pay it much mind.”

Antefalken shook his head. He turned to Tom and shrugged, “Well, I’ve heard that fear spells and such don’t work very well, or predictably, on the insane. Who knows?”

Tom just shook his head. Tizzy never ceased to astonish, he started to look around for Rupert again when about two thousand feet away a flying carpet with wizards came flying out of the wards. The wizards were rolling around on the carpet looking pretty sick.

“What are they doing? Coming out to observe their handy work?” Tom asked and pointed. Antefalken squinted, telescoping in on the rug.

“The one guy is Exador, Lenamare’s arch enemy.” Antefalken stated.

“Notice the one guy, in the leather straps and the two swords on his back?” Tom asked, Antefalken nodded, “Ramses,” they both stated.

“Who’s the woman?” Tom asked; Antefalken shook his head, not knowing.

Tizzy piped up. “Her name is Bess. I keep trying to get her in the sack, but she plays hard to get.” Tizzy was rubbing his first set of genitals; however not erotically, more like in pain. “Last time she used acid to burn my nuts off; took forever to grow them back.” Tizzy complained.

The other two demons shook their heads. “Well, now we know who the three archdemons are.” Antefalken stated. Tom laughed, not really amused.

“That was one hell of a spell to get rid of Archdemons, Greater Demons and a thousand or more other demons.” Antefalken shook his head. I suppose if one has to have an Accursed Master, there’s no shame in having yours, Tom.”

Tom gave him a sardonic grin. “Gee, thanks!”

Tom suddenly felt a rush of panic, he couldn’t figure out what was causing it until he realized it was coming from his link to Rupert. He quickly arrowed in on it, following it down to Rupert. “Oh shit!” Tom exclaimed.

“What is it?” The other two demons looked at him. “It’s Rupert, the Rod has got him again.” Tom shook his head and took off towards Rupert, the other two following.





Chapter 79


Tom flew towards Rupert as quickly as he could; he used his long-range vision and hearing along with the link to figure out what was happening.

Rupert was on the ground rubbing his right wing where it had apparently been shot; taking him out of the sky and into a circle of Rod members; including the big guy in the glowing armor that must be Talarius.

“So Rupert Demon,” the knight asked. “How many times am I going to have to kill you?” Talarius drew his sword.

Rupert stood up straighter and got into something like a fighting stance. “At least this time I’ll be able to put up a fight.” Rupert answered bravely.

“I don’t think it will be that much of a fight; I’ve taken your measure once before, demon.” Talarius responded very seriously.

“Well then,” Tom’s voice boomed down from above as he came in for a landing between the knight and the boy demon. “How about fighting an adult? Man to man, rather than slaughtering children for sport?”

Talarius stepped back in surprise and shock as the giant twelve-foot tall demon landed. The entire circle of priests stepped back giving them more room, the priests behind the front row getting shoved violently back.

“What lies are you spewing, demon?” Talarius asked Tom.

“First: I thought you were a Holy man, sworn to goodness? You sounded a bit smug and egotistical talking to Rupert. You know what they say: Pride goeth before the fall? Vanity is the root of all evil? And so on.”

Tom could see the knight’s eyes twitch within his helmet; he’d hit a nerve. “Second, Rupert is just a child. I don’t think it’s very honorable for a great and glorious knight to go around killing children for sport, do you?”

“That demon is no child; it’s a demon.” Talarius told Tom sternly, “and removing evil from this world is not a sport; it’s a duty. A solemn duty.”

Tom shook his head in exasperation. “What, you think demons don’t have children? You’ve seen his human form. That’s what he really looks like; that’s who he really is. And you killed him, in your own tent, for no reason other than he’d been flying overhead the night before.”

“Lies, lies! He came with you through a portal to take over the world!” Verigas pushed his way forward to yell at Tom.

Tom shook his head in pity at the priest. “Verigas, you were meddling where you shouldn’t have been. I needed a doorway to get my human charges back to Astlan; you simply provided that gateway. No one harmed you. We even arranged for you to escape; if we meant you harm, you wouldn’t be here now.”

“Liar, all demons lie. You seek to confuse us with your lies!” Verigas shouted.

“You are as crazy as those damn wizards, blinded by your own paranoia and fear. You can’t even see the truth when it’s presented to you because you are too wrapped up in silly superstitions and prejudices.” Tom told him.

“Enough chatter demon!” Talarius shouted; “You simply seek to delay us so that your compatriots can destroy us!”

“Destroy you?” Tom waved his arms around. “We, my compatriots as you call them and I aren’t the ones who were lying in ambush outside the city waiting for us to be driven out against our will where you could begin slaughtering us!” Tom raised his arms above his head in frustration.

“You have seriously got to be kidding me.” Tom continued. “It is you who seek to destroy us; we are simply trying to get out of Freehold thanks to a spell cast by wizards; the only people getting killed are demons! Look around!” He waved his arms more vigorously

“Your words are ever so cunning; Greater Demons are ‘greater’ not just for their size but for their cunning and deceptiveness.”

“Dude,” Tom said, “and I say that in most laid back way I can; you are seriously tripping! I don’t have to be cunning or deceptive; you guys are falling all over yourselves with your own paranoia and self-deceptions.”

“Why do you prevaricate? Let’s have this out.” Talarius commanded, rather than asked.

Tom sighed. “So you want to fight me?” The knight tilted his head in agreement. “Very well, here’s the deal. We fight just you and me, no one else; if you win, you guys get to continue on with what you were doing before I arrived. If I win, you and the Rod stop attacking the demons and let them go their own way in peace. Agreed?”

Talarius’ eyes narrowed in calculation for a moment and then he finally nodded and said “Agreed.”

Tom nodded and gestured for everyone to step back. The priests surrounding them did, as did the three demons behind him, Rupert, Tizzy and Antefalken. Tom looked around the circle using his demon sight. He wasn’t sure if he trusted these guys, but they were supposed to be goody-two-shoes, so they should keep their word.

Hmm, Tom had to blink; there were tons of links here. Links of a style he hadn’t seen before. It seemed like every person here, all the Rod members had one or more links to people dressed like priests and these priests had links to fancier dressed priests. The fanciest dressed priests seemed to collect all the links from the lower priests and then had massive cords sort of going up to the sky and fading out as they left the plane. How very weird. He could see that the giant cords to the sky seemed to be carrying mana; actually, there seemed to be two lanes, one going up one going down.

Was this like a wizard link that Rupert had described where wizards could share mana? But if so, who were they sharing mana with? Someone off plane apparently? Gods? Angels? Holy shit! That put a completely new spin on reality! Oh fuck! Were these gods real? Priests did cast spells; everyone said they did; were they really miracles?

Slam! Slice! “Agghhh” Tom roared as Talarius’ sword ripped in to his side. He’d gotten lost in thought staring at the priests and the knight had attacked. That wasn’t very sporting! Tom looked down at his side where there was a huge gash and blood oozing out. He shook his head and flashed to flame and then reformed without the wound. He heard a few gasps from the crowd.

He turned his attention back to the knight just as his sword came cleaving towards him. Tom blocked it with his hand. Shit! He should have used his nails, that magic sword could cut him almost as well as a normal sword could cut human flesh. He flashed his hand and reformed it.

The knight was winding up for another huge slash so Tom quickly spun and gave the knight a standing back kick in the gut as hard as he could. Crap! That hurt! It hurt worse than kicking the dragon or any other demon.

However, no matter how much it had hurt him, it had also knocked Talarius back and on his ass. He should have gone back a lot further than that, but Tom would take what he could get. The knight jumped back up like a gymnast; almost as if he wasn’t covered head to toe in heavy metal.

The knight advanced, this time with shield ready to deflect a kick. Tom took a different fighting stance from his Tae-Kwon-Doe. The knight’s left side was protected by the shield while the right hand had the sword. As the knight moved in raising his arm as he charged to slash, Tom moved to the knight’s right side quickly and did a whirling back kick to the knights’ right flank, kiya-ing loudly and with all the force he could muster.

Talarius went flying forward and to the left, off balance, taken by surprise. His sword coincidentally slashed Tom’s forearm, which hurt, but Tom flashed it back whole quickly. The knight regained his balance quickly; Tom could detect that he was breathing harder.

The knight moved in again, Tom whirled again, only to have the knight slide down low under his legs, twisting somehow and bring his very pointy spiked boot right up into Tom’s balls. What the fuck! Tom howled in agony! His tail, of its own accord slashed down like a razor raking with a nasty shriek across the knight’s armor.

As the razor sharp spade squealed across the armor, lightning coruscated over the surface of the armor, released from Tom’s tail spade. Tom completed his action pulling away from the knight and crouching, protecting his balls. In doing so, his tail had to leave the knight; and the electricity stopped.

“That was rather a low blow, knight!” Tom growled at Talarius.

“It pays to protect the family jewels, fiend!” Talarius glared back at him. Tom noticed that despite the loud noise, there wasn’t much of a mark on Talarius’ armor where his tail had tried to slice.

The knight moved in for another slice; Tom blocked with his arm and tried a forward kick. The blade slammed tight into his forearm lodging in the bone. Fuck! Did that ever hurt! His kick just bounced off the shield. This was going to be tricky; he didn’t want to roast the knight with fire, but he wasn’t sure he could beat him physically without a lot of pain.

He flashed to fire, releasing the sword and started a new spinning back kick between sword and shield while in fire mode and then solidified as his foot slid through the opening. Wham! The knight went flying backwards, shield and sword spreading wide. Tom seized the moment, scrambling as best he could, and using his wings he pounced on the knight with hard open hand punch to the solar plexus, expecting his claws to gouge through the armor.

Again, that huge screeching noise as his claws slid and scraped along the armor! What the fuck! Tom thought? Those nails could carve solid stone! The knight was struggling to curl together and evict Tom. Tom, who’s left hand was back, brought it forward in an open hand thrust at the shoulder joint of the knight; a region only protected by chain mail.

This time his struck home, hard. His nails didn’t quite pierce the chainmail, but the blunt force caused a cracking noise and a screech from Talarius. Tom’s joy was short lived as suddenly he felt excruciating pain in his right wing! Tom twisted back; the knight had slashed the end of his wing off! Tom yelled in anger and flashed to flame, not bothering to protect Talarius from the fire.

However, in the few seconds that it took to do that, Talarius dove through his flame form and regained his feet. Solid again, Tom started to rise only to feel a searing pain in his tail! The son of a bitch had chopped it off! It fell flat on the ground twitching. Tom flashed to flame again and then back.

He noticed that the priests around them were all chanting and there was a sort of glowing circle around the area of combat. He hoped it was some sort of ward to protect the audience, but he wasn’t going to bet on it.

As he refocused on the knight, he saw the man remove his right hand from his left shoulder; there was a yellow glow around the shoulder joint as his hand pulled away. The knight flexed his shoulder good as new. Tom laughed to himself, a healing spell. Well since he could heal himself with flame, he supposed it was only fair.

~

Exador, Ramses and Bess sat on their carpet watching the battle below, while eating the remainder of their breakfast, which Exador had been able to summon once they were outside the wards. Apparently, the Council was allowing a few other things out of the city at the moment, aside from demons.

“Hmm, a very interesting match.” Ramses observed. “The Type IV has a very interesting style of hand to hand combat; not sure how proficient he is in it—it looks rather sloppy, but the novelty of it will put the knight off guard.”

“Perhaps, but this knight is powerful. That armor of his is very nasty.” Bess said.

Exador tilted his head back and forth; “Tiernon is definitely with him on this. He has a ‘grace’ I could never quite acquire. He may have more than Sir Astemon.”

“How did you ever become Vicar General of the Rod Tiernon?” Ramses asked him. “You are and were then a freaking demon. Tiernon does not like demons.”

Exador smiled. “Subterfuge, undercover work. I’ve worked very hard on the Exador line. Presenting a child that people see grow up, a man that runs the place and eventually an old man who dies. Lots of mana and animus hiding as well. Deep undercover.”

“Plus some serious mental discipline not to reveal yourself in prayers and rituals. You’d think Tiernon’s higher priests and even Avatars might have noticed.” Bess commented.

“Lots and lots of practice. Generations of it, so to speak.” Exador smiled. “In some ways, my crowning achievement.”

“You say Talarius may have more grace than Astemon? He certainly had enough grace to kill me.” Ramses asked. “I’d say that doesn’t give very good odds for the IV down there.”

Exador laughed. “And eventually, I killed Astemon. There are many factors that go into these things aside from how much Tiernon likes a person. I didn’t have as much grace, but I also had a lot of other tricks up my sleeve that I could substitute for grace to get the job done.” Exador chuckled.

“You cheated.” Bess stated, amused.

Exador grinned. “Isn’t that what we do?”

~

“Wing Arms Master?” Heron turned from inspecting the desolation of the oncoming demon horde, to find young Traeflon, his personal sorcerer beside him. “You might want to observe this.” He held up a crystal ball.

Heron looked down and his eyes widened. Talarius was battling a Greater Demon hand to hand! This was definitely something to watch. “You’re recording this in the ball, yes?”

Traeflon nodded, “Since the beginning, I’ve been monitoring their camp as a precaution.” Heron nodded in approval.

“We are going to want to capture all of this. This is something you don’t see very often. We may have our differences with the Rod; but they really know how to handle Evil with a capital “E.”

~

The knight got back into fighting position as did Tom. This was going to be a long fight, Tom feared. The knight thrust forward suddenly, Tom, having sensed a slight motion in that direction, was prepared and side stepped, grabbing the knight’s sword arm with both hands and lifting. The knight was over six feet tall, but Tom was nearly twelve, so it was like fighting a child in some ways. He lifted with all the strength in his arms and legs, bringing the knight up and over his own shoulder, spinning and then slamming the knight as hard as he could into the ground.

The knight had managed to slash up Tom’s side pretty good with his sword during this, and his shield had banged painfully against his head, but he was willing to bet that the knight was hurt more than he was.

The knight was on the ground, and Tom really felt like stomping on him with a hoof, but that didn’t seem sporting, so he stood back and let the knight recover. The knight slowly climbed to his feet chanting something Tom couldn’t quite make out. Golden light washed over the knight and his armor seemed to glow more brightly and the knight stood straighter.

The knight tilted his head forward, glaring at Tom in anger. He shouted something in some strange language and charged point first. The guy was losing it. Tom stepped aside to repeat his last maneuver, when suddenly the knight stopped, spun and seemed to shimmer as his blade whisked around seeming to turn to pure light and extending beyond it’s normal reach to slice through Tom’s thighs! Both of them! Fuck that hurt!

Tom screamed as he crashed to the ground, taken so by surprise that his wings weren’t able to catch him before he fell. That had hurt--unimaginably so. Tom was pissed, no more mister nice guy. He assumed the form of flame.

He swatted hard with his flaming hand at the knight who ducked, but was still grazed by the fire. He didn’t seem to mind as much as Tom had hoped. Tom assumed his fist punching form and began fist punching the air, pointing at Talarius. Kiyaing each time and releasing blasts of fire at the Knight.

The knight deflected the blasts with his shield. Tom rose in the air and fired straight down; the knight kept deflecting them. Tom wasn’t sure where’d the deflected bolts were going, it appeared into the crowd. He hoped they could protect themselves.

This wasn’t working. Tom came down to hover near the knight. The knight slashed at Tom. Tom didn’t move expecting the sword to just pass right through him. It did, but holy shit did it hurt! Tom roared in surprised pain.

Tom settled back to the ground and decided to go full bore. He launched a solid flame attack at the knight, just like against the ship. To his immense surprise, instead of raising his shield to defend the knight brought his sword forward; the shield hanging unused on his left forearm, and clasped it with both hands.

Tom’s flames were being parted by the sword; parted and swept aside like the water before the bow of a ship. Again, Tom hoped the crowd was protected. The knight simply stood there, taking it. Tom shook his head and concentrated on trying to recall the blue white cold fire he’d used to finish off the Oorstemothian ship. He wasn’t exactly sure how he’d done that; but he focused on trying to re-achieve that.

There it went; it was actually a cold and electrical fire. Now that he was more in control he could tell what it was. The knight shuddered under the new assault and began mouthing something Tom couldn’t hear. The cold fire began to close in on the knight. Which was good because Tom was getting exhausted.

He glanced down at his body to see if his flame body was blue-cold-electrical fire, or regular fire. It was turning blue-cold-electrical, but he noticed something far more concerning. That ring that the priests had put up, the glowing thing, it was seeping mana from him!

He could see a slow, small but steady stream of his mana flowing off him and across the ground to the ring! The bastards were trying to drain him! The knight was cheating! This really pissed Tom off, and he began shooting traditional lightning bolts from his tail at the knight. He had to end this.

“Aggh!” Tom exclaimed. Something was stinging him, a whole lot of some things. They were arrows being fired by the Rod at him. What the fuck! He was having trouble maintaining his concentration on the fire and what was hitting him. Hitting him in his fire form!

He looked closely at one. It was a small hollow arrow! The arrows were entering his insubstantial body and sort of exploding and then falling to the ground empty. Apparently, there was some sort of magic payload in those arrows. It fucking hurt and there were a lot of them.

~

“Hmm,” Bess casually observed while watching the fight. “Apparently we aren’t the only ones who cheat.”

“Apparently, things have changed a bit in terms of protocol over the last millennia.” Ramses noted, sucking on a lemon.

“Well, I would have expected the Holy Blessed Wards that they put up. It’s a standard blessing they like to use for combat, and it’s great for sapping the resources of mana rich enemies. Demons, vampires and the typical undead, the fey as well. But those arrows the archers are shooting; in my day, they wouldn’t have done that.” Exador shook his head sadly.

“Yet, he’s put up a great fight; I’ll give him that.” Bess observed. “Really a pretty decent Type IV; I don’t know of too many that could have done a lot better under the circumstances. That armor is insane, the knight’s grace is ridiculous and he’s got a huge portion of the Rod helping him with prayers etc. They’re feeding him mana, draining his enemy and now shooting at the guy.”

Ramses shook his head. “I’d have had to use every Temporamastery trick in the book and I’d be limited to the joints and the opening in the face plate given that armor. It would have been tricky, but I would have got him. Add in the other stuff, I’d have to break out the heavy duty archdemon tricks to do better. Which, I might note, I did not do against Sir Astemon. We don’t all cheat—well, not every time.”

“Yes, the knight has some serious advantages that I can see, but clearly any of us could have overcome those. However, I do think it clear that very few Type IV’s could have done much better.” Exador stated. “At this point it’s just a matter of time.”

Bess chuckled, “So, do you still believe Lenamare’s story about this being a fresh recruit?” The others laughed.

“No, this demon has been around several hundred years at least, possibly a thousand.” Exador shook his head laughing to himself, and the others about Lenamare’s bullshit.

~

Tom’s flames were starting to sputter a bit. It was just getting too distracting, too painful and he couldn’t keep the intensity level up, he was getting worn out. His mana level was visibly low when he looked at himself. He couldn’t keep this up. He made a decision.

He turned the flame blast off, leapt over the knight, spinning as he descended and materialized, quickly grabbing the knight’s legs and jerking them out from underneath him. He pulled on the knight’s legs and stood up. Lifting the knight by his legs, he picked him up like a doll and then smashed him face first into the ground as hard as he could. While the knight was down, Tom pulled the knight’s legs apart and kicked him as hard as he could in the balls.

He picked the knight up and smashed him again into the ground as hard as he could; the knight twisting feverishly in his grasp. The squirming made it hard to hold him, but Tom held on; no more mister nice guy. He smashed the knight into the ground again.

He drove the edge of his hoof has hard as he could in between the man’s thigh plates and calf plates until he heard a crunch of broken knee. Tom pulled back, twisting, lifting the knight and bringing him up and over his own shoulders and head and then smashing the knight down on his back.

The arrows had stopped after he’d moved to the other side of the knight and materialized, now they resumed and they still hurt. Several other priests had started chanting loudly. As he was picking the knight up for another smashing, a dark mist grew around the two of them and the knight’s armor glowed white hot and suddenly Tom felt a billion tiny pin pricks digging in to him. Blood started oozing from his pores, even as the exploding arrows left weird burn marks on his flesh.

He was getting exhausted. Shit, his hands were slippery. He lost hold of the knight who scrambled free and in so doing managed to bring the sword, which he’d never dropped, around and lopped off Tom’s foot at his ankle.

Tom teetered trying to right himself with his wings, but he was getting tired. A priest had hurried to Talarius’ side and was doing something. Tom started to fly over there, but a yellow glowing mist, different from before was slowing him down.

The knight climbed to his feet and slashed at Tom’s other leg, he got it at knee level. It hurt like hell, but by this point Tom was feeling punch drunk. His eyes were getting blurry. He had to switch to full demon vision to see.

“Prepare for the final rites.” Tom heard the knight say. “Have you got the others secured?” Tom was confused. He felt a searing pain as the knight lopped off his left arm. He was still flying barely. He glanced over at the other demons and saw a glowing net of mana surrounding them. Fuck, they’d trapped them.

“This will be the final death for all of them.” Tom heard one of the priests say. Final death. He’d heard something about this. Boggy had said demons could be permanently slain, given enough time and effort. Was that their plan?

He was so tired. Slash went one of his wings, he fell to the ground. As he rolled on the ground he saw one of those giant umbilical cords to the sky. All that mana, he needed it. It suddenly felt like he was dying of thirst. If he could link on to one of those umbilical cords, he could get mana and recharge. Tom reached out with everything he had and tried to grab it. It was too slippery, it evaded him. He could barely sort of hold onto it with his mental hands but he couldn’t poke a whole into it and insert a mana string from himself. He needed a fucking needle.

He was desperate, this was entirely his fault, he should have just let the knight send Rupert back to the Abyss and left well enough alone, now it was the final death for them all. Vaguely he noticed struggling over where the other demons were. This was distracting lots of the priests. Oddly, Talarius hadn’t been doing much. He glanced at the knight who was being healed by the priests. Those fuckers had really cheated.

His eyes fell on one of the hollow arrows beside him. He stared at it for a second, a fucking needle. A needle blessed by the fucking god whose mana he wanted.

~

“Did he say final death?” Bess asked.

“That’s what it sounded like.” Ramses stated.

“These folks are definitely feeling rather pissed.” Exador stated.

“Do you suppose we should intervene?” Bess asked.

“Why?” Ramses asked.

“Just sort of seems like the right thing to do; after all this is Good vs. Evil, all us demons are Evil, and the Rod is Good; shouldn’t we help out our fellow Evil? If only to defeat Good?”

“Hmm, you make a compelling point.” Ramses pondered.

“Yeah but that would mean blowing what little remains of our cover, exposing ourselves and jeopardizing our plan to get our hands on the book.” Exador responded.

“Better point.” Ramses noted.

Bess was nodding her head. “You, of course, are correct.”

“So why,” Ramses asked. “Isn’t the Type IV leaving? He should have enough mana left to fade to the Abyss. The little ones over there,” he pointed to the other three demons, “may not be able to do so on their own.”

“Particularly inside that weird net thing.” Bess observed.

“But the big guy?” Ramses asked.

“Quiet, something is happening.” Exador commanded.

They looked down on the field.

“So demon.” Talarius was standing over the greater demon who had been flailing around on the ground with no feet, only one wing and one arm. That arm had been flailing around a bit as if trying to throw something at the priests but not much had happened. “You are defeated, and now you and your immediate compatriots will face the true death.”

“You cheated.” The demon croaked.

Bess and Ramses chuckled. Exador shook his head thinking about how times had changed the Rod; then he smiled, obviously, he must have had some influence on the development of the Rod’s ethics.

“There is no such thing as cheating when fighting Evil.” The knight took his helmet off. He almost looked sad as he stared down at the demon.

“So you say. I disagree.” The greater demon said. The demon was smoldering a bit now. The demon let out a loud sigh and suddenly there was nothing but glowing ashes on the ground.

“Finally,” Bess stated. “The suspense was getting to me; I couldn’t figure out why he wouldn’t leave.” Exador chuckled and Ramses grinned. They turned back to the drama.

“Curses!” The knight yelled. “He fled back to the Abyss!” He turned back to the group of priests that were not trying to contain the other demons. “How are the preparations going?”

“Are you sure you want to do this?” A man who appeared to be a general asked. “This is the sort of stuff that can have unintended repercussions.”

The knight sighed, “I understand Barabus, but these are clearly the root of the problem we and the Sky Fleet have pursued and we need to deal with them once and for all.”

“Do you not want to question them?” Barabus asked.

“What good is questioning demons?” Talarius asked. “We’ll get better results from their human henchmen.” Barabus was nodding as a senior priest nearby suddenly threw up.

“Are you OK?” Barabus asked. The man was seriously pale and shaking his head no, he was gasping and too weak to speak. Another high priest suddenly turned pale and fell on the ground vomiting. Then another, and then a fourth high priest.

“What the hell is going on?” Talarius was looking around. “Verigas? What’s wrong?”

The high priest named Verigas was very rigid and saying nothing, it was like he was locked in some sort of internal struggle.

“Oh, this is a strange turn.” Bess stated. “I’m really glad we didn’t tune out. I’m thinking this is even more interesting than our spat with Lenamare.”

Exador glared at her, aside from distracting him from the spectacle below, she was taking her eye off the real prize, the book.

Ramses just chuckled.

“I wish I had some popcorn!” Bess told the others.

The high priest Verigas seemed to wake from his trance and turned to face Talarius.

“Well, knight, you said that in the battle with Evil, there is no such thing as cheating.”

Talarius looked at the priest strangely, clearing sensing something was not right. “So, I’ve decided to pull out all the stops.” The priest said.

“Verigas, what the hell are you talking about?” Barabus asked the high priest.

Verigas smiled a rather wicked looking smile. “What makes you think I’m Verigas? Where are your paranoid conspiracy theories now when you need them? You’ve really pissed me off, Talarius: you cheated; you have no honor, no integrity.”

“Oh shit.” Talarius stated, the blood draining from his face.

Suddenly the embers where the greater demon had fallen burst into flame. A whirlwind of embers and smoke rose into the air over the site of the fallen demon. Suddenly the smoke and embers joined into flame, growing and growing. The knight and priests stared as the flames grew and melded into a humanoid form, a large humanoid form.

The high priest Verigas let out a shriek and fell to the ground, collapsing in a heap like a discarded marionette. No one moved to attend him.

The flames grew to twelve feet tall and then solidified in the form of the demon they had just defeated.

“I’m afraid you won’t get rid of me that easy, Talarius.” The demon grinned.

“Oh, goody, round two!” Bess shouted with joy.

~

Tom smiled at the shocked knight and the priests who were still unaware of what was going on amongst their ranks. He wanted to enjoy their shock while he rebuilt his mana supply and solidified his hold on the Rod members he was infiltrating. He was busy gulping in as much mana from the umbilical cords as he could.

The trick had been the Holy Arrows. They had provided the needles to the umbilical cords. He’d managed to object link them to himself and then somehow, lift them, telekinetically or something to the mana cords and pierce them.

Once inside he’d managed to send his mana, guided by some animus, he guessed, downward into the priests below; he’d had no desire to go the other direction. He had forced himself to spread quickly through the links to the people below the priest; and was still doing that, letting himself flow among them.

He’d then proceeded on to other high priests and their umbilical cords to heaven. He’d gotten five of them, including Verigas. He worked to secure his connections to the high priests and their lower priest as fast as he could. Once he felt tethered, that’s when he felt confident enough to start diverting the mana for himself. The process seemed to take forever, but in reality must have only been a few minutes.

It was when he turned on the mana flow, started sucking it in for himself that the high priests had started dropping. It probably didn’t feel too good, Tom had laughed to himself. Verigas was the last high priest he’d tapped and he’d suddenly remembered his discussion with Rupert about possession. He had been, and still was, pouring parts of himself into everyone in the chain; creating personal links to them; he decided to put a lot more into Verigas.

It had been a struggle, but he’d managed to somehow seize control of Verigas by pouring his essence into the priest and suppressing the priest’s consciousness. It was very weird, and very taxing, but he now had a huge mana stream to draw on, which helped considerably.

Unfortunately, there wasn’t really enough of him to go around to both possess Verigas and inhabit his own body; so he’d had to release Verigas from his control to inhabit his own form; he kept the mana tap of course.

“So, you’re back?” Talarius stated, putting his helmet back on.

“Yes, I am, and you cheated.” Tom shook his head. “Seems to me that violates the Knight’s Code of Ethics?” The knight winced slightly this time.

The knight sighed, “As I’ve said, there can be no mercy in fighting Evil.”

“I suppose then, it’s a matter of how, or who, you define as Evil.” Tom stated. “Personally, I’m getting tired of being called Evil, when there are plenty of other people around behaving far more dishonorably and despicably than me.”

The knight got a steely look in his eyes. “Enough of your prevarication, demon. I’ve slain you once; I’ll do it again.”

“Not if I cheat first.” Tom said softly, but still loud enough for the knight to hear. “Fire!” Tom commanded. In his mind, he projected an image of Talarius as a god forsaken evil that had to be destroyed. They had to destroy him.

Suddenly large numbers of archers among the Rod raised their bows and began raining arrows upon Talarius. Some were the same hollow arrows from before, and others were more traditional.

Tom had hoped mostly for shock and distraction, what he hadn’t counted on was that the Blessed Arrows of the Rod couldn’t be stopped by the Blessed Armor of Talarius; to all intents and purposes, the two sets of blessings canceled each other out.

Talarius fell to his knees, crouching and covering himself with his shield as best he could, trying to minimize the exposed parts of his body. While he did this, Tom flew over to the net and quickly ripped it to shreds. “Get ready to move on my mark; there will be a few more surprises I have planned.” Tom was going to try to give the knight one more chance; if the knight didn’t take it, it would be time for plan B.

Tom returned to his position by the knight; by this point, the Rod members not under his command were subduing those he was commanding. Tom didn’t care, as long as they kept each other busy, he sent feelings of fear, anger and rage through his links encouraging his people to defend themselves and fight back. He came up behind the knight as he started coming out of his crouch, grabbed him by the legs and began thrashing him over again; this time watching out for any priests that tried to help the knight.

He smashed the knight into the ground about a dozen times, kicking him as hard as he could between slammings. Periodically he would stop and do a jab with his claws between the joints to try and do damage, and then he’d smash the knight a few more times. The armor held up amazingly well, but Tom was betting the knight inside was taking a serious beating.

Finally, after Tom had lost track of smashings, the knight cried out, “Enough! Stop, please.” Tom stopped.

The knight crawled to his knees then tossed his sword and shield away. He took his helmet off and put it under his arm. “I surrender, you have defeated me, demon!” Talarius shouted. It certainly looked like he had, the knight was black and blue all over his head; he had blood running out his nose, several cracked teeth and various head injuries.

“Kill me now, and be done with, oh vile demon! Know that you have beaten Talarius.” The knight sobbed, tears running down his cheeks. Tom was moved, somewhat.

Tom relaxed and allowed himself to shift to human form. He didn’t shift to Edwyrd; he wasn’t that stupid; but rather he shifted to a young man a few years older than himself; someone who looked vaguely like his friend Paul, but a bit more fit, and a bit older. With all the mana he had to draw on, it was surprisingly easy.

Naturally, he was naked. “I don’t want to kill you, Talarius.” He walked over to the knight who was on his knees.

“I do not hate you, nor do I wish to destroy you. I only want to protect my friends and my people.” Tom said staring down, slightly at the knight. His current form was about the same height as Talarius standing, so the knight’s head was at his chest. “I’m not different, nor are they,” he waved to Rupert, Tizzy and Antefalken, “than any other man. All we want is to live our lives, the same as you.”

The knight looked at him suspiciously, and skeptically.

“Killing you would only perpetuate this stupidity. It needs to end. This whole Astlan Demon thing needs to end; we have to start somewhere. Why not here?”

The knight shook his head. “I don’t know. You make no sense demon.”

“Talarius, you don’t have to change your opinion now. I don’t expect that. I am going to simply spare your life today so that you might, possibly, start to think that not everything you’ve grown up believing is true.”

“OK?” Tom asked.

The knight hung his head, “OK,” he whispered.

Tom smiled and put his hand down on the knight’s shoulder.

A searing pain lanced through his stomach, far worse than anything other than his first formation had. Talarius shouted in triumph as Tom bent over in agony.

“The Holy Dagger of Tiernon!” Talarius raised his arm showing off a dagger on a switchblade mechanism on his forearm. “It is instant, permanent death for Evil!”

Tom was in pain; he had been expecting this; OK, maybe nothing quite this nasty. The blade was gone, but the wound was there. He tried to flash to fire but something was preventing him, some poison or magic from the blade.

Tom tried hard to flash to flame, he poured in mana from his linked priests and Rod members; but it wasn’t enough. He was seriously bleeding. Blood and animus were flowing out. He had to staunch this. He needed more power.

No choice; he’d been careful to only pull mana from downstream the umbilical cord. He’d have to go upstream. He groaned as he felt the upstream mana start to flow his way. Holy shit! Literally, this was different; this was like highly processed, refined mana or something. He had five streams of it and he poured it into his wound.

The heavenly mana suddenly interacted with the wound…holy crap! He was healing! The divine mana was from Tiernon, exactly like the magic on the blade and was curing it. He stood up smiling. Staring at the bright white glow between his fingers.

“Talarius?” Tom said smiling. The knight turned from receiving his cheers. The knight’s face went cold as he saw the golden light at Tom’s midsection. Tom pulled his hands back to reveal the wound glowing with brilliant white light and closing.

“Do you recognize the aura of that light? What magic it is that heals me?” The knight was staring at Tom’s midsection in shock. Tom turned to face Barabus and the fancy priest beside him. They turned completely pale with shock. Tom rotated to face the still shocked Knight.

He reached out and snapped the dagger from the knight’s wrist. The knight just jerked in response, too shocked to react. Tom stared at the dagger, it was engorged, and literally swelling with whatever it was that had been his wound. He directed the same healing mana at dagger, concentrating on shoving it in and through as hard as he could. Cleansing, wiping, eradicating and healing the evil, the disease that was in that dagger. He willed healing and health and purity into the knife, channeling the god mana as fast and as furiously as he could until he could sense no more darkness.

The blade was glowing with a pale white light, previously black, it was now a bright silver. He tossed it over towards the feet of the general. Talarius was now staring at his knife in just as much shock. Tom looked at the knight again.

“One question, Talarius, when I was blasting you with fire, you deflected that with your sword; but wasn’t the air super-hot? How did you stand that?”

The knight was still in shock, not even thinking he just mumbled, “The armor, keeps me safe in any environment.”

“Good, that’s what I had hoped.” He looked over to his demon friends. “Tizzy, Rupert, Antefalken get ready to play catch.” He gestured to the ground at Talarius’ feet. The other demons nodded; Tom couldn’t read their expressions well: Antefalken and Rupert seemed somewhat in shock and Tizzy seemed bored and, well, sort of like nothing unusual was going on.

A spark started between Talarius’ feet, and then it was a flame. By the point that the knight realized there was a fire at his feet, the fire had turned into a ring that began expanding between he feet. It looked like empty space below, well empty except for a few balls of fire.

“Talarius?” The knight looked to Tom. “Time for a vacation! Off you go…into the Abyss!”

With that, the hole widened and Talarius fell through it screaming. It was going to be a long way down. Tom gestured to his friends. “Make sure he doesn’t hit ground, OK?” Rupert laughed and dove in followed by Antefalken and Tizzy. Tom began quickly pulling his mana net out of the priests and Rod members he had infiltrated.

Tom turned to Barabus and Iskerus and said. “Don’t worry; I’ll try to keep him safe.” They simply stared at Tom in even more shock. Tom reeled in the last of himself, took a last gulp of super mana and then severed the links, all of them, yanking his links back, pulling the holy arrows along with them into his two hands. He didn’t want anyone following them back into the Abyss. With that, the naked human looking demon stepped over the gaping hole to hell and let himself fall through into the Abyss.

The hole shrunk and closed behind him.

The Demons of Astlan continue in Volume II:

The Heavenly Host.





